10-K 1 so10-k12312018.htm 10-K
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
þ ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
 For the Fiscal Year Ended December 31, 2018
 
OR
¨ TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
 For the Transition Period from              to             
Commission
File NumberRegistrant, State of Incorporation,
Address and Telephone NumberI.R.S. Employer
Identification No.
1-3526 The Southern Company 58-0690070
 (A Delaware Corporation)  
 30 Ivan Allen Jr. Boulevard, N.W.  
 Atlanta, Georgia 30308  
 (404) 506-5000  
1-3164 Alabama Power Company 63-0004250
 (An Alabama Corporation)  
 600 North 18th Street  
 Birmingham, Alabama 35291  
 (205) 257-1000  
1-6468 Georgia Power Company 58-0257110
 (A Georgia Corporation)  
 241 Ralph McGill Boulevard, N.E.  
 Atlanta, Georgia 30308  
 (404) 506-6526  
001-11229 Mississippi Power Company 64-0205820
 (A Mississippi Corporation)  
 2992 West Beach Boulevard  
 Gulfport, Mississippi 39501  
 (228) 864-1211  
001-37803 Southern Power Company 58-2598670
 (A Delaware Corporation)  
 30 Ivan Allen Jr. Boulevard, N.W.  
 Atlanta, Georgia 30308  
 (404) 506-5000  
1-14174 Southern Company Gas 58-2210952
 (A Georgia Corporation)  
 Ten Peachtree Place, N.E.  
 Atlanta, Georgia 30309  
 (404) 584-4000  
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:(1) 
Each of the following classes or series of securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act is listed on the New York Stock
Exchange.
Title of each class Registrant
Common Stock, $5 par value The Southern Company
 
Junior Subordinated Notes, $25 denominations
6.25% Series 2015A due 2075
5.25% Series 2016A due 2076
5.25% Series 2017B due 2077
 
 
Class A preferred stock, cumulative, $25 stated
capital Alabama Power Company
5.00% Series
 
 
Junior Subordinated Notes, $25 denominations Georgia Power Company
5.00% Series 2017A due 2077
 
 
Senior Notes Southern Power Company
1.000% Series 2016A due 2022
1.850% Series 2016B due 2026
 
 
 Securities registered pursuant
to Section 12(g) of the Act:(1)
 
Title of each class Registrant
Preferred stock, cumulative, $100 par value Alabama Power Company
4.20% Series                                      4.60% Series 4.72% Series        
4.52% Series                                      4.64% Series 4.92% Series        
 
(1)At December 31, 2018.
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Registrant Yes No
The Southern Company X
Alabama Power Company X
Georgia Power Company X
Mississippi Power Company  X
Southern Power Company X
Southern Company Gas X
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ¨ No x
(Response applicable to all registrants.)
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants (1) have filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrants were required to file such
reports), and (2) have been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes x No ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants have submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrants were
required to submit such files). Yes x No ¨
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will
not be contained, to the best of registrants' knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in
Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of "large accelerated filer," "accelerated filer," "smaller
reporting company," and "emerging growth company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
 
RegistrantLarge
Accelerated
FilerAccelerated
FilerNon-accelerated
FilerSmaller
Reporting
CompanyEmerging
Growth
Company
The Southern Company X   
Alabama Power Company   X  
Georgia Power Company   X  
Mississippi Power Company   X  
Southern Power Company   X  
Southern Company Gas   X  
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ¨ No x
(Response applicable to all registrants.)
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Aggregate market value of The Southern Company's common stock held by non-affiliates of The Southern Company at June 29,
2018: $47.0 billion. All of the common stock of the other registrants is held by The Southern Company. A description of each
registrant's common stock follows:
Registrant  Description of
Common Stock  Shares Outstanding at
January 31, 2019
The Southern Company  Par Value $5 Per Share  1,034,564,279
Alabama Power Company  Par Value $40 Per Share  30,537,500
Georgia Power Company  Without Par Value  9,261,500
Mississippi Power Company  Without Par Value  1,121,000
Southern Power Company  Par Value $0.01 Per Share  1,000
Southern Company Gas  Par Value $0.01 Per Share  100
Documents incorporated by reference: specified portions of The Southern Company's Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A
relating to the 2019 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference into PART III. In addition, specified portions of
the Definitive Information Statement on Schedule 14C of Alabama Power Company relating to its 2019 Annual Meeting of
Shareholders are incorporated by reference into PART III.
Each of Georgia Power Company, Mississippi Power Company, Southern Power Company, and Southern Company Gas meets the
conditions set forth in General Instructions I(1)(a) and (b) of Form 10-K and is therefore filing this Form 10-K with the reduced
disclosure format specified in General Instructions I(2)(b), (c), and (d) of Form 10-K.
This combined Form 10-K is separately filed by The Southern Company, Alabama Power Company, Georgia Power Company,
Mississippi Power Company, Southern Power Company, and Southern Company Gas. Information contained herein relating to any
individual company is filed by such company on its own behalf. Each company makes no representation as to information relating
to the other companies.
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Table of Contents
  Page
 PART I
Item 1 Business I-1
 The Southern Company System I-2
 Construction Programs I-8
 Financing Programs I-9
 Fuel Supply I-9
 Territory Served by the Southern Company System I-10
 Competition I-12
 Seasonality I-13
 Regulation I-13
 Rate Matters I-15
 Employee Relations I-17
Item 1A Risk Factors I-19
Item 1B Unresolved Staff Comments I-37
Item 2 Properties I-38
Item 3 Legal Proceedings I-46
Item 4 Mine Safety Disclosures I-46
 Executive Officers of Southern Company I-47
 Executive Officers of Alabama Power I-49
 PART II
Item 5 Market for Registrants' Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities II-1
Item 6 Selected Financial Data II-2
Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations II-15
Item 7A Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk II-213
Item 8 Financial Statements and Supplementary Data II-214
Item 9 Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure II-433
Item 9A Controls and Procedures II-433
Item 9B Other Information II-440
 PART III
Item 10 Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance III-1
Item 11 Executive Compensation III-1
Item 12 Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder MattersIII-1
Item 13 Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence III-1
Item 14 Principal Accountant Fees and Services III-2
 PART IV
Item 15 Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules IV-1
Item 16 Form 10-K Summary IV-1
 Signatures
i
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
When used in this Form 10-K, the following terms will have the meanings indicated.
Term Meaning
2013 ARP Alternative Rate Plan approved by the Georgia PSC in 2013 for Georgia Power for the years 2014
through 2016 and subsequently extended through 2019
AFUDC Allowance for funds used during construction
Alabama Power Alabama Power Company
AMEA Alabama Municipal Electric Authority
AOCI Accumulated other comprehensive income
ARO Asset retirement obligation
ASC Accounting Standards Codification
ASU Accounting Standards Update
Atlanta Gas Light Atlanta Gas Light Company, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Atlantic Coast Pipeline Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC, a joint venture to construct and operate a natural gas pipeline in which
Southern Company Gas has a 5% ownership interest
Bcf Billion cubic feet
Bechtel Bechtel Power Corporation, the primary contractor for the remaining construction activities for Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4
Bechtel Agreement The October 23, 2017 construction completion agreement between the Vogtle Owners and Bechtel
CCR Coal combustion residuals
CCR Rule Disposal of Coal Combustion Residuals from Electric Utilities final rule published by the EPA in
2015
Chattanooga Gas Chattanooga Gas Company, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Clean Air Act Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990
CO2 Carbon dioxide
COD Commercial operation date
Contractor Settlement
AgreementThe December 31, 2015 agreement between Westinghouse and the Vogtle Owners resolving disputes
between the Vogtle Owners and the EPC Contractor under the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement
Cooperative Energy Electric cooperative in Mississippi
CPCN Certificate of public convenience and necessity
Customer Refunds Refunds issued to Georgia Power customers in 2018 as ordered by the Georgia PSC related to the
Guarantee Settlement Agreement
CWIP Construction work in progress
Dalton City of Dalton, Georgia, an incorporated municipality in the State of Georgia, acting by and through
its Board of Water, Light, and Sinking Fund Commissioners
Dalton Pipeline A pipeline facility in Georgia in which Southern Company Gas has a 50% undivided ownership
interest
DOE U.S. Department of Energy
Duke Energy Florida Duke Energy Florida, LLC
EBIT Earnings before interest and taxes
ECM Mississippi Power's energy cost management clause
ECO Plan Mississippi Power's environmental compliance overview plan
Eligible Project Costs Certain costs of construction relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 that are eligible for financing
under the loan guarantee program established under Title XVII of the Energy Policy Act of 2005
EMC Electric membership corporation
EPA U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
EPC Contractor Westinghouse and its affiliate, WECTEC Global Project Services Inc.; the former engineering,
procurement, and construction contractor for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
ii
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
(continued)
Term Meaning
FASB Financial Accounting Standards Board
FERC Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
FFB Federal Financing Bank
Fitch Fitch Ratings, Inc.
FMPA Florida Municipal Power Agency
GAAP U.S. generally accepted accounting principles
Georgia Power Georgia Power Company
Georgia Power 2019 Base
Rate CaseGeorgia Power's base rate case scheduled to be filed by July 1, 2019
Georgia Power Tax Reform
Settlement AgreementA settlement agreement between Georgia Power and the staff of the Georgia PSC regarding the retail
rate impact of the Tax Reform Legislation, as approved by the Georgia PSC on April 3, 2018
GHG Greenhouse gas
Guarantee Settlement
AgreementThe June 9, 2017 settlement agreement between the Vogtle Owners and Toshiba related to certain
payment obligations of the EPC Contractor guaranteed by Toshiba
Gulf Power Gulf Power Company
Heating Degree Days A measure of weather, calculated when the average daily temperatures are less than 65 degrees
Fahrenheit
Heating Season The period from November through March when Southern Company Gas' natural gas usage and
operating revenues are generally higher
HLBV Hypothetical liquidation at book value
Horizon Pipeline Horizon Pipeline Company, LLC
IBEW International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers
IGCC Integrated coal gasification combined cycle, the technology originally approved for Mississippi
Power's Kemper County energy facility (Plant Ratcliffe)
IIC Intercompany Interchange Contract
Illinois Commission Illinois Commerce Commission
Interim Assessment
AgreementAgreement entered into by the Vogtle Owners and the EPC Contractor to allow construction to
continue after the EPC Contractor's bankruptcy filing
Internal Revenue Code Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended
IPP Independent Power Producer
IRP Integrated Resource Plan
IRS Internal Revenue Service
ITAAC Inspections, Tests, Analyses, and Acceptance Criteria, standards established by the NRC
ITC Investment tax credit
JEA Jacksonville Electric Authority
KUA Kissimmee Utility Authority
KW Kilowatt
KWH Kilowatt-hour
LIBOR London Interbank Offered Rate
LIFO Last-in, first-out
LNG Liquefied natural gas
Loan Guarantee AgreementLoan guarantee agreement entered into by Georgia Power with the DOE in 2014, under which the
proceeds of borrowings may be used to reimburse Georgia Power for Eligible Project Costs incurred
in connection with its construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
LOCOM Lower of weighted average cost or current market price
LTSA Long-term service agreement
Marketers Marketers selling retail natural gas in Georgia and certificated by the Georgia PSC
iii
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
(continued)
Term Meaning
MEAG Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia
Merger The merger, effective July 1, 2016, of a wholly-owned, direct subsidiary of Southern Company with
and into Southern Company Gas, with Southern Company Gas continuing as the surviving
corporation
MGP Manufactured gas plant
Mississippi Power Mississippi Power Company
mmBtu Million British thermal units
Moody's Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
MPUS Mississippi Public Utilities Staff
MRA Municipal and Rural Associations
MW Megawatt
MWH Megawatt hour
natural gas distribution
utilitiesSouthern Company Gas' natural gas distribution utilities (Nicor Gas, Atlanta Gas Light, Virginia
Natural Gas, Elizabethtown Gas, Florida City Gas, Chattanooga Gas, and Elkton Gas as of June 30,
2018) (Nicor Gas, Atlanta Gas Light, Virginia Natural Gas, and Chattanooga Gas as of July 29,
2018)
NCCR Georgia Power's Nuclear Construction Cost Recovery
NDR Alabama Power's Natural Disaster Reserve
NextEra Energy NextEra Energy, Inc.
Nicor Gas Northern Illinois Gas Company, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
NOX Nitrogen oxide
NRC U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission
NYMEX New York Mercantile Exchange, Inc.
NYSE New York Stock Exchange
OCI Other comprehensive income
OPC Oglethorpe Power Corporation (an Electric Membership Corporation)
OTC Over-the-counter
OUC Orlando Utilities Commission
PATH Act Protecting Americans from Tax Hikes Act
PennEast Pipeline PennEast Pipeline Company, LLC, a joint venture to construct and operate a natural gas pipeline in
which Southern Company Gas has a 20% ownership interest
PEP Mississippi Power's Performance Evaluation Plan
Piedmont Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
Pivotal Home Solutions Nicor Energy Services Company, until June 4, 2018 a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern
Company Gas, doing business as Pivotal Home Solutions
Pivotal Utility Holdings Pivotal Utility Holdings, Inc., until July 29, 2018 a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company
Gas, doing business as Elizabethtown Gas (until July 1, 2018), Elkton Gas (until July 1, 2018), and
Florida City Gas
power pool The operating arrangement whereby the integrated generating resources of the traditional electric
operating companies and Southern Power (excluding subsidiaries) are subject to joint commitment
and dispatch in order to serve their combined load obligations
PowerSecure PowerSecure Inc.
PowerSouth PowerSouth Energy Cooperative
PPA Power purchase agreements, as well as, for Southern Power, contracts for differences that provide
the owner of a renewable facility a certain fixed price for the electricity sold to the grid
PRP Pipeline Replacement Program, Atlanta Gas Light's 15-year infrastructure replacement program,
which ended in December 2013
PSC Public Service Commission
PTC Production tax credit
iv
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
(continued)
Term Meaning
Rate CNP Alabama Power's Rate Certificated New Plant
Rate CNP Compliance Alabama Power's Rate Certificated New Plant Compliance
Rate CNP PPA Alabama Power's Rate Certificated New Plant Power Purchase Agreement
Rate ECR Alabama Power's Rate Energy Cost Recovery
Rate NDR Alabama Power's Rate Natural Disaster Reserve
Rate RSE Alabama Power's Rate Stabilization and Equalization
registrants Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company,
and Southern Company Gas
revenue from contracts with
customersRevenue from contracts accounted for under the guidance of ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts
with Customers
ROE Return on equity
RUS Rural Utilities Service
S&P S&P Global Ratings, a division of S&P Global Inc.
SCS Southern Company Services, Inc. (the Southern Company system service company)
SEC U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
SEGCO Southern Electric Generating Company
SEPA Southeastern Power Administration
Sequent Sequent Energy Management, L.P.
SERC Southeastern Electric Reliability Council
SNG Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C.
SO2 Sulfur dioxide
Southern Company The Southern Company
Southern Company Gas Southern Company Gas and its subsidiaries
Southern Company Gas
Capital Southern Company Gas Capital Corporation, a 100%-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas
DispositionsSouthern Company Gas' disposition of Pivotal Home Solutions, Pivotal Utility Holdings' disposition
of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, and NUI Corporation's disposition of Pivotal Utility
Holdings, which primarily consisted of Florida City Gas
Southern Company system Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, Southern
Company Gas (as of July 1, 2016), SEGCO, Southern Nuclear, SCS, Southern Linc, PowerSecure
(as of May 9, 2016), and other subsidiaries
Southern Holdings Southern Company Holdings, Inc.
Southern Linc Southern Communications Services, Inc.
Southern Nuclear Southern Nuclear Operating Company, Inc.
Southern Power Southern Power Company and its subsidiaries
SouthStar SouthStar Energy Services, LLC
SP Solar SP Solar Holdings I, LP
SP Wind SP Wind Holdings II, LLC
SRR Mississippi Power's System Restoration Rider, a tariff for retail property damage reserve
STRIDE Atlanta Gas Light's Strategic Infrastructure Development and Enhancement program
Subsidiary Registrants Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas
Tax Reform Legislation The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, which became effective on January 1, 2018
Toshiba Toshiba Corporation, parent company of Westinghouse
traditional electric operating
companiesAlabama Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, and Mississippi Power through December 31, 2018;
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power as of January 1, 2019
Triton Triton Container Investments, LLC
v
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
DEFINITIONS
(continued)
Term Meaning
VCM Vogtle Construction Monitoring
VIE Variable interest entity
Virginia Commission Virginia State Corporation Commission
Virginia Natural Gas Virginia Natural Gas, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas
Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement Agreement entered into with the EPC Contractor in 2008 by Georgia Power, acting for itself and as
agent for the Vogtle Owners, and rejected in bankruptcy in July 2017, pursuant to which the EPC
Contractor agreed to design, engineer, procure, construct, and test Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
Vogtle Owners Georgia Power, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, MEAG, and Dalton
Vogtle Services AgreementThe June 9, 2017 services agreement between the Vogtle Owners and the EPC Contractor, as
amended and restated on July 20, 2017, for the EPC Contractor to transition construction
management of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to Southern Nuclear and to provide ongoing design,
engineering, and procurement services to Southern Nuclear
WACOG Weighted average cost of gas
Westinghouse Westinghouse Electric Company LLC
vi
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements include, among other things,
statements concerning regulated rates, the strategic goals for the business, customer and sales growth, economic conditions, fuel
and environmental cost recovery and other rate actions, projected equity ratios, current and proposed environmental regulations and
related compliance plans and estimated expenditures, pending or potential litigation matters, access to sources of capital,
projections for the qualified pension plans, postretirement benefit plans, and nuclear decommissioning trust fund contributions,
financing activities, completion dates of construction projects, completion of announced dispositions, filings with state and federal
regulatory authorities, federal and state income tax benefits, estimated sales and purchases under power sale and purchase
agreements, and estimated construction plans and expenditures. In some cases, forward-looking statements can be identified by
terminology such as "may," "will," "could," "would," "should," "expects," "plans," "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "projects,"
"predicts," "potential," or "continue" or the negative of these terms or other similar terminology. There are various factors that
could cause actual results to differ materially from those suggested by the forward-looking statements; accordingly, there can be no
assurance that such indicated results will be realized. These factors include:
• the impact of recent and future federal and state regulatory changes, including environmental laws and regulations, and also
changes in tax (including the Tax Reform Legislation) and other laws and regulations to which Southern Company and its
subsidiaries are subject, as well as changes in application of existing laws and regulations;
• the extent and timing of costs and liabilities to comply with federal and state laws, regulations, and legal requirements
related to CCR, including amounts for required closure of ash ponds and ground water monitoring;
• current and future litigation or regulatory investigations, proceedings, or inquiries, including litigation and other disputes
related to the Kemper County energy facility;
• the effects, extent, and timing of the entry of additional competition in the markets in which Southern Company's
subsidiaries operate, including from the development and deployment of alternative energy sources;
• variations in demand for electricity and natural gas;
• available sources and costs of natural gas and other fuels;
• the ability to complete necessary or desirable pipeline expansion or infrastructure projects, limits on pipeline capacity, and
operational interruptions to natural gas distribution and transmission activities;
• transmission constraints;
• effects of inflation;
• the ability to control costs and avoid cost and schedule overruns during the development, construction, and operation of
facilities, including Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 which includes components based on new technology that only recently began
initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale, including changes in labor costs, availability, and productivity;
challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, or vendors; adverse weather conditions; shortages, increased
costs, or inconsistent quality of equipment, materials, and labor; contractor or supplier delay; non-performance under
construction, operating, or other agreements; operational readiness, including specialized operator training and required site
safety programs; engineering or design problems; design and other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely
resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC; challenges with start-up activities, including major equipment
failure and system integration; and/or operational performance;
• the ability to construct facilities in accordance with the requirements of permits and licenses (including satisfaction of NRC
requirements), to satisfy any environmental performance standards and the requirements of tax credits and other incentives,
and to integrate facilities into the Southern Company system upon completion of construction;
• investment performance of the employee and retiree benefit plans and nuclear decommissioning trust funds;
• advances in technology;
• the ability to control operating and maintenance costs;
• ongoing renewable energy partnerships and development agreements;
• state and federal rate regulations and the impact of pending and future rate cases and negotiations, including rate actions
relating to ROE, equity ratios, and fuel and other cost recovery mechanisms;
vii
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
(continued)
• the ability to successfully operate the electric utilities' generating, transmission, and distribution facilities and Southern
Company Gas' natural gas distribution and storage facilities and the successful performance of necessary corporate
functions;
• legal proceedings and regulatory approvals and actions related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, including Georgia PSC
approvals and NRC actions;
• under certain specified circumstances, a decision by holders of more than 10% of the ownership interests of Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 not to proceed with construction and the ability of other Vogtle Owners to tender a portion of their ownership
interests to Georgia Power following certain construction cost increases;
• in the event Georgia Power becomes obligated to provide funding to MEAG with respect to the portion of MEAG's
ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 involving JEA, any inability of Georgia Power to receive repayment of such
funding;
• the inherent risks involved in operating and constructing nuclear generating facilities;
• the inherent risks involved in transporting and storing natural gas;
• the performance of projects undertaken by the non-utility businesses and the success of efforts to invest in and develop new
opportunities;
• internal restructuring or other restructuring options that may be pursued;
• potential business strategies, including acquisitions or dispositions of assets or businesses, including the proposed disposition
of Plant Mankato, which cannot be assured to be completed or beneficial to Southern Company or its subsidiaries;
• the ability of counterparties of Southern Company and its subsidiaries to make payments as and when due and to perform as
required;
• the ability to obtain new short- and long-term contracts with wholesale customers;
• the direct or indirect effect on the Southern Company system's business resulting from cyber intrusion or physical attack and
the threat of physical attacks;
• interest rate fluctuations and financial market conditions and the results of financing efforts;
• access to capital markets and other financing sources;
• changes in Southern Company's and any of its subsidiaries' credit ratings;
• the ability of Southern Company's electric utilities to obtain additional generating capacity (or sell excess generating
capacity) at competitive prices;
• catastrophic events such as fires, earthquakes, explosions, floods, tornadoes, hurricanes and other storms, droughts,
pandemic health events, or other similar occurrences;
• the direct or indirect effects on the Southern Company system's business resulting from incidents affecting the U.S. electric
grid, natural gas pipeline infrastructure, or operation of generating or storage resources;
• impairments of goodwill or long-lived assets;
• the effect of accounting pronouncements issued periodically by standard-setting bodies; and
• other factors discussed elsewhere herein and in other reports filed by the registrants from time to time with the SEC.
The registrants expressly disclaim any obligation to update any forward-looking statements.
viii
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
PART I
Item 1.BUSINESS
Southern Company was incorporated under the laws of Delaware on November 9, 1945. Southern Company owns all of the
outstanding common stock of Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power, each of which is an operating public utility
company. The traditional electric operating companies supply electric service in the states of Alabama, Georgia, and Mississippi.
More particular information relating to each of the traditional electric operating companies is as follows:
Alabama Power is a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Alabama on November 10, 1927, by the consolidation
of a predecessor Alabama Power Company, Gulf Electric Company, and Houston Power Company. The predecessor Alabama
Power Company had been in continuous existence since its incorporation in 1906.
Georgia Power was incorporated under the laws of the State of Georgia on June 26, 1930.
Mississippi Power was incorporated under the laws of the State of Mississippi on July 12, 1972 and effective December 21,
1972, by the merger into it of the predecessor Mississippi Power Company, succeeded to the business and properties of the latter
company. The predecessor Mississippi Power Company was incorporated under the laws of the State of Maine on November 24,
1924.
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed its sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy for an aggregate cash purchase price
of approximately $5.8 billion (less $1.3 billion of indebtedness assumed), subject to customary working capital adjustments. Gulf
Power is an electric utility serving retail customers in the northwestern portion of Florida. See Note 15 to the financial statements
under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
In addition, Southern Company owns all of the common stock of Southern Power Company, which is also an operating public
utility company. The term "Southern Power" when used herein refers to Southern Power Company and its subsidiaries, while the
term "Southern Power Company" when used herein refers only to the Southern Power parent company. Southern Power develops,
constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy projects, and sells electricity at
market-based rates in the wholesale market. Southern Power Company is a corporation organized under the laws of Delaware on
January 8, 2001. On May 22, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership
indirectly owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, for approximately $1.2 billion and, on December 11, 2018,
Southern Power sold a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, a holding company owning a portfolio of eight operating wind
facilities, for approximately $1.2 billion. Southern Power also sold all of its equity interests in Plant Oleander and Plant Stanton
Unit A (together, the Florida Plants) to NextEra Energy on December 4, 2018 for $203 million. On November 5, 2018, Southern
Power entered into an agreement to sell all of its equity interests in Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion currently
under construction) for approximately $650 million. The transaction is subject to FERC and state commission approvals and is
expected to close mid-2019. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time. See "The Southern Company
System – Southern Power" herein and Note 15 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Southern Company acquired all of the common stock of Southern Company Gas in July 2016. Southern Company Gas is an energy
services holding company whose primary business is the distribution of natural gas in four states - Illinois, Georgia, Virginia, and
Tennessee - through the natural gas distribution utilities. Southern Company Gas is also involved in several other businesses that
are complementary to the distribution of natural gas. Southern Company Gas was incorporated under the laws of the State of
Georgia on November 27, 1995 for the primary purpose of becoming the holding company for Atlanta Gas Light, which was
founded in 1856. In July 2018, Southern Company Gas completed sales of three of its natural gas distribution utilities
(Elizabethtown Gas, Florida City Gas, and Elkton Gas). In June 2018, Southern Company Gas also completed the sale of Pivotal
Home Solutions, which provided home equipment protection products and services. See "The Southern Company System –
Southern Company Gas" herein and Note 15 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Southern Company also owns all of the outstanding common stock or membership interests of SCS, Southern Linc, Southern
Holdings, Southern Nuclear, PowerSecure, and other direct and indirect subsidiaries. SCS, the system service company, has
contracted with Southern Company, each traditional electric operating company, Southern Power, Southern Company Gas,
Southern Nuclear, SEGCO, and other subsidiaries to furnish, at direct or allocated cost and upon request, the following services:
general executive and advisory, general and design engineering, operations, purchasing, accounting, finance, treasury, legal, tax,
information technology, marketing, auditing, insurance and pension administration, human resources, systems and procedures,
digital wireless communications, cellular tower space, and other services with respect to business and operations, construction
management, and power pool transactions. Southern Linc provides digital wireless communications for use by Southern Company
and its subsidiary companies and also markets these services to the public and provides fiber optics services within the Southeast.
Southern Holdings is an intermediate holding company subsidiary, primarily for Southern Company's investments in leveraged
leases and energy-related funds and companies, and for other electric and natural gas products and
I-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
services. Southern Nuclear operates and provides services to the Southern Company system's nuclear power plants and is currently
managing construction of and developing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which are co-owned by Georgia Power. PowerSecure is a
provider of energy solutions, including distributed energy infrastructure, energy efficiency products and services, and utility
infrastructure services, to customers.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power each own 50% of the outstanding common stock of SEGCO. SEGCO is an operating public
utility company that owns electric generating units with an aggregate capacity of 1,020 MWs at Plant Gaston on the Coosa River
near Wilsonville, Alabama. Alabama Power and Georgia Power are each entitled to one-half of SEGCO's capacity and energy.
Alabama Power acts as SEGCO's agent in the operation of SEGCO's units and furnishes fuel to SEGCO for its units. See Note 7 to
the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Segment information for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas is included in Note 16 to the financial statements in Item
8 herein.
The registrants' Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and any
amendments to those reports are made available on Southern Company's website, free of charge, as soon as reasonably practicable
after such material is electronically filed with or furnished to the SEC. Southern Company's internet address is
www.southerncompany.com.
The Southern Company System
Traditional Electric Operating Companies
The traditional electric operating companies are vertically integrated utilities that own generation, transmission, and distribution
facilities. See PROPERTIES in Item 2 herein for additional information on the traditional electric operating companies' generating
facilities. Each company's transmission facilities are connected to the respective company's own generating plants and other sources
of power (including certain generating plants owned by Southern Power) and are interconnected with the transmission facilities of
the other traditional electric operating companies and SEGCO. For information on the State of Georgia's integrated transmission
system, see "Territory Served by the Southern Company System – Traditional Electric Operating Companies and Southern Power"
herein.
Agreements in effect with principal neighboring utility systems provide for capacity and energy transactions that may be entered
into from time to time for reasons related to reliability or economics. Additionally, the traditional electric operating companies have
entered into various reliability agreements with certain neighboring utilities, each of which provides for the establishment and
periodic review of principles and procedures for planning and operation of generation and transmission facilities, maintenance
schedules, load retention programs, emergency operations, and other matters affecting the reliability of bulk power supply. The
traditional electric operating companies have joined with other utilities in the Southeast to form the SERC to augment further the
reliability and adequacy of bulk power supply. Through the SERC, the traditional electric operating companies are represented on
the North American Electric Reliability Council.
The utility assets of the traditional electric operating companies and certain utility assets of Southern Power Company are operated
as a single integrated electric system, or power pool, pursuant to the IIC. Activities under the IIC are administered by SCS, which
acts as agent for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power Company. The fundamental purpose of the power
pool is to provide for the coordinated operation of the electric facilities in an effort to achieve the maximum possible economies
consistent with the highest practicable reliability of service. Subject to service requirements and other operating limitations, system
resources are committed and controlled through the application of centralized economic dispatch. Under the IIC, each traditional
electric operating company and Southern Power Company retains its lowest cost energy resources for the benefit of its own
customers and delivers any excess energy to the power pool for use in serving customers of other traditional electric operating
companies or Southern Power Company or for sale by the power pool to third parties. The IIC provides for the recovery of
specified costs associated with the affiliated operations thereunder, as well as the proportionate sharing of costs and revenues
resulting from power pool transactions with third parties. In connection with the sale of Gulf Power, an appendix was added to the
IIC setting forth terms and conditions governing Gulf Power's continued participation in the IIC for a defined transition period that,
subject to certain potential adjustments, is scheduled to end on January 1, 2024.
Southern Power and Southern Linc have secured from the traditional electric operating companies certain services which are
furnished in compliance with FERC regulations.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power each have agreements with Southern Nuclear to operate the Southern Company system's
existing nuclear plants, Plants Farley, Hatch, and Vogtle. In addition, Georgia Power has an agreement with Southern Nuclear to
develop, license, construct, and operate Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See "Regulation – Nuclear Regulation" herein for additional
information.
I-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Southern Power
Southern Power develops, constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy facilities,
and sells electricity at market-based rates (under authority from the FERC) in the wholesale market. Southern Power continually
seeks opportunities to execute its strategy to create value through various transactions including acquisitions, dispositions, and sales
of partnership interests, development and construction of new generating facilities, and entry into PPAs primarily with investor-
owned utilities, IPPs, municipalities, electric cooperatives, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial
customers. Southern Power's business activities are not subject to traditional state regulation like the traditional electric operating
companies, but the majority of its business activities are subject to regulation by the FERC. Southern Power has attempted to
insulate itself from significant fuel supply, fuel transportation, and electric transmission risks by generally making such risks the
responsibility of the counterparties to its PPAs. However, Southern Power's future earnings will depend on the parameters of the
wholesale market and the efficient operation of its wholesale generating assets, as well as Southern Power's ability to execute its
growth strategy and to develop and construct generating facilities. For additional information on Southern Power's business
activities, see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – OVERVIEW – "Business Activities" of Southern Power in
Item 7 herein.
Southern Power Company directly owns and manages generation assets primarily in the Southeast, which are included in the power
pool, and has various subsidiaries, which were created to own and operate natural gas and renewable generation facilities either
wholly or in partnership with various third parties. At December 31, 2018, Southern Power's generation fleet, which is owned in
part with its various partners, totaled 11,888 MWs of nameplate capacity in commercial operation (including 4,508 MWs of
nameplate capacity owned by its subsidiaries and including Plant Mankato, which is classified as held for sale in the financial
statements). In addition, Southern Power Company has other subsidiaries that are pursuing additional natural gas generation and
other renewable generation development opportunities. The generation assets of Southern Power Company's subsidiaries are not
included in the power pool.
On May 22, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership indirectly owning
substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities. On December 11, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling tax equity
interest in SP Wind, a holding company which owns a portfolio of eight operating wind farms.
In addition, on December 4, 2018, Southern Power sold all of its equity interests in the Florida Plants and, in November 2018,
entered into an agreement to sell Plant Mankato. The completion of the disposition of Plant Mankato is subject to the expansion
unit reaching commercial operation as well as various other customary conditions to closing, including FERC and state commission
approvals, and is expected to close mid-2019. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
A majority of Southern Power's partnerships in renewable facilities allow for the sharing of cash distributions and tax benefits at
differing percentages, with Southern Power being the controlling member and thus consolidating the assets and operations of the
partnerships. At December 31, 2018, Southern Power has three tax-equity partnership arrangements where the tax-equity investors
receive substantially all of the tax benefits, including ITCs and PTCs. In addition, Southern Power holds controlling interests in
eight partnerships in solar facilities through SP Solar. For seven of these solar partnerships, Southern Power and its new 33%
partner, Global Atlantic, are entitled to 51% of all cash distributions and the respective partner that holds the Class B membership
interests is entitled to 49% of all cash distributions. For the Desert Stateline partnership, Southern Power and Global Atlantic are
entitled to 66% of all cash distributions and the Class B member is entitled to 34% of all cash distributions. In addition, Southern
Power and Global Atlantic are entitled to substantially all of the federal tax benefits with respect to these eight partnership entities.
Finally, for the Roserock partnership, Southern Power is entitled to 51% of all cash distributions and substantially all of the federal
tax benefits, with the Class B member entitled to 49% of all cash distributions.
See PROPERTIES in Item 2 herein and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" in Item 8 herein for additional
information regarding Southern Power's acquisitions, dispositions, construction, and development projects.
Southern Power calculates an investment coverage ratio for its generating assets based on the ratio of investment under contract to
total investment using the respective generation facilities' net book value (or expected in-service value for facilities under
construction or being acquired) as the investment amount. With the inclusion of investments associated with the wind and natural
gas facilities currently under construction, as well as other capacity and energy contracts, Southern Power has an average
investment coverage ratio, at December 31, 2018, of 93% through 2023 and 91% through 2028, with an average remaining contract
duration of approximately 14 years (including Plant Mankato, which is classified as held for sale in the financial statements).
Southern Power's natural gas and biomass sales are primarily through long-term PPAs that consist of two types of agreements. The
first type, referred to as a unit or block sale, is a customer purchase from a dedicated plant unit where all or a portion of the
generation from that unit is reserved for that customer. Southern Power typically has the ability to serve the unit or block sale
customer from an alternate resource. The second type, referred to as requirements service, provides that Southern Power serves
I-3
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
the customer's capacity and energy requirements from a combination of the customer's own generating units and from Southern
Power resources not dedicated to serve unit or block sales. Southern Power has rights to purchase power provided by the
requirements customers' resources when economically viable. Capacity charges that form part of the PPA payments are designed to
recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance costs based on dollars-per-kilowatt year and to provide a return on
investment.
Southern Power's electricity sales from solar and wind generating facilities are predominantly through long-term PPAs; however,
these solar and wind PPAs do not have a capacity charge and customers either purchase the energy output of a dedicated renewable
facility through an energy charge or provide Southern Power a certain fixed price for the electricity sold to the grid. As a result,
Southern Power's ability to recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance expenses is dependent upon the level of energy
generated from these facilities, which can be impacted by weather conditions, equipment performance, transmission constraints,
and other factors.
The following tables set forth Southern Power's PPAs as of December 31, 2018:
Block Sales PPAs
Facility/Source  Counterparty  MWs(1)   Contract Term
Addison Units 1 and 3  Georgia Power  297   through May 2030
Addison Unit 2  MEAG Power  149   through April 2029
Addison Unit 4  Georgia Energy Cooperative  146   through May 2030
Cleveland County Unit 1 North Carolina EMC (NCEMC)  90-180   through Dec. 2036
Cleveland County Unit 2  NCEMC  183   through Dec. 2036
Cleveland County Unit 3  North Carolina Municipal Power Agency 1 183   through Dec. 2031
Dahlberg Units 1, 3, and 5  Cobb EMC  224   through Dec. 2027
Dahlberg Units 2, 6, 8, and 10  Georgia Power  298   through May 2025
Dahlberg Unit 4  Georgia Power  74   through May 2030
Franklin Unit 1  Duke Energy Florida  434   through May 2021
Franklin Unit 2  Morgan Stanley Capital Group  250   through Dec. 2025
Franklin Unit 2  Jackson EMC  60-65   through Dec. 2035
Franklin Unit 2  GreyStone Power Corporation  35   through Dec. 2035
Franklin Unit 2  Cobb EMC  100   through Dec. 2027
Franklin Unit 3  Morgan Stanley Capital Group  200-300   through Dec. 2033
Franklin Unit 3  Dalton  70   through Dec. 2027
Franklin Unit 3  Dalton  16   through Dec. 2019
Harris Unit 1  Georgia Power  640   through May 2030
Harris Unit 2  Georgia Power  657   through May 2019
Harris Unit 2  AMEA(2) 25   through Dec. 2025
Mankato(3) Northern States Power Company  375   through July 2026
Mankato(3) Northern States Power Company  345   June 2019 – May 2039(4)
Nacogdoches  City of Austin, Texas  100   through May 2032
NCEMC PPA(5) EnergyUnited  100   through Dec. 2021
Rowan CT Unit 1  North Carolina Municipal Power Agency 1 150   through Dec. 2030
Rowan CT Units 2 and 3  EnergyUnited  100-175   Jan. 2022 – Dec. 2025
Rowan CT Unit 3  EnergyUnited  113   through Dec. 2023
Rowan CC Unit 4  EnergyUnited  23-328   through Dec. 2025
I-4
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Block Sales PPAs (continued)
Facility/Source  Counterparty  MWs(1)   Contract Term
Rowan CC Unit 4  Duke Energy Progress, LLC  150   through Dec. 2019
Rowan CC Unit 4  Macquarie  150-250   Jan. 2019 – Nov. 2020
Wansley Unit 6  Century Aluminum  158   Jan. 2019 – Dec. 2020
Wansley Unit 7  JEA(6) 200   through Dec. 2019
(1)The MWs and related facility units may change due to unit rating changes or assignment of units to contracts.
(2)AMEA will also be served by Plant Franklin Unit 1 through December 2019.
(3)On November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement with Northern States Power to sell all of its equity interests
in Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction). The ultimate outcome of this matter
cannot be determined at this time. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas
Plants" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(4)Subject to commercial operation of the 385-MW expansion project.
(5)Represents sale of power purchased from NCEMC under a PPA.
(6)JEA will also be served by Plant Wansley Unit 6 during 2019.
Requirements Services PPAs
Counterparty  MWs(1)Contract Term
Nine Georgia EMCs  294-376 through Dec. 2024
Sawnee EMC  267-639 through Dec. 2027
Cobb EMC  0-145 through Dec. 2027
Flint EMC  135-194 through Dec. 2024
Dalton  53-92 through Dec. 2027
EnergyUnited  78-159 through Dec. 2025
City of Blountstown, Florida  10 through April 2022
(1)Represents forecasted incremental capacity needs over the contract term.
Solar/Wind PPAs
Facility Counterparty MWs(1)Contract Term
Solar(2)  
Adobe Southern California Edison Company 20through June 2034
Apex Nevada Power Company 20through Dec. 2037
Boulder 1 Nevada Power Company 100through Dec. 2036
Butler Georgia Power 100through Dec. 2046
Butler Solar Farm Georgia Power 20through Feb. 2036
Calipatria San Diego Gas & Electric Company 20through Feb. 2036
Campo Verde San Diego Gas & Electric Company 139through Oct. 2033
Cimarron Tri-State Generation and Transmission Association, Inc. 30through Dec. 2035
Decatur County Georgia Power 19through Dec. 2035
Decatur Parkway Georgia Power 80through Dec. 2040
Desert Stateline Southern California Edison Company 300through Sept. 2036
East Pecos Austin Energy 119through April 2032
Garland A Southern California Edison Company 20through Sept. 2036
Garland Southern California Edison Company 180through Oct. 2031
Gaskell West 1 Southern California Edison Company 20through March 2038
Granville Duke Energy Progress, LLC 3through Oct. 2032
Henrietta Pacific Gas & Electric Company(3)100through Sept. 2036
Imperial Valley San Diego Gas & Electric Company 150through Nov. 2039
I-5
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Solar/Wind PPAs (continued)
Facility Counterparty MWs(1)Contract Term
Lamesa City of Garland, Texas 102through April 2032
Lost Hills Blackwell 99% to Pacific Gas & Electric Company(3) and 1% to City
of Roseville, California32through Dec. 2043
Macho Springs El Paso Electric Company 50through May 2034
Morelos Pacific Gas & Electric Company(3)15through Feb. 2036
North Star Pacific Gas & Electric Company(3)60through June 2035
Pawpaw Georgia Power 30through March 2046
Roserock Austin Energy 157through Nov. 2036
Rutherford Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC 75through Dec. 2031
Sandhills Cobb EMC 111through Oct. 2041
Sandhills Flint EMC 15through Oct. 2041
Sandhills Sawnee EMC 15through Oct. 2041
Sandhills Middle Georgia and Irwin EMC 2through Oct. 2041
Spectrum Nevada Power Company 30through Dec. 2038
Tranquillity Shell Energy North America (US), LP 204through Nov. 2019
Tranquillity Southern California Edison Company 204Dec. 2019 – Nov. 2034
Wind(4)  
Bethel Google Inc. 225through Jan. 2029
Cactus Flats General Mills, Inc. 98through July 2033
Cactus Flats General Motors Company 50through July 2030
Grant Plains Oklahoma Municipal Power Authority 41Jan. 2020 – Dec. 2039
Grant Plains Steelcase Inc. 25through Dec. 2028
Grant Plains Allianz Risk Transfer (Bermuda) Ltd. 81-122through March 2027
Grant Wind East Texas Electric Cooperative 50through April 2036
Grant Wind Northeast Texas Electric Cooperative 50through April 2036
Grant Wind Western Farmers Electric Cooperative 50through April 2036
Kay Wind Westar Energy Inc. 200through Dec. 2035
Kay Wind Grand River Dam Authority 99through Dec. 2035
Passadumkeag Western Massachusetts Electric Company 40through June 2031
Reading(5)Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd. 200April 2020 – March 2032
Salt Fork Wind City of Garland, Texas 150through Nov. 2030
Salt Fork Wind Salesforce.com, Inc. 24through Nov. 2028
Tyler Bluff Wind The Proctor & Gamble Company 96through Dec. 2028
Wake Wind Equinix Enterprises, Inc. 100through Oct. 2028
Wake Wind Owens Corning 125through Oct. 2028
Wildhorse(5)Arkansas Electric Cooperative Corporation 100Oct. 2019 – Sept. 2039
(1) MWs shown are for 100% of the PP A, which is based on demonstrated capacity of the facility .
(2) In May 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP  Solar (a limited partnership indirectly owning all of Southern
Power's solar facilities, except the Roserock and Gaskell West facilities). SP  Solar is the 51% majority owner of Boulder 1, Garland, Henrietta,
Imperial Valley , Lost Hills Blackwell, North Star , and Tranquillity; the 66% majority owner of Desert Stateline; and the sole owner of the
remaining SP  Solar facilities. Southern Power is the 51% majority owner of Roserock and also the controlling partner in a tax equity
partnership owning Gaskell West. All of these entities are consolidated subsidiaries of Southern Power .
(3) See Note 1 to the financial statements under " Revenues  – Concentration of Revenue " in Item 8 herein for additional information on Pacific
Gas & Electric Company's bankruptcy filing.
(4) In December 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP  Wind (which owns all of Southern Power's wind facilities,
except Cactus Flats and the two wind projects under construction, Reading and Wildhorse). SP  Wind is the 90.1% majority owner of Wake
Wind and owns 100% of the remaining SP  Wind facilities. Southern Power owns 100% of Reading and Wildhorse and is the controlling
partner in a tax equity partnership owning Cactus Flats. All of these entities are consolidated subsidiaries of Southern Power .
(5) Subject to commercial operation.
I-6
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
For the year ended December 31, 2018, approximately 9.8% of Southern Power's revenues were derived from Georgia Power.
Southern Power actively pursues replacement PPAs prior to the expiration of its current PPAs and anticipates that the revenues
attributable to one customer may be replaced by revenues from a new customer; however, the expiration of any of Southern Power's
current PPAs without the successful remarketing of a replacement PPA could have a material negative impact on Southern Power's
earnings but is not expected to have a material impact on Southern Company's earnings.
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas is an energy services holding company whose primary business is the distribution of natural gas through
the natural gas distribution utilities. Southern Company Gas is also involved in several other businesses that are complementary to
the distribution of natural gas, including gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services. During the
fourth quarter 2018, Southern Company Gas changed its reportable segments to further align with the way its new Chief Operating
Decision Maker reviews operating results and has reclassified prior years' data to conform to the new reportable segment
presentation. This change resulted in a new reportable segment, gas pipeline investments, which was formerly included in gas
midstream operations. Gas pipeline investments consists primarily of joint ventures in natural gas pipeline investments including a
50% interest in SNG, two significant pipeline construction projects, and a 50% joint ownership interest in the Dalton Pipeline. Gas
distribution operations, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services continue to remain as separate reportable segments and
reflect the impact of the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. The all other non-reportable segment includes segments below the
quantitative threshold for separate disclosure, including the storage and fuels operations that were formerly included in gas
midstream operations, and other subsidiaries that fall below the quantitative threshold for separate disclosure.
Gas distribution operations, the largest segment of Southern Company Gas' business, operates, constructs, and maintains
approximately 75,200 miles of natural gas pipelines and 14 storage facilities, with total capacity of 158 Bcf, to provide natural gas
to residential, commercial, and industrial customers. Gas distribution operations serves approximately 4.2 million customers across
four states.
On July 1, 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings, completed the sales of the assets of two of its
natural gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey Industries, Inc. On July 29, 2018, Southern
Company Gas and its wholly-owned direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the stock sale of Pivotal Utility Holdings,
which then primarily consisted of Florida City Gas, to NextEra Energy. The transactions raised approximately $2.3 billion in
proceeds. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Gas pipeline investments includes joint ventures in natural gas pipeline investments that enable the provision of diverse sources of
natural gas supplies to the customers of Southern Company Gas. SNG, the largest natural gas pipeline investment, is the owner of a
7,000-mile pipeline connecting natural gas supply basins in Texas, Louisiana, Mississippi, and Alabama to markets in Louisiana,
Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, Georgia, South Carolina, and Tennessee.
Wholesale gas services consists of Sequent and engages in natural gas storage and gas pipeline arbitrage and provides natural gas
asset management and related logistical services to most of the natural gas distribution utilities as well as non-affiliate companies.
Gas marketing services is comprised of SouthStar and provides natural gas commodity and related services to customers in
competitive markets or markets that provide for customer choice. SouthStar, serving approximately 697,000 natural gas commodity
customers, markets gas to residential, commercial, and industrial customers and offers energy-related products that provide natural
gas price stability and utility bill management.
On June 4, 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the stock sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water Enterprises LLC
for $365 million. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
Other Businesses
PowerSecure, which was acquired by Southern Company in 2016, provides energy solutions, including distributed energy
infrastructure, energy efficiency products and services, and utility infrastructure services, to customers.
Southern Holdings is an intermediate holding subsidiary, primarily for Southern Company's investments in leveraged leases and
energy-related funds and companies, and also for other electric and natural gas products and services.
Southern Linc provides digital wireless communications for use by Southern Company and its subsidiary companies and also
markets these services to the public. Southern Linc delivers multiple wireless communication options including push to talk,
cellular service, text messaging, wireless internet access, and wireless data. Its system covers approximately 127,000 square
I-7
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
miles in the Southeast. Southern Linc also provides fiber optics services within the Southeast through its subsidiary, Southern
Telecom, Inc.
These efforts to invest in and develop new business opportunities may offer potential returns exceeding those of rate-regulated
operations. However, these activities often involve a higher degree of risk.
Construction Programs
The subsidiary companies of Southern Company are engaged in continuous construction programs to accommodate existing and
estimated future loads on their respective systems. For estimated construction and environmental expenditures for the periods 2019
through 2023, see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY –
"Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" of each registrant in Item 7 herein. The Southern Company system's
construction program consists of capital investment and capital expenditures to comply with environmental laws and regulations. In
2019, the construction program is expected to be apportioned approximately as follows:
 Southern
Company
    system(a)(b)Alabama
Power(a)Georgia
Power(a)Mississippi
Power
 (in billions)
New generation $ 1.6$ —$ 1.6$ —
Environmental compliance(c)0.5 0.2 0.2 —
Generation maintenance 0.9 0.4 0.4 0.1
Transmission 1.0 0.3 0.6 —
Distribution 1.1 0.5 0.5 0.1
Nuclear fuel 0.2 0.1 0.1 —
General plant 0.5 0.2 0.2 —
 5.8 1.8 3.7 0.2
Southern Power(d)0.3
Southern Company Gas(e)1.6
Other subsidiaries 0.3
Total(a)$ 8.0$ 1.8$ 3.7$ 0.2
(a)Totals may not add due to rounding.
(b)Includes the Subsidiary Registrants, as well as the other subsidiaries. See "Other Businesses" herein for additional information.
(c)Reflects cost estimates for environmental regulations. These estimated expenditures do not include any potential compliance
costs associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions from fossil-fuel-fired electric generating units or costs associated
with ash pond closure and groundwater monitoring under the CCR Rule and the related state rules. See MANAGEMENT'S
DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and
Regulations" and FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" of
Southern Company and each traditional electric operating company in Item 7 herein for additional information.
(d)Excludes up to approximately $0.5 billion for planned expenditures for plant acquisitions and placeholder growth, which may
vary materially due to market opportunities and Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy.
(e)Includes costs for ongoing capital projects associated with infrastructure improvement programs for certain natural gas
distribution utilities that have been previously approved by their applicable state regulatory agencies. See MANAGEMENT'S
DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital
Projects" of Southern Company Gas in Item 7 herein for additional information.
The construction programs are subject to periodic review and revision, and actual construction costs may vary from these estimates
because of numerous factors. These factors include: changes in business conditions; changes in load projections; changes in
environmental laws and regulations; the outcome of any legal challenges to environmental rules; changes in electric generating
plants, including unit retirements and replacements and adding or changing fuel sources at existing electric generating units, to
meet regulatory requirements; changes in FERC rules and regulations; state regulatory agency approvals; changes in the expected
environmental compliance program; changes in legislation; the cost and efficiency of construction labor, equipment, and materials;
project scope and design changes; storm impacts; and the cost of capital. In addition, there can
I-8
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
be no assurance that costs related to capital expenditures will be fully recovered. Additionally, planned expenditures for plant
acquisitions may vary due to market opportunities and Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy.
The construction program also includes Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which includes components based on new technology that only
recently began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale and which may be subject to additional revised cost
estimates during construction. The ability to control costs and avoid cost and schedule overruns during the development,
construction, and operation of new facilities is subject to a number of factors, including, but not limited to, changes in labor costs,
availability, and productivity; challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, or vendors; adverse weather conditions;
shortages, increased costs, or inconsistent quality of equipment, materials, and labor; contractor or supplier delay; non-performance
under construction, operating, or other agreements; operational readiness, including specialized operator training and required site
safety programs; engineering or design problems; design and other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely
resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC; challenges with start-up activities, including major equipment failure
and system integration; and/or operational performance. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear
Construction" in Item 8 herein for additional information regarding Georgia Power's construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Also see "Regulation – Environmental Laws and Regulations" herein for additional information with respect to certain existing and
proposed environmental requirements and PROPERTIES – "Electric – Jointly-Owned Facilities" and – "Natural Gas – Jointly-
Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein and Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for
additional information concerning Alabama Power's, Georgia Power's, and Southern Power's joint ownership of certain generating
units and related facilities with certain non-affiliated utilities and Southern Company Gas' joint ownership of a pipeline facility.
Financing Programs
See each of the registrant's MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY
in Item 7 herein and Note 8 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for information concerning financing programs.
Fuel Supply
Electric
The traditional electric operating companies' and SEGCO's supply of electricity is primarily fueled by natural gas and coal.
Southern Power's supply of electricity is primarily fueled by natural gas. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS
– RESULTS OF OPERATION – "Electricity Business – Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses" of Southern Company and
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – RESULTS OF OPERATION – "Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses" of
each traditional electric operating company in Item 7 herein for information regarding the electricity generated and the average cost
of fuel in cents per net KWH generated for the years 2016 through 2018.
The traditional electric operating companies have agreements in place from which they expect to receive substantially all of their
2019 coal burn requirements. These agreements have terms ranging between one and four years. In 2018, the weighted average
sulfur content of all coal burned by the traditional electric operating companies was 1.06%. This sulfur level, along with banked
SO2 allowances, allowed the traditional electric operating companies to remain within limits set by Phase I of the Cross-State Air
Pollution Rule (CSAPR) under the Clean Air Act. In 2018, the Southern Company system did not purchase any SO2 allowances,
annual NOx emission allowances, or seasonal NOx emission allowances from the market. As any additional environmental
regulations are proposed that impact the utilization of coal, the traditional electric operating companies' fuel mix will be monitored
to help ensure that the traditional electric operating companies remain in compliance with applicable laws and regulations.
Additionally, Southern Company and the traditional electric operating companies will continue to evaluate the need to purchase
additional emissions allowances, the timing of capital expenditures for emissions control equipment, and potential unit retirements
and replacements. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Environmental Matters" of Southern Company, each traditional electric operating company, and Southern Power in Item 7 herein
for additional information on environmental matters.
SCS, acting on behalf of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power Company, has agreements in place for the
natural gas burn requirements of the Southern Company system. For 2019, SCS has contracted for 557 Bcf of natural gas supply
under agreements with remaining terms up to 15 years. In addition to natural gas supply, SCS has contracts in place for both firm
natural gas transportation and storage. Management believes these contracts provide sufficient natural gas supplies, transportation,
and storage to ensure normal operations of the Southern Company system's natural gas generating units.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power have multiple contracts covering their nuclear fuel needs for uranium, conversion services,
enrichment services, and fuel fabrication. The uranium, conversion services, and fuel fabrication contracts have remaining
I-9
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
terms ranging from one to 17 years. The remaining term lengths for the enrichment services contracts range from five to 10 years.
Management believes suppliers have sufficient nuclear fuel production capability to permit the normal operation of the Southern
Company system's nuclear generating units.
Changes in fuel prices to the traditional electric operating companies are generally reflected in fuel adjustment clauses contained in
rate schedules. See "Rate Matters – Rate Structure and Cost Recovery Plans" herein for additional information. Southern Power's
natural gas and biomass PPAs generally provide that the counterparty is responsible for substantially all of the cost of fuel.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power have contracts with the United States, acting through the DOE, that provide for the permanent
disposal of spent nuclear fuel. The DOE failed to begin disposing of spent fuel in 1998, as required by the contracts, and Alabama
Power and Georgia Power have pursued and are pursuing legal remedies against the government for breach of contract. See Note 3
to the financial statements under "Nuclear Fuel Disposal Costs" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Natural Gas
Advances in natural gas drilling in shale producing regions of the United States have resulted in historically high supplies of natural
gas and relatively low prices for natural gas. Procurement plans for natural gas supply and transportation to serve regulated utility
customers are reviewed and approved by the regulatory agencies in the states where Southern Company Gas operates. Southern
Company Gas purchases natural gas supplies in the open market by contracting with producers and marketers and, for the natural
gas distribution utilities except Nicor Gas, from its wholly-owned subsidiary, Sequent, under asset management agreements
approved by the applicable state regulatory agency. Southern Company Gas also contracts for transportation and storage services
from interstate pipelines that are regulated by the FERC. When firm pipeline services are temporarily not needed, Southern
Company Gas may release the services in the secondary market under FERC-approved capacity release provisions or utilize asset
management arrangements, thereby reducing the net cost of natural gas charged to customers for most of the natural gas
distribution utilities. Peak-use requirements are met through utilization of company-owned storage facilities, pipeline transportation
capacity, purchased storage services, peaking facilities, and other supply sources, arranged by either transportation customers or
Southern Company Gas.
Territory Served by the Southern Company System
Traditional Electric Operating Companies and Southern Power
As of January 1, 2019, the territory in which the traditional electric operating companies provide retail electric service comprises
most of the states of Alabama and Georgia, together with southeastern Mississippi. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" in Item 8 herein for information on the sale of Gulf Power. In this territory there are
non-affiliated electric distribution systems that obtain some or all of their power requirements either directly or indirectly from the
traditional electric operating companies. As of January 1, 2019, the territory had an area of approximately 114,000 square miles and
an estimated population of approximately 16 million. Southern Power sells electricity at market-based rates in the wholesale
market, primarily to investor-owned utilities, IPPs, municipalities, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and
industrial customers.
Alabama Power is engaged, within the State of Alabama, in the generation, transmission, distribution, and purchase of electricity
and the sale of electric service, at retail in approximately 400 cities and towns (including Anniston, Birmingham, Gadsden, Mobile,
Montgomery, and Tuscaloosa), as well as in rural areas, and at wholesale to 11 municipally-owned electric distribution systems, all
of which are served indirectly through sales to AMEA, and two rural distributing cooperative associations. The sales contract with
AMEA is scheduled to expire on December 31, 2025. Alabama Power owns coal reserves near its Plant Gorgas and uses the output
of coal from the reserves in its generating plants. Alabama Power also sells, and cooperates with dealers in promoting the sale of,
electric appliances and products and markets and sells outdoor lighting services.
Georgia Power is engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution, and purchase of electricity and the sale of electric service
within the State of Georgia, at retail in over 600 communities (including Athens, Atlanta, Augusta, Columbus, Macon, Rome, and
Savannah), as well as in rural areas, and at wholesale to OPC, MEAG Power, Dalton, various EMCs, and non-affiliated utilities.
Georgia Power also markets and sells outdoor lighting services.
Mississippi Power is engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution, and purchase of electricity and the sale of electric
service within 23 counties in southeastern Mississippi, at retail in 123 communities (including Biloxi, Gulfport, Hattiesburg,
Laurel, Meridian, and Pascagoula), as well as in rural areas, and at wholesale to one municipality, six rural electric distribution
cooperative associations, and one generating and transmitting cooperative.
I-10
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
For information relating to KWH sales by customer classification for the traditional electric operating companies, see
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – RESULTS OF OPERATIONS of Southern Company and each traditional
electric operating company in Item 7 herein. For information relating to the number of retail customers served by customer
classification for the traditional electric operating companies, see SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA of Southern Company and each
traditional electric operating company in Item 6 herein. Also, for information relating to the sources of revenues for Southern
Company, each traditional electric operating company, and Southern Power, reference is made to Item 7 herein.
The RUS has authority to make loans to cooperative associations or corporations to enable them to provide electric service to
customers in rural sections of the country. As of January 1, 2019, there were approximately 58 electric cooperative distribution
systems operating in the territory in which the traditional electric operating companies provide electric service at retail or
wholesale.
One of these organizations, PowerSouth, is a generating and transmitting cooperative selling power to several distributing
cooperatives, municipal systems, and other customers in south Alabama. As of December 31, 2018, PowerSouth owned generating
units with approximately 2,100 MWs of nameplate capacity, including an undivided 8.16% ownership interest in Alabama Power's
Plant Miller Units 1 and 2. PowerSouth's facilities were financed with RUS loans secured by long-term contracts requiring
distributing cooperatives to take their requirements from PowerSouth to the extent such energy is available. See PROPERTIES –
"Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein and Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8
herein for details of Alabama Power's joint-ownership with PowerSouth of a portion of Plant Miller. Alabama Power has a system
supply agreement with PowerSouth to provide 200 MWs of capacity service through December 31, 2030 with an option to extend
and renegotiate in the event Alabama Power builds new generation or contracts for new capacity.
Alabama Power has entered into a separate agreement with PowerSouth involving interconnection between their systems. The
delivery of capacity and energy from PowerSouth to certain distributing cooperatives in the service territory of Alabama Power is
governed by the Southern Company/PowerSouth Network Transmission Service Agreement. The rates for this service to
PowerSouth are on file with the FERC.
OPC is an EMC owned by its 38 retail electric distribution cooperatives, which provide retail electric service to customers in
Georgia. OPC provides wholesale electric power to its members through its generation assets, some of which are jointly owned
with Georgia Power, and power purchased from other suppliers. OPC and the 38 retail electric distribution cooperatives are
members of Georgia Transmission Corporation, an EMC (GTC), which provides transmission services to its members and third
parties. See PROPERTIES – "Electric – Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein and Note 5 to the financial statements under
"Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information regarding Georgia Power's jointly-owned facilities.
Mississippi Power has an interchange agreement with Cooperative Energy, a generating and transmitting cooperative, pursuant to
which various services are provided.
As of January 1, 2019, there were approximately 71 municipally-owned electric distribution systems operating in the territory in
which the traditional electric operating companies provide electric service at retail or wholesale.
As of December 31, 2018, 48 municipally-owned electric distribution systems and one county-owned system received their
requirements through MEAG Power, which was established by a Georgia state statute in 1975. MEAG Power serves these
requirements from self-owned generation facilities, some of which are jointly-owned with Georgia Power, and purchases from
other resources. MEAG Power also has a pseudo scheduling and services agreement with Georgia Power. Dalton serves its
requirements from self-owned generation facilities, some of which are jointly-owned with Georgia Power, and through purchases
from Southern Power through a service agreement. See PROPERTIES – "Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein and Note 5 to
the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Georgia Power has entered into substantially similar agreements with GTC, MEAG Power, and Dalton providing for the
establishment of an integrated transmission system to carry the power and energy of all parties. The agreements require an
investment by each party in the integrated transmission system in proportion to its respective share of the aggregate system load.
See PROPERTIES – "Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein for additional information.
Southern Power assumed or entered into PPAs with Georgia Power, investor-owned utilities, IPPs, municipalities, electric
cooperatives, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial customers. See "The Southern Company
System – Southern Power" above and MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS
POTENTIAL – "Power Sales Agreements" of Southern Power in Item 7 herein for additional information concerning Southern
Power's PPAs.
SCS, acting on behalf of the traditional electric operating companies, also has a contract with SEPA providing for the use of the
traditional electric operating companies' facilities at government expense to deliver to certain cooperatives and municipalities,
I-11
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
entitled by federal statute to preference in the purchase of power from SEPA, quantities of power equivalent to the amounts of
power allocated to them by SEPA from certain U.S. government hydroelectric projects.
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas is engaged in the distribution of natural gas in four states through the natural gas distribution utilities. The
natural gas distribution utilities construct, manage, and maintain intrastate natural gas pipelines and distribution facilities. Details of
the natural gas distribution utilities at December 31, 2018 are as follows:
Utility State Number of customers Approximate miles of pipe
(in thousands)
Nicor Gas Illinois 2,237 34,285
Atlanta Gas Light Georgia 1,643 33,610
Virginia Natural Gas Virginia 301 5,650
Chattanooga Gas Tennessee 67 1,655
Total 4,248 75,200
For information relating to the sources of revenue for Southern Company Gas, see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND
ANALYSIS – RESULTS OF OPERATIONS and – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL of Southern Company Gas in Item 7
herein.
Competition
Electric
The electric utility industry in the U.S. is continuing to evolve as a result of regulatory and competitive factors. Among the early
primary agents of change was the Energy Policy Act of 1992, which allowed IPPs to access a utility's transmission network in order
to sell electricity to other utilities.
The competition for retail energy sales among competing suppliers of energy is influenced by various factors, including price,
availability, technological advancements, service, and reliability. These factors are, in turn, affected by, among other influences,
regulatory, political, and environmental considerations, taxation, and supply.
The retail service rights of all electric suppliers in the State of Georgia are regulated by the Territorial Electric Service Act of 1973.
Pursuant to the provisions of this Act, all areas within existing municipal limits were assigned to the primary electric supplier
therein. Areas outside of such municipal limits were either to be assigned or to be declared open for customer choice of supplier by
action of the Georgia PSC pursuant to standards set forth in this Act. Consistent with such standards, the Georgia PSC has assigned
substantially all of the land area in the state to a supplier. Notwithstanding such assignments, this Act provides that any new
customer locating outside of 1973 municipal limits and having a connected load of at least 900 KWs may exercise a one-time
choice for the life of the premises to receive electric service from the supplier of its choice.
Pursuant to the 1956 Utility Act, the Mississippi PSC issued "Grandfather Certificates" of public convenience and necessity to
Mississippi Power and to six distribution rural cooperatives operating in southeastern Mississippi, then served in whole or in part
by Mississippi Power, authorizing them to distribute electricity in certain specified geographically described areas of the state. The
six cooperatives serve approximately 325,000 retail customers in a certificated area of approximately 10,300 square miles. In areas
included in a "Grandfather Certificate," the utility holding such certificate may extend or maintain its electric system subject to
certain regulatory approvals; extensions of facilities by such utility, or extensions of facilities into that area by other utilities, may
not be made except upon a showing of, and a grant of a certificate of, public convenience and necessity. Areas included in a CPCN
that are subsequently annexed to municipalities may continue to be served by the holder of the CPCN, irrespective of whether it has
a franchise in the annexing municipality. On the other hand, the holder of the municipal franchise may not extend service into such
newly annexed area without authorization by the Mississippi PSC.
Generally, the traditional electric operating companies have experienced, and expect to continue to experience, competition in their
respective retail service territories in varying degrees from the development and deployment of alternative energy sources such as
self-generation (as described below) and distributed generation technologies, as well as other factors.
Southern Power competes with investor-owned utilities, IPPs, and others for wholesale energy sales across various U.S. utility
markets. The needs of these markets are driven by the demands of end users and the generation available. Southern Power's success
in wholesale energy sales is influenced by various factors including reliability and availability of Southern Power's plants,
availability of transmission to serve the demand, price, and Southern Power's ability to contain costs.
I-12
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
As of December 31, 2018, Alabama Power had cogeneration contracts in effect with nine industrial customers. Under the terms of
these contracts, Alabama Power purchases excess energy generated by such companies. During 2018, Alabama Power purchased
approximately 99 million KWHs from such companies at a cost of $3 million.
As of December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had contracts in effect with 28 small power producers whereby Georgia Power purchases
their excess generation. During 2018, Georgia Power purchased 2.1 billion KWHs from such companies at a cost of $140 million.
Georgia Power also has PPAs for electricity with four cogeneration facilities. Payments are subject to reductions for failure to meet
minimum capacity output. During 2018, Georgia Power purchased 26 million KWHs at a cost of $0.8 million from these facilities.
Also during 2018, Georgia Power purchased energy from three customer-owned generating facilities. These customers provide
energy with no capacity commitment and are not dispatched by Georgia Power. During 2018, Georgia Power purchased a total of
341 million KWHs from the three customers at a cost of approximately $28 million.
As of December 31, 2018, Mississippi Power had a cogeneration agreement in effect with one of its industrial customers. Under the
terms of this contract, Mississippi Power purchases any excess generation. During 2018, Mississippi Power did not purchase any
excess generation from this customer.
Natural Gas
Southern Company Gas' natural gas distribution utilities do not compete with other distributors of natural gas in their exclusive
franchise territories but face competition from other energy products. Their principal competitors are electric utilities and fuel oil
and propane providers serving the residential, commercial, and industrial markets in their service areas for customers who are
considering switching to or from a natural gas appliance.
Competition for heating as well as general household and small commercial energy needs generally occurs at the initial installation
phase when the customer or builder makes decisions as to which types of equipment to install. Customers generally use the chosen
energy source for the life of the equipment.
Customer demand for natural gas could be affected by numerous factors, including:
•changes in the availability or price of natural gas and other forms of energy;
•general economic conditions;
•energy conservation, including state-supported energy efficiency programs;
•legislation and regulations;
•the cost and capability to convert from natural gas to alternative energy products; and
•technological changes resulting in displacement or replacement of natural gas appliances.
The natural gas-related programs generally emphasize natural gas as the fuel of choice for customers and seek to expand the use of
natural gas through a variety of promotional activities. In addition, Southern Company Gas partners with third-party entities to
market the benefits of natural gas appliances.
The availability and affordability of natural gas have provided cost advantages and further opportunity for growth of the businesses.
Seasonality
The demand for electric power and natural gas supply is affected by seasonal differences in the weather. While the electric power
sales of some of the traditional electric operating companies peak in the summer, others peak in the winter. In the aggregate,
electric power sales peak during the summer with a smaller peak during the winter. In most of the areas Southern Company Gas
serves, natural gas demand peaks during the winter. As a result, the overall operating results of Southern Company, the traditional
electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas in the future may fluctuate substantially on a seasonal
basis. In addition, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas have historically sold
less power and natural gas when weather conditions are milder.
Regulation
States
The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities are subject to the jurisdiction of their
respective state PSCs or applicable state regulatory agencies. These regulatory bodies have broad powers of supervision and
regulation over public utilities operating in the respective states, including their rates, service regulations, sales of securities (except
for the Mississippi PSC), and, in the cases of the Georgia PSC and the Mississippi PSC, in part, retail service territories. See
"Territory Served by the Southern Company System" and "Rate Matters" herein for additional information.
I-13
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Federal Power Act
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power Company and certain of its generation subsidiaries, and SEGCO are
all public utilities engaged in wholesale sales of energy in interstate commerce and, therefore, are subject to the rate, financial, and
accounting jurisdiction of the FERC under the Federal Power Act. The FERC must approve certain financings and allows an "at
cost standard" for services rendered by system service companies such as SCS and Southern Nuclear. The FERC is also authorized
to establish regional reliability organizations which enforce reliability standards, address impediments to the construction of
transmission, and prohibit manipulative energy trading practices.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power are also subject to the provisions of the Federal Power Act or the earlier Federal Water Power
Act applicable to licensees with respect to their hydroelectric developments. As of December 31, 2018, among the hydroelectric
projects subject to licensing by the FERC are 14 existing Alabama Power generating stations having an aggregate installed capacity
of 1,670,000 KWs and 17 existing Georgia Power generating stations and one generating station partially owned by Georgia Power,
with a combined aggregate installed capacity of 1,101,402 KWs.
In 2013, the FERC issued a new 30-year license to Alabama Power for Alabama Power's seven hydroelectric developments on the
Coosa River (Weiss, Henry, Logan Martin, Lay, Mitchell, Jordan, and Bouldin). Alabama Power filed a petition requesting
rehearing of the FERC order granting the relicense seeking revisions to several conditions of the license. Alabama Rivers Alliance,
American Rivers, the Georgia Environmental Protection Division, and the Atlanta Regional Commission also filed petitions for
rehearing of the FERC order. In 2016, the FERC issued an order granting in part and denying in part Alabama Power's rehearing
request. The order also denied all of the other rehearing requests. Also in 2016, Alabama Rivers Alliance and American Rivers filed
a second rehearing request and also filed a petition with the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit for review of
the license and the rehearing denial order. The FERC issued an order in 2016 denying the second rehearing request, and American
Rivers and Alabama Rivers Alliance subsequently filed an appeal of that order at the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of
Columbia Circuit. The U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit consolidated the two appeals into one proceeding
and, on July 6, 2018, vacated the FERC's 2013 order for the new 30-year license and remanded the proceeding to the FERC.
Alabama Power continues to operate the Coosa River developments under annual licenses issued by the FERC. The ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
In 2018, Alabama Power continued the process of developing an application to relicense the Harris Dam project on the Tallapoosa
River, which is expected to be filed with the FERC by November 30, 2021. The current Harris Dam project license will expire on
November 30, 2023.
On May 31, 2018, Georgia Power filed an application to relicense the Wallace Dam project on the Oconee River. The current
Wallace Dam project license will expire on June 1, 2020. On July 3, 2018, Georgia Power filed a Notice of Intent to relicense the
Lloyd Shoals project on the Ocmulgee River. The application to relicense the Lloyd Shoals project is expected to be filed with the
FERC by December 31, 2021. The current Lloyd Shoals project license will expire on December 31, 2023. On December 18, 2018,
Georgia Power filed applications to surrender the Langdale and Riverview hydroelectric projects on the Chattahoochee River upon
their license expirations on December 31, 2023. Both projects together represent 1,520 KWs of Georgia Power's hydro fleet
capacity.
Georgia Power and OPC also have a license, expiring in 2027, for the Rocky Mountain project, a pure pumped storage facility of
903,000 KW installed capacity. See PROPERTIES – "Jointly-Owned Facilities" in Item 2 herein for additional information.
Licenses for all projects, excluding those discussed above, expire in the years 2034-2066 in the case of Alabama Power's projects
and in the years 2035-2044 in the case of Georgia Power's projects.
Upon or after the expiration of each license, the U.S. Government, by act of Congress, may take over the project or the FERC may
relicense the project either to the original licensee or to a new licensee. In the event of takeover or relicensing to another, the
original licensee is to be compensated in accordance with the provisions of the Federal Power Act, such compensation to reflect the
net investment of the licensee in the project, not in excess of the fair value of the property, plus reasonable damages to other
property of the licensee resulting from the severance therefrom of the property. The FERC may grant relicenses subject to certain
requirements that could result in additional costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Nuclear Regulation
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Southern Nuclear are subject to regulation by the NRC. The NRC is responsible for licensing
and regulating nuclear facilities and materials and for conducting research in support of the licensing and regulatory process, as
mandated by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended; the Energy Reorganization Act of 1974, as amended; and the Nuclear
Nonproliferation Act of 1978, as amended; and in accordance with the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, as amended,
and other applicable statutes. These responsibilities also include protecting public health and safety, protecting the
I-14
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
environment, protecting and safeguarding nuclear materials and nuclear power plants in the interest of national security, and
assuring conformity with antitrust laws.
The NRC licenses for Georgia Power's Plant Hatch Units 1 and 2 expire in 2034 and 2038, respectively. The NRC licenses for
Alabama Power's Plant Farley Units 1 and 2 expire in 2037 and 2041, respectively. The NRC licenses for Plant Vogtle Units 1 and
2 expire in 2047 and 2049, respectively.
In 2012, the NRC issued combined construction and operating licenses (COLs) for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Receipt of the COLs
allowed full construction to begin. See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS
POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters – Nuclear Construction" of Georgia Power in Item 7 herein and Note 2 to the financial
statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
See Notes 3 and 6 to the financial statements under "Nuclear Insurance" and "Nuclear Decommissioning," respectively, in Item 8
herein for information on nuclear insurance and nuclear decommissioning costs.
Environmental Laws and Regulations
The Southern Company system's operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and
regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Compliance with these existing environmental
requirements involves significant capital and operating costs, a major portion of which is expected to be recovered through existing
ratemaking provisions or through market-based contracts. There is no assurance, however, that all such costs will be recovered.
For Southern Company Gas, substantially all of these costs are related to former MGP sites, which are generally recovered through
existing ratemaking provisions. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Environmental Matters" in Item 8 herein for
additional information.
Compliance with environmental laws and resulting regulations, including, but not limited to, proposed and existing regulations
related to air quality, water quality, CCR, and global climate issues, has been, and will continue to be, a significant focus for each of
the registrants and SEGCO. Compliance with any new or revised environmental laws and regulations could affect many areas of
the traditional electric operating companies', Southern Power's, SEGCO's, and Southern Company Gas' operations. See
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters" of each of
the registrants in Item 7 herein for additional information about environmental issues.
The Southern Company system's ultimate environmental compliance strategy and future environmental expenditures will depend
on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements, the availability and cost of any deployed control
technology, fuel prices, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges. Compliance costs may result from the
installation of additional environmental controls, closure and monitoring of CCR facilities, unit retirements, or changing fuel
sources for certain existing units, as well as related upgrades to the transmission and distribution (electric and natural gas) systems.
Environmental compliance spending over the next several years may differ materially from the amounts estimated. Such
expenditures could affect results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition if such costs are not recovered on a timely
basis through regulated rates for the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities or through
long-term wholesale agreements for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power. Further, higher costs that are
recovered through regulated rates could contribute to reduced demand for energy, which could negatively affect results of
operations, cash flows, and financial condition. Additionally, many commercial and industrial customers may also be affected by
existing and future environmental requirements, which for some may have the potential to ultimately affect their demand for
electricity and natural gas. See "Construction Program" herein and MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS –
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters" of each of the registrants in Item 7 herein for additional
information. The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Rate Matters
Rate Structure and Cost Recovery Plans
Electric
The rates and service regulations of the traditional electric operating companies are uniform for each class of service throughout
their respective retail service territories. Rates for residential electric service are generally of the block type based upon KWHs used
and include minimum charges. Residential and other rates contain separate customer charges. Rates for commercial service are
presently of the block type and, for large customers, the billing demand is generally used to determine capacity and minimum bill
charges. These large customers' rates are generally based upon usage by the customer and include rates with special features to
encourage off-peak usage. Additionally, Alabama Power and Mississippi Power are generally allowed by
I-15
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
their respective state PSCs to negotiate the terms and cost of service to large customers. Such terms and cost of service, however,
are subject to final state PSC approval.
The traditional electric operating companies recover certain costs through a variety of forward-looking, cost-based rate
mechanisms. Fuel and net purchased energy costs are recovered through specific fuel cost recovery provisions. These fuel cost
recovery provisions are adjusted to reflect increases or decreases in such costs as needed or on schedules as required by the
respective PSCs. Approved compliance, storm damage, and certain other costs are recovered at Alabama Power and Mississippi
Power through specific cost recovery mechanisms approved by their respective PSCs. Certain similar costs at Georgia Power are
recovered through various base rate tariffs as approved by the Georgia PSC. Costs not recovered through specific cost recovery
mechanisms are recovered at Alabama Power and Mississippi Power through annual, formulaic cost recovery proceedings and at
Georgia Power through periodic base rate proceedings.
See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters" of
Southern Company and each of the traditional electric operating companies in Item 7 herein and Note 2 to the financial statements
in Item 8 herein for a discussion of rate matters and certain cost recovery mechanisms. Also, see Note 1 to the financial statements
in Item 8 herein for a discussion of recovery of fuel costs, storm damage costs, and compliance costs through rate mechanisms.
See "Integrated Resource Planning" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Integrated Resource
Plan" in Item 8 herein for a discussion of Georgia PSC certification of new demand-side or supply-side resources for Georgia
Power. In addition, see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail
Regulatory Matters – Nuclear Construction" of Georgia Power in Item 7 herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein for a discussion of the Georgia Nuclear Energy Financing Act and the
Georgia PSC certification of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which have allowed Georgia Power to recover financing costs for
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 since 2011.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County Energy Facility" in Item 8 herein and MANAGEMENT'S
DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Kemper County Energy Facility – Rate Recovery" of
Mississippi Power in Item 7 herein for information on cost recovery plans for the Kemper County energy facility.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power Company and certain of its generation subsidiaries are authorized
by the FERC to sell power to non-affiliates, including short-term opportunity sales, at market-based prices. Specific FERC approval
must be obtained with respect to a market-based contract with an affiliate.
Mississippi Power serves long-term contracts with rural electric cooperative associations and a municipality located in southeastern
Mississippi under cost-based electric tariffs which are subject to regulation by the FERC. The contracts with these wholesale
customers represented 17.3% of Mississippi Power's total operating revenues in 2018 and are generally subject to 10-year rolling
cancellation notices. Historically, these wholesale customers have acted as a group and any changes in contractual relationships for
one customer are likely to be followed by the other wholesale customers.
Natural Gas
Southern Company Gas' natural gas distribution utilities are subject to regulation and oversight by their respective state regulatory
agencies. Rates charged to these customers vary according to customer class (residential, commercial, or industrial) and rate
jurisdiction. These agencies approve rates designed to provide each natural gas distribution utility the opportunity to generate
revenues to recover all prudently-incurred costs, including a return on rate base sufficient to pay interest on debt, and provide a
reasonable return.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, which operates in a deregulated environment in which Marketers rather than a traditional
utility sell natural gas to end-use customers and earns revenue by charging rates to its customers based primarily on monthly fixed
charges that are set by the Georgia PSC, the earnings of the natural gas distribution utilities can be affected by customer
consumption patterns that are largely a function of weather conditions and price levels for natural gas.
The natural gas distribution utilities, excluding Atlanta Gas Light, are authorized to use natural gas cost recovery mechanisms that
adjust rates to reflect changes in the wholesale cost of natural gas and ensure recovery of all costs prudently incurred in purchasing
natural gas for customers. In addition to natural gas cost recovery mechanisms, the natural gas distribution utilities have other cost
recovery mechanisms, such as regulatory riders, which vary by utility but allow recovery of certain costs, such as those related to
infrastructure replacement programs as well as environmental remediation and energy efficiency plans.
See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Utility
Regulation and Rate Design" of Southern Company Gas in Item 7 herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for a discussion of rate matters and certain cost recovery mechanisms.
I-16
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Integrated Resource Planning
Each of the traditional electric operating companies continually evaluates its electric generating resources in order to ensure that it
maintains a cost-effective and reliable mix of resources to meet the existing and future demand requirements of its customers. See
"Environmental Laws and Regulations" above for a discussion of existing and potential environmental regulations that may impact
the future generating resource needs of the traditional electric operating companies.
Alabama Power
Triennially, Alabama Power provides an IRP report to the Alabama PSC. This report overviews Alabama Power's resource planning
process and contains information that serves as the foundation for certain decisions affecting Alabama Power's portfolio of supply-
side and demand-side resources. The IRP report facilitates Alabama Power's ability to provide reliable and cost-effective electric
service to customers, while accounting for the risks and uncertainties inherent in planning for resources sufficient to meet expected
customer demand. Under State of Alabama law, a CPCN must be obtained from the Alabama PSC before Alabama Power
constructs any new generating facility, unless such construction is deemed an ordinary extension in the usual course of business.
Georgia Power
Triennially, Georgia Power must file an IRP with the Georgia PSC that specifies how it intends to meet the future electric service
needs of its customers through a combination of demand-side and supply-side resources. The Georgia PSC, under state law, must
certify any new demand-side or supply-side resources for Georgia Power to receive cost recovery. Once certified, the lesser of
actual or certified construction costs and purchased power costs is recoverable through rates. Certified costs may be excluded from
recovery only on the basis of fraud, concealment, failure to disclose a material fact, imprudence, or criminal misconduct. See Note
2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Rate Plans," " – Integrated Resource Plan," and " – Nuclear Construction" in
Item 8 herein for additional information.
Mississippi Power
On February 6, 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved a settlement agreement related to cost recovery for the Kemper County energy
facility, pursuant to which Mississippi Power filed a Reserve Margin Plan (RMP) on August 6, 2018. The RMP includes many of
the same aspects of a traditional IRP, but the RMP also contains alternatives proposed by Mississippi Power to address its existing
reserve capacity, which is greater than the level required to meet Mississippi Power's projected summer peak demand. Mississippi
Power developed the alternatives by evaluating the economics of each unit in Mississippi Power's fleet, the opportunities currently
available in the wholesale market, and the operational constraints of the Southern Company system. The ultimate outcome of this
matter cannot be determined at this time. For additional information, see Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County
Energy Facility" in Item 8 herein.
Employee Relations
The Southern Company system had a total of 29,192 employees on its payroll at January 1, 2019.
 Employees at
January 1, 2019
Alabama Power 6,650
Georgia Power 6,967
Mississippi Power 1,053
PowerSecure 1,743
SCS 3,799
Southern Company Gas 4,389
Southern Nuclear 3,870
Southern Power 491
Other 230
Total 29,192
The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities have separate agreements with local unions of
the IBEW and the Utilities Workers Union of America generally covering wages, working conditions, and procedures for handling
grievances and arbitration. These agreements apply with certain exceptions to operating, maintenance, and construction employees.
I-17
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Alabama Power has agreements with the IBEW in effect through August 15, 2019. Upon notice given at least 60 days prior to that
date, negotiations may be initiated with respect to agreement terms to be effective after such date.
Georgia Power has an agreement with the IBEW covering wages and working conditions, which is in effect through June 30, 2021.
Mississippi Power has an agreement with the IBEW covering wages and working conditions, which is in effect through May 1,
2019. In 2015, Mississippi Power signed a separate agreement with the IBEW related solely to the Kemper County energy facility;
that current agreement is in effect through March 15, 2021. In August 2017, Mississippi Power signed an agreement with the IBEW
that added several job classifications and provided guidelines related to the reorganization at the Kemper County energy facility.
Southern Nuclear has a five-year agreement with the IBEW covering certain employees at Plants Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1
and 2, which is in effect through June 30, 2021. A five-year agreement between Southern Nuclear and the IBEW representing
certain employees at Plant Farley is in effect through August 15, 2019. Upon notice given at least 60 days prior to that date,
negotiations may be initiated with respect to agreement terms to be effective after such date.
The agreements also make the terms of the pension plans for the companies discussed above subject to collective bargaining with
the unions at either a five-year or a 10-year cycle, depending upon union and company actions.
The natural gas distribution utilities have separate agreements with local unions of the IBEW and Utilities Workers Union of
America covering wages, working conditions, and procedures for handling grievances and arbitration. Nicor Gas' agreement with
the IBEW is effective through February 29, 2020. Virginia Natural Gas' agreement with the IBEW is effective through May 15,
2020. The agreements also make the terms of the Southern Company Gas pension plan subject to collective bargaining with the
unions when significant changes to the benefit accruals are considered by Southern Company Gas.
I-18
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 1A. RISK F ACT ORS
In addition to the other information in this Form 10-K, including MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS –
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL in Item 7 of each registrant, and other documents filed by Southern Company and/or
its subsidiaries with the SEC from time to time, the following factors should be carefully considered in evaluating Southern
Company and its subsidiaries. Such factors could affect actual results and cause results to differ materially from those
expressed in any forward-looking statements made by, or on behalf of, Southern Company and/or its subsidiaries.
UTILITY REGULATORY, LEGISLATIVE, AND LITIGATION RISKS
Southern Company and its subsidiaries are subject to substantial state and federal governmental regulation. Compliance
with current and future regulatory requirements and procurement of necessary approvals, permits, and certificates may
result in substantial costs to Southern Company and its subsidiaries.
Southern Company and its subsidiaries are subject to substantial regulation from federal, state, and local regulatory agencies and
are required to comply with numerous laws and regulations and to obtain numerous permits, approvals, and certificates from
governmental agencies. The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities seek to recover their
costs (including a reasonable return on invested capital) through their retail rates, which must be approved by the applicable state
PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency. A state PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency, in a future rate proceeding,
may alter the timing or amount of certain costs for which recovery is allowed or modify the current authorized rate of return. Rate
refunds may also be required. Additionally, the rates charged to wholesale customers by the traditional electric operating companies
and by Southern Power and the rates charged to natural gas transportation customers by Southern Company Gas' pipeline
investments and for some of its storage assets must be approved by the FERC. These wholesale rates could be affected by changes
to Southern Power's and the traditional electric operating companies' ability to conduct business pursuant to FERC market-based
rate authority. Retaining this authority from the FERC is important to the traditional electric operating companies' and Southern
Power's ability to remain competitive in the wholesale electric markets.
The impact of any future revision or changes in interpretations of existing regulations or the adoption of new laws and regulations
applicable to Southern Company or any of its subsidiaries is uncertain. Changes in regulation or the imposition of additional
regulations could influence the operating environment of Southern Company and its subsidiaries and may result in substantial costs
or otherwise negatively affect their results of operations.
The Southern Company system's costs of compliance with environmental laws and satisfying related AROs are significant.
The costs of compliance with current and future environmental laws and related AROs and the incurrence of environmental
liabilities could negatively impact the net income, cash flows, and financial condition of the registrants.
The Southern Company system's operations are subject to extensive regulation by state and federal environmental agencies through
a variety of laws and regulations. Compliance with existing environmental requirements involves significant capital and operating
costs including the settlement of AROs, a major portion of which is expected to be recovered through existing ratemaking
provisions or through market-based contracts. There is no assurance, however, that all such costs will be recovered. The registrants
expect future compliance expenditures will continue to be significant.
The EPA has adopted and is implementing regulations governing air and water quality under the Clean Air Act and regulations
governing cooling water intake structures and effluent guidelines for steam electric generating plants under the Clean Water Act.
The EPA has also adopted regulations governing the disposal of CCR, including coal ash and gypsum, in landfills and surface
impoundments at active generating power plants. The cost estimates for AROs related to the disposal of CCR are based on
information using various assumptions related to closure and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and
discount rates, and the potential methods for complying with the CCR Rule. The traditional electric operating companies will
continue to periodically update their ARO cost estimates.
Additionally, environmental laws and regulations covering the handling and disposal of waste and release of hazardous substances
could require the Southern Company system to incur substantial costs to clean up affected sites, including certain current and
former operating sites, and locations affected by historical operations or subject to contractual obligations.
Existing environmental laws and regulations may be revised or new environmental laws and regulations may be adopted or become
applicable to the Southern Company system. In addition, existing environmental laws and regulations may be impacted by related
legal challenges.
Litigation over environmental issues and claims of various types, including property damage, personal injury, common law
nuisance, and citizen enforcement of environmental requirements has occurred throughout the U.S. This litigation has included
claims for damages alleged to have been caused by CO2 and other emissions, CCR, releases of regulated substances, and alleged
exposure to regulated substances, and/or requests for injunctive relief in connection with such matters.
I-19
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Compliance with any new or revised environmental laws or regulations could affect many areas of the Southern Company system's
operations. The Southern Company system's ultimate environmental compliance strategy and future environmental expenditures
will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements, the availability and cost of any
deployed control technology, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges. Compliance costs may result from the
installation of additional environmental controls, closure and monitoring of CCR facilities, unit retirements, or changing fuel
sources for certain existing units, as well as related upgrades to the Southern Company system's transmission and distribution
(electric and natural gas) systems. Environmental compliance spending over the next several years may differ materially from the
amounts estimated. Such expenditures could affect results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition if such costs are not
recovered on a timely basis through regulated rates for the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution
utilities or through long-term wholesale agreements for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power. Further,
higher costs that are recovered through regulated rates could contribute to reduced demand for energy, which could negatively
affect results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition. Additionally, many commercial and industrial customers may also
be affected by existing and future environmental requirements, which for some may have the potential to ultimately affect their
demand for electricity or natural gas.
The Southern Company system may be exposed to regulatory and financial risks related to the impact of GHG legislation,
regulation, and emission reduction goals.
The EPA has published rules limiting CO2 emissions from new, modified, and reconstructed fossil fuel-fired electric generating
units and guidelines for states to develop plans to meet EPA-mandated CO2 emission performance standards for existing units
(known as the Clean Power Plan or CPP). On August 31, 2018, the EPA published a proposed rule known as the Affordable Clean
Energy (ACE) Rule, which is intended to replace a regulation enacted in 2015 known as the Clean Power Plan (CPP), that would
limit CO2 emissions from existing fossil fuel-fired electric generating units. The CPP has been stayed by the U.S. Supreme Court
since 2016. The ACE Rule would require states to develop GHG unit-specific emission rate standards based on heat-rate efficiency
improvements for existing fossil fuel-fired steam units. As proposed, combustion turbines, including natural gas combined cycles,
are not affected sources. As of January 1, 2019, the Southern Company system has ownership interests in 40 fossil fuel-fired steam
units to which the proposed ACE Rule is applicable. The ultimate impact of this rule to the Southern Company system is currently
unknown and will depend on changes between the proposal and the final rule, subsequent state plan developments and
requirements, and any associated legal challenges.
The EPA also has proposed a review of final rules adopted in 2015 to establish performance standards for new, modified, and
reconstructed electric utility generating units. The impact of any changes will depend on the content of any final rule adopted by the
EPA and the outcome of any related legal challenges.
In April 2018, Southern Company established an intermediate goal of a 50% reduction in carbon emissions from 2007 levels by
2030 and a long-term goal of low- to no-carbon operations by 2050. To achieve these goals, the Southern Company system expects
to continue growing its renewable energy portfolio, optimize technology advancements to modernize its transmission and
distribution systems, increase the use of natural gas for generation, complete ongoing construction projects, including Georgia
Power's interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, invest in energy efficiency, and continue research and development efforts focused
on technologies to lower GHG emissions. The Southern Company system's ability to achieve these goals also will be dependent on
many external factors, including supportive national energy policies, low natural gas prices, and the development, deployment, and
advancement of relevant energy technologies.
Costs associated with GHG legislation, regulation, and emission reduction goals could be significant. However, the ultimate impact
will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements, low natural gas prices, the development,
deployment, and advancement of relevant energy technologies, the ability to recover costs through existing ratemaking provisions,
and the outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges.
Because natural gas is a fossil fuel with lower carbon content relative to other fossil fuels, future GHG constraints, including, but
not limited to, the imposition of a carbon tax, may create additional demand for natural gas, both for production of electricity and
direct use in homes and businesses. Future GHG constraints designed to minimize emissions from natural gas could likewise result
in increased costs to the Southern Company system and affect the demand for natural gas as well as the prices charged to customers
and the competitive position of natural gas.
I-20
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
The net income of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power could be
negatively impacted by changes in regulations related to transmission planning processes and competition in the wholesale
electric markets.
The traditional electric operating companies currently own and operate transmission facilities as part of a vertically integrated
utility. A small percentage of transmission revenues are collected through the wholesale electric tariff but the majority are collected
through retail rates. FERC rules pertaining to regional transmission planning and cost allocation present challenges to transmission
planning and the wholesale market structure. The key impacts of these rules include:
•possible disruption of the integrated resource planning processes within the states in the Southern Company system's
service territory;
•delays and additional processes for developing transmission plans; and
•possible impacts on state jurisdiction of approving, certifying, and pricing new transmission facilities.
The FERC rules related to transmission are intended to spur the development of new transmission infrastructure to promote and
encourage the integration of renewable sources of supply as well as facilitate competition in the wholesale market by providing
more choices to wholesale power customers. Technology changes in the power and fuel industries continue to create significant
impacts to wholesale transaction cost structures. The impact of these and other such developments and the effect of changes in
levels of wholesale supply and demand are uncertain. The financial condition, net income, and cash flows of Southern Company,
the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power could be adversely affected by these and other changes.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power could be subject to higher costs as a result of
implementing and maintaining compliance with the North American Electric Reliability Corporation mandatory reliability
standards along with possible associated penalties for non-compliance.
Owners and operators of bulk power systems, including the traditional electric operating companies, are subject to mandatory
reliability standards enacted by the North American Electric Reliability Corporation and enforced by the FERC. Compliance with
or changes in the mandatory reliability standards may subject the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power to
higher operating costs and/or increased capital expenditures. If any traditional electric operating company or Southern Power is
found to be in noncompliance with these standards, such traditional electric operating company or Southern Power could be subject
to sanctions, including substantial monetary penalties.
OPERATIONAL RISKS
The financial performance of Southern Company and its subsidiaries may be adversely affected if the subsidiaries are
unable to successfully operate their facilities or perform certain corporate functions.
The financial performance of Southern Company and its subsidiaries depends on the successful operation of the electric generation,
transmission, and distribution facilities and natural gas distribution and storage facilities and the successful performance of
necessary corporate functions. There are many risks that could affect these operations and performance of corporate functions,
including:
•operator error or failure of equipment or processes;
•accidents;
•operating limitations that may be imposed by environmental or other regulatory requirements or in connection with joint
owner arrangements;
•labor disputes;
•physical attacks;
•fuel or material supply interruptions and/or shortages;
•transmission disruption or capacity constraints, including with respect to the Southern Company system's and third parties'
transmission, storage, and transportation facilities;
•compliance with mandatory reliability standards, including mandatory cyber security standards;
•implementation of new technologies;
•information technology system failures;
•cyber intrusions;
•environmental events, such as spills or releases; and
•catastrophic events such as fires, earthquakes, explosions, floods, tornadoes, hurricanes and other storms, droughts,
pandemic health events, or other similar occurrences.
A decrease or elimination of revenues from the electric generation, transmission, or distribution facilities or natural gas distribution
or storage facilities or an increase in the cost of operating the facilities would reduce the net income and cash flows and could
adversely impact the financial condition of the affected registrant.
I-21
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Operation of nuclear facilities involves inherent risks, including environmental, safety, health, regulatory, natural disasters,
cyber intrusions or physical attacks, and financial risks, that could result in fines or the closure of the nuclear units owned
by Alabama Power or Georgia Power and which may present potential exposures in excess of insurance coverage.
Alabama Power owns, and contracts for the operation of, two nuclear units and Georgia Power holds undivided interests in, and
contracts for the operation of, four existing nuclear units. The six existing units are operated by Southern Nuclear and represent
approximately 3,680 MWs, or 8% of the Southern Company system's electric generation capacity at January 1, 2019. In addition,
these units generated approximately 25% of the total KWHs generated by each of Alabama Power and Georgia Power in the year
ended December 31, 2018. In addition, Southern Nuclear, on behalf of Georgia Power and the other Vogtle Owners, is managing
the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Due solely to the increase in nuclear generating capacity, the below risks are
expected to increase incrementally once Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are operational. Nuclear facilities are subject to environmental,
safety, health, operational, and financial risks such as:
•the potential harmful effects on the environment and human health and safety resulting from a release of radioactive
materials in connection with the operation of nuclear facilities and the storage, handling, and disposal of radioactive
material, including spent nuclear fuel;
•uncertainties with respect to the ability to dispose of spent nuclear fuel and the need for longer term on-site storage;
•uncertainties with respect to the technological and financial aspects of decommissioning nuclear plants at the end of
licensed lives and the ability to maintain and anticipate adequate capital reserves for decommissioning;
•limitations on the amounts and types of insurance commercially available to cover losses that might arise in connection
with the nuclear operations of Alabama Power and Georgia Power or those of other commercial nuclear facility owners in
the U.S.;
•potential liabilities arising out of the operation of these facilities;
•significant capital expenditures relating to maintenance, operation, security, and repair of these facilities, including repairs
and upgrades required by the NRC;
•actual or threatened cyber intrusions or physical attacks; and
•the potential impact of an accident or natural disaster.
It is possible that damages, decommissioning, or other costs could exceed the amount of decommissioning trusts or external
insurance coverage, including statutorily required nuclear incident insurance.
The NRC has broad authority under federal law to impose licensing and safety-related requirements for the operation of nuclear
generation facilities. In the event of non-compliance, the NRC has the authority to impose fines and/or shut down any unit,
depending upon its assessment of the severity of the situation, until compliance is achieved. NRC orders or regulations related to
increased security measures and any future safety requirements promulgated by the NRC could require Alabama Power and
Georgia Power to make substantial operating and capital expenditures at their nuclear plants. In addition, if a serious nuclear
incident were to occur, it could result in substantial costs to Alabama Power or Georgia Power and Southern Company. A major
incident at a nuclear facility anywhere in the world could cause the NRC to delay or prohibit construction of new nuclear units or
require additional safety measures at new and existing units. Moreover, a major incident at any nuclear facility in the U.S.,
including facilities owned and operated by third parties, could require Alabama Power and Georgia Power to make material
contributory payments.
In addition, actual or potential threats of cyber intrusions or physical attacks could result in increased nuclear licensing or
compliance costs that are difficult to predict.
Transporting and storing natural gas involves risks that may result in accidents and other operating risks and costs.
Southern Company Gas' natural gas distribution and storage activities involve a variety of inherent hazards and operating risks,
such as leaks, accidents, explosions, and mechanical problems, which could result in serious injury to employees and non-
employees, loss of life, significant damage to property, environmental pollution, and impairment of its operations. The location of
pipelines and storage facilities near populated areas could increase the level of damage resulting from these risks. Additionally,
these pipeline and storage facilities are subject to various state and other regulatory requirements. Failure to comply with these
regulatory requirements could result in substantial monetary penalties or potential early retirement of storage facilities, which could
trigger an associated impairment. The occurrence of any of these events not fully covered by insurance or otherwise could
adversely affect Southern Company Gas' and Southern Company's financial condition and results of operations.
Physical attacks, both threatened and actual, could impact the ability of the Subsidiary Registrants to operate and could
adversely affect financial results and liquidity.
The Subsidiary Registrants face the risk of physical attacks, both threatened and actual, against their respective generation and
storage facilities and the transmission and distribution infrastructure used to transport energy, which could negatively impact
I-22
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
their ability to generate, transport, and deliver power, or otherwise operate their respective facilities, or, with respect to Southern
Company Gas, its ability to distribute or store natural gas, or otherwise operate its facilities, in the most efficient manner or at all.
In addition, physical attacks against third-party providers could have a similar effect on Southern Company and its subsidiaries.
Despite the implementation of robust security measures, all assets are potentially vulnerable to disability, failures, or unauthorized
access due to human error, natural disasters, technological failure, or internal or external physical attacks. If assets were to fail, be
physically damaged, or be breached and were not restored in a timely manner, the affected Subsidiary Registrant may be unable to
fulfill critical business functions. Moreover, the amount and scope of insurance maintained against losses resulting from any such
events or physical security breaches may not be sufficient to cover losses or otherwise adequately compensate for any disruptions
to business that could result.
These events could harm the reputation of and negatively affect the financial results of the registrants through lost revenues and
costs to repair damage, if such costs cannot be recovered.
An information security incident, including a cybersecurity breach, or the failure of one or more key information
technology systems, networks, or processes could impact the ability of the registrants to operate and could adversely affect
financial results and liquidity.
Information security risks have generally increased in recent years as a result of the proliferation of new technology and increased
sophistication and frequency of cyber attacks and data security breaches. The Subsidiary Registrants operate in highly regulated
industries that require the continued operation of sophisticated information technology systems and network infrastructure, which
are part of interconnected distribution systems. Because of the critical nature of the infrastructure, increased connectivity to the
internet, and technology systems' inherent vulnerability to disability or failures due to hacking, viruses, acts of war or terrorism, or
other types of data security breaches, Southern Company and its subsidiaries face a heightened risk of cyberattack. Parties that wish
to disrupt the U.S. bulk power system or Southern Company system operations could view these computer systems, software, or
networks as targets. The registrants and their third-party vendors have been subject, and will likely continue to be subject, to
attempts to gain unauthorized access to their information technology systems and confidential data or to attempts to disrupt utility
operations. As a result, Southern Company and its subsidiaries face on-going threats to their assets, including assets deemed critical
infrastructure, where databases and systems have been, and will likely continue to be, subject to advanced computer viruses or
other malicious codes, unauthorized access attempts, phishing, and other cyber attacks. While there have been immaterial incidents
of phishing and attempted financial fraud across the Southern Company system, there has been no material impact on business or
operations from these attacks. However, the registrants cannot guarantee that security efforts will prevent breaches, operational
incidents, or other breakdowns of information technology systems and network infrastructure and cannot provide any assurance
that such incidents will not have a material adverse effect in the future.
In addition, in the ordinary course of business, Southern Company and its subsidiaries collect and retain sensitive information,
including personally identifiable information about customers, employees, and stockholders, and other confidential information. In
some cases, administration of certain functions may be outsourced to third-party service providers that could also be targets of
cyber attacks. Generally, Southern Company and its subsidiaries enter certain contractual security guarantees and assurances with
these third parties to help ensure the security and safety of this information.
Despite the implementation of robust security measures, all assets are potentially vulnerable to disability, failures, or unauthorized
access due to human error, natural disasters, technological failure, or internal or external cyber attacks. If assets were to fail or be
breached and were not restored in a timely manner, the affected registrant may be unable to fulfill critical business functions, and
sensitive and other data could be compromised. Any cyber breach or theft, damage, or improper disclosure of sensitive electronic
data may also subject the affected registrant to penalties and claims from regulators or other third parties. Moreover, the amount
and scope of insurance maintained against losses resulting from any such events or security breaches may not be sufficient to cover
losses or otherwise adequately compensate for any disruptions to business that could result. In addition, as cybercriminals become
more sophisticated, the cost of proactive defensive measures may increase.
These events could negatively affect the financial results of the registrants through lost revenues, costs to recover and repair
damage, costs associated with governmental actions in response to such attacks, and litigation costs if such costs cannot be
recovered through insurance or otherwise.
The Southern Company system may not be able to obtain adequate natural gas, fuel supplies, and other resources required
to operate the traditional electric operating companies' and Southern Power's electric generating plants or serve Southern
Company Gas' natural gas customers.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power purchase fuel, including coal, natural gas, uranium, fuel oil, and
biomass, as applicable, from a number of suppliers. Additionally, the traditional electric operating companies and Southern
I-23
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Power need adequate access to water, which is drawn from nearby sources to aid in the production of electricity and, once it is
used, returned to its source. Disruption in the delivery of fuel, including disruptions as a result of, among other things,
transportation delays, weather, labor relations, force majeure events, or environmental regulations affecting any of these fuel
suppliers, or the availability of water, could limit the ability of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power to
operate certain facilities, which could result in higher fuel and operating costs and potentially reduce the net income of the affected
traditional electric operating company or Southern Power and Southern Company.
Southern Company Gas' primary business is the distribution and sale of natural gas through its regulated and unregulated
subsidiaries. Natural gas supplies can be subject to disruption in the event production or distribution is curtailed, such as in the
event of a hurricane or a pipeline failure. Southern Company Gas also relies on natural gas pipelines and other storage and
transportation facilities owned and operated by third parties to deliver natural gas to wholesale markets and to Southern Company
Gas' distribution systems. The availability of shale gas and potential regulations affecting its accessibility may have a material
impact on the supply and cost of natural gas. Disruption in natural gas supplies could limit the ability to fulfill these contractual
obligations.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power have become more dependent on natural gas for a portion of their
electric generating capacity and expect to continue to increase such dependence. In many instances, the cost of purchased power for
the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power is influenced by natural gas prices. Historically, natural gas prices
have been more volatile than prices of other fuels. In recent years, domestic natural gas prices have been depressed by robust
supplies, including production from shale gas. These market conditions, together with additional regulation of coal-fired generating
units, have increased the traditional electric operating companies' reliance on natural gas-fired generating units.
The traditional electric operating companies are also dependent on coal for a portion of their electric generating capacity. The
traditional electric operating companies depend on coal supply contracts, and the counterparties to these agreements may not fulfill
their obligations to supply coal to the traditional electric operating companies. The suppliers may experience financial or technical
problems that inhibit their ability to fulfill their obligations. In addition, the suppliers may not be required to supply coal under
certain circumstances, such as in the event of a natural disaster. If the traditional electric operating companies are unable to obtain
their coal requirements under these contracts, they may be required to purchase their coal requirements at higher prices, which may
not be recoverable through rates.
The revenues of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power depend in part on
sales under PPAs. The failure of a counterparty to one of these PPAs to perform its obligations, the failure of the traditional
electric operating companies or Southern Power to satisfy minimum requirements under the PPAs, or the failure to renew
the PPAs or successfully remarket the related generating capacity could have a negative impact on the net income and cash
flows of the affected traditional electric operating company or Southern Power and of Southern Company.
Most of Southern Power's generating capacity has been sold to purchasers under PPAs. Southern Power's top three customers,
Georgia Power, Duke Energy Corporation, and Southern California Edison accounted for 9.8%, 6.8%, and 6.2%, respectively, of
Southern Power's total revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018. In addition, the traditional electric operating companies
enter into PPAs with non-affiliated parties. Revenues are dependent on the continued performance by the purchasers of their
obligations under these PPAs. The failure of one of the purchasers to perform its obligations, including as a result of a general
default or bankruptcy, could have a negative impact on the net income and cash flows of the affected traditional electric operating
company or Southern Power and of Southern Company. Although the credit evaluations undertaken and contractual protections
implemented by Southern Power and the traditional electric operating companies take into account the possibility of default by a
purchaser, actual exposure to a default by a purchaser may be greater than predicted or specified in the applicable contract. See
Note 1 to the financial statements under "Revenues – Concentration of Revenue" in Item 8 herein for additional information on
Pacific Gas & Electric Company's bankruptcy filing.
Additionally, neither Southern Power nor any traditional electric operating company can predict whether the PPAs will be renewed
at the end of their respective terms or on what terms any renewals may be made. The failure of the traditional electric operating
companies or Southern Power to satisfy minimum operational or availability requirements under these PPAs could result in
payment of damages or termination of the PPAs.
The asset management arrangements between Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services and its customers, including
the natural gas distribution utilities, may not be renewed or may be renewed at lower levels, which could have a significant
impact on Southern Company Gas' financial results.
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services currently manages the storage and transportation assets of the natural gas
distribution utilities (except Nicor Gas) as well as certain non-affiliated customers. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas
I-24
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
services has a concentration of credit risk for services it provides to its counterparties, which is generally concentrated in 20 of its
counterparties.
The profits earned from the management of affiliate assets are shared with the respective affiliate's customers (and for Atlanta Gas
Light with the Georgia PSC's Universal Service Fund), except for Chattanooga Gas where wholesale gas services are provided
under annual fixed-fee agreements. These asset management agreements are subject to regulatory approval and such agreements
may not be renewed or may be renewed with less favorable terms.
The financial results of Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services could be significantly impacted if any of its agreements
with its affiliated or non-affiliated customers are not renewed or are amended or renewed with less favorable terms. Sustained low
natural gas prices could reduce the demand for these types of asset management arrangements.
Increased competition could negatively impact Southern Company's and its subsidiaries' revenues, results of operations,
and financial condition.
The Southern Company system faces increasing competition from other companies that supply energy or generation and storage
technologies. Changes in technology may make the Southern Company system's electric generating facilities owned by the
traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power less competitive. Southern Company Gas' business is dependent on
natural gas prices remaining competitive as compared to other forms of energy. Southern Company Gas also faces competition in
its unregulated markets.
A key element of the business models of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power is that generating power
at central station power plants achieves economies of scale and produces power at a competitive cost. There are distributed
generation and storage technologies that produce and store power, including fuel cells, microturbines, wind turbines, solar cells,
and batteries. Advances in technology or changes in laws or regulations could reduce the cost of these or other alternative methods
of producing power to a level that is competitive with that of most central station power electric production or result in smaller-
scale, more fuel efficient, and/or more cost effective distributed generation that allows for increased self-generation by customers.
Broader use of distributed generation by retail energy customers may also result from customers' changing perceptions of the merits
of utilizing existing generation technology or tax or other economic incentives. Additionally, a state PSC or legislature may modify
certain aspects of the traditional electric operating companies' business as a result of these advances in technology.
It is also possible that rapid advances in central station power generation technology could reduce the value of the current electric
generating facilities owned by the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power. Changes in technology could also
alter the channels through which electric customers buy or utilize power, which could reduce the revenues or increase the expenses
of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, or Southern Power.
Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services is affected by competition from other energy marketers providing similar services
in Southern Company Gas' service territories, most notably in Illinois and Georgia. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services
competes for sales with national and regional full-service energy providers, energy merchants and producers, and pipelines based
on the ability to aggregate competitively-priced commodities with transportation and storage capacity. Southern Company Gas
competes with natural gas facilities in the Gulf Coast region of the U.S., as the majority of the existing and proposed high
deliverability salt-dome natural gas storage facilities in North America are located in the Gulf Coast region.
If new technologies become cost competitive and achieve sufficient scale, the market share of the Subsidiary Registrants could be
eroded, and the value of their respective electric generating facilities or natural gas distribution and storage facilities could be
reduced. Additionally, Southern Company Gas' market share could be reduced if Southern Company Gas cannot remain price
competitive in its unregulated markets. If state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies fail to adjust rates to reflect the
impact of any changes in loads, increasing self-generation, and the growth of distributed generation, the financial condition, results
of operations, and cash flows of Southern Company and the affected traditional electric operating company or Southern Company
Gas could be materially adversely affected.
Failure to attract and retain an appropriately qualified workforce could negatively impact Southern Company's and its
subsidiaries' results of operations.
Events such as an aging workforce without appropriate replacements, mismatch of skill sets to future needs, or unavailability of
contract resources may lead to operating challenges such as lack of resources, loss of knowledge, and a lengthy time period
associated with skill development, including with the workforce needs associated with major construction projects and ongoing
operations. The Southern Company system's costs, including costs for contractors to replace employees, productivity costs, and
safety costs, may rise. Failure to hire and adequately obtain replacement employees, including the ability to transfer significant
internal historical knowledge and expertise to the new employees, or the future availability and cost of contract labor may adversely
affect Southern Company and its subsidiaries' ability to manage and operate their businesses. If Southern Company
I-25
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
and its subsidiaries are unable to successfully attract and retain an appropriately qualified workforce, results of operations could be
negatively impacted.
CONSTRUCTION RISKS
The registrants may incur additional costs or delays in the construction of new plants or other facilities and may not be able
to recover their investments. Also, existing facilities of the Subsidiary Registrants require ongoing expenditures, including
those to meet AROs and other environmental standards and goals.
General
The businesses of the registrants require substantial expenditures for investments in new facilities and, for the traditional electric
operating companies, capital improvements to transmission, distribution, and generation facilities, for Southern Power, capital
improvements to generation facilities, and, for Southern Company Gas, capital improvements to natural gas distribution and storage
facilities. These expenditures also include those to meet AROs and environmental standards and goals. Certain of the traditional
electric operating companies and Southern Power are in the process of constructing new generating facilities and adding
environmental controls equipment at existing generating facilities. Southern Company Gas is replacing certain pipelines in its
natural gas distribution system and is involved in two new gas pipeline construction projects. The Southern Company system
intends to continue its strategy of developing and constructing other new facilities, expanding or updating existing facilities, and
adding environmental control equipment. These types of projects are long term in nature and in some cases may include the
development and construction of facilities with designs that have not been finalized or previously constructed. The completion of
these types of projects without delays or significant cost overruns is subject to substantial risks, including:
•shortages, increased costs, or inconsistent quality of equipment, materials, and labor;
•changes in labor costs, availability, and productivity;
•challenges related to management of contractors, subcontractors, or vendors;
•work stoppages;
•contractor or supplier delay;
•non-performance under construction, operating, or other agreements;
•delays in or failure to receive necessary permits, approvals, tax credits, and other regulatory authorizations;
•delays in start-up activities (including major equipment failure and system integration) and/or operational performance;
•operational readiness, including specialized operator training and required site safety programs;
•impacts of new and existing laws and regulations, including environmental laws and regulations;
•the outcome of any legal challenges to projects, including legal challenges to regulatory approvals;
•failure to construct in accordance with permitting and licensing requirements (including satisfaction of NRC
requirements);
•failure to satisfy any environmental performance standards and the requirements of tax credits and other incentives;
•continued public and policymaker support for projects;
•adverse weather conditions or natural disasters;
•engineering or design problems;
•changes in project design or scope;
•environmental and geological conditions;
•delays or increased costs to interconnect facilities to transmission grids; and
•increased financing costs as a result of changes in market interest rates or as a result of project delays.
If a Subsidiary Registrant is unable to complete the development or construction of a project or decides to delay or cancel
construction of a project, it may not be able to recover its investment in that project and may incur substantial cancellation
payments under equipment purchase orders or construction contracts, as well as other costs associated with the closure and/or
abandonment of the construction project. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County Energy Facility" for
information related to the abandonment of and related closure activities and costs for the mine and gasifier-related assets at the
Kemper County energy facility.
Additionally, each Southern Company Gas pipeline construction project involves separate joint venture participants, Southern
Power participates in partnership agreements with respect to renewable energy projects, and Georgia Power jointly owns Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 with other co-owners. Any failure by a partner or co-owner to perform its obligations under the applicable
agreements could have a material negative impact on the applicable project under construction. In addition, partnership and joint
ownership agreements may provide partners or co-owners with certain decision-making authority in connection with projects under
construction, including rights to cause the cancellation of a construction project under certain circumstances.
Even if a construction project (including a joint venture construction project) is completed, the total costs may be higher than
estimated and may not be recoverable through regulated rates, if applicable. In addition, construction delays and contractor
I-26
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
performance shortfalls can result in the loss of revenues and may, in turn, adversely affect the net income and financial position of
the affected registrant. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "FERC Matters – Southern Company Gas" for information
regarding the Atlantic Coast Pipeline construction delays and the associated cost increase.
Construction delays could result in the loss of otherwise available tax credits and incentives. Furthermore, if construction projects
are not completed according to specification, a registrant may incur liabilities and suffer reduced plant efficiency, higher operating
costs, and reduced net income.
Once facilities become operational, ongoing capital expenditures are required to maintain reliable levels of operation. Significant
portions of the traditional electric operating companies' existing facilities were constructed many years ago. Older equipment, even
if maintained in accordance with good engineering practices, may require significant expenditures to maintain efficiency, to comply
with changing environmental requirements, to provide safe and reliable operations, and/or to meet related retirement obligations.
The largest construction project currently underway in the Southern Company system is Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 construction and rate recovery
Background
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In 2012, the NRC issued the related combined construction and operating licenses, which allowed full
construction of the two AP1000 nuclear units (with electric generating capacity of approximately 1,100 MWs each) and related
facilities to begin. Until March 2017, construction on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 continued under the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement,
which was a substantially fixed price agreement. In March 2017, the EPC Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter
11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.
In connection with the EPC Contractor's bankruptcy filing, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the Vogtle Owners,
entered into the Interim Assessment Agreement with the EPC Contractor to allow construction to continue. The Interim Assessment
Agreement expired in July 2017 when Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, and the EPC
Contractor entered into the Vogtle Services Agreement. Under the Vogtle Services Agreement, Westinghouse provides facility
design and engineering services, procurement and technical support, and staff augmentation on a time and materials cost basis.
In October 2017, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, executed the Bechtel Agreement, a cost
reimbursable plus fee arrangement, whereby Bechtel is reimbursed for actual costs plus a base fee and an at-risk fee, which is
subject to adjustment based on Bechtel's performance against cost and schedule targets.
Cost and Schedule
Georgia Power's approximate proportionate share of the remaining estimated capital cost to complete Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 by
the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, is as follows:
 (in billions)
Base project capital cost forecast(a)(b)$ 8.0
Construction contingency estimate 0.4
Total project capital cost forecast(a)(b)8.4
Net investment as of December 31, 2018(b)(4.6)
Remaining estimate to complete(a)$ 3.8
(a)Excludes financing costs expected to be capitalized through AFUDC of approximately $315 million.
(b)Net of $1.7 billion received from Toshiba under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds.
Georgia Power estimates that its financing costs for construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will total approximately $3.1 billion,
of which $1.9 billion had been incurred through December 31, 2018.
As construction continues, challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, and vendors; labor productivity, availability,
and/or cost escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, and/or installation and testing, including any required
engineering changes, of plant systems, structures, and components (some of which are based on new technology that only recently
began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale); or other issues could arise and change the projected schedule and
estimated cost. Monthly construction production targets required to maintain the current project schedule will continue to increase
significantly throughout 2019. To meet these increasing monthly targets, existing craft construction productivity must improve and
additional craft laborers must be retained and deployed.
I-27
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Georgia Power and Southern Nuclear believe it is a leading practice in connection with a construction project of this size and
complexity to periodically validate recent construction progress in comparison to the projected schedule and to verify and update
quantities of commodities remaining to install, labor productivity, and forecasted staffing needs. This verification process, led by
Southern Nuclear, was underway as of December 31, 2018 and is expected to be completed during the second quarter 2019.
Georgia Power currently does not anticipate any material changes to the total estimated project capital cost forecast for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 or the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, resulting from this verification
process. However, the ultimate impact on cost and schedule, if any, will not be known until the verification process is completed.
Georgia Power is required to report the results and any project impacts to the Georgia PSC by May 15, 2019.
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC, may
arise, which may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. If any license amendment requests or other
licensing-based compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result
in increased costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, any extension of the project schedule is
currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50 million per month, based on Georgia Power's
ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While Georgia Power is not precluded from seeking
recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately determine whether or not to seek recovery. Any
further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable through regulated rates will be required to be
charged to income and such charges could be material.
Joint Owner Contracts
In November 2017, the Vogtle Owners entered into an amendment to their joint ownership agreements for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 to provide for, among other conditions, additional Vogtle Owner approval requirements. Effective August 31, 2018, the Vogtle
Owners further amended the joint ownership agreements to clarify and provide procedures for certain provisions of the joint
ownership agreements related to adverse events that require the vote of the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to continue construction (as amended, and together with the November 2017 amendment, the Vogtle
Joint Ownership Agreements).
As a result of the increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs as described below, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4 were required to vote to continue construction. On September 26, 2018, the Vogtle Owners unanimously voted to continue
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
In connection with the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into (i) a binding term sheet (Vogtle Owner Term
Sheet) with the other Vogtle Owners and MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC (MEAG SPVJ), MEAG
Power SPVM, LLC (MEAG SPVM), and MEAG Power SPVP, LLC (MEAG SPVP) to take certain actions which partially
mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle Owners, including additional amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements and the purchase of PTCs from the other Vogtle Owners, and (ii) a term sheet (MEAG Term Sheet) with MEAG and
MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with respect to MEAG SPVJ's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (Project J) under
certain circumstances. On January 14, 2019, Georgia Power, MEAG, and MEAG SPVJ entered into an agreement to implement the
provisions of the MEAG Term Sheet (MEAG Funding Agreement). On February 18, 2019, Georgia Power, the other Vogtle
Owners, and MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG SPVJ, MEAG SPVM, and MEAG SPVP entered into certain
amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements to implement the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet (Global
Amendments).
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
were modified as follows: (i) each Vogtle Owner must pay its proportionate share of qualifying construction costs for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 based on its ownership percentage up to the estimated cost at completion (EAC) for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 which
formed the basis of Georgia Power's forecast of $8.4 billion in the nineteenth VCM plus $800 million; (ii) Georgia Power will be
responsible for 55.7% of actual qualifying construction costs between $800 million and $1.6 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth
VCM (resulting in $80 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners responsible for
44.3% of such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests; and (iii) Georgia
I-28
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Power will be responsible for 65.7% of qualifying construction costs between $1.6 billion and $2.1 billion over the EAC in the
nineteenth VCM (resulting in a further $100 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle
Owners responsible for 34.3% of such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
If the EAC is revised and exceeds the EAC in the nineteenth VCM by more than $2.1 billion, each of the other Vogtle Owners will
have a one-time option at the time the project budget forecast is so revised to tender a portion of its ownership interest to Georgia
Power in exchange for Georgia Power's agreement to pay 100% of such Vogtle Owner's remaining share of total construction costs
in excess of the EAC in the nineteenth VCM plus $2.1 billion. In this event, Georgia Power will have the option of cancelling the
project in lieu of purchasing a portion of the ownership interest of any other Vogtle Owner. If Georgia Power accepts the offer to
purchase a portion of another Vogtle Owner's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, the ownership interest(s) to be
conveyed from the tendering Vogtle Owner(s) to Georgia Power will be calculated based on the proportion of the cumulative
amount of construction costs paid by each such tendering Vogtle Owner(s) and by Georgia Power as of the COD of Plant Vogtle
Unit 4. For purposes of this calculation, payments made by Georgia Power on behalf of another Vogtle Owner in accordance with
the second and third items described in the paragraph above will be treated as payments made by the applicable Vogtle Owner.
In the event the actual costs of construction at completion of a Unit are less than the EAC reflected in the nineteenth VCM report
and such Unit is placed in service in accordance with the schedule projected in the nineteenth VCM report (i.e., Plant Vogtle Unit 3
is placed in service by November 2021 or Plant Vogtle Unit 4 is placed in service by November 2022), Georgia Power will be
entitled to 60.7% of the cost savings with respect to the relevant Unit and the remaining Vogtle Owners will be entitled to 39.3% of
such savings on a pro rata basis in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
For purposes of the foregoing provisions, qualifying construction costs will not include costs (i) resulting from force majeure
events, including governmental actions or inactions (or significant delays associated with issuance of such actions) that affect the
licensing, completion, start-up, operations, or financing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, administrative proceedings or litigation
regarding ITAAC or other regulatory challenges to commencement of operation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, and changes in laws
or regulations governing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, (ii) legal fees and legal expenses incurred due to litigation with contractors or
subcontractors that are not subsidiaries or affiliates of Southern Company, and (iii) additional costs caused by requests from the
Vogtle Owners other than Georgia Power, except for the exercise of a right to vote granted under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements, that increase costs by $100,000 or more.
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the provisions of the Vogtle Joint
Ownership Agreements requiring that Vogtle Owners holding 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 vote to
continue construction following certain adverse events (Project Adverse Events) were modified. Pursuant to the Global
Amendments, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 must vote to continue
construction if certain Project Adverse Events occur, including: (i) the bankruptcy of Toshiba; (ii) the termination or rejection in
bankruptcy of certain agreements, including the Vogtle Services Agreement, the Bechtel Agreement, or the agency agreement with
Southern Nuclear; (iii) Georgia Power publicly announces its intention not to submit for rate recovery any portion of its investment
in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 or the Georgia PSC determines that any of Georgia Power's costs relating to the construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will not be recovered in retail rates, excluding any additional amounts paid by Georgia Power on behalf of the
other Vogtle Owners pursuant to the Global Amendments described above and the first 6% of costs during any six-month VCM
reporting period that are disallowed by the Georgia PSC for recovery, or for which Georgia Power elects not to seek cost recovery,
through retail rates; and (iv) an incremental extension of one year or more over the most recently approved schedule. Under the
Global Amendments, Georgia Power may cancel the project at any time in its sole discretion.
In addition, pursuant to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements, the required approval of holders of ownership interests in Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is at least (i) 90% for a change of the primary construction contractor and (ii) 67% for material amendments to
the Vogtle Services Agreement or agreements with Southern Nuclear or the primary construction contractor, including the Bechtel
Agreement.
The Global Amendments provide that if the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests fail to vote in favor of continuing the
project following any future Project Adverse Event, work on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will continue for a period of 30 days if the
holders of more than 50% of the ownership interests vote in favor of continuing construction (Majority Voting Owners). In such a
case, the Vogtle Owners (i) have agreed to negotiate in good faith towards the resumption of the project, (ii) if no agreement is
reached during such 30-day period, the project will be cancelled, and (iii) in the event of such a cancellation, the Majority Voting
Owners will be obligated to reimburse any other Vogtle Owner for the incremental costs it incurred during such 30-day negotiation
period.
I-29
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Purchase of PTCs During Commercial Operation
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, Georgia Power has agreed to purchase
additional PTCs from OPC, Dalton, MEAG SPVM, MEAG SPVP, and MEAG SPVJ (to the extent any MEAG SPVJ PTC rights
remain after any purchases required under the MEAG Funding Agreement as described below) at varying purchase prices
dependent upon the actual cost to complete construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 as compared to the EAC reflected in the
nineteenth VCM report. The purchases are at the option of the applicable Vogtle Owner.
Potential Funding to MEAG Project J
Pursuant to the MEAG Funding Agreement, and consistent with the MEAG Term Sheet, if MEAG SPVJ is unable to make its
payments due under the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements solely as a result of the occurrence of one of the following situations
that materially impedes access to capital markets for MEAG for Project J: (i) the conduct of JEA or the City of Jacksonville, such
as JEA's legal challenges of its obligations under a PPA with MEAG (PPA-J), or (ii) PPA-J is declared void by a court of competent
jurisdiction or rejected by JEA under the applicable provisions of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code (each of (i) and (ii), a JEA Default), at
MEAG's request, Georgia Power will purchase from MEAG SPVJ the rights to PTCs attributable to MEAG SPVJ's share of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (approximately 206 MWs) within 30 days of such request at varying prices dependent upon the stage of
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. The aggregate purchase price of the PTCs, together with any advances made as
described in the next paragraph, shall not exceed $300 million.
At the option of MEAG, as an alternative or supplement to Georgia Power's purchase of PTCs as described above, Georgia Power
has agreed to provide up to $250 million in funding to MEAG for Project J in the form of advances (either advances under the
Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements or the purchase of MEAG Project J bonds, at the discretion of Georgia Power), subject to any
required approvals of the Georgia PSC and the DOE.
In the event MEAG SPVJ certifies to Georgia Power that it is unable to fund its obligations under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements as a result of a JEA Default and Georgia Power becomes obligated to provide funding as described above, MEAG is
required to (i) assign to Georgia Power its right to vote on any future Project Adverse Event and (ii) diligently pursue JEA for its
breach of PPA-J. In addition, Georgia Power agreed that it will not sue MEAG for any amounts due from MEAG SPVJ under
MEAG's guarantee of MEAG SPVJ's obligations so long as MEAG SPVJ complies with the terms of the MEAG Funding
Agreement as to its payment obligations and the other non-payment provisions of the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements.
Under the terms of the MEAG Funding Agreement, Georgia Power may cancel the project in lieu of providing funding in the form
of advances or PTC purchases.
Regulatory Matters
In December 2017, the Georgia PSC voted to approve (and issued its related order on January 11, 2018) Georgia Power's
recommendation to continue construction and resolved the following regulatory matters related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4: (i)
none of the $3.3 billion of costs incurred through December 31, 2015 and reflected in the fourteenth VCM report should be
disallowed from rate base on the basis of imprudence; (ii) the Contractor Settlement Agreement was reasonable and prudent and
none of the amounts paid pursuant to the Contractor Settlement Agreement should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of
imprudence; (iii) (a) capital costs incurred up to $5.68 billion would be presumed to be reasonable and prudent with the burden of
proof on any party challenging such costs, (b) Georgia Power would have the burden to show that any capital costs above $5.68
billion were prudent, and (c) a revised capital cost forecast of $7.3 billion (after reflecting the impact of payments received under
the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and related Customer Refunds) was found reasonable; (iv) construction of Plant Vogtle Units
3 and 4 should be completed, with Southern Nuclear serving as project manager and Bechtel as primary contractor; (v) approved
and deemed reasonable Georgia Power's revised schedule placing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in service in November 2021 and
November 2022, respectively; (vi) confirmed that the revised cost forecast does not represent a cost cap and that prudence decisions
on cost recovery will be made at a later date, consistent with applicable Georgia law; (vii) reduced the ROE used to calculate the
NCCR tariff (a) from 10.95% (the ROE rate setting point authorized by the Georgia PSC in the 2013 ARP) to 10.00% effective
January 1, 2016, (b) from 10.00% to 8.30%, effective January 1, 2020, and (c) from 8.30% to 5.30%, effective January 1, 2021
(provided that the ROE in no case will be less than Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt); (viii) reduced the ROE used
for AFUDC equity for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 from 10.00% to Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt, effective
January 1, 2018; and (ix) agreed that upon Unit 3 reaching commercial operation, retail base rates would be adjusted to include
carrying costs on those capital costs deemed prudent in the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement. The January 11, 2018 order also
stated that if Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are not commercially operational by June 1, 2021 and June 1, 2022, respectively, the ROE
used to calculate the NCCR tariff will be further reduced by 10 basis points each month (but not lower than Georgia Power's
average cost of long-term debt) until the respective Unit is commercially operational. The ROE reductions negatively impacted
earnings by approximately $100 million, $25 million, and $20 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively, and are estimated to
have negative earnings impacts of approximately $75 million in 2019 and an aggregate of approximately $615 million from 2020 to
2022.
I-30
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
In its January 11, 2018 order, the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon which Georgia Power's
seventeenth VCM report are based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the decision to continue
construction.
On February 12, 2018, Georgia Interfaith Power & Light, Inc. (GIPL) and Partnership for Southern Equity, Inc. (PSE) filed a
petition appealing the Georgia PSC's January 11, 2018 order with the Fulton County Superior Court. On March 8, 2018, Georgia
Watch filed a similar appeal to the Fulton County Superior Court for judicial review of the Georgia PSC's decision and denial of
Georgia Watch's motion for reconsideration. On December 21, 2018, the Fulton County Superior Court granted Georgia Power's
motion to dismiss the two appeals. On January 9, 2019, GIPL, PSE, and Georgia Watch filed an appeal of this decision with the
Georgia Court of Appeals. Georgia Power believes the appeal has no merit; however, an adverse outcome in the appeal combined
with subsequent adverse action by the Georgia PSC could have a material impact on Southern Company's and Georgia Power's
results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
In preparation for its nineteenth VCM filing, Georgia Power requested Southern Nuclear to perform a full cost reforecast for the
project. This reforecast, performed prior to the nineteenth VCM filing, resulted in a $0.7 billion increase to the base capital cost
forecast reported in the second quarter 2018. This base cost increase primarily resulted from changed assumptions related to the
finalization of contract scopes and management responsibilities for Bechtel and over 60 subcontractors, labor productivity rates,
and craft labor incentives, as well as the related levels of project management, oversight, and support, including field supervision
and engineering support.
Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the Georgia
PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is not subject
to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for these cost increases included in the current base capital cost forecast (or
any related financing costs) in the nineteenth VCM report. In connection with future VCM filings, Georgia Power may request the
Georgia PSC to evaluate costs currently included in the construction contingency estimate for rate recovery as and when they are
appropriately included in the base capital cost forecast. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that exists regarding
the future recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of these matters is
subject to the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future regulatory
proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter
2018, which includes the total increase in the base capital cost forecast and construction contingency estimate.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein for additional information
regarding Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Southern Company Gas' significant investments in pipelines and pipeline development projects involve financial and
execution risks.
Southern Company Gas has made significant investments in existing pipelines and pipeline development projects. Many of the
existing pipelines are, and when completed many of the pipeline development projects will be, operated by third parties. If one of
these agents fails to perform in a proper manner, the value of the investment could decline and Southern Company Gas could lose
part or all of its investment. In addition, from time to time, Southern Company Gas may be required to contribute additional capital
to a pipeline joint venture or guarantee the obligations of such joint venture.
With respect to certain pipeline development projects, Southern Company Gas will rely on its joint venture partners for
construction management and will not exercise direct control over the process. All of the pipeline development projects are
dependent on contractors for the successful and timely completion of the projects. Further, the development of pipeline projects
involves numerous regulatory, environmental, construction, safety, political, and legal uncertainties and may require the
expenditure of significant amounts of capital. These projects may not be completed on schedule, at the budgeted cost, or at all.
There may be cost overruns and construction difficulties that cause Southern Company Gas' capital expenditures to exceed its
initial expectations. Moreover, Southern Company Gas' income will not increase immediately upon the expenditure of funds on a
pipeline project. Pipeline construction occurs over an extended period of time and Southern Company Gas will not receive material
increases in income until the project is placed in service.
Work continues with state and federal agencies to obtain the required permits to begin construction on the PennEast Pipeline. Any
material delays may impact forecasted capital expenditures and the expected in-service date.
The Atlantic Coast Pipeline has experienced challenges to its permits since construction began in 2018. During the third and fourth
quarters 2018, a FERC stop work order, together with delays in obtaining permits necessary for construction and construction
delays due to judicial actions, impacted the cost and schedule for the project. As a result, total project cost estimates have increased
and the operator of the joint venture currently expects to achieve a late 2020 in-service date for at least
I-31
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
key segments of the Atlantic Coast Pipeline, while the remainder may extend into early 2021. Abnormal weather, work delays
(including due to judicial or regulatory action), and other conditions may result in additional cost or schedule modifications, which
could result in an impairment of Southern Company Gas' investment and could have a material impact on Southern Company's and
Southern Company Gas' financial statements.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time and the occurrence of these or any other of the foregoing
events could adversely affect the results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition of Southern Company Gas and Southern
Company.
FINANCIAL, ECONOMIC, AND MARKET RISKS
The electric generation and energy marketing operations of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern
Power and the natural gas operations of Southern Company Gas are subject to risks, many of which are beyond their
control, including changes in energy prices and fuel costs, which may reduce revenues and increase costs.
The generation, energy marketing, and natural gas operations of the Southern Company system are subject to changes in energy
prices and fuel costs, which could increase the cost of producing power, decrease the amount received from the sale of energy,
and/or make electric generating facilities less competitive. The market prices for these commodities may fluctuate significantly
over relatively short periods of time. Among the factors that could influence energy prices and fuel costs are:
•prevailing market prices for coal, natural gas, uranium, fuel oil, biomass, and other fuels, as applicable, used in the
generation facilities of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power and, in the case of natural gas,
distributed by Southern Company Gas, including associated transportation costs, and supplies of such commodities;
•demand for energy and the extent of additional supplies of energy available from current or new competitors;
•liquidity in the general wholesale electricity and natural gas markets;
•weather conditions impacting demand for electricity and natural gas;
•seasonality;
•transmission or transportation constraints, disruptions, or inefficiencies;
•availability of competitively priced alternative energy sources;
•forced or unscheduled plant outages for the Southern Company system, its competitors, or third party providers;
•the financial condition of market participants;
•the economy in the Southern Company system's service territory, the nation, and worldwide, including the impact of
economic conditions on demand for electricity and the demand for fuels, including natural gas;
•natural disasters, wars, embargos, physical or cyber attacks, and other catastrophic events; and
•federal, state, and foreign energy and environmental regulation and legislation.
These factors could increase the expenses and/or reduce the revenues of the registrants. For the traditional electric operating
companies and Southern Company Gas' regulated gas distribution operations, such impacts may not be fully recoverable through
rates.
Historically, the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas from time to time have experienced
underrecovered fuel and/or purchased gas cost balances and may experience such balances in the future. While the traditional
electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas are generally authorized to recover fuel and/or purchased gas costs
through cost recovery clauses, recovery may be denied if costs are deemed to be imprudently incurred, and delays in the
authorization of such recovery, both of which could negatively impact the cash flows of the affected traditional electric operating
company or Southern Company Gas and of Southern Company.
The registrants are subject to risks associated with a changing economic environment, customer behaviors, including
increased energy conservation, and adoption patterns of technologies by the customers of the Subsidiary Registrants.
The consumption and use of energy are fundamentally linked to economic activity. This relationship is affected over time by
changes in the economy, customer behaviors, and technologies. Any economic downturn could negatively impact customer growth
and usage per customer, thus reducing the sales of energy and revenues. Additionally, any economic downturn or disruption of
financial markets, both nationally and internationally, could negatively affect the financial stability of customers and counterparties
of the Subsidiary Registrants.
Outside of economic disruptions, changes in customer behaviors in response to energy efficiency programs, changing conditions
and preferences, or changes in the adoption of technologies could affect the relationship of economic activity to the consumption of
energy.
Both federal and state programs exist to influence how customers use energy, and several of the traditional electric operating
companies and Southern Company Gas have PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency mandates to promote energy
efficiency. Conservation programs could impact the financial results of the registrants in different ways. For example, if any
traditional electric operating company or Southern Company Gas is required to invest in conservation measures that result in
I-32
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
reduced sales from effective conservation, regulatory lag in adjusting rates for the impact of these measures could have a negative
financial impact on such traditional electric operating company or Southern Company Gas and Southern Company. Customers
could also voluntarily reduce their consumption of energy in response to decreases in their disposable income, increases in energy
prices, or individual conservation efforts.
In addition, the adoption of technology by customers can have both positive and negative impacts on sales. Many new technologies
utilize less energy than in the past. However, electric and natural gas technologies such as electric and natural gas vehicles can
create additional demand. The Southern Company system uses best available methods and experience to incorporate the effects of
changes in customer behavior, state and federal programs, PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency mandates, and
technology, but the Southern Company system's planning processes may not appropriately estimate and incorporate these effects.
All of the factors discussed above could adversely affect a registrant's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
The operating results of the registrants are affected by weather conditions and may fluctuate on a seasonal and quarterly
basis. In addition, catastrophic events, such as fires, earthquakes, hurricanes, tornadoes, floods, droughts, and storms, could
result in substantial damage to or limit the operation of the properties of a Subsidiary Registrant and could negatively
impact results of operation, financial condition, and liquidity.
Electric power and natural gas supply are generally seasonal businesses. In many parts of the country, demand for power peaks
during the summer months, with market prices also peaking at that time. In other areas, power demand peaks during the winter
months. While the electric power sales of some of the traditional electric operating companies peak in the summer, others peak in
the winter. In the aggregate, electric power sales peak during the summer with a smaller peak during the winter. Additionally,
Southern Power has variability in its revenues from renewable generation facilities due to seasonal weather patterns primarily from
wind and sun. In most of the areas Southern Company Gas serves, natural gas demand peaks during the winter. As a result, the
overall operating results of the registrants may fluctuate substantially on a seasonal basis. In addition, the Subsidiary Registrants
have historically sold less power and natural gas when weather conditions are milder. Unusually mild weather in the future could
reduce the revenues, net income, and available cash of the affected registrant.
Further, volatile or significant weather events could result in substantial damage to the transmission and distribution lines of the
traditional electric operating companies, the generating facilities of the traditional electric operating companies and Southern
Power, and the natural gas distribution and storage facilities of Southern Company Gas. The Subsidiary Registrants have significant
investments in the Atlantic and Gulf Coast regions and Southern Power and Southern Company Gas have investments in various
states which could be subject to severe weather and natural disasters, including wildfires. Further, severe drought conditions can
reduce the availability of water and restrict or prevent the operation of certain generating facilities. There have been multiple
significant hurricanes in the Southern Company system service territory in recent years.
In the event a traditional electric operating company or Southern Company Gas experiences any of these weather events or any
natural disaster or other catastrophic event, recovery of costs in excess of reserves and insurance coverage is subject to the approval
of its state PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency. Historically, the traditional electric operating companies from time to
time have experienced deficits in their storm cost recovery reserve balances and may experience such deficits in the future. For
example, at December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had a substantial underrecovered balance in its storm cost recovery balance as a
result of multiple recent significant hurricanes in its service territory. Any denial by the applicable state PSC or other applicable
state regulatory agency or delay in recovery of any portion of such costs could have a material negative impact on a traditional
electric operating company's or Southern Company Gas' and on Southern Company's results of operations, financial condition, and
liquidity.
In addition, damages resulting from significant weather events within the service territory of any traditional electric operating
company or Southern Company Gas or affecting Southern Power's customers may result in the loss of customers and reduced
demand for energy for extended periods and may impact customers' ability to perform under existing PPAs. See Note 1 to the
financial statements under "Revenues – Concentration of Revenue" in Item 8 herein for additional information on Pacific Gas &
Electric Company's bankruptcy filing. Any significant loss of customers or reduction in demand for energy could have a material
negative impact on a registrant's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
Acquisitions, dispositions, or other strategic ventures or investments may not result in anticipated benefits and may present
risks not originally contemplated, which may have a material adverse effect on the liquidity, results of operations, and
financial condition of Southern Company and its subsidiaries.
Southern Company and its subsidiaries have made significant acquisitions and investments in the past, as well as recent
dispositions, and may in the future make additional acquisitions, dispositions, or other strategic ventures or investments, including
the pending disposition by Southern Power of Plant Mankato, which cannot be assured to be completed or beneficial to Southern
Company or its subsidiaries. Southern Company and its subsidiaries continually seek opportunities to create value
I-33
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
through various transactions, including acquisitions or sales of assets. Specifically, Southern Power continually seeks opportunities
to execute its strategy to create value through various transactions, including acquisitions, dispositions, and sales of partnership
interests, development and construction of new generating facilities, and entry into PPAs primarily with investor-owned utilities,
IPPs, municipalities, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial customers.
Southern Company and its subsidiaries may face significant competition for transactional opportunities and anticipated transactions
may not be completed on acceptable terms or at all. In addition, these transactions are intended to, but may not, result in the
generation of cash or income, the realization of savings, the creation of efficiencies, or the reduction of risk. These transactions may
also affect the liquidity, results of operations, and financial condition of Southern Company and its subsidiaries.
These transactions also involve risks, including:
•they may not result in an increase in income or provide adequate or expected funds or return on capital or other anticipated
benefits;
•they may result in Southern Company or its subsidiaries entering into new or additional lines of business, which may have
new or different business or operational risks;
•they may not be successfully integrated into the acquiring company's operations and/or internal control processes;
•the due diligence conducted prior to a transaction may not uncover situations that could result in financial or legal
exposure or may not appropriately evaluate the likelihood or quantify the exposure from identified risks;
•they may result in decreased earnings, revenues, or cash flow;
•Southern Company, Southern Company Gas, and certain of their subsidiaries have retained obligations in connection with
transitional agreements related to dispositions that subject these companies to additional risk;
•Southern Company or the applicable subsidiary may not be able to achieve the expected financial benefits from the use of
funds generated by any dispositions;
•expected benefits of a transaction may be dependent on the cooperation or performance of a counterparty; or
•for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas, costs associated with such investments that
were expected to be recovered through regulated rates may not be recoverable.
Southern Company and Southern Company Gas are holding companies and Southern Power owns many of its assets
indirectly through subsidiaries. Each of these companies is dependent on cash flows from their respective subsidiaries to
meet their ongoing and future financial obligations, including making interest and principal payments on outstanding
indebtedness and, for Southern Company, to pay dividends on its common stock.
Southern Company and Southern Company Gas are holding companies and, as such, they have no operations of their own.
Substantially all of Southern Company's and Southern Company Gas' and many of Southern Power's respective consolidated assets
are held by subsidiaries. A significant portion of Southern Company Gas' debt is issued by its 100%-owned subsidiary, Southern
Company Gas Capital, and is fully and unconditionally guaranteed by Southern Company Gas. Southern Company's, Southern
Company Gas' and, to a certain extent, Southern Power's ability to meet their respective financial obligations, including making
interest and principal payments on outstanding indebtedness, and, for Southern Company, to pay dividends on its common stock, is
dependent on the net income and cash flows of their respective subsidiaries and the ability of those subsidiaries to pay upstream
dividends or to repay borrowed funds. Prior to funding Southern Company, Southern Company Gas, or Southern Power, the
respective subsidiaries have financial obligations and, with respect to Southern Company and Southern Company Gas, regulatory
restrictions that must be satisfied, including among others, debt service and preferred stock dividends. These subsidiaries are
separate legal entities and, except as described below, have no obligation to provide Southern Company, Southern Company Gas, or
Southern Power with funds. Certain of Southern Power's assets are held through controlling interests in subsidiaries. In certain
cases, distributions without partner consent are limited to available cash, and the subsidiaries are obligated to distribute all available
cash to their owners each quarter. In addition, Southern Company, Southern Company Gas, and Southern Power may provide
capital contributions or debt financing to subsidiaries under certain circumstances, which would reduce the funds available to meet
their respective financial obligations, including making interest and principal payments on outstanding indebtedness, and to pay
dividends on Southern Company's common stock.
A downgrade in the credit ratings of any of the registrants, Southern Company Gas Capital, or Nicor Gas could negatively
affect their ability to access capital at reasonable costs and/or could require posting of collateral or replacing certain
indebtedness.
There are a number of factors that rating agencies evaluate to arrive at credit ratings for the registrants, Southern Company Gas
Capital, and Nicor Gas, including capital structure, regulatory environment, the ability to cover liquidity requirements, and other
commitments for capital. The registrants, Southern Company Gas Capital, and Nicor Gas could experience a downgrade in their
ratings if any rating agency concludes that the level of business or financial risk of the industry or the applicable company has
deteriorated. Changes in ratings methodologies by the agencies could also have a negative impact on credit ratings. If one or more
rating agencies downgrade any registrant, Southern Company Gas Capital, or Nicor Gas, borrowing
I-34
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
costs likely would increase, including automatic increases in interest rates under applicable term loans and credit facilities, the pool
of investors and funding sources would likely decrease, and, particularly for any downgrade to below investment grade, significant
collateral requirements may be triggered in a number of contracts. Any credit rating downgrades could require altering the mix of
debt financing currently used, and could require the issuance of secured indebtedness and/or indebtedness with additional
restrictive covenants binding the applicable company.
Uncertainty in demand for energy can result in lower earnings or higher costs. If demand for energy falls short of
expectations, it could result in potentially stranded assets. If demand for energy exceeds expectations, it could result in
increased costs for purchasing capacity in the open market or building additional electric generation and transmission
facilities or natural gas distribution and storage facilities.
Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power each engage in a long-term planning process
to estimate the optimal mix and timing of new generation assets required to serve future load obligations. Southern Company Gas
engages in a long-term planning process to estimate the optimal mix and timing of building new pipelines and storage facilities,
replacing existing pipelines, rewatering storage facilities, and entering new markets and/or expanding in existing markets. These
planning processes must look many years into the future in order to accommodate the long lead times associated with the
permitting and construction of new generation and associated transmission facilities and natural gas distribution and storage
facilities. Inherent risk exists in predicting demand as future loads are dependent on many uncertain factors, including economic
conditions, customer usage patterns, efficiency programs, and customer technology adoption. Because regulators may not permit
the traditional electric operating companies or Southern Company Gas' regulated operating companies to adjust rates to recover the
costs of new generation and associated transmission assets and/or new pipelines and related infrastructure in a timely manner or at
all, Southern Company and its subsidiaries may not be able to fully recover these costs or may have exposure to regulatory lag
associated with the time between the incurrence of costs and the recovery in customers' rates. In addition, under Southern Power's
model of selling capacity and energy at negotiated market-based rates under long-term PPAs, Southern Power might not be able to
fully execute its business plan if market prices drop below original forecasts. Southern Power and/or the traditional electric
operating companies may not be able to extend existing PPAs or find new buyers for existing generation assets as existing PPAs
expire, or they may be forced to market these assets at prices lower than originally intended. These situations could have negative
impacts on net income and cash flows for the affected registrant.
The traditional electric operating companies are currently obligated to supply power to retail customers and wholesale customers
under long-term PPAs. Southern Power is currently obligated to supply power to wholesale customers under long-term PPAs. At
peak times, the demand for power required to meet this obligation could exceed the Southern Company system's available
generation capacity. Market or competitive forces may require that the traditional electric operating companies purchase capacity
on the open market or build additional generation and transmission facilities and that Southern Power purchase energy or capacity
on the open market. Because regulators may not permit the traditional electric operating companies to pass all of these purchase or
construction costs on to their customers, the traditional electric operating companies may not be able to recover some or all of these
costs or may have exposure to regulatory lag associated with the time between the incurrence of costs of purchased or constructed
capacity and the traditional electric operating companies' recovery in customers' rates. Under Southern Power's long-term fixed
price PPAs, Southern Power may not be able to recover all of these costs. These situations could have negative impacts on net
income and cash flows for the affected registrant.
The businesses of the registrants, SEGCO, and Nicor Gas are dependent on their ability to successfully access funds
through capital markets and financial institutions. The inability of any of the registrants, SEGCO, or Nicor Gas to access
funds may limit its ability to execute its business plan by impacting its ability to fund capital investments or acquisitions
that it may otherwise rely on to achieve future earnings and cash flows.
The registrants, SEGCO, and Nicor Gas rely on access to both short-term money markets and longer-term capital markets as a
significant source of liquidity for capital requirements not satisfied by the cash flow from their respective operations. If any of the
registrants, SEGCO, or Nicor Gas is not able to access capital at competitive rates or on favorable terms, its ability to implement its
business plan will be limited by impacting its ability to fund capital investments or acquisitions that it may otherwise rely on to
achieve future earnings and cash flows. In addition, the registrants, SEGCO, and Nicor Gas rely on committed bank lending
agreements as back-up liquidity which allows them to access low cost money markets. Each of the registrants, SEGCO, and Nicor
Gas believes that it will maintain sufficient access to these financial markets based upon current credit ratings. However, certain
events or market disruptions may increase the cost of borrowing or adversely affect the ability to raise capital through the issuance
of securities or other borrowing arrangements or the ability to secure committed bank lending agreements used as back-up sources
of capital. Such disruptions could include:
•an economic downturn or uncertainty;
•bankruptcy or financial distress at an unrelated energy company, financial institution, or sovereign entity;
•capital markets volatility and disruption, either nationally or internationally;
•changes in tax policy, including further interpretation and guidance on tax reform;
I-35
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
•volatility in market prices for electricity and natural gas;
•actual or threatened cyber or physical attacks on the Southern Company system's facilities or unrelated energy companies'
facilities;
•war or threat of war; or
•the overall health of the utility and financial institution industries.
Georgia Power's ability to make future borrowings through its term loan credit facility with the FFB is subject to the satisfaction of
customary conditions, as well as certification of compliance with the requirements of the loan guarantee program under Title XVII
of the Energy Policy Act of 2005, including accuracy of project-related representations and warranties, delivery of updated project-
related information and evidence of compliance with the prevailing wage requirements of the Davis-Bacon Act of 1931, as
amended, and certification from the DOE's consulting engineer that proceeds of the advances are used to reimburse certain costs of
construction relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 that are eligible for financing under the Title XVII Loan Guarantee Program.
Prior to obtaining any further advances under Georgia Power's loan guarantee agreement with the DOE, Georgia Power is required
to obtain the DOE's approval of the Bechtel Agreement.
Failure to comply with debt covenants or conditions could adversely affect the ability of the registrants, SEGCO, Southern
Company Gas Capital, or Nicor Gas to execute future borrowings.
The debt and credit agreements of the registrants, SEGCO, Southern Company Gas Capital, and Nicor Gas contain various
financial and other covenants. Georgia Power's loan guarantee agreement with the DOE contains additional covenants, events of
default, and mandatory prepayment events relating to the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Failure to meet those
covenants beyond applicable grace periods could result in accelerated due dates and/or termination of the agreements, which would
negatively affect the applicable company's financial condition and liquidity.
Volatility in the securities markets, interest rates, and other factors could substantially increase defined benefit pension and
other postretirement plan costs and the funding available for nuclear decommissioning.
The costs of providing pension and other postretirement benefit plans are dependent on a number of factors, such as the rates of
return on plan assets, discount rates, the level of interest rates used to measure the required minimum funding levels of the plan,
changes in actuarial assumptions, government regulations, and/or life expectancy, and the frequency and amount of the Southern
Company system's required or voluntary contributions made to the plans. Changes in actuarial assumptions and differences
between the assumptions and actual values, as well as a significant decline in the value of investments that fund the pension and
other postretirement plans, if not offset or mitigated by a decline in plan liabilities, could increase pension and other postretirement
expense, and the Southern Company system could be required from time to time to fund the pension plans with significant amounts
of cash. Such cash funding obligations could have a material impact on liquidity by reducing cash flows and could negatively affect
results of operations. Additionally, Alabama Power and Georgia Power each hold significant assets in their nuclear
decommissioning trusts to satisfy obligations to decommission Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's nuclear plants. The rate of
return on assets held in those trusts can significantly impact both the funding available for decommissioning and the funding
requirements for the trusts.
The registrants are subject to risks associated with their ability to obtain adequate insurance at acceptable costs.
The financial condition of some insurance companies, actual or threatened physical or cyber attacks, and natural disasters, among
other things, could have disruptive effects on insurance markets. The availability of insurance covering risks that the registrants and
their respective competitors typically insure against may decrease, and the insurance that the registrants are able to obtain may have
higher deductibles, higher premiums, and more restrictive policy terms. Further, the insurance policies may not cover all of the
potential exposures or the actual amount of loss incurred.
Any losses not covered by insurance, or any increases in the cost of applicable insurance, could adversely affect the results of
operations, cash flows, or financial condition of the affected registrant.
The use of derivative contracts by Southern Company and its subsidiaries in the normal course of business could result in
financial losses that negatively impact the net income of the registrants or in reported net income volatility.
Southern Company and its subsidiaries use derivative instruments, such as swaps, options, futures, and forwards, to manage their
commodity and interest rate exposures and, to a lesser extent, manage foreign currency exchange rate exposure and engage in
limited trading activities. The registrants could recognize financial losses as a result of volatility in the market values of these
contracts or if a counterparty fails to perform. These risks are managed through risk management policies, limits, and procedures,
which might not work as planned and cannot entirely eliminate the risks associated with these activities. In addition, derivative
contracts entered into for hedging purposes might not offset the underlying exposure being hedged as expected, resulting in
financial losses. In the absence of actively quoted market prices and pricing information from external sources, the valuation of
these financial instruments can involve management's judgment or use of estimates. The factors used in the valuation of these
instruments become more difficult to predict and the calculations become less reliable further into the
I-36
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
future. As a result, changes in the underlying assumptions or use of alternative valuation methods could affect the reported fair
value of these contracts.
In addition, Southern Company Gas utilizes derivative instruments to lock in economic value in wholesale gas services, which may
not qualify as, or may not be designated as, hedges for accounting purposes. The difference in accounting treatment for the
underlying position and the financial instrument used to hedge the value of the contract can cause volatility in reported net income
of Southern Company and Southern Company Gas while the positions are open due to mark-to-market accounting.
Future impairments of goodwill or long-lived assets could have a material adverse effect on the registrants' results of
operations.
Goodwill is assessed for impairment at least annually and more frequently if events or circumstances occur that would more likely
than not reduce the fair value of a reporting unit below its carrying value and long-lived assets are assessed for impairment
whenever events or circumstances indicate that an asset's carrying amount may not be recoverable. In connection with the
completion of the Merger, the application of the acquisition method of accounting was pushed down to Southern Company Gas.
The excess of the purchase price over the fair values of Southern Company Gas' assets and liabilities was recorded as goodwill.
This resulted in a significant increase in the goodwill recorded on Southern Company's and Southern Company Gas' consolidated
balance sheets. At December 31, 2018, goodwill was $5.3 billion and $5.0 billion for Southern Company and Southern Company
Gas, respectively.
In addition, Southern Company and its subsidiaries have long-lived assets recorded on their balance sheets. To the extent the value
of goodwill or long-lived assets become impaired, the affected registrant may be required to incur impairment charges that could
have a material impact on their results of operations. For example, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas owns and
operates a natural gas storage facility consisting of two salt dome caverns where recent seismic mapping indicates that proximity of
one of the caverns to the edge of the salt dome may be less than the required minimum and could result in Southern Company Gas
retiring the cavern early. Early retirement of the cavern could trigger impairment of other long-lived assets associated with the
natural gas storage facility. In addition, a subsidiary of Southern Company has several leveraged lease agreements, with terms
ranging up to 45 years, which relate to international and domestic energy generation, distribution, and transportation assets.
Southern Company receives federal income tax deductions for depreciation and amortization, as well as interest on long-term debt
related to these investments. Southern Company reviews all important lease assumptions at least annually, or more frequently if
events or changes in circumstances indicate that a change in assumptions has occurred or may occur. With respect to Southern
Company's subsidiary's investments in leveraged leases, the recovery of its investment is dependent on the profitable operation of
the leased assets by the respective lessees. A significant deterioration in the performance of the leased asset could result in the
impairment of the related lease receivable.
Item 1B.UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS.
None.
I-37
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 2. PROPERTIES
Electric
Electric Properties
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and SEGCO, at January 1, 2019, owned and/or operated 33
hydroelectric generating stations, 26 fossil fuel generating stations, three nuclear generating stations, 13 combined
cycle/cogeneration stations, 40 solar facilities, nine wind facilities, and one biomass facility. The amounts of capacity for each
company, at January 1, 2019, are shown in the table below.
Generating Station LocationNameplate
Capacity (1)
  (KWs)
FOSSIL STEAM   
Gadsden Gadsden, AL 120,000
Gorgas Jasper, AL 1,021,250(2)
Barry Mobile, AL 1,300,000
Greene County Demopolis, AL 300,000(3)
Gaston Unit 5 Wilsonville, AL 880,000
Miller Birmingham, AL 2,532,288(4)
Alabama Power Total  6,153,538
Bowen Cartersville, GA 3,160,000
Hammond Rome, GA 800,000(5)
McIntosh Effingham County, GA 163,117(5)
Scherer Macon, GA 750,924(6)
Wansley Carrollton, GA 925,550(7)
Yates Newnan, GA 700,000
Georgia Power Total  6,499,591
Daniel Pascagoula, MS 500,000(8)
Greene County Demopolis, AL 200,000(3)
Watson Gulfport, MS 750,000
Mississippi Power Total  1,450,000
Gaston Units 1-4 Wilsonville, AL  
SEGCO Total  1,000,000(9)
Total Fossil Steam  15,103,129
NUCLEAR STEAM   
Farley Dothan, AL  
Alabama Power Total  1,720,000
Hatch Baxley, GA 899,612(10)
Vogtle Units 1 and 2 Augusta, GA 1,060,240(11)
Georgia Power Total  1,959,852
Total Nuclear Steam  3,679,852
I-38
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Generating Station LocationNameplate
Capacity (1) 
COMBUSTION TURBINES   
Greene County Demopolis, AL   
Alabama Power Total 720,000 
Boulevard Savannah, GA 19,700 
McDonough Unit 3 Atlanta, GA 78,800 
McIntosh Units 1 through 8 Effingham County, GA 640,000 
McManus Brunswick, GA 481,700 
Robins Warner Robins, GA 158,400 
Wansley Carrollton, GA 26,322 (7)
Wilson Augusta, GA 354,100 
Georgia Power Total 1,759,022 
Chevron Cogenerating Station Pascagoula, MS 147,292(12)
Sweatt Meridian, MS 39,400 
Watson Gulfport, MS 39,360 
Mississippi Power Total 226,052 
Addison Thomaston, GA 668,800 
Cleveland County Cleveland County, NC 720,000 
Dahlberg Jackson County, GA 756,000 
Rowan Salisbury, NC 455,250 
Southern Power Total 2,600,050 
Gaston (SEGCO) Wilsonville, AL 19,680 (9)
Total Combustion Turbines 5,324,804 
COGENERATION   
Washington County Washington County, AL 123,428 
Lowndes County Burkeville, AL 104,800 
Theodore Theodore, AL 236,418 
Alabama Power Total 464,646 
COMBINED CYCLE   
Barry Mobile, AL   
Alabama Power Total 1,070,424 
McIntosh Units 10 and 11 Effingham County, GA 1,318,920 
McDonough-Atkinson Units 4 through 6 Atlanta, GA 2,520,000 
Georgia Power Total 3,838,920 
Daniel Pascagoula, MS 1,070,424 
Ratcliffe Kemper County, MS 769,898(13)
Mississippi Power Total 1,840,322 
Franklin Smiths, AL 1,857,820 
Harris Autaugaville, AL 1,318,920 
Mankato Mankato, MN 375,000(14)
Rowan Salisbury, NC 530,550 
Wansley Units 6 and 7 Carrollton, GA 1,073,000 
Southern Power Total 5,155,290 
Total Combined Cycle 11,904,956 
I-39
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Generating Station LocationNameplate
Capacity (1)
HYDROELECTRIC FACILITIES   
Bankhead Holt, AL 53,985
Bouldin Wetumpka, AL 225,000
Harris Wedowee, AL 132,000
Henry Ohatchee, AL 72,900
Holt Holt, AL 46,944
Jordan Wetumpka, AL 100,000
Lay Clanton, AL 177,000
Lewis Smith Jasper, AL 157,500
Logan Martin Vincent, AL 135,000
Martin Dadeville, AL 182,000
Mitchell Verbena, AL 170,000
Thurlow Tallassee, AL 81,000
Weiss Leesburg, AL 87,750
Yates Tallassee, AL 47,000
Alabama Power Total  1,668,079
Bartletts Ferry Columbus, GA 173,000
Goat Rock Columbus, GA 38,600
Lloyd Shoals Jackson, GA 14,400
Morgan Falls Atlanta, GA 16,800
North Highlands Columbus, GA 29,600
Oliver Dam Columbus, GA 60,000
Rocky Mountain Rome, GA 215,256(15)
Sinclair Dam Milledgeville, GA 45,000
Tallulah Falls Clayton, GA 72,000
Terrora Clayton, GA 16,000
Tugalo Clayton, GA 45,000
Wallace Dam Eatonton, GA 321,300
Yonah Toccoa, GA 22,500
6 Other Plants Various Georgia locations 18,080
Georgia Power Total  1,087,536
Total Hydroelectric Facilities  2,755,615
I-40
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Generating Station LocationNameplate
Capacity (1)
RENEWABLE SOURCES:   
SOLAR FACILITIES   
Fort Rucker Calhoun County, AL 10,560
Anniston Army Depot Dale County, AL 7,380
Alabama Power Total  17,940
Fort Benning Columbus, GA 30,005
Fort Gordon Augusta, GA 30,000
Fort Stewart Fort Stewart, GA 30,000
Kings Bay Camden County, GA 30,161
Dalton Dalton, GA 6,508
Marine Corps Logistics Base Albany, GA 31,161
4 Other Plants Various Georgia locations 5,171
Georgia Power Total  163,006
Adobe Kern County, CA 20,000
Apex North Las Vegas, NV 20,000
Boulder I Clark County, NV 100,000
Butler Taylor County, GA 103,700
Butler Solar Farm Taylor County, GA 22,000
Calipatria Imperial County, CA 20,000
Campo Verde Imperial County, CA 147,420
Cimarron Springer, NM 30,640
Decatur County Decatur County, GA 20,000
Decatur Parkway Decatur County, GA 84,000
Desert Stateline San Bernadino County, CA 299,900
East Pecos Pecos County, TX 120,000
Garland Kern County, CA 205,130
Gaskell West I Kern County, CA 20,000
Granville Oxford, NC 2,500
Henrietta Kings County, CA 102,000
Imperial Valley Imperial County, CA 163,200
Lamesa Dawson County, TX 102,000
Lost Hills - Blackwell Kern County, CA 33,440
Macho Springs Luna County, NM 55,000
Morelos del Sol Kern County, CA 15,000
North Star Fresno County, CA 61,600
Pawpaw Taylor County, GA 30,480
Roserock Pecos County, TX 160,000
Rutherford Rutherford County, NC 74,800
Sandhills Taylor County, GA 146,890
Spectrum Clark County, NV 30,240
Tranquillity Fresno County, CA 205,300
Southern Power Total  2,395,240(16)
Total Solar  2,576,186
I-41
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Generating Station LocationNameplate
Capacity (1)
WIND FACILITIES   
Bethel Castro County, TX 276,000
Cactus Flats Concho County, TX 148,350
Grant Plains Grant County, OK 147,200
Grant Wind Grant County, OK 151,800
Kay Wind Kay County, OK 299,000
Passadumkeag Penobscot County, ME 42,900
Salt Fork Donley & Gray Counties TX 174,000
Tyler Bluff Cooke County, TX 125,580
Wake Wind Crosby & Floyd Counties, TX 257,250
Southern Power Total  1,622,080(17)
BIOMASS FACILITY   
Nacogdoches Sacul, TX  
Southern Power Total  115,500
Total Alabama Power Generating Capacity  11,814,627
Total Georgia Power Generating Capacity  15,307,927
Total Mississippi Power Generating Capacity  3,516,374
Total Southern Power Generating Capacity  11,888,160
Total Generating Capacity  43,546,768
Notes:
(1) See "Jointly-Owned Facilities" herein and Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for
additional information.
(2) As part of its environmental compliance strategy , Alabama Power plans to retire Plant Gor gas Units 8, 9, and 10 by April 15, 2019. See
Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Environmental Accounting Order" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(3) Owned by Alabama Power and Mississippi Power as tenants in common in the proportions of 60% and 40%, respectively . Capacity shown
for each company represents its portion of total plant capacity .
(4) Capacity shown is Alabama Power's portion (95.92%) of total plant capacity .
(5)Geor gia Power has requested to decertify and retire Plant Hammond Units 1 through 4 and Plant McIntosh Unit 1 upon approval of its
2019 IRP  filing. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Geor gia Power – Integrated Resource Plan" in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
(6) Capacity shown for Geor gia Power is 8.4% of Units 1 and 2 and 75% of Unit 3.
(7) Capacity shown is Geor gia Power's portion (53.5%) of total plant capacity .
(8) Capacity shown is Mississippi Power's portion (50%) of total plant capacity .
(9) SEGCO is jointly-owned by Alabama Power and Geor gia Power . See BUSINESS in Item 1 herein for additional information. Also see
Note 7 to the financial statements under "SEGCO" in Item 8 herein.
(10) Capacity shown is Geor gia Power's portion (50.1%) of total plant capacity .
(11)Capacity shown is Geor gia Power's portion (45.7%) of total plant capacity .
(12) Generation is dedicated to a single industrial customer . See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANAL YSIS – FINANCIAL
CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY  – "Credit Rating Risk" of Mississippi Power in Item 7 herein.
(13) The capacity shown is the gross capacity using natural gas fuel without supplemental firing.
(14)On November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement with Northern States Power to sell all of its equity interests in Plant
Mankato (including the 385-MW  expansion currently under construction). The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this
time. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
(15) Capacity shown is Geor gia Power's portion (25.4%) of total plant capacity . OPC operates the plant.
(16) In May 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP  Solar (a limited partnership indirectly owning all of Southern
Power's solar facilities, except the Roserock and Gaskell West facilities). SP  Solar is the 51% majority owner of Boulder 1, Garland,
Henrietta, Imperial Valley , Lost Hills Blackwell, North Star , and Tranquillity; the 66% majority owner of Desert Stateline; and the sole
owner of the remaining SP  Solar facilities. Southern Power is the 51% majority owner of Roserock and also the controlling partner in a tax
equity partnership owning Gaskell West. All of these entities are consolidated subsidiaries of Southern Power and the capacity shown in the
table is 100% of the nameplate capacity for the respective facility .
(17) In December 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP  Wind (which owns all of Southern Power's wind
facilities, except Cactus Flats). SP  Wind is the 90.1% majority owner of Wake Wind and owns 100% of the remaining SP  Wind facilities.
Southern Power is the controlling partner in a tax equity partnership owning Cactus Flats. All of these entities are consolidated subsidiaries
of Southern Power and the capacity shown in the table is 100% of the nameplate capacity for the respective facility .
I-42
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Except as discussed below under "Titles to Property," the principal plants and other important units of the traditional electric
operating companies, Southern Power, and SEGCO are owned in fee by the respective companies. It is the opinion of management
of each such company that its operating properties are adequately maintained and are substantially in good operating condition, and
suitable for their intended purpose.
Mississippi Power owns a 79-mile length of 500-kilovolt transmission line which is leased to Entergy Gulf States Louisiana, LLC.
The line extends from Plant Daniel to the Louisiana state line. Entergy Gulf States Louisiana, LLC is paying a use fee over a 40-
year period through 2024 covering all expenses and the amortization of the original cost. At December 31, 2018, the unamortized
portion was approximately $12 million.
Mississippi Power owns a lignite mine and equipment that were intended to provide fuel for the Kemper IGCC. Mississippi Power
also has acquired mineral reserves located around the Kemper County energy facility. Liberty Fuels Company, LLC, the operator of
the mine, has a legal obligation to perform mine reclamation and Mississippi Power has a contractual obligation to fund all
reclamation activities. As a result of the abandonment of the Kemper IGCC, final mine reclamation began in 2018 and is expected
to be substantially completed in 2020, with monitoring expected to continue through 2027. Mississippi Power is currently
evaluating its options regarding the final disposition of the CO2 pipeline, including removal of the pipeline. This evaluation is
expected to be complete later in 2019. The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. See Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility – Lignite Mine and CO2 Pipeline Facilities" in
Item 8 herein for additional information on the lignite mine and CO2 pipeline.
In August 2018, Mississippi Power filed a RMP which identified alternatives that, if implemented, could impact Mississippi
Power's generating stations as well as Plant Greene County, jointly owned by Mississippi Power and Alabama Power. See
BUSINESS in Item 1 herein under "Rate Matters – Integrated Resource Planning – Mississippi Power" for additional information.
In conjunction with Southern Company's sale of Gulf Power, Mississippi Power and Gulf Power have committed to seek a
restructuring of their 50% undivided ownership interests in Plant Daniel such that each of them would, after the restructuring, own
100% of a generating unit. On January 15, 2019, Gulf Power provided notice to Mississippi Power that Gulf Power will retire its
share of the generating capacity of Plant Daniel on January 15, 2024. Mississippi Power has the option to purchase Gulf Power's
ownership interest for $1 on January 15, 2024, provided that Mississippi Power exercises the option no later than 120 days prior to
that date. Mississippi Power is assessing the potential operational and economic effects of Gulf Power's notice. The ultimate
outcome of these matters remains subject to completion of Mississippi Power's evaluations and applicable regulatory approvals,
including the FERC and the Mississippi PSC, and cannot now be determined. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" in Item 8 herein for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
In 2018, the maximum demand on the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power Company, and SEGCO was
36,429,000 KWs and occurred on January 18, 2018. The all-time maximum demand of 38,777,000 KWs on the traditional electric
operating companies, Southern Power Company, and SEGCO occurred on August 22, 2007. These amounts exclude demand served
by capacity retained by MEAG Power, OPC, and SEPA. The reserve margin for the traditional electric operating companies,
Southern Power Company, and SEGCO in 2018 was 29.8%. See SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA in Item 6 herein for additional
information.
Jointly-Owned Facilities
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power at January 1, 2019 had undivided interests in certain generating plants and
other related facilities with non-affiliated parties. The percentages of ownership of the total plant or facility are as follows:
  Percentage Ownership   
 Total
CapacityAlabama
Power  Power
South  Geor gia
Power  Mississippi
Power  OPC  MEAG
Power  Dalton  Gulf
Power
 (MWs)          
Plant Miller Units 1
and 2 1,320 91.8% 8.2% —% —% —% —% —% —%
Plant Hatch 1,796 —  —  50.1  —  30.0  17.7  2.2  —
Plant Vogtle Units 1
and 2 2,320 —  —  45.7  —  30.0  22.7  1.6  —
Plant Scherer Units 1
and 2 1,636 —  —  8.4  —  60.0  30.2  1.4  —
Plant Scherer Unit 3 818 —  —  75.0  —  —  —  —  25.0
Plant Wansley 1,779 —  —  53.5  —  30.0  15.1  1.4  —
Rocky Mountain 903 —  —  25.4  —  74.6  —  —  —
Plant Daniel Units 1
and 2 1,000 —  —  —  50.0  —  —  —  50.0
I-43
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power have contracted to operate and maintain the respective units in which each
has an interest (other than Rocky Mountain) as agent for the joint owners. Southern Nuclear operates and provides services to
Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's nuclear plants.
In addition, Georgia Power has commitments regarding a portion of a 5% interest in Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 owned by MEAG
Power that are in effect until the later of retirement of the plant or the latest stated maturity date of MEAG Power's bonds issued to
finance such ownership interest. The payments for capacity are required whether any capacity is available. The energy cost is a
function of each unit's variable operating costs. Except for the portion of the capacity payments related to the Georgia PSC's
disallowances of Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 costs, the cost of such capacity and energy is included in purchased power from non-
affiliates in Georgia Power's statements of income in Item 8 herein. Also see Note 9 to the financial statements under "Fuel and
Power Purchase Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Construction continues on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which are jointly owned by the Vogtle Owners (with each owner holding the
same undivided ownership interest as shown in the table above with respect to Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2). See Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" in Item 8 herein.
On December 4, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of its 65% ownership interest in Plant Stanton Unit A, which Southern
Power previously jointly-owned with OUC, FMPA, and KUA, to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Titles to Property
The traditional electric operating companies', Southern Power's, and SEGCO's interests in the principal plants and other important
units of the respective companies are owned in fee by such companies, subject to the following major encumbrances: (1) liens
pursuant to the assumption of debt obligations by Mississippi Power in connection with the acquisition of Plant Daniel Units 3 and
4, (2) a leasehold interest granted by Mississippi Power's largest retail customer, Chevron Products Company (Chevron), at the
Chevron refinery, on which five combustion turbines of Mississippi Power are located, (3) liens pursuant to the agreements entered
into with Chevron in October 2017 on Mississippi Power's co-generation assets located at the Chevron refinery, (4) liens associated
with Georgia Power's reimbursement obligations to the DOE under its loan guarantee, which are secured by a first priority lien on
(a) Georgia Power's 45.7% undivided ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 and (b) Georgia Power's rights and
obligations under the principal contracts relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, and (5) liens associated with two PPAs assumed as
part of the acquisition of Plant Mankato in 2016 by Southern Power Company. See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Assets
Subject to Lien," Note 8 to the financial statements under "Secured Debt" and "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee
Borrowings," and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" in Item 8 herein for
additional information. The traditional electric operating companies own the fee interests in certain of their principal plants as
tenants in common. See "Jointly-Owned Facilities" herein and Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership
Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information. Properties such as electric transmission and distribution lines, steam
heating mains, and gas pipelines are constructed principally on rights-of-way, which are maintained under franchise or are held by
easement only. A substantial portion of lands submerged by reservoirs is held under flood right easements. In addition, certain of
the renewable generating facilities occupy or use real property that is not owned, primarily through various leases, easements,
rights-of-way, permits, or licenses from private landowners or governmental entities.
Natural Gas
Southern Company Gas considers its properties to be adequately maintained, substantially in good operating condition, and suitable
for their intended purpose. The following provides the location and general character of the materially important properties that are
used by the segments of Southern Company Gas. Substantially all of Nicor Gas' properties are subject to the lien of the indenture
securing its first mortgage bonds. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term Debt – Other Long-Term Debt –
Southern Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Distribution and Transmission Mains – Southern Company Gas' distribution systems transport natural gas from its pipeline
suppliers to customers in its service areas. These systems consist primarily of distribution and transmission mains, compressor
stations, peak shaving/storage plants, service lines, meters, and regulators. At December 31, 2018, Southern Company Gas' gas
distribution operations segment owned approximately 75,200 miles of underground distribution and transmission mains, which are
located on easements or rights-of-way that generally provide for perpetual use.
Storage Assets – Gas Distribution Operations – Southern Company Gas owns and operates eight underground natural gas storage
fields in Illinois with a total working capacity of approximately 150 Bcf, approximately 135 Bcf of which is usually cycled on an
annual basis. This system is designed to meet about 50% of the estimated peak-day deliveries and approximately 40% of the
normal winter deliveries in Illinois. This level of storage capability provides Nicor Gas with supply flexibility, improves the
reliability of deliveries, and helps mitigate the risk associated with seasonal price movements.
I-44
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Southern Company Gas also has four LNG plants located in Georgia and Tennessee with total LNG storage capacity of
approximately 7.4 Bcf. In addition, Southern Company Gas owns two propane storage facilities in Virginia, each with storage
capacity of approximately 0.3 Bcf. The LNG plants and propane storage facility are used by Southern Company Gas' gas
distribution operations segment to supplement natural gas supply during peak usage periods.
Storage Assets – All Other – Southern Company Gas subsidiaries own three high-deliverability natural gas storage and hub
facilities that are included in the all other segment. Jefferson Island Storage & Hub, LLC operates a storage facility in Louisiana
consisting of two salt dome gas storage caverns. Golden Triangle Storage, Inc. operates a storage facility in Texas consisting of two
salt dome caverns. Central Valley Gas Storage, LLC operates a depleted field storage facility in California. In addition, Southern
Company Gas has a LNG facility in Alabama that produces LNG for Pivotal LNG, Inc. to support its business of selling LNG as a
substitute fuel in various markets.
In August 2017, in connection with an ongoing integrity project into the salt dome gas storage caverns in Louisiana, updated
seismic mapping indicated the proximity of one of the caverns to the edge of the salt dome may be less than the required minimum
and could result in Southern Company Gas retiring the cavern early. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Other Matters" of
Southern Company Gas in Item 7 herein and Note 3 to the financial statements under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas" in
Item 8 herein for additional information.
Jointly-Owned Properties – Southern Company Gas' gas pipeline investments segment has a 50% undivided ownership interest in
a 115-mile pipeline facility in northwest Georgia that was placed in service in August 2017. Southern Company Gas also has an
agreement to lease its 50% undivided ownership in the pipeline facility. See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint
Ownership Agreements" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
Southern Company Gas owns a 50% interest in a LNG liquefaction and storage facility in Jacksonville, Florida, which was placed
in service in October 2018 and is included in the all other segment. The facility is outfitted with a 2.0 million gallon storage tank
with the capacity to produce in excess of 120,000 gallons of LNG per day.
I-45
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 3.LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
See Note 3 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for descriptions of legal and administrative proceedings discussed therein.
Item 4.MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
I-46
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF SOUTHERN COMPANY
(Identification of executive officers of Southern Company is inserted in Part I in accordance with Regulation S-K, Item 401(b),
Instruction 3.) The ages of the officers set forth below are as of December 31, 2018.
Thomas A. Fanning
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
Age 61
First elected in 2003. Chairman and Chief Executive Officer since December 2010 and President since August 2010.
Andrew W. Evans
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Age 52
First elected in 2016. Executive Vice President since July 2016 and Chief Financial Officer since June 2018. Previously served as
Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of Southern Company Gas' Board of Directors from January 2016 through June 2018,
President of Southern Company Gas from May 2015 through June 2018, Chief Operating Officer of Southern Company Gas from
May 2015 through December 2015, and Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Southern Company Gas from May
2006 through May 2015.
W. Paul Bowers
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Georgia Power
Age 62
First elected in 2001. Chief Executive Officer, President, and Director of Georgia Power since January 2011. Chairman of Georgia
Power's Board of Directors since May 2014.
S. W. Connally, Jr.
Executive Vice President of SCS
Age 49
First elected in 2012. Executive Vice President for Operations of SCS since June 2018. Previously served as President, Chief
Executive Officer, and Director of Gulf Power from July 2012 through December 2018 and Chairman of Gulf Power's Board of
Directors from July 2015 through December 2018.
Mark A. Crosswhite
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Alabama Power
Age 56
First elected in 2010. President, Chief Executive Officer, and Director of Alabama Power since March 2014. Chairman of Alabama
Power's Board of Directors since May 2014. Previously served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of
Southern Company from July 2012 through February 2014.
Kimberly S. Greene
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Company Gas
Age 52
First elected in 2013. Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Company Gas since June 2018. Director of
Southern Company Gas since July 2016. Previously served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of Southern
Company from March 2014 through June 2018 and President and Chief Executive Officer of SCS from April 2013 through
February 2014.
James Y. Kerr II
Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer, and Chief Compliance Officer
Age 54
First elected in 2014. Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer (formerly known as General Counsel), and Chief Compliance
Officer since March 2014. Before joining Southern Company, Mr. Kerr was a partner with McGuireWoods LLP and a senior
advisor at McGuireWoods Consulting LLC from 2008 through February 2014.
Stephen E. Kuczynski
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Nuclear
Age 56
First elected in 2011. Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Nuclear since July 2011.
I-47
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Mark S. Lantrip
Executive Vice President
Age 64
First elected in 2014. Executive Vice President since February 2019. Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of SCS
since March 2014 and Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Southern Power since March 2018. Previously served
as Treasurer of Southern Company from October 2007 to February 2014 and Executive Vice President of SCS from November
2010 to March 2014.
Anthony L. Wilson
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer of Mississippi Power
Age 54
First elected in 2015. President of Mississippi Power since October 2015 and Chief Executive Officer and Director since January
2016. Chairman of Mississippi Power's Board of Directors since August 2016. Previously served as Executive Vice President of
Mississippi Power from May 2015 to October 2015 and Executive Vice President of Georgia Power from January 2012 to May
2015.
Christopher C. Womack
Executive Vice President
Age 60
First elected in 2008. Executive Vice President and President of External Affairs since January 2009.
The officers of Southern Company were elected at the first meeting of the directors following the last annual meeting of
stockholders held on May 23, 2018, for a term of one year or until their successors are elected and have qualified, except for Mr.
Lantrip, whose election as Executive Vice President was effective February 11, 2019.
I-48
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF ALABAMA POWER
(Identification of executive officers of Alabama Power is inserted in Part I in accordance with Regulation S-K, Item 401(b),
Instruction 3.) The ages of the officers set forth below are as of December 31, 2018.
Mark A. Crosswhite
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
Age 56
First elected in 2014. President, Chief Executive Officer, and Director since March 1, 2014. Chairman since May 2014. Previously
served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of Southern Company from July 2012 through February 2014.
Greg J. Barker
Executive Vice President
Age 55
First elected in 2016. Executive Vice President for Customer Services since February 2016. Previously served as Senior Vice
President of Marketing and Economic Development from April 2012 to February 2016.
Philip C. Raymond
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
Age 59
First elected in 2010. Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer since August 2010.
Zeke W. Smith
Executive Vice President
Age 59
First elected in 2010. Executive Vice President of External Affairs since November 2010.
James P. Heilbron
Senior Vice President and Senior Production Officer
Age 47
First elected in 2013. Senior Vice President and Senior Production Officer of Alabama Power since March 2013 and Senior Vice
President and Senior Production Officer – West of SCS and Senior Production Officer of Mississippi Power since October 2018.
R. Scott Moore
Senior Vice President
Age 51
First elected in 2017. Senior Vice President of Power Delivery since May 2017. Previously served as Vice President of
Transmission from August 2012 to May 2017.
The officers of Alabama Power were elected at the meeting of the directors held on April 27, 2018 for a term of one year or until
their successors are elected and have qualified.
I-49
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
PART II
Item 5.MARKET FOR REGISTRANTS' COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
(a)(1) The common stock of Southern Company is listed and traded on the NYSE under the ticker symbol SO. The common stock
is also traded on regional exchanges across the U.S.
There is no market for the other registrants' common stock, all of which is owned by Southern Company.
(a)(2) Number of Southern Company's common stockholders of record at January 31, 2019: 115,847
Each of the other registrants have one common stockholder, Southern Company.
(a)(3) Securities authorized for issuance under equity compensation plans.
See Part III, Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.
(b) Use of Proceeds
Not applicable.
(c) Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
None.
II-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 6.SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
 Page
Southern Company II-3
Alabama Power II-6
Georgia Power II-8
Mississippi Power II-10
Southern Power II-12
Southern Company Gas II-13
II-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016(d)2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions) $ 23,495 $ 23,031 $ 19,896$ 17,489$ 18,467
Total Assets (in millions)(a)$ 116,914 $ 111,005 $ 109,697$ 78,318$ 70,233
Gross Property Additions (in millions) $ 8,205 $ 5,984 $ 7,624$ 6,169$ 6,522
Return on Average Common Equity (percent)(b)9.11 3.44 10.80 11.68 10.08
Cash Dividends Paid Per Share of
 Common Stock $ 2.3800 $ 2.3000 $ 2.2225$ 2.1525$ 2.0825
Consolidated Net Income Attributable to
   Southern Company (in millions)(b)$ 2,226 $ 842 $ 2,448$ 2,367$ 1,963
Earnings Per Share —       
Basic $ 2.18 $ 0.84 $ 2.57$ 2.60$ 2.19
Diluted 2.17 0.84 2.55 2.59 2.18
Capitalization (in millions):       
Common stockholders' equity $ 24,723 $ 24,167 $ 24,758$ 20,592$ 19,949
Preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries and
   noncontrolling interests 4,316 1,361 1,854 1,390 977
Redeemable preferred stock of subsidiaries 291 324 118 118 375
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — — 164 43 39
Long-term debt(a)(c)40,736 44,462 42,629 24,688 20,644
Total (excluding amounts due within one year)(c)$ 70,066 $ 70,314 $ 69,523$ 46,831$ 41,984
Capitalization Ratios (percent):       
Common stockholders' equity 35.3 34.4 35.6 44.0 47.5
Preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries and
   noncontrolling interests 6.2 1.9 2.7 3.0 2.3
Redeemable preferred stock of subsidiaries 0.4 0.5 0.2 0.3 0.9
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — — 0.2 0.1 0.1
Long-term debt(a)(c)58.1 63.2 61.3 52.6 49.2
Total (excluding amounts due within one year)(c)100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Other Common Stock Data:       
Book value per share $ 23.91 $ 23.99 $ 25.00$ 22.59$ 21.98
Market price per share:       
High $ 49.43 $ 53.51 $ 54.64$ 53.16$ 51.28
Low 42.38 46.71 46.00 41.40 40.27
Close (year-end) 43.92 48.09 49.19 46.79 49.11
Market-to-book ratio (year-end) (percent) 183.7 200.5 196.8 207.2 223.4
Price-earnings ratio (year-end) (times) 20.1 57.3 19.1 18.0 22.4
Dividends paid (in millions) $ 2,425 $ 2,300 $ 2,104$ 1,959$ 1,866
Dividend yield (year-end) (percent) 5.4 4.8 4.5 4.6 4.2
Dividend payout ratio (percent) 108.9 273.2 86.0 82.7 95.0
Shares outstanding (in thousands):       
Average 1,020,247 1,000,336 951,332 910,024 897,194
Year-end 1,033,788 1,007,603 990,394 911,721 907,777
Stockholders of record (year-end) 116,135 120,803 126,338 131,771 137,369
(a)A reclassification of debt issuance costs from Total Assets to Long-term debt of $202 million and a reclassification of deferred tax assets from Total Assets to
Accumulated deferred income taxes of $488 million is reflected for 2014, in accordance with new accounting standards adopted in 2015 and applied
retrospectively.
(b)Georgia Power recorded a pre-tax estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter 2018 to reflect its revised estimate to
complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In addition, a significant loss to income was recorded by Mississippi Power related to the
suspension of the Kemper IGCC in June 2017. Earnings in all periods presented were impacted by losses related to the Kemper IGCC. See Note 2 to the
financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(c)Amounts related to Gulf Power have been reclassified to liabilities held for sale at December 31, 2018. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(d)The 2016 selected financial and operating data includes the operations of Southern Company Gas from the date of the Merger, July 1, 2016, through
December 31, 2016. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
II-3
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018 (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016(a)2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions):     
Residential $ 6,608$ 6,515 $ 6,614$ 6,383 $ 6,499
Commercial 5,266 5,439 5,394 5,317 5,469
Industrial 3,224 3,262 3,171 3,172 3,449
Other 124 114 55 115 133
Total retail 15,222 15,330 15,234 14,987 15,550
Wholesale 2,516 2,426 1,926 1,798 2,184
Total revenues from sales of electricity 17,738 17,756 17,160 16,785 17,734
Natural gas revenues 3,854 3,791 1,596 — —
Other revenues 1,903 1,484 1,140 704 733
Total $ 23,495$ 23,031 $ 19,896$ 17,489 $ 18,467
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):     
Residential 54,590 50,536 53,337 52,121 53,347
Commercial 53,451 52,340 53,733 53,525 53,243
Industrial 53,341 52,785 52,792 53,941 54,140
Other 799 846 883 897 909
Total retail 162,181 156,507 160,745 160,484 161,639
Wholesale sales 49,963 49,034 37,043 30,505 32,786
Total 212,144 205,541 197,788 190,989 194,425
Average Revenue Per Kilowatt-Hour (cents):     
Residential 12.10 12.89 12.40 12.25 12.18
Commercial 9.85 10.39 10.04 9.93 10.27
Industrial 6.04 6.18 6.01 5.88 6.37
Total retail 9.39 9.80 9.48 9.34 9.62
Wholesale 5.04 4.95 5.20 5.89 6.66
Total sales 8.36 8.64 8.68 8.79 9.12
Average Annual Kilowatt-Hour     
Use Per Residential Customer 12,514 11,618 12,387 13,318 13,765
Average Annual Revenue     
Per Residential Customer $ 1,555$ 1,498 $ 1,541$ 1,630 $ 1,679
Plant Nameplate Capacity     
Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 45,824 46,936 46,291 44,223 46,549
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):     
Winter 36,429 31,956 32,272 36,794 37,234
Summer 34,841 34,874 35,781 36,195 35,396
System Reserve Margin (at peak) (percent) 29.8 30.8 34.2 33.2 19.8
Annual Load Factor (percent) 61.2 61.4 61.5 59.9 59.6
Plant Availability (percent):     
Fossil-steam 81.4 84.5 86.4 86.1 85.8
Nuclear 94.0 94.7 93.3 93.5 91.5
(a)The 2016 selected financial and operating data includes the operations of Southern Company Gas from the date of the Merger, July 1, 2016, through
December 31, 2016. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
II-4
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018 (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016(a)2015 2014
Source of Energy Supply (percent):     
Gas 41.6 41.9 41.7 42.7 37.0
Coal 27.0 27.0 30.3 32.3 39.3
Nuclear 13.8 14.5 14.5 15.2 14.8
Hydro 2.9 2.1 2.1 2.6 2.5
Other 5.4 5.4 2.4 0.8 0.4
Purchased power 9.3 9.1 9.0 6.4 6.0
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Gas Sales Volumes (mmBtu in millions):     
Firm 791 729 296 — —
Interruptible 109 109 53 — —
Total 900 838 349 — —
Traditional Electric Operating Company
   Customers (year-end) (in thousands):     
Residential 4,053 4,011 3,970 3,928 3,890
Commercial(b)603 599 595 590 586
Industrial(b)17 18 17 17 17
Other 12 12 11 11 11
Total electric customers 4,685 4,640 4,593 4,546 4,504
Gas distribution operations customers 4,248 4,623 4,586 — —
Total utility customers 8,933 9,263 9,179 4,546 4,504
Employees (year-end) 30,286 31,344 32,015 26,703 26,369
(a)The 2016 selected financial and operating data includes the operations of Southern Company Gas from the date of the Merger, July 1, 2016, through
December 31, 2016. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional
information.
(b)A reclassification of customers from commercial to industrial is reflected for years 2014-2015 to be consistent with the rate structure approved by the Georgia
PSC. The impact to operating revenues, kilowatt-hour sales, and average revenue per kilowatt-hour by class is not material.
II-5
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions) $ 6,032 $ 6,039$ 5,889 $ 5,768$ 5,942
Net Income After Dividends
on Preferred and Preference Stock (in millions)$ 930 $ 848$ 822 $ 785$ 761
Cash Dividends on Common Stock (in millions)$ 801 $ 714$ 765 $ 571$ 550
Return on Average Common Equity (percent) 13.00 12.89 13.34 13.37 13.52
Total Assets (in millions)(*)$ 26,730 $ 23,864$ 22,516 $ 21,721$ 20,493
Gross Property Additions (in millions) $ 2,273 $ 1,949$ 1,338 $ 1,492$ 1,543
Capitalization (in millions):      
Common stockholder's equity $ 7,477 $ 6,829$ 6,323 $ 5,992$ 5,752
Preference stock — — 196 196 343
Redeemable preferred stock 291 291 85 85 342
Long-term debt(*)7,923 7,628 6,535 6,654 6,137
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) $ 15,691 $ 14,748$ 13,139 $ 12,927$ 12,574
Capitalization Ratios (percent):      
Common stockholder's equity 47.7 46.3 48.1 46.4 45.8
Preference stock — — 1.5 1.5 2.7
Redeemable preferred stock 1.9 2.0 0.7 0.7 2.7
Long-term debt(*)50.4 51.7 49.7 51.4 48.8
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Customers (year-end):      
Residential 1,273,526 1,268,271 1,262,752 1,253,875 1,247,061
Commercial 200,032 199,840 199,146 197,920 197,082
Industrial 6,158 6,171 6,090 6,056 6,032
Other 760 766 762 757 753
Total 1,480,476 1,475,048 1,468,750 1,458,608 1,450,928
Employees (year-end) 6,650 6,613 6,805 6,986 6,935
(*)A reclassification of debt issuance costs from Total Assets to Long-term debt of $40 million and a reclassification of deferred tax assets from Total Assets to
Accumulated deferred income taxes of $20 million is reflected for 2014, in accordance with new accounting standards adopted in 2015 and applied
retrospectively.
II-6
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018 (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions):      
Residential $ 2,335$ 2,302 $ 2,322 $ 2,207$ 2,209
Commercial 1,578 1,649 1,627 1,564 1,533
Industrial 1,428 1,477 1,416 1,436 1,480
Other 26 30 (43) 27 27
Total retail 5,367 5,458 5,322 5,234 5,249
Wholesale — non-affiliates 279 276 283 241 281
Wholesale — affiliates 119 97 69 84 189
Total revenues from sales of electricity 5,765 5,831 5,674 5,559 5,719
Other revenues 267 208 215 209 223
Total $ 6,032$ 6,039 $ 5,889 $ 5,768$ 5,942
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):      
Residential 18,626 17,219 18,343 18,082 18,726
Commercial 13,868 13,606 14,091 14,102 14,118
Industrial 23,006 22,687 22,310 23,380 23,799
Other 187 198 208 201 211
Total retail 55,687 53,710 54,952 55,765 56,854
Wholesale — non-affiliates 5,018 5,415 5,744 3,567 3,588
Wholesale — affiliates 4,565 4,166 3,177 4,515 6,713
Total 65,270 63,291 63,873 63,847 67,155
Average Revenue Per Kilowatt-Hour (cents):      
Residential 12.54 13.37 12.66 12.21 11.80
Commercial 11.38 12.12 11.55 11.09 10.86
Industrial 6.21 6.51 6.35 6.14 6.22
Total retail 9.64 10.16 9.68 9.39 9.23
Wholesale 4.15 3.89 3.95 4.02 4.56
Total sales 8.83 9.21 8.88 8.71 8.52
Residential Average Annual
Kilowatt-Hour Use Per Customer 14,660 13,601 14,568 14,454 15,051
Residential Average Annual
Revenue Per Customer $ 1,878$ 1,819 $ 1,844 $ 1,764$ 1,775
Plant Nameplate Capacity
Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 11,815 11,797 11,797 11,797 12,222
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):      
Winter 11,744 10,513 10,282 12,162 11,761
Summer 10,652 10,711 10,932 11,292 11,054
Annual Load Factor (percent) 60.1 63.5 63.5 58.4 61.4
Plant Availability (percent):      
Fossil-steam 81.6 82.8 83.0 81.5 82.5
Nuclear 91.6 97.6 88.0 92.1 93.3
Source of Energy Supply (percent):      
Coal 43.8 44.8 47.1 49.1 49.0
Nuclear 20.5 22.2 20.3 21.3 20.7
Gas 17.2 18.1 17.1 14.6 15.4
Hydro 6.7 5.4 4.8 5.6 5.5
Purchased power —      
From non-affiliates 5.4 4.6 4.8 4.4 3.6
From affiliates 6.4 4.9 5.9 5.0 5.8
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
II-7
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions) $ 8,420$ 8,310 $ 8,383 $ 8,326$ 8,988
Net Income After Dividends
on Preferred and Preference Stock (in millions)
(a) $ 793$ 1,414 $ 1,330 $ 1,260$ 1,225
Cash Dividends on Common Stock (in millions)$ 1,396$ 1,281 $ 1,305 $ 1,034$ 954
Return on Average Common Equity (percent) 6.04 12.15 12.05 11.92 12.24
Total Assets (in millions)(b)$ 40,365$ 36,779 $ 34,835 $ 32,865$ 30,872
Gross Property Additions (in millions) $ 3,176$ 1,080 $ 2,314 $ 2,332$ 2,146
Capitalization (in millions):     
Common stockholder's equity $ 14,323$ 11,931 $ 11,356 $ 10,719$ 10,421
Preferred and preference stock — — 266 266 266
Long-term debt(b)9,364 11,073 10,225 9,616 8,563
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) $ 23,687$ 23,004 $ 21,847 $ 20,601$ 19,250
Capitalization Ratios (percent):     
Common stockholder's equity 60.5 51.9 52.0 52.0 54.1
Preferred and preference stock — — 1.2 1.3 1.4
Long-term debt(b)39.5 48.1 46.8 46.7 44.5
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Customers (year-end):     
Residential 2,220,240 2,185,782 2,155,945 2,127,658 2,102,673
Commercial(c)312,474 308,939 305,488 302,891 300,186
Industrial(c)10,571 10,644 10,537 10,429 10,192
Other 9,838 9,766 9,585 9,261 9,003
Total 2,553,123 2,515,131 2,481,555 2,450,239 2,422,054
Employees (year-end) 6,967 6,986 7,527 7,989 7,909
(a)Georgia Power recorded a pre-tax estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter 2018 to reflect its revised estimate to
complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
(b)A reclassification of debt issuance costs from Total Assets to Long-term debt of $124 million and a reclassification of deferred tax assets from Total Assets to
Accumulated deferred income taxes of $34 million is reflected for 2014, in accordance with new accounting standards adopted in 2015 and applied
retrospectively.
(c)A reclassification of customers from commercial to industrial is reflected for years 2014-2015 to be consistent with the rate structure approved by the Georgia
PSC. The impact to operating revenues, kilowatt-hour sales, and average revenue per kilowatt-hour by class is not material.
II-8
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018 (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions):      
Residential $ 3,301 $ 3,236 $ 3,318$ 3,240 $ 3,350
Commercial 3,023 3,092 3,077 3,094 3,271
Industrial 1,344 1,321 1,291 1,305 1,525
Other 84 89 86 88 94
Total retail 7,752 7,738 7,772 7,727 8,240
Wholesale — non-affiliates 163 163 175 215 335
Wholesale — affiliates 24 26 42 20 42
Total revenues from sales of electricity 7,939 7,927 7,989 7,962 8,617
Other revenues 481 383 394 364 371
Total $ 8,420 $ 8,310 $ 8,383$ 8,326 $ 8,988
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):      
Residential 28,331 26,144 27,585 26,649 27,132
Commercial 32,958 32,155 32,932 32,719 32,426
Industrial 23,655 23,518 23,746 23,805 23,549
Other 549 584 610 632 633
Total retail 85,493 82,401 84,873 83,805 83,740
Wholesale — non-affiliates 3,140 3,277 3,415 3,501 4,323
Wholesale — affiliates 526 800 1,398 552 1,117
Total 89,159 86,478 89,686 87,858 89,180
Average Revenue Per Kilowatt-Hour (cents):      
Residential 11.65 12.38 12.03 12.16 12.35
Commercial 9.17 9.62 9.34 9.46 10.09
Industrial 5.68 5.62 5.44 5.48 6.48
Total retail 9.07 9.39 9.16 9.22 9.84
Wholesale 5.10 4.64 4.51 5.80 6.93
Total sales 8.90 9.17 8.91 9.06 9.66
Residential Average Annual
Kilowatt-Hour Use Per Customer 12,849 12,028 12,864 12,582 12,969
Residential Average Annual
Revenue Per Customer $ 1,555 $ 1,489 $ 1,557$ 1,529 $ 1,605
Plant Nameplate Capacity
Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 15,308 15,274 15,274 15,455 17,593
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):      
Winter 15,372 13,894 14,527 15,735 16,308
Summer 15,748 16,002 16,244 16,104 15,777
Annual Load Factor (percent) 64.5 61.1 61.9 61.9 61.2
Plant Availability (percent):      
Fossil-steam 81.5 85.0 87.4 85.6 86.3
Nuclear 95.0 93.5 95.6 94.1 90.8
Source of Energy Supply (percent):      
Gas 29.1 28.6 28.2 28.3 26.3
Coal 21.1 22.4 26.4 24.5 30.9
Nuclear 17.6 17.8 17.6 17.6 16.7
Hydro 1.9 1.0 1.1 1.6 1.3
Other 0.3 0.3 — — —
Purchased power —      
From non-affiliates 7.3 7.8 6.7 5.0 3.8
From affiliates 22.7 22.1 20.0 23.0 21.0
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
II-9
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions) $ 1,265 $ 1,187$ 1,163$ 1,138$ 1,243
Net Income (Loss) After Dividends
on Preferred Stock (in millions)(a)(b)$ 235 $ (2,590)$ (50)$ (8)$ (329)
Return on Average Common Equity (percent)(a)
(b) 15.83 (120.43) (1.87) (0.34) (15.43)
Total Assets (in millions)(c)$ 4,886 $ 4,866$ 8,235$ 7,840$ 6,642
Gross Property Additions (in millions) $ 206 $ 536$ 946$ 972$ 1,389
Capitalization (in millions):      
Common stockholder's equity $ 1,609 $ 1,358$ 2,943$ 2,359$ 2,084
Redeemable preferred stock — 33 33 33 33
Long-term debt(c)1,539 1,097 2,424 1,886 1,621
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) $ 3,148 $ 2,488$ 5,400$ 4,278$ 3,738
Capitalization Ratios (percent):      
Common stockholder's equity 51.1 54.6 54.5 55.1 55.8
Redeemable preferred stock — 1.3 0.6 0.8 0.9
Long-term debt(c)48.9 44.1 44.9 44.1 43.3
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Customers (year-end):      
Residential 153,423 153,115 153,172 153,158 152,453
Commercial 33,968 33,992 33,783 33,663 33,496
Industrial 445 452 451 467 482
Other 188 173 175 175 175
Total 188,024 187,732 187,581 187,463 186,606
Employees (year-end) 1,053 1,242 1,484 1,478 1,478
(a)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, Mississippi Power recorded an income tax expense (benefit) of $(35) million and $372 million in 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
(b)A significant loss to income was recorded by Mississippi Power related to the suspension of the Kemper IGCC in June 2017. Earnings in all periods presented
were impacted by losses related to the Kemper IGCC.
(c)A reclassification of debt issuance costs from Total Assets to Long-term debt of $9 million and a reclassification of deferred tax assets from Total Assets to
Accumulated deferred income taxes of $105 million is reflected for 2014, in accordance with new accounting standards adopted in 2015 and applied
retrospectively.
II-10
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018 (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions):      
Residential $ 273$ 257 $ 260$ 238 $ 239
Commercial 286 285 279 256 257
Industrial 321 321 313 287 291
Other 9 (9) 7 (5) 8
Total retail 889 854 859 776 795
Wholesale — non-affiliates 263 259 261 270 323
Wholesale — affiliates 91 56 26 76 107
Total revenues from sales of electricity 1,243 1,169 1,146 1,122 1,225
Other revenues 22 18 17 16 18
Total $ 1,265$ 1,187 $ 1,163$ 1,138 $ 1,243
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):      
Residential 2,113 1,944 2,051 2,025 2,126
Commercial 2,797 2,764 2,842 2,806 2,860
Industrial 4,924 4,841 4,906 4,958 4,943
Other 37 39 39 40 40
Total retail 9,871 9,588 9,838 9,829 9,969
Wholesale — non-affiliates 3,980 3,672 3,920 3,852 4,191
Wholesale — affiliates 2,584 2,024 1,108 2,807 2,900
Total 16,435 15,284 14,866 16,488 17,060
Average Revenue Per Kilowatt-Hour (cents):      
Residential 12.92 13.22 12.68 11.75 11.26
Commercial 10.23 10.31 9.82 9.12 8.99
Industrial 6.52 6.63 6.38 5.79 5.89
Total retail 9.01 8.91 8.73 7.90 7.97
Wholesale 5.39 5.53 5.71 5.20 6.06
Total sales 7.56 7.65 7.71 6.80 7.18
Residential Average Annual
Kilowatt-Hour Use Per Customer 13,768 12,692 13,383 13,242 13,934
Residential Average Annual
Revenue Per Customer $ 1,780$ 1,680 $ 1,697$ 1,556 $ 1,568
Plant Nameplate Capacity
Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 3,516 3,628 3,481 3,561 3,867
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):      
Winter 2,763 2,390 2,195 2,548 2,618
Summer 2,346 2,322 2,384 2,403 2,345
Annual Load Factor (percent) 55.8 63.1 64.0 60.6 59.4
Plant Availability Fossil-Steam (percent) 82.4 89.1 91.4 90.6 87.6
Source of Energy Supply (percent):      
Gas 86.1 88.0 84.9 81.6 55.3
Coal 6.9 7.5 8.0 16.5 39.7
Purchased power —      
From non-affiliates 4.7 0.5 (0.3) 0.4 1.4
From affiliates 2.3 4.0 7.4 1.5 3.6
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
II-11
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in millions):    
Wholesale — non-affiliates $ 1,757$ 1,671$ 1,146 $ 964$ 1,116
Wholesale — affiliates 435 392 419 417 383
Total revenues from sales of electricity 2,192 2,063 1,565 1,381 1,499
Other revenues 13 12 12 9 2
Total $ 2,205$ 2,075$ 1,577 $ 1,390$ 1,501
Net Income Attributable to
   Southern Power (in millions)(a)$ 187$ 1,071$ 338 $ 215$ 172
Cash Dividends
   on Common Stock (in millions) $ 312$ 317$ 272 $ 131$ 131
Return on Average Common Equity (percent)(a)4.62 22.39 9.79 10.16 10.39
Total Assets (in millions)(b)$ 14,883$ 15,206$ 15,169 $ 8,905$ 5,233
Property, Plant, and Equipment —
   In Service (in millions) $ 13,271$ 13,755$ 12,728 $ 7,275$ 5,657
Capitalization (in millions):    
Common stockholders' equity $ 2,968$ 5,138$ 4,430 $ 2,483$ 1,752
Noncontrolling interests 4,316 1,360 1,245 781 219
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — — 164 43 39
Long-term debt(b)4,418 5,071 5,068 2,719 1,085
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) $ 11,702$ 11,569$ 10,907 $ 6,026$ 3,095
Capitalization Ratios (percent):    
Common stockholders' equity 25.4 44.4 40.6 41.2 56.6
Noncontrolling interests 36.9 11.8 11.4 13.0 7.1
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — — 1.5 0.7 1.3
Long-term debt(b)37.7 43.8 46.5 45.1 35.0
Total (excluding amounts due within one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Kilowatt-Hour Sales (in millions):    
Wholesale — non-affiliates 37,164 35,920 23,213 18,544 19,014
Wholesale — affiliates 12,603 12,811 15,950 16,567 11,194
Total 49,767 48,731 39,163 35,111 30,208
Plant Nameplate Capacity
   Ratings (year-end) (megawatts) 11,888 12,940 12,442 9,808 9,185
Maximum Peak-Hour Demand (megawatts):    
Winter 2,867 3,421 3,469 3,923 3,999
Summer 4,210 4,224 4,303 4,249 3,998
Annual Load Factor (percent) 52.2 49.1 50.0 49.0 51.8
Plant Availability (percent) 99.9 99.9 91.6 93.1 91.8
Source of Energy Supply (percent):    
Natural gas 68.1 67.7 79.4 89.5 86.0
Solar, Wind, and Biomass 23.6 22.8 12.1 4.3 2.9
Purchased power —    
From non-affiliates 6.6 7.8 6.8 4.7 6.4
From affiliates 1.7 1.7 1.7 1.5 4.7
Total 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Employees (year-end)(c)491 541 — — —
(a)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, Southern Power recorded an income tax expense (benefit) of $79 million and $(743) million in 2018 and
2017, respectively.
(b)A reclassification of debt issuance costs from Total Assets to Long-term debt of $11 million and a reclassification of deferred tax assets from Total
Assets to Accumulated deferred income taxes of $306 million is reflected for 2014, in accordance with new accounting standards adopted in 2015 and
applied retrospectively.
(c)Prior to December 2017, Southern Power had no employees but was billed for employee-related costs from SCS.
II-12
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Successor(a) Predecessor(a)
 2018(b)2017  July 1, 2016
through
December 31,
2016  January 1,
2016 through
June 30, 2016 2015 2014
Operating Revenues (in
millions) $ 3,909$ 3,920 $ 1,652 $ 1,905$ 3,941$ 5,385
Net Income Attributable to
Southern Company Gas
(in millions)(c)$ 372$ 243 $ 114 $ 131$ 353$ 482
Cash Dividends on Common
Stock
(in millions) $ 468$ 443 $ 126 $ 128$ 244$ 233
Return on Average Common
Equity
(percent)(c)4.23 2.68 1.74 3.31 9.05 12.96
Total Assets (in millions) $ 21,448$ 22,987 $ 21,853 $ 14,488$ 14,754$ 14,888
Gross Property Additions
(in millions) $ 1,399$ 1,525 $ 632 $ 548$ 1,027$ 769
Capitalization (in millions):        
Common stockholders' equity $ 8,570$ 9,022 $ 9,109 $ 3,933$ 3,975$ 3,828
Long-term debt 5,583 5,891 5,259 3,709 3,275 3,581
Total (excluding amounts due
within
one year) $ 14,153$ 14,913 $ 14,368 $ 7,642$ 7,250$ 7,409
Capitalization Ratios (percent):       
Common stockholders' equity 60.6 60.5 63.4 51.5 54.8 51.7
Long-term debt 39.4 39.5 36.6 48.5 45.2 48.3
Total (excluding amounts due
within
one year) 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0 100.0
Service Contracts (period-end) — 1,184,257 1,198,263 1,197,096 1,205,476 1,162,065
Customers (period-end)        
Gas distribution operations 4,247,804 4,623,249 4,586,477 4,544,489 4,557,729 4,529,114
Gas marketing services 697,384 773,984 655,999 630,475 654,475 633,460
Total 4,945,188 5,397,233 5,242,476 5,174,964 5,212,204 5,162,574
Employees (period-end) 4,389 5,318 5,292 5,284 5,203 5,165
(a)As a result of the Merger, pushdown accounting was applied to create a new cost basis for Southern Company Gas' assets, liabilities, and equity as of the
acquisition date. Accordingly, the successor financial statements reflect the new basis of accounting, and successor and predecessor period financial
results are presented but are not comparable.
(b)During 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
(c)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, Southern Company Gas recorded income tax expense (benefit) of $(3) million and $93 million in 2018 and
2017, respectively.
II-13
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SELECTED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL AND OPERATING DATA 2014-2018 (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Successor(a)  Predecessor(a)
 2018(b) 2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31,
2016   January 1,
2016 through
June 30, 2016 2015  2014
Operating Revenues (in
millions)       
Residential $ 1,886 $ 2,100$ 899  $ 1,101$ 2,129 $ 2,877
Commercial 546 641 260  310 617 861
Transportation 944 811 269  290 526 458
Industrial 140 159 74  72 203 242
Other 393 209 150  132 466 947
Total $ 3,909 $ 3,920$ 1,652  $ 1,905$ 3,941 $ 5,385
Heating Degree Days:       
Illinois 6,101 5,246 1,903  3,340 5,433 6,556
Georgia 2,588 1,970 727  1,448 2,204 2,882
Gas Sales Volumes
(mmBtu in millions):       
Gas distribution operations       
Firm 721 667 274  396 695 766
Interruptible 95 95 47  49 99 106
Total 816 762 321  445 794 872
Gas marketing services       
Firm:       
Georgia 37 32 13  21 35 41
Illinois 13 12 4  8 13 17
Other 20 18 5  7 11 10
Interruptible large commercial
and
industrial 14 14 6  8 14 17
Total 84 76 28  44 73 85
Market share in Georgia (percent) 29.0 29.2 29.4  29.3 29.7 30.6
Wholesale gas services       
Daily physical sales (mmBtu in
millions/day) 6.7 6.4 7.2  7.6 6.8 6.3
(a)As a result of the Merger, pushdown accounting was applied to create a new cost basis for Southern Company Gas' assets, liabilities, and equity as of the
acquisition date. Accordingly, the successor financial statements reflect the new basis of accounting, and successor and predecessor period financial
results are presented but are not comparable.
(b)During 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
II-14
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 7.MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
 Page
Southern Company II-16
Alabama Power II-70
Georgia Power II-93
Mississippi Power II-124
Southern Power II-151
Southern Company Gas II-171
II-15
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements    
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
OVERVIEW
Business Activities
Southern Company is a holding company that owns all of the common stock of the traditional electric operating companies and the
parent entities of Southern Power and Southern Company Gas and owns other direct and indirect subsidiaries. The primary
businesses of the Southern Company system are electricity sales by the traditional electric operating companies and Southern
Power and the distribution of natural gas by Southern Company Gas.
•The traditional electric operating companies are vertically integrated utilities providing electric service in three
Southeastern states as of January 1, 2019. On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed its sale of Gulf Power to
NextEra Energy for an aggregate cash purchase price of approximately $5.8 billion (less $1.3 billion of indebtedness
assumed), subject to customary working capital adjustments. At December 31, 2018, the assets and liabilities of Gulf
Power were classified as held for sale on Southern Company's balance sheet. Unless otherwise noted, the disclosures
herein related to specific asset and liability balances at December 31, 2018 exclude assets and liabilities held for sale. See
Note 15 under "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information. A preliminary gain of $2.5 billion pre-tax ($1.3 billion
after tax) associated with the sale of Gulf Power is expected to be recorded in 2019.
•Southern Power develops, constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy
projects, and sells electricity at market-based rates in the wholesale market. On May 22, 2018, Southern Power sold a
noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership indirectly owning substantially all of Southern
Power's solar facilities, for approximately $1.2 billion and, on December 11, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling
tax equity interest in SP Wind, a holding company owning a portfolio of eight operating wind facilities, for approximately
$1.2 billion. On November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement to sell all of its equity interests in Plant
Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction) for an aggregate purchase price of
approximately $650 million, which is expected to close mid-2019. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
•Southern Company Gas distributes natural gas through its natural gas distribution utilities and is involved in several other
complementary businesses including gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services. In July
2018, Southern Company Gas completed sales of three of its natural gas distribution utilities.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "General" herein and Note 15 to the financial statements for additional information
regarding disposition activities.
Many factors affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of the Southern Company system's electricity and natural gas
businesses. These factors include the ability to maintain constructive regulatory environments, to maintain and grow sales and
customers, and to effectively manage and secure timely recovery of costs. These costs include those related to projected long-term
demand growth, stringent environmental standards, including CCR rules, reliability, fuel, restoration following major storms, and
capital expenditures, including constructing new electric generating plants, expanding and improving the electric transmission and
distribution systems, and updating and expanding the natural gas distribution systems.
The traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities have various regulatory mechanisms that operate
to address cost recovery. Effectively operating pursuant to these regulatory mechanisms and appropriately balancing required costs
and capital expenditures with customer prices will continue to challenge the Southern Company system for the foreseeable future.
See Note 2 to the financial statements for additional information.
In 2018, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Atlanta Gas Light, and Nicor Gas reached agreements with their
respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies relating to the regulatory impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation,
which, for some companies, included capital structure adjustments expected to help mitigate the potential adverse impacts to
certain of their credit metrics. See Note 2 to the financial statements for additional information regarding state PSC or other
regulatory agency actions related to the Tax Reform Legislation. Also see MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS –
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" and FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Credit Rating
Risk" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for information regarding the Tax Reform Legislation.
Another major factor affecting the Southern Company system's businesses is the profitability of the competitive market-based
wholesale generating business. Southern Power's strategy is to create value through various transactions including acquisitions,
dispositions, and sales of partnership interests, development and construction of new generating facilities, and entry into PPAs
primarily with investor-owned utilities, IPPs, municipalities, electric cooperatives, and other load-serving entities, as well as
commercial and industrial customers. In general, Southern Power commits to the construction or acquisition of new generating
capacity only after entering into or assuming long-term PPAs for the new facilities.
II-16
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company's other business activities include providing energy solutions, including distributed energy infrastructure,
energy efficiency products and services, and utility infrastructure services, to customers. Other business activities also include
investments in telecommunications, leveraged lease projects, and gas storage facilities. Management continues to evaluate the
contribution of each of these activities to total shareholder return and may pursue acquisitions, dispositions, and other strategic
ventures or investments accordingly.
In striving to achieve attractive risk-adjusted returns while providing cost-effective energy to more than eight million electric and
gas utility customers, the Southern Company system continues to focus on several key performance indicators. These indicators
include, but are not limited to, customer satisfaction, plant availability, electric and natural gas system reliability, execution of
major construction projects, and earnings per share (EPS). Southern Company's financial success is directly tied to customer
satisfaction. Key elements of ensuring customer satisfaction include outstanding service, high reliability, and competitive prices.
Management uses customer satisfaction surveys and reliability indicators to evaluate the results of the Southern Company system.
See RESULTS OF OPERATIONS herein for information on Southern Company's financial performance.
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 Status
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (with electric generating capacity of approximately
1,100 MWs each). Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In March 2017, the EPC
Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC
approved Georgia Power's recommendation to continue construction. The current expected in-service dates remain November 2021
for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4.
In the second quarter 2018, Georgia Power revised its base capital cost forecast and estimated contingency to complete construction
and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to $8.0 billion and $0.4 billion, respectively, for a total project capital cost forecast of
$8.4 billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related
Customer Refunds), with respect to Georgia Power's ownership interest. Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs
are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the Georgia PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically
states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is not subject to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for
the $0.7 billion increase in costs included in the current base capital cost forecast (or any related financing costs) in the nineteenth
VCM report that was approved by the Georgia PSC on February 19, 2019. In connection with future VCM filings, Georgia Power
may request the Georgia PSC to evaluate costs currently included in the construction contingency estimate for rate recovery as and
when they are appropriately included in the base capital cost forecast. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that
exists regarding the future recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of
these matters is subject to the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future
regulatory proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the
second quarter 2018.
As a result of the increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 were required
to vote to continue construction. On September 26, 2018, the Vogtle Owners unanimously voted to continue construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In connection with the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into (i) a binding term sheet
(Vogtle Owner Term Sheet) with the other Vogtle Owners and certain of MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries, including MEAG
Power SPVJ, LLC (MEAG SPVJ), to take certain actions which partially mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle
Owners and (ii) a term sheet (MEAG Term Sheet) with MEAG and MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with respect to MEAG SPVJ's
ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 under certain circumstances. On January 14, 2019, Georgia Power, MEAG, and
MEAG SPVJ entered into an agreement to implement the provisions of the MEAG Term Sheet. On February 18, 2019, Georgia
Power, the other Vogtle Owners, and certain of MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries entered into certain amendments to their joint
ownership agreements to implement the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Construction Program – Nuclear Construction" herein for additional information on
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Earnings
Consolidated net income attributable to Southern Company was $2.2 billion in 2018, an increase of $1.4 billion, or 164.4%, from
the prior year. The increase was primarily due to charges of $3.4 billion ($2.4 billion after tax) in 2017 related to the Kemper IGCC
at Mississippi Power, partially offset by a $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) charge in the second quarter 2018 for an
II-17
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
estimated probable loss on Georgia Power's construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. The increase also reflects lower federal
income tax expense as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, partially offset by impairment charges, primarily associated with
asset sales at Southern Power and Southern Company Gas.
Consolidated net income attributable to Southern Company was $842 million in 2017, a decrease of $1.6 billion, or 65.6%, from
the prior year. The decrease was primarily due to pre-tax charges of $3.4 billion ($2.4 billion after tax) related to the Kemper IGCC
at Mississippi Power. Also contributing to the change were increases of $240 million in net income from Southern Company Gas
(excluding the impact of $111 million in additional expense related to the Tax Reform Legislation) reflecting the 12-month period
in 2017 compared to the six-month period following the Merger closing on July 1, 2016, $264 million related to net tax benefits
from the Tax Reform Legislation, higher retail electric revenues resulting from increases in base rates partially offset by milder
weather and lower customer usage, and increases in renewable energy sales at Southern Power. These increases were partially
offset by higher interest and depreciation and amortization.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" for additional information
regarding the Merger.
Basic EPS was $2.18 in 2018, $0.84 in 2017, and $2.57 in 2016. Diluted EPS, which factors in additional shares related to stock-
based compensation, was $2.17 in 2018, $0.84 in 2017, and $2.55 in 2016. EPS for 2018, 2017, and 2016 was negatively impacted
by $0.04, $0.04, and $0.12 per share, respectively, as a result of increases in the average shares outstanding. See FINANCIAL
CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Financing Activities" herein for additional information.
Dividends
Southern Company has paid dividends on its common stock since 1948. Dividends paid per share of common stock were $2.38 in
2018, $2.30 in 2017, and $2.22 in 2016. In January 2019, Southern Company declared a quarterly dividend of 60 cents per share.
This is the 285th consecutive quarter that Southern Company has paid a dividend equal to or higher than the previous quarter. For
2018, the dividend payout ratio was 109% compared to 273% for 2017. The decrease was due to an increase in earnings in 2018
resulting from charges related to the Kemper IGCC in 2017, partially offset by the charge related to construction of Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 in 2018. See "Earnings" and RESULTS OF OPERATIONS – "Electricity Business – Estimated Loss on Projects
Under Construction" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" and "Mississippi
Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Discussion of the results of operations is divided into three parts – the Southern Company system's primary business of electricity
sales, its gas business, and its other business activities.
 2018 2017  2016
 (in millions)
Electricity business $ 2,304 $ 878 $ 2,571
Gas business 372 243 114
Other business activities (450) (279) (237)
Net Income $ 2,226 $ 842 $ 2,448
II-18
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Electricity Business
Southern Company's electric utilities generate and sell electricity to retail and wholesale customers. The results of operations
discussed below include the results of Gulf Power through December 31, 2018. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for additional information.
A condensed statement of income for the electricity business follows:
 AmountIncrease (Decrease)
from Prior Year
 2018 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Electric operating revenues $ 18,571 $ 31 $ 599
Fuel 4,637 237 39
Purchased power 971 108 113
Cost of other sales 66 (3) 11
Other operations and maintenance 4,635 45 (76)
Depreciation and amortization 2,565 108 224
Taxes other than income taxes 1,098 35 24
Estimated loss on plants under construction 1,097 (2,265) 2,934
Impairment charges 156 156 —
Gain on dispositions, net — 40 (41)
Total electric operating expenses 15,225 (1,539) 3,228
Operating income 3,346 1,570 (2,629)
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 131 (21) (48)
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 1,035 24 80
Other income (expense), net 144 17 58
Income taxes 207 125 (1,009)
Net income 2,379 1,417 (1,690)
Less:
Dividends on preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries 16 (22) (7)
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 59 13 10
Net Income Attributable to Southern Company $ 2,304 $ 1,426 $ (1,693)
II-19
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Electric Operating Revenues
Electric operating revenues for 2018 were $18.6 billion, reflecting a $31 million increase from 2017. Details of electric operating
revenues were as follows:
 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Retail electric — prior year $ 15,330 $ 15,234
Estimated change resulting from —  
Rates and pricing (773) 508
Sales growth (decline) 84 (71)
Weather 300 (281)
Fuel and other cost recovery 281 (60)
Retail electric — current year 15,222 15,330
Wholesale electric revenues 2,516 2,426
Other electric revenues 664 681
Other revenues 169 103
Electric operating revenues $ 18,571 $ 18,540
Percent change 0.2% 3.3%
Retail electric revenues decreased $108 million, or 0.7%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year. The significant factors driving this
change are shown in the preceding table. The decrease in rates and pricing in 2018 was primarily due to revenues deferred as
regulatory liabilities for customer bill credits related to the Tax Reform Legislation and expected customer refunds at Alabama
Power and Georgia Power.
Retail electric revenues increased $96 million, or 0.6%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year. The significant factors driving this
change are shown in the preceding table. The increase in rates and pricing in 2017 was primarily due to a Rate RSE increase at
Alabama Power effective in January 2017, the recovery of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 construction financing costs under the NCCR
tariff at Georgia Power, and an increase in retail base rates effective July 2017 at Gulf Power.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company – Gulf Power," "Alabama Power – Rate RSE" and " – Rate CNP
Compliance," "Georgia Power – Rate Plans," and " – Nuclear Construction" for additional information. Also see "Energy Sales"
below for a discussion of changes in the volume of energy sold, including changes related to sales growth (decline) and weather.
Electric rates for the traditional electric operating companies include provisions to adjust billings for fluctuations in fuel costs,
including the energy component of purchased power costs. Under these provisions, fuel revenues generally equal fuel expenses,
including the energy component of PPA costs, and do not affect net income. The traditional electric operating companies each have
one or more regulatory mechanisms to recover other costs such as environmental and other compliance costs, storm damage, new
plants, and PPA capacity costs.
Wholesale electric revenues consist of PPAs and short-term opportunity sales. Wholesale electric revenues from PPAs (other than
solar and wind PPAs) have both capacity and energy components. Capacity revenues generally represent the greatest contribution to
net income and are designed to provide recovery of fixed costs plus a return on investment. Energy revenues will vary depending
on fuel prices, the market prices of wholesale energy compared to the Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy
within the Southern Company system's electric service territory, and the availability of the Southern Company system's generation.
Increases and decreases in energy revenues that are driven by fuel prices are accompanied by an increase or decrease in fuel costs
and do not have a significant impact on net income. Energy sales from solar and wind PPAs do not have a capacity charge and
customers either purchase the energy output of a dedicated renewable facility through an energy charge or through a fixed price
related to the energy. As a result, the ability to recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance expenses is dependent upon
the level of energy generated from these facilities, which can be impacted by weather conditions, equipment performance,
transmission constraints, and other factors. Wholesale electric revenues at Mississippi Power include FERC-regulated MRA sales
as well as market-based sales. Short-term opportunity sales are made at market-based rates that generally provide a margin above
the Southern Company system's variable cost to produce the energy.
II-20
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Wholesale electric revenues from power sales were as follows:
 2018  2017  2016
 (in millions)
Capacity and other $ 620 $ 642 $ 570
Energy 1,896 1,784 1,356
Total $ 2,516 $ 2,426 $ 1,926
In 2018, wholesale revenues increased $90 million, or 3.7%, as compared to the prior year due to a $112 million increase in energy
revenues, partially offset by a $22 million decrease in capacity revenues. The increase in energy revenues was primarily related to
Southern Power and includes new PPAs related to existing natural gas facilities, new renewable facilities, and an increase in the
volume of KWHs sold at existing renewable facilities, partially offset by a decrease in non-PPA revenues from short-term sales.
The decrease in capacity revenues was primarily due to the expiration of a wholesale contract in the fourth quarter 2017 at Georgia
Power.
In 2017, wholesale revenues increased $500 million, or 26.0%, as compared to the prior year due to a $428 million increase in
energy revenues and a $72 million increase in capacity revenues, primarily at Southern Power. The increase in energy revenues was
primarily due to increases in renewable energy sales arising from new solar and wind facilities and non-PPA revenues from short-
term sales. The increase in capacity revenues was primarily due to a PPA related to new natural gas facilities and additional
customer capacity requirements.
Other Electric Revenues
Other electric revenues decreased $17 million, or 2.5%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year. The decrease is primarily related to a
decrease in open access transmission tariff revenues, largely due to a lower rate related to the Tax Reform Legislation. Other
electric revenues decreased $17 million, or 2.4%, in 2017, as compared to the prior year. The decrease reflects a $15 million
decrease in open access transmission tariff revenues, primarily as a result of the expiration of long-term transmission services
contracts at Georgia Power.
Energy Sales
Changes in revenues are influenced heavily by the change in the volume of energy sold from year to year. KWH sales for 2018 and
the percent change from the prior year were as follows:
 Total
KWHsTotal KWH
Percent ChangeWeather-Adjusted
Percent Change
 2018 2018  2017 2018 2017
 (in billions)    
Residential 54.6 8.0 % (5.3)% 1.2 % (0.3)%
Commercial 53.5 2.1  (2.6) 0.5 (0.9)
Industrial 53.3 1.1  — 1.1 —
Other 0.8 (5.5) (4.0) (5.7) (3.9)
Total retail 162.2 3.6  (2.6) 0.9 % (0.4)%
Wholesale 49.9 1.9  32.4  
Total energy sales 212.1 3.2 % 3.9 %  
Changes in retail energy sales are generally the result of changes in electricity usage by customers, changes in weather, and changes
in the number of customers. Retail energy sales increased 5.7 billion KWHs in 2018 as compared to the prior year. This increase
was primarily due to colder weather in the first quarter 2018 and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 compared to
the corresponding periods in 2017. Weather-adjusted residential KWH sales increased primarily due to customer growth. Weather-
adjusted commercial KWH sales increased primarily due to customer growth, partially offset by decreased customer usage
resulting from customer initiatives in energy savings and an ongoing migration to the electronic commerce business model.
Industrial KWH energy sales increased primarily due to increased sales in the primary metals sector, partially offset by decreased
sales in the paper sector.
Retail energy sales decreased 4.2 billion KWHs in 2017 as compared to the prior year. This decrease was primarily due to milder
weather and decreased customer usage, partially offset by customer growth. Weather-adjusted residential KWH sales decreased
II-21
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
primarily due to decreased customer usage resulting from an increase in penetration of energy-efficient residential appliances and
an increase in multi-family housing, partially offset by customer growth. Weather-adjusted commercial KWH sales decreased
primarily due to decreased customer usage resulting from customer initiatives in energy savings and an ongoing migration to the
electronic commerce business model, partially offset by customer growth. Industrial KWH energy sales were flat primarily due to
decreased sales in the paper, stone, clay, and glass, transportation, and chemicals sectors, offset by increased sales in the primary
metals and textile sectors. Additionally, Hurricane Irma negatively impacted customer usage for all customer classes.
See "Electric Operating Revenues" above for a discussion of significant changes in wholesale revenues related to changes in price
and KWH sales.
Other Revenues
Other revenues increased $66 million, or 64.1%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to
unregulated sales of products and services that were reclassified from other income (expense), net as a result of the adoption of
ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (ASC 606). See Note 1 to the financial statements for additional information
regarding the adoption of ASC 606.
Other revenues increased $20 million in 2017 as compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to additional third
party infrastructure services.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
The mix of fuel sources for the generation of electricity is determined primarily by demand, the unit cost of fuel consumed, and the
availability of generating units. Additionally, the electric utilities purchase a portion of their electricity needs from the wholesale
market.
Details of the Southern Company system's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
Total generation (in billions of KWHs) 200 194 188
Total purchased power (in billions of KWHs) 21 20 19
Sources of generation (percent) —    
Gas 46 46 46
Coal 30 30 33
Nuclear 15 16 16
Hydro 3 2 2
Other 6 6 3
Cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)(a) —    
Gas 2.89 2.79 2.48
Coal 2.80 2.81 3.04
Nuclear 0.80 0.79 0.81
Average cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)(a)2.50 2.44 2.40
Average cost of purchased power (in cents per net KWH)(b)5.46 5.19 4.81
(a)For 2018, cost of fuel, generated and average cost of fuel, generated excludes a $30 million adjustment associated with a May 2018 Alabama PSC accounting
order related to excess deferred income taxes.
(b)Average cost of purchased power includes fuel purchased by the Southern Company system for tolling agreements where power is generated by the provider.
In 2018, total fuel and purchased power expenses were $5.6 billion, an increase of $345 million, or 6.6%, as compared to the prior
year. The increase was primarily the result of a $178 million increase in the volume of KWHs generated and purchased primarily
due to colder weather in the first quarter 2018 and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 compared to the
corresponding periods in 2017 and a $137 million increase in the average cost of fuel and purchased power primarily due to higher
natural gas prices.
In addition, fuel expense increased $30 million in 2018 as a result of an Alabama PSC accounting order authorizing the
amortization of a regulatory liability to offset under recovered fuel costs. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory
Matters – Alabama Power – Tax Reform Accounting Order" herein for additional information.
II-22
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
In 2017, total fuel and purchased power expenses were $5.3 billion, an increase of $152 million, or 3.0%, as compared to the prior
year. The increase was primarily the result of a $196 million increase in the average cost of fuel and purchased power primarily due
to higher natural gas prices, partially offset by a $44 million net decrease in the volume of KWHs generated and purchased.
Fuel and purchased power energy transactions at the traditional electric operating companies are generally offset by fuel revenues
and do not have a significant impact on net income. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Fuel Cost
Recovery" herein for additional information. Fuel expenses incurred under Southern Power's PPAs are generally the responsibility
of the counterparties and do not significantly impact net income.
Fuel
In 2018, fuel expense was $4.6 billion, an increase of $237 million, or 5.4%, as compared to the prior year. The increase was
primarily due to a 3.6% increase in the average cost of natural gas per KWH generated, a 3.5% increase in the volume of KWHs
generated by coal, and a 2.8% increase in the volume of KWHs generated by natural gas.
In 2017, fuel expense was $4.4 billion, an increase of $39 million, or 0.9%, as compared to the prior year. The increase was
primarily due to a 12.5% increase in the average cost of natural gas per KWH generated and a 2.8% increase in the volume of
KWHs generated by natural gas, partially offset by a 7.9% decrease in the volume of KWHs generated by coal and a 7.6% decrease
in the average cost of coal per KWH generated.
Purchased Power
In 2018, purchased power expense was $971 million, an increase of $108 million, or 12.5%, as compared to the prior year. The
increase was primarily due to a 5.2% increase in the average cost per KWH purchased, primarily as a result of higher natural gas
prices, and a 5.2% increase in the volume of KWHs purchased.
In 2017, purchased power expense was $863 million, an increase of $113 million, or 15.1%, as compared to the prior year. The
increase was primarily due to a 7.9% increase in the average cost per KWH purchased, primarily as a result of higher natural gas
prices, and a 5.0% increase in the volume of KWHs purchased.
Energy purchases will vary depending on demand for energy within the Southern Company system's electric service territory, the
market prices of wholesale energy as compared to the cost of the Southern Company system's generation, and the availability of the
Southern Company system's generation.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
Other operations and maintenance expenses increased $45 million, or 1.0%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year. The increase
was primarily due to a $74 million increase in transmission and distribution costs, primarily related to additional vegetation
management at Georgia Power, and $74 million in expenses from unregulated sales of products and services that were reclassified
to other operations and maintenance expenses as a result of the adoption of ASC 606. In prior periods, these expenses were
included in other income (expense), net. These increases were partially offset by a $32.5 million charge in the first quarter 2017
related to the write-down of Gulf Power's ownership of Plant Scherer Unit 3 in accordance with a rate case settlement agreement, a
$30 million net decrease in employee compensation and benefits, including pension costs, largely due to a decrease in active
medical costs at Alabama Power and a 2017 employee attrition plan at Georgia Power, and a $27 million decrease in customer
accounts, service, and sales costs primarily due to cost-saving initiatives. See Note 1 to the financial statements for additional
information regarding the adoption of ASC 606.
Other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $76 million, or 1.6%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year. The decrease
was primarily due to cost containment and modernization activities implemented at Georgia Power that contributed to decreases of
$85 million in generation maintenance costs, $46 million in transmission and distribution overhead line maintenance, $22 million
in other employee compensation and benefits, and $22 million in customer accounts, service, and sales costs. Additionally, there
was a $34 million decrease in scheduled outage and maintenance costs at generation facilities. These decreases were partially offset
by a $56 million increase associated with new facilities at Southern Power, a $37 million increase in transmission and distribution
costs primarily due to vegetation management at Alabama Power, and $32.5 million resulting from the write-down of Gulf Power's
ownership of Plant Scherer Unit 3 in accordance with a rate case settlement agreement.
Production expenses and transmission and distribution expenses fluctuate from year to year due to variations in outage and
maintenance schedules and normal changes in the cost of labor and materials.
II-23
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization increased $108 million, or 4.4%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily
related to additional plant in service. Additionally, the increase reflects $34 million in depreciation credits recognized in 2017, as
authorized in Gulf Power's 2013 rate case settlement.
Depreciation and amortization increased $224 million, or 10.0%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year. The increase reflects $203
million related to additional plant in service at the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power and a $13 million
increase in amortization related to environmental compliance at Mississippi Power. The increase was partially offset by $34 million
in depreciation credits recognized in accordance with Gulf Power's 2013 rate case settlement.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company – Regulatory Assets and Liabilities" and Note 5 to the financial
statements under "Depreciation and Amortization" for additional information.
Taxes Other Than Income Taxes
Taxes other than income taxes increased $35 million, or 3.3%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year primarily due to increased
property taxes associated with higher assessed values and an increase in municipal franchise fees primarily related to higher retail
revenues at Georgia Power.
Taxes other than income taxes increased $24 million, or 2.3%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to an increase in
property taxes due to new facilities at Southern Power.
Estimated Loss on Projects Under Construction
In the second quarter 2018, an estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion was recorded to reflect Georgia Power's revised estimate to
complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which reflects the increase in costs included in the revised base
capital cost forecast for which Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery and costs included in the revised construction contingency
estimate for which Georgia Power may seek rate recovery as and when such costs are appropriately included in the base capital cost
forecast. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
Charges associated with the Kemper IGCC of $37 million, $3.4 billion, and $428 million were recorded in 2018, 2017, and 2016,
respectively. The 2018 pre-tax charge of $37 million primarily resulted from the abandonment and related closure activities and
ongoing period costs, net of sales proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets at the Kemper County energy facility. On June
28, 2017, Mississippi Power suspended the gasifier portion of the project and recorded a charge to earnings for the remaining $2.8
billion book value of the gasifier portion of the project. Prior to the suspension, Mississippi Power recorded losses for revisions of
estimated costs expected to be incurred on construction of the Kemper IGCC in excess of the $2.88 billion cost cap established by
the Mississippi PSC, net of $245 million of grants awarded to the project by the DOE under the Clean Coal Power Initiative Round
2 and excluding the cost of the lignite mine and equipment, the cost of the CO2 pipeline facilities, AFUDC, and certain general
exceptions. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional
information.
Impairment Charges
In the second quarter 2018, Southern Power recorded a $119 million asset impairment charge in contemplation of the sale of Plant
Oleander and Plant Stanton Unit A (together, the Florida Plants) and in the third quarter 2018 recorded a $36 million asset
impairment charge on wind turbine equipment held for development projects. There were no asset impairment charges recorded in
2017 or 2016. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" and " – Development
Projects" for additional information.
Gain on Dispositions, Net
Gain on dispositions, net decreased $40 million in 2018 and increased $41 million in 2017 as compared to the prior periods
primarily due to gains on sales of assets at Georgia Power recorded in 2017.
Allowance for Equity Funds Used During Construction
AFUDC equity decreased $21 million, or 13.8%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year primarily due to Mississippi Power's
suspension of the Kemper IGCC construction in June 2017, partially offset by a higher AFUDC rate resulting from a higher equity
ratio and lower short-term borrowings at Georgia Power and a higher AFUDC base related to steam and transmission construction
projects at Alabama Power.
II-24
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
AFUDC equity decreased $48 million, or 24.0%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to Mississippi Power's
suspension of the Kemper IGCC in June 2017.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized increased $24 million, or 2.4%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year. The increase
was primarily related to Mississippi Power and reflects a $33 million net reduction in interest recorded in 2017 following a
settlement with the IRS related to research and experimental deductions and a $29 million reduction in interest capitalized related
to the Kemper IGCC suspension in June 2017. The increase also reflects an increase in outstanding borrowings and higher interest
rates at Alabama Power, partially offset by a decrease in outstanding borrowings at Georgia Power. See Note 10 to the financial
statements under "Section 174 Research and Experimental Deduction" for additional information.
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized increased $80 million, or 8.6%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to
an increase in average outstanding long-term debt, primarily at Southern Power and Georgia Power, and a $37 million decrease in
interest capitalized, primarily at Southern Power and Mississippi Power, partially offset by a net reduction of $33 million following
Mississippi Power's settlement with the IRS related to research and experimental deductions. See Note 10 to the financial
statements under "Unrecognized Tax Benefits" for additional information.
See Note 8 to the financial statements for additional information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net increased $17 million, or 13.4%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year primarily due to the settlement
of Mississippi Power's Deepwater Horizon claim in May 2018 and a gain from a joint-development wind project at Southern
Power, which is attributable to Southern Power's partner in the project and fully offset within noncontrolling interests, partially
offset by an increase in charitable donations. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "General Litigation Matters – Mississippi
Power" and Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" for additional information.
Other income (expense), net increased $58 million, or 84.1%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to a decrease in
non-service cost components of net periodic pension and other postretirement benefits costs, partially offset by increases in
charitable donations. The change also includes an increase of $159 million in currency losses arising from a translation of euro-
denominated fixed-rate notes into U.S. dollars, fully offset by an equal change in gains on the foreign currency hedges that were
reclassified from accumulated OCI into earnings at Southern Power. See Note 1 under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards"
and Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information on net periodic pension and other postretirement benefit costs.
Income Taxes
Income taxes increased $125 million, or 152.4%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to an
increase in pre-tax earnings, primarily resulting from charges recorded in 2017 related to the Kemper IGCC at Mississippi Power,
partially offset by the estimated probable loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at Georgia Power recognized in the second quarter
2018. This increase was partially offset by lower federal income tax expense, as well as benefits from the flowback of excess
deferred income taxes as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation.
Income taxes decreased $1.0 billion, or 92.5%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to $809 million in tax benefits
related to estimated losses on the Kemper IGCC at Mississippi Power and $346 million in net tax benefits resulting from the Tax
Reform Legislation.
See Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock of Subsidiaries
Dividends on preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries decreased $22 million, or 57.9%, in 2018 as compared to 2017 and
decreased $7 million, or 15.6%, in 2017 as compared to 2016. These decreases were primarily due to the 2017 redemptions of all
outstanding shares of preferred and preference stock at Georgia Power and Gulf Power. See Note 8 to the financial statements for
additional information.
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
Substantially all noncontrolling interests relate to renewable projects at Southern Power. Net income attributable to noncontrolling
interests increased $13 million, or 28.3%, in 2018, as compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to $20 million of
net income allocations due to the sale of a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar in 2018 and $14
II-25
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
million of other income allocations attributable to a joint-development wind project, partially offset by a reduction of $19 million
due to HLBV income allocations between Southern Power and tax equity partners for partnerships entered into during 2018. In
2017, noncontrolling interests increased $10 million, or 28%, compared to 2016 primarily due to additional net income allocations
from new solar partnerships.
See Note 15 under "Southern Power" for additional information.
Gas Business
Southern Company Gas distributes natural gas through utilities in four states and is involved in several other complementary
businesses including gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services.
A condensed statement of income for the gas business follows:
 AmountIncrease (Decrease)
from Prior Year
 2018 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 3,909 $ (11) $ 2,268
Cost of natural gas 1,539 (62) 988
Cost of other sales 12 (17) 19
Other operations and maintenance 981 36 424
Depreciation and amortization 500 (1) 263
Taxes other than income taxes 211 27 113
Impairment charges 42 42 —
Gain on dispositions, net (291) (291) —
Total operating expenses 2,994 (266) 1,807
Operating income 915 255 461
Earnings from equity method investments 148 42 46
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 228 28 119
Other income (expense), net 1 (43) 32
Income taxes 464 97 291
Net income $ 372 $ 129 $ 129
In the table above, the 2018 changes for Southern Company Gas reflect the year ended December 31, 2018 compared to 2017. The
Southern Company Gas Dispositions were completed by July 29, 2018 and represent the primary variance driver for the 2018
changes. Additional detailed variance explanations are provided herein. The 2017 changes reflect the 12-month period in 2017
compared to the six-month period following the Merger closing on July 1, 2016, which is the primary variance driver. Additionally,
earnings from equity method investments include Southern Company Gas' acquisition of a 50% equity interest in SNG completed
in September 2016. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information on Southern
Company Gas' investment in SNG and the Southern Company Gas Dispositions.
Seasonality of Results
During the period from November through March when natural gas usage and operating revenues are generally higher (Heating
Season), more customers are connected to Southern Company Gas' distribution systems, and natural gas usage is higher in periods
of colder weather. Occasionally in the summer, operating revenues are impacted due to peak usage by power generators in response
to summer energy demands. Southern Company Gas' base operating expenses, excluding cost of natural gas, bad debt expense, and
certain incentive compensation costs, are incurred relatively equally over any given year. Thus, operating results can vary
significantly from quarter to quarter as a result of seasonality. For 2018, the percentage of operating revenues and net income
generated during the Heating Season (January through March and November through December) were 68.7% and 96.0%,
respectively. For 2017, the percentage of operating revenues and net income generated during the Heating Season were 67.3% and
73.7%, respectively. The 2017 net income generated during the Heating Season was significantly impacted by additional tax
expense recorded in the fourth quarter resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Income Tax Matters – Federal Tax Reform Legislation" herein for additional information.
II-26
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues in 2018 were $3.9 billion, reflecting an $11 million decrease from 2017. Details of operating revenues were as
follows:
 (in millions) (% change)
Operating revenues – prior year $ 3,920
Estimated change resulting from –  
Infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes 31 0.8
Gas costs and other cost recovery 3 0.1
Weather 13 0.3
Wholesale gas services 138 3.5
Southern Company Gas Dispositions(*)(228) (5.8)
Other 32 0.8
Operating revenues – current year $ 3,909 (0.3)%
(*)Includes a $154 million decrease related to natural gas revenues, including alternative revenue programs, and a $74 million decrease related to other revenues.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Revenues from infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes increased in 2018 primarily due to a $48 million
increase at Nicor Gas, partially offset by a $12 million decrease at Atlanta Gas Light. These amounts include the natural gas
distribution utilities' continued investments recovered through infrastructure replacement programs and base rate increases less
revenue reductions for the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company
Gas" for additional information.
Revenues increased due to colder weather, as determined by Heating Degree Days, in 2018 compared to 2017.
Revenues from wholesale gas services increased in 2018 primarily due to increased commercial activity, partially offset by
derivative losses.
Other revenues increased in 2018 primarily due to a $15 million increase from the Dalton Pipeline being placed in service in
August 2017 and a $14 million increase in Nicor Gas' revenue taxes.
Natural gas distribution rates include provisions to adjust billings for fluctuations in natural gas costs. Therefore, gas costs
recovered through natural gas revenues generally equal the amount expensed in cost of natural gas and do not affect net income
from the natural gas distribution utilities.
Cost of Natural Gas
Excluding Atlanta Gas Light, which does not sell natural gas to end-use customers, the natural gas distribution utilities charge their
utility customers for natural gas consumed using natural gas cost recovery mechanisms set by the applicable state regulatory
agencies. Under these mechanisms, all prudently-incurred natural gas costs are passed through to customers without markup,
subject to regulatory review. The natural gas distribution utilities defer or accrue the difference between the actual cost of natural
gas and the amount of commodity revenue earned in a given period. The deferred or accrued amount is either billed or refunded to
customers prospectively through adjustments to the commodity rate. Deferred natural gas costs are reflected as regulatory assets
and accrued natural gas costs are reflected as regulatory liabilities. Therefore, gas costs recovered through natural gas revenues
generally equal the amount expensed in cost of natural gas and do not affect net income from the natural gas distribution utilities.
Cost of natural gas at the natural gas distribution utilities represented 83.2% of the total cost of natural gas for 2018.
Gas marketing services customers are charged for actual and estimated natural gas consumed. Cost of natural gas includes the cost
of fuel and associated transportation costs, lost and unaccounted for gas, adjustments to reduce the value of inventories to market
value, if applicable, and gains and losses associated with certain derivatives.
Cost of natural gas in 2018 was $1.5 billion, a decrease of $62 million, or 3.9%, compared to 2017, which was substantially all as a
result of the Southern Company Gas Dispositions.
II-27
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Cost of Other Sales
Cost of other sales in 2018 was $12 million, a decrease of $17 million, or 58.6%, compared to 2017 primarily related to the
disposition of Pivotal Home Solutions.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
Other operations and maintenance expenses increased $36 million, or 3.8%, in 2018 compared to the prior year. Excluding a $39
million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, other operations and maintenance expenses increased $75
million. This increase was primarily due to a $53 million increase in compensation and benefit costs, including a $12 million one-
time increase for the adoption of a new paid time off policy to align with the Southern Company system, a $28 million increase in
disposition-related costs, and an $11 million expense for a litigation settlement to facilitate the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions.
These increases were partially offset by a $27 million decrease in bad debt expense primarily at Nicor Gas, which was offset by a
decrease in revenues as a result of the related regulatory recovery mechanism. See Note 3 to the financial statements under
"General Litigation Matters – Southern Company Gas" for additional information on the litigation settlement.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization decreased $1 million, or 0.2%, in 2018 compared to the prior year. Excluding a $37 million decrease
related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, depreciation and amortization increased $36 million. The increase was
primarily due to continued infrastructure investments at the natural gas distribution utilities, partially offset by lower amortization
of intangible assets as a result of fair value adjustments in acquisition accounting at gas marketing services. See Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information on infrastructure replacement programs.
Taxes Other Than Income Taxes
Taxes other than income taxes increased $27 million, or 14.7%, in 2018 compared to the prior year. Excluding a $4 million
decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, taxes other than income taxes increased $31 million. This increase
primarily reflects a $13 million increase in revenue tax expenses as a result of higher natural gas revenues, a $12 million increase in
Nicor Gas' invested capital tax that reflects a $7 million credit in 2017 to establish a related regulatory asset, and a $4 million
increase in property taxes. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information on
the Southern Company Gas Dispositions.
Impairment Charges
A goodwill impairment charge of $42 million was recorded in 2018 in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See
Notes 1 and 15 to the financial statements under "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets and Liabilities" and "Southern Company
Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions," respectively, for additional information.
Gain on Dispositions, Net
Gain on dispositions, net was $291 million in 2018 and was associated with the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. The income
tax expense on these gains included income tax expense on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for which a deferred tax
liability had not been recorded previously.
Earnings from Equity Method Investments
Earnings from equity method investments increased $42 million, or 39.6%, in 2018 compared to the prior year. The increase was
primarily due to higher earnings from Southern Company Gas' equity method investment in SNG from new rates effective
September 2018 and lower operations and maintenance expenses due to the timing of pipeline maintenance. See Note 7 to the
financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized increased $28 million, or 14.0%, in 2018 compared to the prior year. The increase was
primarily due to $21 million of additional interest expense related to new debt issuances and a $4 million reduction in capitalized
interest primarily due to the Dalton Pipeline being placed in service in August 2017.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net decreased $43 million, or 97.7%, in 2018 compared to the prior year. Excluding a $3 million decrease
related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, other income (expense), net decreased $40 million. This decrease
II-28
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
was primarily due to a $23 million increase in charitable donations and a $13 million decrease in gains from the settlement of
contractor litigation claims. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Infrastructure Replacement
Programs and Capital Projects – PRP" for additional information on the contractor litigation settlement.
Income Taxes
Income taxes increased $97 million, or 26.4%, in 2018 compared to the prior year. Excluding a $329 million increase related to the
Southern Company Gas Dispositions, including tax expense on the goodwill for which a deferred tax liability had not been
previously provided, income taxes decreased $232 million. This decrease was primarily due to a lower federal income tax rate and
the flowback of excess deferred taxes as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. In addition, 2017 included additional tax expense
of $130 million from the revaluation of deferred tax assets associated with the Tax Reform Legislation, the enactment of the State
of Illinois income tax legislation, and new income tax apportionment factors in several states. See Note 10 to the financial
statements for additional information.
Other Business Activities
Southern Company's other business activities primarily include the parent company (which does not allocate operating expenses to
business units); PowerSecure, which was acquired on May 9, 2016 and is a provider of energy solutions, including distributed
infrastructure, energy efficiency products and services, and utility infrastructure services, to customers; Southern Company
Holdings, Inc. (Southern Holdings), which invests in various projects, including leveraged lease projects; and Southern Linc, which
provides digital wireless communications for use by Southern Company and its subsidiary companies and also markets these
services to the public and provides fiber optics services within the Southeast.
A condensed statement of income for Southern Company's other business activities follows:
 Amount Increase (Decrease)
from Prior Year
 2018  2018 2017
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 1,015 $ 444 $ 268
Cost of other sales 728 313 223
Other operations and maintenance 273 69 9
Depreciation and amortization 66 14 21
Taxes other than income taxes 6 3 —
Impairment charges 12 12 —
Total operating expenses 1,085 411 253
Operating income (loss) (70) 33 15
Interest expense 579 96 178
Other income (expense), net (23) (23) 30
Income taxes (benefit) (222) 85 (91)
Net income (loss) $ (450) $ (171) $ (42)
In the table above, the 2018 changes for these other business activities reflect the inclusion of PowerSecure for the year ended
December 31, 2018 compared to 2017. The 2017 changes reflect the inclusion of PowerSecure for the 12-month period in 2017
compared to the eight-month period following the acquisition on May 9, 2016, which is the primary variance driver. Additional
detailed variance explanations are provided herein. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Acquisition
of PowerSecure" for additional information.
Operating Revenues
Southern Company's operating revenues for these other business activities increased $444 million, or 77.8%, in 2018 as compared
to the prior year. The increase was primarily related to PowerSecure's storm restoration services in Puerto Rico.
Cost of Other Sales
Cost of other sales for these other business activities increased $313 million, or 75.4% in 2018. The increase was primarily related
to PowerSecure's storm restoration services in Puerto Rico.
II-29
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
Other operations and maintenance expenses for these other business activities increased $69 million, or 33.8%, in 2018 as
compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to PowerSecure's storm restoration services in Puerto Rico and parent
company expenses related to the sale of Gulf Power. Other operations and maintenance expenses for these other business activities
increased $9 million, or 4.6%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to a $44 million increase as a
result of the inclusion of PowerSecure results for the 12-month period in 2017 compared to eight months in 2016, partially offset by
a $35 million decrease in parent company expenses related to the Merger and the acquisition of PowerSecure.
Impairment Charges
Impairment charges for these other business activities were $12 million in 2018. These charges were associated with Southern
Linc's tower leases and were recorded in contemplation of the sale of Gulf Power.
Interest Expense
Interest expense for these other business activities increased $96 million, or 19.9%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year primarily
due to an increase in variable interest rates and average outstanding debt at the parent company. Interest expense for these other
business activities increased $178 million, or 58.4%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to an increase in average
outstanding long-term debt at the parent company. See Note 8 to the financial statements for additional information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net for these other business activities decreased $23 million in 2018 as compared to the prior year
primarily due to charitable donations, partially offset by leveraged lease income at Southern Holdings. See Note 1 to the financial
statements for additional information. Other income (expense), net for these other business activities increased $30 million in 2017
as compared to the prior year primarily due to expenses associated with bridge financing for the Merger in 2016.
Income Taxes (Benefit)
The income tax benefit for these other business activities decreased $85 million, or 27.7%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year
primarily as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, partially offset by an increase in pre-tax losses at the parent company. The
income tax benefit for these other business activities increased $91 million, or 42.1%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year
primarily as a result of pre-tax earnings (losses) and net tax benefits related to the Tax Reform Legislation. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters – Federal Tax Reform Legislation" herein and Note 10 to the financial
statements for additional information.
Effects of Inflation
The electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities are subject to rate regulation that is generally based on the
recovery of historical and projected costs. The effects of inflation can create an economic loss since the recovery of costs could be
in dollars that have less purchasing power. Southern Power is party to long-term contracts reflecting market-based rates, including
inflation expectations. Any adverse effect of inflation on Southern Company's results of operations has not been substantial in
recent years.
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
General
The traditional electric operating companies operate as vertically integrated utilities providing electric service to customers within
their service territories in the Southeast. On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of Gulf Power, one of the
traditional electric operating companies, to NextEra Energy. The natural gas distribution utilities provide service to customers in
their service territories in Illinois, Georgia, Virginia, and Tennessee. In July 2018, Southern Company Gas completed sales of three
of its natural gas distribution utilities. Prices for electricity provided and natural gas distributed to retail customers are set by state
PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies under cost-based regulatory principles. Retail rates and earnings are reviewed
and may be adjusted periodically within certain limitations. Prices for wholesale electricity sales and natural gas distribution,
interconnecting transmission lines, and the exchange of electric power are regulated by the FERC. Southern Power continues to
focus on long-term PPAs. In 2018, Southern Power completed sales of noncontrolling interests in entities indirectly owning
substantially all of its solar facilities and eight of its wind facilities and also completed sales and entered into an agreement to sell
certain of its natural gas plants. See ACCOUNTING POLICIES – "Application of Critical Accounting Policies
II-30
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
and Estimates – Utility Regulation" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements for additional information about regulatory
matters.
The results of operations for the past three years are not necessarily indicative of Southern Company's future earnings potential.
Future earnings will be impacted by the 2018 disposition activities described herein and in Note 15 to the financial statements. The
level of Southern Company's future earnings depends on numerous factors that affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of the
Southern Company system's primary businesses of selling electricity and distributing natural gas. These factors include the
traditional electric operating companies' and the natural gas distribution utilities' ability to maintain constructive regulatory
environments that allow for the timely recovery of prudently-incurred costs during a time of increasing costs, continued customer
growth, and, for the traditional electric operating companies, the weak pace of growth in electricity use per customer, especially in
residential and commercial markets. Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 construction and rate recovery and the profitability of Southern
Power's competitive wholesale business are also major factors.
Earnings in the electricity business will also depend upon maintaining and growing sales, considering, among other things, the
adoption and/or penetration rates of increasingly energy-efficient technologies, increasing volumes of electronic commerce
transactions, and more multi-family home construction, all of which could contribute to a net reduction in customer usage. Earnings
for both the electricity and natural gas businesses are subject to a variety of other factors. These factors include weather,
competition, new energy contracts with other utilities and other wholesale customers, energy conservation practiced by customers,
the use of alternative energy sources by customers, the prices of electricity and natural gas, the price elasticity of demand, and the
rate of economic growth or decline in the service territory. In addition, the level of future earnings for the wholesale electric
business also depends on numerous factors including regulatory matters, creditworthiness of customers, total electric generating
capacity available and related costs, the development or acquisition of renewable facilities and other energy projects, and the
successful remarketing of capacity as current contracts expire. Demand for electricity and natural gas is primarily driven by the
pace of economic growth that may be affected by changes in regional and global economic conditions, which may impact future
earnings. In addition, the volatility of natural gas prices has a significant impact on the natural gas distribution utilities' customer
rates, long-term competitive position against other energy sources, and the ability of Southern Company Gas' gas marketing
services and wholesale gas services businesses to capture value from locational and seasonal spreads. Additionally, changes in
commodity prices subject a significant portion of Southern Company Gas' operations to earnings variability.
As part of its ongoing effort to adapt to changing market conditions, Southern Company continues to evaluate and consider a wide
array of potential business strategies. These strategies may include business combinations, partnerships, and acquisitions involving
other utility or non-utility businesses or properties, disposition of certain assets or businesses, internal restructuring, or some
combination thereof. Furthermore, Southern Company may engage in new business ventures that arise from competitive and
regulatory changes in the utility industry. Pursuit of any of the above strategies, or any combination thereof, may significantly
affect the business operations, risks, and financial condition of Southern Company.
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy for an aggregate cash purchase price
of approximately $5.8 billion (less $1.3 billion of indebtedness assumed), subject to customary working capital adjustments. In
2018, net income attributable to Gulf Power was $160 million.
On June 4, 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the stock sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water Enterprises LLC
for a total cash purchase price of $365 million. On July 1, 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings,
completed the sales of the assets of two of its natural gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey
Industries, Inc. for a total cash purchase price of $1.7 billion. On July 29, 2018, Southern Company Gas and its wholly-owned
direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the stock sale of Pivotal Utility Holdings, which primarily consisted of Florida City
Gas, to NextEra Energy for a total cash purchase price of $587 million. The total cash purchase price for each transaction includes
final working capital and other adjustments.
The Southern Company Gas Dispositions resulted in a net loss of $51 million, which includes $342 million of tax expense. The
after-tax impacts of these dispositions included income tax expense on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for which a
deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. In addition, a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million was recorded
during 2018 in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions.
On May 22, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership indirectly owning
substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, for approximately $1.2 billion and, on December 11, 2018, sold a
noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, a holding company owning a portfolio of eight operating wind facilities, for
approximately $1.2 billion. Additionally, on November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement to sell all of its equity
interests in Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction) for an aggregate purchase price of
approximately $650 million. The completion of the disposition is subject to the expansion unit reaching commercial operation as
well as various other customary conditions to closing, including FERC and state commission approvals, and the sale is expected
II-31
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
to close mid-2019. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time. On December 4, 2018, Southern Power
sold of all of its equity interests in the Florida Plants to NextEra Energy for approximately $203 million.
See Note 15 to the financial statements for additional information regarding disposition activities.
Environmental Matters
The Southern Company system's operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and
regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. The Southern Company system maintains
comprehensive environmental compliance and GHG strategies to assess upcoming requirements and compliance costs associated
with these environmental laws and regulations. The costs, including capital expenditures, operations and maintenance costs, and
costs reflected in ARO liabilities, required to comply with environmental laws and regulations and to achieve stated goals may
impact future electric generating unit retirement and replacement decisions, results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial
condition. Related costs may result from the installation of additional environmental controls, closure and monitoring of CCR
facilities, unit retirements, or changing fuel sources for certain existing units, as well as related upgrades to the Southern Company
system's transmission and distribution (electric and natural gas) systems. A major portion of these costs is expected to be recovered
through retail and wholesale rates. The ultimate impact of environmental laws and regulations and the GHG goals discussed herein
will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements, the availability and cost of any
deployed technology, fuel prices, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges.
New or revised environmental laws and regulations could affect many areas of the traditional electric operating companies',
Southern Power's, and the natural gas distribution utilities' operations. The impact of any such changes cannot be determined at this
time. Environmental compliance costs could affect earnings if such costs cannot continue to be recovered in rates on a timely basis
for the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities or through long-term wholesale agreements
for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power. Further, increased costs that are recovered through regulated
rates could contribute to reduced demand for electricity and natural gas, which could negatively affect results of operations, cash
flows, and/or financial condition. Additionally, many commercial and industrial customers may also be affected by existing and
future environmental requirements, which for some may have the potential to ultimately affect their demand for electricity and
natural gas.
The Southern Company system's commitment to the environment has been demonstrated in many ways, including participating in
partnerships resulting in approximately $140 million of funding that has restored or enhanced more than 2 million acres of habitat
since 2003; the removal of more than 15.5 million pounds of trash and debris from waterways between 2000 and 2018 through the
Renew Our Rivers program; a 21.2% reduction in surface water withdrawal from 2015 to 2017; reductions in SO2 and NOX air
emissions of 98% and 89%, respectively, from 1990 to 2017; the reduction of mercury air emissions of over 95% from 2005 to
2017; and the Southern Company system's changing energy mix.
Through 2018, the traditional electric operating companies have invested approximately $14.2 billion in environmental capital
retrofit projects to comply with environmental requirements, with annual totals of approximately $1.3 billion, $0.9 billion, and $0.5
billion for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. Although the timing, requirements, and estimated costs could change as
environmental laws and regulations are adopted or modified, as compliance plans are revised or updated, and as legal challenges to
rules are initiated or completed, the Southern Company system's current compliance strategy estimates capital expenditures of $1.4
billion from 2019 through 2023, with annual totals of approximately $0.5 billion, $0.2 billion, $0.3 billion, $0.3 billion, and $0.2
billion for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023, respectively. These estimates do not include any potential compliance costs
associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions from fossil fuel-fired electric generating units. See "Global Climate Issues"
herein for additional information. The Southern Company system also anticipates substantial expenditures associated with ash pond
closure and ground water monitoring under the CCR Rule, which are reflected in Southern Company's ARO liabilities. See
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the
financial statements for additional information.
Environmental Laws and Regulations
Air Quality
The EPA has set National Ambient Air Quality Standards (NAAQS) for six air pollutants (carbon monoxide, lead, nitrogen dioxide,
ozone, particulate matter, and SO2) to protect and improve the nation's air quality, which it reviews and revises periodically.
Following a NAAQS revision, states are required to develop an EPA-approved plan to protect air quality. These state plans can
require additional emission controls, improvements in control efficiency, or fuel changes which can result in increased compliance
and operational costs. NAAQS requirements can also adversely affect the siting of new electric generating facilities. All areas
within the Southern Company system's electric service territory have been designated as attainment for all NAAQS
II-32
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
except for a seven-county area within metropolitan Atlanta that is not in attainment with the 2015 ozone NAAQS and the area
surrounding Plant Hammond, in Georgia, which will not be designated attainment or nonattainment for the 2010 SO2 standard until
December 2020. If areas are designated as nonattainment in the future, increased compliance costs could result. See "Regulatory
Matters – Georgia Power – Integrated Resource Plan" herein for information regarding Georgia Power's request to decertify and
retire Plant Hammond.
In 2011, the EPA finalized the Cross-State Air Pollution Rule (CSAPR) to address impacts of SO2 and NOX emissions from fossil
fuel-fired electric generating plants. CSAPR establishes emissions trading programs and budgets for certain states and allocates
emissions allowances for sources in those states. In 2016, the EPA published a final rule establishing more stringent ozone season
NOX emissions budgets in Alabama, Mississippi, and Texas. Georgia's ozone season NOX emissions budget remained unchanged.
The EPA also removed North Carolina from this particular CSAPR program. The outcome of ongoing CSAPR litigation concerning
the 2016 CSAPR rule, to which Mississippi Power is a party, could have an impact on the State of Mississippi's ozone season NOX
emissions budget. Increases in either future fossil fuel-fired generation or the availability or cost of CSAPR allowances could have
a negative financial impact on results of operations for Southern Company.
The EPA finalized regional haze regulations in 2005 and 2017. These regulations require states, tribal governments, and various
federal agencies to develop and implement plans to reduce pollutants that impair visibility and demonstrate reasonable progress
toward the goal of restoring natural visibility conditions in certain areas, including national parks and wilderness areas. States must
submit a revised state implementation plan (SIP) to the EPA demonstrating continued reasonable progress towards achieving
visibility improvement goals. These plans could require reductions in certain pollutants, such as particulate matter, SO2, and NOX,
which could result in increased compliance costs. The EPA approved the regional progress SIPs for the States of Alabama and
Georgia, but only issued a limited approval of the regional progress SIP for the State of Mississippi because Mississippi must revise
the best available retrofit technology (BART) provisions of its SIP. Therefore, Mississippi Power's Plant Daniel is the only electric
generating unit in the Southern Company system that continues to be evaluated under the regional haze BART provisions.
Mississippi Power is required to submit Plant Daniel's BART analysis to the State of Mississippi by summer 2019. Requirements
for further reduction of these pollutants at Plant Daniel could increase compliance costs.
Water Quality
In 2014, the EPA finalized requirements under Section 316(b) of the Clean Water Act (CWA) to regulate cooling water intake
structures (CWIS) to minimize their effects on fish and other aquatic life at existing power plants (e.g. coal, natural gas, oil, and
nuclear generating plants) and manufacturing facilities. The regulation requires plant-specific studies to determine applicable CWIS
changes to protect organisms that either get caught on the intake screens (impingement) or are drawn into the cooling system
(entrainment). The Southern Company system is conducting these studies and currently anticipates applicable CWIS changes may
include fish-friendly CWIS screens with fish return systems and minor additions of monitoring equipment at certain plants.
However, the ultimate impact of this rule will depend on the outcome of these plant-specific studies, any additional protective
measures required to be incorporated into each plant's National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit based on
site-specific factors, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In 2015, the EPA finalized the steam electric effluent limitations guidelines (ELG) rule (2015 ELG Rule) that set national standards
for wastewater discharges from new and existing steam electric generating units generating greater than 50 MWs. The 2015 ELG
Rule prohibits effluent discharges of certain waste streams and imposes stringent limits on flue gas desulfurization (scrubber)
wastewater discharges. The revised technology-based limits and the CCR Rule require extensive changes to existing ash and
wastewater management systems or the installation and operation of new ash and wastewater management systems. Compliance
with the 2015 ELG Rule is expected to require capital expenditures and increased operational costs primarily for the traditional
electric operating companies' coal-fired electric generation. State environmental agencies will incorporate specific compliance
applicability dates in the NPDES permitting process for each ELG waste stream no later than December 31, 2023. The EPA is
scheduled to issue a new rulemaking by December 2019 that could revise the limitations and applicability dates of two of the waste
streams regulated in the 2015 ELG Rule. The impact of any changes to the 2015 ELG Rule will depend on the content of the new
rule and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In 2015, the EPA and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers (Corps) jointly published a final rule that revised the regulatory definition
of waters of the United States (WOTUS) for all CWA programs. The rule significantly expanded the scope of federal jurisdiction
over waterbodies (such as rivers, streams, canals, and wastewater treatment ponds), which could impact new generation projects
and permitting and reporting requirements associated with the installation, expansion, and maintenance of transmission,
distribution, and pipeline projects. The EPA and the Corps are expected to publish a final rule in 2019 to replace the 2015 WOTUS
definition. The impact of any changes to the 2015 WOTUS rule will depend on the content of this final rule and the outcome of any
legal challenges.
II-33
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Coal Combustion Residuals
In 2015, the EPA finalized non-hazardous solid waste regulations for the disposal of CCR, including coal ash and gypsum, in
landfills and surface impoundments (ash ponds) at active generating power plants. In addition to the EPA's CCR Rule, the States of
Alabama and Georgia have also finalized regulations regarding the handling of CCR within their respective states. The EPA's CCR
Rule requires landfills and ash ponds to be evaluated against a set of performance criteria and potentially closed if minimum criteria
are not met. Closure of existing landfills and ash ponds could require installation of equipment and infrastructure to manage CCR
in accordance with the CCR Rule. Based on cost estimates for closure and monitoring of landfills and ash ponds pursuant to the
CCR Rule, the Southern Company system recorded AROs for each CCR unit in 2015. As further analysis was performed and
closure details were developed, the traditional electric operating companies have continued to periodically update these cost
estimates, as discussed further below.
The EPA published certain amendments to the CCR Rule, which became effective August 29, 2018. These amendments extend the
date from April 2019 to October 31, 2020 to cease sending CCR and other waste streams to ash ponds that demonstrate compliance
with all except two of the specified performance criteria.
On August 21, 2018, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit issued a decision suggesting the EPA should
regulate previously-excluded inactive ash ponds located at retired generation facilities and questioning both the ability of unlined
ash ponds to continue operating no matter the performance criteria results and the classification of clay-lined landfills and ash
ponds. These developments could impact the expected timing of the traditional electric operating companies' landfill and ash pond
closure activities, but the extent of any impact will depend on the outcome of ongoing litigation, anticipated EPA rulemaking action
to establish further guidance, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In June 2018, Alabama Power recorded an increase of approximately $1.2 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule. The revised
cost estimates were based on information from feasibility studies performed on ash ponds in use at plants operated by Alabama
Power, including at a plant jointly-owned by Mississippi Power. During the second quarter 2018, Alabama Power's management
completed its analysis of these studies which indicated that additional closure costs, primarily related to increases in estimated ash
volume, water management requirements, and design revisions, will be required to close these ash ponds under the planned closure-
in-place methodology. As the level of work becomes more defined in the next 12 months, it is likely that these cost estimates will
change and the change could be material.
In December 2018, Georgia Power recorded an increase of approximately $3.1 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule and the
related state rule. During the second half of 2018, Georgia Power completed a strategic assessment related to its plans to close the
ash ponds at all of its generating plants in compliance with the CCR Rule and the related state rule. This assessment included
engineering and constructability studies related to design assumptions for ash pond closures and advanced engineering methods.
The results indicated that additional closure costs will be required to close these ash ponds, primarily due to changes in closure
strategies, the estimated amount of ash to be excavated, and additional water management requirements necessary to support
closure strategies. These factors also impact the estimated timing of future cash outlays.
The traditional electric operating companies expect to periodically update their ARO cost estimates. Absent continued recovery of
ARO costs through regulated rates, Southern Company's results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition could be
materially impacted. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations"
herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Nuclear Decommissioning
In June 2018, Alabama Power completed an updated decommissioning cost site study for Plant Farley. The estimated cost of
decommissioning based on the study resulted in an increase in Alabama Power's ARO liability of approximately $300 million.
Amounts previously contributed to Alabama Power's external trust funds are currently projected to be adequate to meet the updated
decommissioning obligations.
In December 2018, Georgia Power completed updated decommissioning cost site studies for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1
and 2. The estimated cost of decommissioning based on the studies resulted in an increase in Georgia Power's ARO liability of
approximately $130 million. Georgia Power currently collects $4 million and $2 million annually in rates, which is used to fund
external nuclear decommissioning trusts for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2, respectively. Georgia Power expects the
Georgia PSC to review and adjust, if necessary, these amounts in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
See Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
II-34
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Environmental Remediation
The Southern Company system must comply with environmental laws and regulations governing the handling and disposal of
waste and releases of hazardous substances. Under these various laws and regulations, the Southern Company system could incur
substantial costs to clean up affected sites. The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities
conduct studies to determine the extent of any required cleanup and Southern Company has recognized the estimated costs to clean
up known impacted sites in its financial statements. Amounts for cleanup and ongoing monitoring costs were not material for any
year presented. The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities in Illinois and Georgia have all
received authority from their respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies to recover approved environmental
compliance costs through regulatory mechanisms. These regulatory mechanisms are adjusted annually or as necessary within limits
approved by the state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies. The traditional electric operating companies and Southern
Company Gas may be liable for some or all required cleanup costs for additional sites that may require environmental remediation.
See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Environmental Remediation" for additional information.
Global Climate Issues
On August 31, 2018, the EPA published a proposed rule known as the Affordable Clean Energy (ACE) Rule, which is intended to
replace a regulation enacted in 2015 known as the Clean Power Plan (CPP), that would limit CO2 emissions from existing fossil
fuel-fired electric generating units. The CPP has been stayed by the U.S. Supreme Court since 2016. The ACE Rule would require
states to develop GHG unit-specific emission rate standards based on heat-rate efficiency improvements for existing fossil fuel-
fired steam units. As proposed, combustion turbines, including natural gas combined cycles, are not affected sources. As of January
1, 2019, the Southern Company system has ownership interests in 40 fossil fuel-fired steam units to which the proposed ACE Rule
is applicable. The ultimate impact of this rule to the Southern Company system is currently unknown and will depend on changes
between the proposal and the final rule, subsequent state plan developments and requirements, and any associated legal challenges.
On December 20, 2018, the EPA published a proposed review of the Standards of Performance for Greenhouse Gas Emissions from
New, Modified, and Reconstructed Stationary Sources: Electric Utility Generating Units final rule (2015 NSPS rule). The EPA's
final 2015 NSPS rule set standards of performance for new, modified, and reconstructed electric utility generating units which
included stationary combustion turbines and fossil-fired steam boilers. This proposal reduces the stringency of the 2015 NSPS rule
by not basing the new and reconstructed fossil-fired steam boiler and IGCC standards on partial carbon capture and sequestration.
The impact of any changes to this rule will depend on the content of the final rule and the outcome of any legal challenges.
Additional domestic GHG policies may emerge in the future requiring the United States to transition to a lower GHG emitting
economy. The Southern Company system has transitioned from an electric generating mix of 70% coal and 15% natural gas in 2007
to a mix of 30% coal and 46% natural gas in 2018, along with over 8,000 MWs of renewable resources. This transition has been
supported in part by the Southern Company system retiring 4,226 MWs of coal- and oil-fired generating capacity since 2010 and
converting 3,280 MWs of generating capacity from coal to natural gas since 2015. In addition, Southern Company Gas has replaced
approximately 5,600 miles of bare steel and cast-iron pipe, resulting in removal of approximately 2.5 million metric tons of GHG
from its natural gas distribution system since 1998. Based on ownership or financial control of facilities, the Southern Company
system's 2017 GHG emissions (CO2 equivalent) were approximately 98 million metric tons, with 2018 emissions estimated at 98
million metric tons. This equates to a reduction of 36% between 2007 and 2018. The 2018 estimates include GHG emissions
attributable to each of Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, Florida City Gas, and the Florida Plants through the date of the applicable
disposition. See Note 15 to the financial statements for additional information regarding disposition activities.
In April 2018, Southern Company established an intermediate goal of a 50% reduction in carbon emissions from 2007 levels by
2030 and a long-term goal of low- to no-carbon operations by 2050. To achieve these goals, the Southern Company system expects
to continue growing its renewable energy portfolio, optimize technology advancements to modernize its transmission and
distribution systems, increase the use of natural gas for generation, complete ongoing construction projects, including Georgia
Power's interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, invest in energy efficiency, and continue research and development efforts focused
on technologies to lower GHG emissions. The Southern Company system's ability to achieve these goals also will be dependent on
many external factors, including supportive national energy policies, low natural gas prices, and the development, deployment, and
advancement of relevant energy technologies.
II-35
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
FERC Matters
Open Access Transmission Tariff
On May 10, 2018, AMEA and Cooperative Energy filed with the FERC a complaint against SCS and the traditional electric
operating companies claiming that the current 11.25% base ROE used in calculating the annual transmission revenue requirements
of the traditional electric operating companies' open access transmission tariff is unjust and unreasonable as measured by the
applicable FERC standards. The complaint requested that the base ROE be set no higher than 8.65% and that the FERC order
refunds for the difference in revenue requirements that results from applying a just and reasonable ROE established in this
proceeding upon determining the current ROE is unjust and unreasonable. On June 18, 2018, SCS and the traditional electric
operating companies filed their response challenging the adequacy of the showing presented by the complainants and offering
support for the current ROE. On September 6, 2018, the FERC issued an order establishing a refund effective date of May 10, 2018
in the event a refund is due and initiating an investigation and settlement procedures regarding the current base ROE. Through
December 31, 2018, the estimated maximum potential refund is not expected to be material to Southern Company's results of
operations or cash flows. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas' gas pipeline investments business is involved in two significant pipeline construction projects, the Atlantic
Coast Pipeline (5% ownership) and the PennEast Pipeline (20% ownership), which received FERC approval in October 2017 and
January 2018, respectively. Southern Company Gas' total capital expenditures, excluding AFUDC, at completion are expected to be
between $350 million and $390 million for the Atlantic Coast Pipeline and $276 million for the PennEast Pipeline. These projects,
along with Southern Company Gas' existing pipelines, are intended to provide diverse sources of natural gas supplies to customers,
resolve current and long-term supply planning for new capacity, enhance system reliability, and generate economic development in
the areas served.
Work continues with state and federal agencies to obtain the required permits to begin construction on the PennEast Pipeline. Any
material delays may impact forecasted capital expenditures and the expected in-service date.
The Atlantic Coast Pipeline has experienced challenges to its permits since construction began in 2018. During the third and fourth
quarters 2018, a FERC stop work order, together with delays in obtaining permits necessary for construction and construction
delays due to judicial actions, impacted the cost and schedule for the project. As a result, total project cost estimates have increased
from between $6.0 billion and $6.5 billion to between $7.0 billion and $7.8 billion, excluding financing costs. Southern Company
Gas' share of the total project costs is 5% and Southern Company Gas' investment at December 31, 2018 totaled $83 million. The
operator of the joint venture currently expects to achieve a late 2020 in-service date for at least key segments of the Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, while the remainder may extend into early 2021. Southern Company Gas has evaluated the recoverability of its
investment and determined there was no impairment as of December 31, 2018. Abnormal weather, work delays (including due to
judicial or regulatory action), and other conditions may result in additional cost or schedule modifications, which could result in an
impairment of Southern Company Gas' investment and could have a material impact on Southern Company's financial statements.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. See Notes 7 and 9 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments" and "Guarantees," respectively, for additional information on these
pipeline projects.
Regulatory Matters
Alabama Power
Alabama Power's revenues from regulated retail operations are collected through various rate mechanisms subject to the oversight
of the Alabama PSC. Alabama Power currently recovers its costs from the regulated retail business primarily through Rate RSE,
Rate CNP, Rate ECR, and Rate NDR. In addition, the Alabama PSC issues accounting orders to address current events impacting
Alabama Power. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power" for additional information regarding Alabama
Power's rate mechanisms and accounting orders.
Rate RSE
The Alabama PSC has adopted Rate RSE that provides for periodic annual adjustments based upon Alabama Power's projected
weighted common equity return (WCER) compared to an allowable range. Rate RSE adjustments are based on forward-looking
information for the applicable upcoming calendar year. Rate RSE adjustments for any two-year period, when averaged together,
cannot exceed 4.0% and any annual adjustment is limited to 5.0%. When the projected WCER is under the allowed range, there is
II-36
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
an adjusting point of 5.98% and eligibility for a performance-based adder of seven basis points, or 0.07%, to the WCER adjusting
point if Alabama Power (i) has an "A" credit rating equivalent with at least one of the recognized rating agencies or (ii) is in the top
one-third of a designated customer value benchmark survey. If Alabama Power's actual retail return is above the allowed WCER
range, the excess will be refunded to customers unless otherwise directed by the Alabama PSC; however, there is no provision for
additional customer billings should the actual retail return fall below the WCER range. Prior to January 2019, retail rates remained
unchanged when the WCER range was between 5.75% and 6.21%.
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved modifications to Rate RSE and other commitments designed to position Alabama
Power to address the growing pressure on its credit quality resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation, without increasing retail
rates under Rate RSE in the near term. Alabama Power plans to reduce growth in total debt by increasing equity, with
corresponding reductions in debt issuances, thereby de-leveraging its capital structure. Alabama Power's goal is to achieve an
equity ratio of approximately 55% by the end of 2025. At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's equity ratio was approximately
47%.
The approved modifications to Rate RSE began for billings in January 2019. The modifications include reducing the top of the
allowed WCER range from 6.21% to 6.15% and modifications to the refund mechanism applicable to prior year actual results. The
modifications to the refund mechanism allow Alabama Power to retain a portion of the revenue that causes the actual WCER for a
given year to exceed the allowed range.
Generally, if Alabama Power's actual WCER is between 6.15% and 7.65%, customers will receive 25% of the amount between
6.15% and 6.65%, 40% of the amount between 6.65% and 7.15%, and 75% of the amount between 7.15% and 7.65%. Customers
will receive all amounts in excess of an actual WCER of 7.65%.
In conjunction with these modifications to Rate RSE, on May 8, 2018, Alabama Power consented to a moratorium on any upward
adjustments under Rate RSE for 2019 and 2020 and will also return $50 million to customers through bill credits in 2019.
On November 30, 2018, Alabama Power made its required annual Rate RSE submission to the Alabama PSC of projected data for
calendar year 2019. Projected earnings were within the specified range; therefore, retail rates under Rate RSE remain unchanged
for 2019.
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's retail return exceeded the allowed WCER range, which resulted in Alabama Power
establishing a regulatory liability of $109 million for Rate RSE refunds. In accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on
February 5, 2019, Alabama Power will apply $75 million to reduce the Rate ECR under recovered balance and the remaining $34
million will be refunded to customers through bill credits in July through September 2019.
Rate CNP PPA
Alabama Power's retail rates, approved by the Alabama PSC, provide for adjustments under Rate CNP to recognize the placing of
new generating facilities into retail service. Alabama Power may also recover retail costs associated with certificated PPAs under
Rate CNP PPA. No adjustments to Rate CNP PPA occurred during the period 2016 through 2018 and no adjustment is expected in
2019.
In accordance with an accounting order issued in February 2017 by the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power reclassified $69 million of
the December 31, 2016 Rate CNP PPA under recovered balance to a separate regulatory asset. The amortization of the new
regulatory asset through Rate RSE will begin concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study,
which is expected to occur no later than 2022.
Rate CNP Compliance
Rate CNP Compliance allows for the recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with laws, regulations, and other such
mandates directed at the utility industry involving the environment, security, reliability, safety, sustainability, or similar
considerations impacting Alabama Power's facilities or operations. Rate CNP Compliance is based on forward-looking information
and provides for the recovery of these costs pursuant to a factor that is calculated annually. Compliance costs to be recovered
include operations and maintenance expenses, depreciation, and a return on certain invested capital. Revenues for Rate CNP
Compliance, as recorded on the financial statements, are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable costs and amounts billed in
current regulated rates. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor will have no significant effect on revenues or net income, but will
affect annual cash flow. Changes in Rate CNP Compliance-related operations and maintenance expenses and depreciation generally
will have no effect on net income.
In accordance with an accounting order issued in February 2017 by the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power reclassified $36 million of
its under recovered balance in Rate CNP Compliance to a separate regulatory asset. The amortization of the new regulatory asset
II-37
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
through Rate RSE will begin concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study, which is expected to
occur no later than 2022.
On November 30, 2018, Alabama Power submitted calculations associated with its cost of complying with environmental
mandates, as provided under Rate CNP Compliance. The filing reflected a projected unrecovered retail revenue requirement for
environmental compliance of approximately $205 million, which is being recovered in the billing months of January 2019 through
December 2019.
Tax Reform Accounting Order
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved an accounting order that authorized Alabama Power to defer the benefits of federal
excess deferred income taxes associated with the Tax Reform Legislation for the year ended December 31, 2018 as a regulatory
liability and to use up to $30 million of such deferrals to offset under recovered amounts under Rate ECR. The estimated deferrals
for the year ended December 31, 2018 totaled approximately $63 million, subject to adjustment following the filing of the 2018 tax
return, of which $30 million was used to offset the Rate ECR under recovered balance and $33 million is recorded in other
regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet to be used for the benefit of customers as determined by the Alabama PSC at a
future date. See Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
Environmental Accounting Order
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC (Environmental Accounting Order), Alabama Power is allowed to establish a regulatory
asset to record the unrecovered investment costs, including the unrecovered plant asset balance and the unrecovered costs
associated with site removal and closure associated with future unit retirements caused by environmental regulations. The
regulatory asset is being amortized and recovered over the affected unit's remaining useful life, as established prior to the decision
regarding early retirement through Rate CNP Compliance. At December 31, 2018, this regulatory asset had a balance of $42
million. See "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations" herein for additional information regarding
environmental regulations.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Alabama Power determined that Plant Gorgas Units 8, 9, and 10 (approximately 1,000 MWs)
will be retired by April 15, 2019 due to the expected costs of compliance with federal and state environmental regulations. In
accordance with the Environmental Accounting Order, approximately $740 million of net investment costs will be transferred to a
regulatory asset at the retirement date and recovered over the affected units' remaining useful lives, as established prior to the
decision to retire.
Georgia Power
Georgia Power's revenues from regulated retail operations are collected through various rate mechanisms subject to the oversight of
the Georgia PSC. Georgia Power currently recovers its costs from the regulated retail business through the 2013 ARP, which
includes traditional base tariff rates, Demand-Side Management (DSM) tariffs, Environmental Compliance Cost Recovery (ECCR)
tariffs, and Municipal Franchise Fee (MFF) tariffs. Georgia Power is scheduled to file a base rate case by July 1, 2019, which may
continue or modify these tariffs. In addition, financing costs on certified construction costs of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are being
collected through the NCCR tariff and fuel costs are collected through a separate fuel cost recovery tariff. See Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Georgia Power" for additional information.
Rate Plans
Pursuant to the terms and conditions of a settlement agreement related to Southern Company's acquisition of Southern Company
Gas approved by the Georgia PSC in 2016, the 2013 ARP will continue in effect until December 31, 2019, and Georgia Power will
be required to file its next base rate case by July 1, 2019. Furthermore, through December 31, 2019, Georgia Power will retain its
merger savings, net of transition costs, as defined in the settlement agreement; through December 31, 2022, such net merger
savings will be shared on a 60/40 basis with customers; thereafter, all merger savings will be retained by customers. See Note 15 to
the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" for additional information regarding the
Merger.
There were no changes to Georgia Power's traditional base tariff rates, ECCR tariff, DSM tariffs, or MFF tariff in 2017 or 2018.
Under the 2013 ARP, Georgia Power's retail ROE is set at 10.95% and earnings are evaluated against a retail ROE range of 10.00%
to 12.00%. Two-thirds of any earnings above 12.00% will be directly refunded to customers, with the remaining one-third retained
by Georgia Power. There will be no recovery of any earnings shortfall below 10.00% on an actual basis. In 2016, Georgia Power's
retail ROE exceeded 12.00%, and Georgia Power refunded to retail customers in 2018 approximately $40 million as approved by
the Georgia PSC. On February 5, 2019, the Georgia PSC approved a settlement between Georgia Power and the staff
II-38
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
of the Georgia PSC under which Georgia Power's retail ROE for 2017 was stipulated to exceed 12.00% and Georgia Power will
reduce certain regulatory assets by approximately $4 million in lieu of providing refunds to retail customers. In 2018, Georgia
Power's retail ROE exceeded 12.00%, and Georgia Power accrued approximately $100 million to refund to retail customers, subject
to review and approval by the Georgia PSC.
On April 3, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. Pursuant to the Georgia Power
Tax Reform Settlement Agreement, to reflect the federal income tax rate reduction impact of the Tax Reform Legislation, Georgia
Power will refund to customers a total of $330 million through bill credits. Georgia Power issued bill credits of approximately $130
million in 2018 and will issue bill credits of approximately $95 million in June 2019 and $105 million in February 2020. In
addition, Georgia Power is deferring as a regulatory liability (i) the revenue equivalent of the tax expense reduction resulting from
legislation lowering the Georgia state income tax rate from 6.00% to 5.75% in 2019 and (ii) the entire benefit of federal and state
excess accumulated deferred income taxes, which is expected to total approximately $700 million at December 31, 2019. At
December 31, 2018, the related regulatory liability balance totaled $610 million. The amortization of these regulatory liabilities is
expected to be addressed in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. If there is not a base rate case in 2019, customers will receive
$185 million in annual bill credits beginning in 2020, with any additional federal and state income tax savings deferred as a
regulatory liability, until Georgia Power's next base rate case.
To address some of the negative cash flow and credit quality impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation, the Georgia PSC also
approved an increase in Georgia Power's retail equity ratio to the lower of (i) Georgia Power's actual common equity weight in its
capital structure or (ii) 55%, until the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power's actual retail
common equity ratio (on a 13-month average basis) was approximately 55%. Benefits from reduced federal income tax rates in
excess of the amounts refunded to customers will be retained by Georgia Power to cover the carrying costs of the incremental
equity in 2018 and 2019.
Integrated Resource Plan
See "Environmental Matters" herein for additional information regarding proposed and final EPA rules and regulations, including
revisions to ELG for steam electric power plants and additional regulations of CCR and CO2.
In 2016, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's triennial Integrated Resource Plan (2016 IRP) including the reclassification of
the remaining net book value of Plant Mitchell Unit 3 and costs associated with materials and supplies remaining at the unit
retirement date to a regulatory asset. Recovery of the unit's net book value will continue through December 31, 2019, as provided
in the 2013 ARP. The timing of the recovery of the remaining balance of the unit's net book value as of December 31, 2019 and
costs associated with materials and supplies remaining at the unit retirement date was deferred for consideration in the Georgia
Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
In the 2016 IRP, the Georgia PSC also approved recovery of costs up to $99 million through June 30, 2019 to preserve nuclear
generation as an option at a future generation site in Stewart County, Georgia. In March 2017, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia
Power's decision to suspend work at the site due to changing economics, including lower load forecasts and fuel costs. The timing
of recovery for costs incurred of approximately $50 million is expected to be determined by the Georgia PSC in the Georgia Power
2019 Base Rate Case.
On January 31, 2019, Georgia Power filed its triennial IRP (2019 IRP). The filing includes a request to decertify and retire Plant
Hammond Units 1 through 4 (840 MWs) and Plant McIntosh Unit 1 (142.5 MWs) upon approval of the 2019 IRP.
In the 2019 IRP, Georgia Power requested approval to reclassify the remaining net book value of Plant Hammond Units 1 through 4
(approximately $520 million at December 31, 2018) upon retirement to a regulatory asset to be amortized ratably over a period
equal to the applicable unit's remaining useful life through 2035. For Plant McIntosh Unit 1, Georgia Power requested approval to
reclassify the remaining net book value (approximately $40 million at December 31, 2018) upon retirement to a regulatory asset to
be amortized over a three-year period to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Georgia Power also requested
approval to reclassify any unusable material and supplies inventory balances remaining at the applicable unit's retirement date to a
regulatory asset for recovery over a period to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
The 2019 IRP also includes a request to certify approximately 25 MWs of capacity at Plant Scherer Unit 3 for the retail jurisdiction
beginning January 1, 2020, following the expiration of a wholesale PPA.
The 2019 IRP also includes details regarding ARO costs associated with ash pond and landfill closures and post-closure care.
Georgia Power requested the timing and rate of recovery of these costs be determined by the Georgia PSC in the Georgia Power
2019 Base Rate Case. See "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" and
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the
financial statements for additional information regarding Georgia Power's AROs.
II-39
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Georgia Power also requested approval to issue two capacity-based requests for proposals (RFP). If approved, the first capacity-
based RFP will seek resources that can provide capacity beginning in 2022 or 2023 and the second capacity-based RFP will seek
resources that can provide capacity beginning in 2026, 2027, or 2028. Additionally, the 2019 IRP includes a request to procure an
additional 1,000 MWs of renewable resources through a competitive bidding process. Georgia Power also proposed to invest in a
portfolio of up to 50 MWs of battery energy storage technologies.
A decision from the Georgia PSC on the 2019 IRP is expected in mid-2019.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Storm Damage Recovery
Georgia Power is accruing $30 million annually through December 31, 2019, as provided in the 2013 ARP, for incremental
operations and maintenance costs of damage from major storms to its transmission and distribution facilities. At December 31,
2018, the total balance in the regulatory asset related to storm damage was $416 million. During October 2018, Hurricane Michael
caused significant damage to Georgia Power's transmission and distribution facilities. The incremental restoration costs related to
this hurricane deferred in the regulatory asset for storm damage totaled approximately $115 million. Hurricanes Irma and Matthew
also caused significant damage to Georgia Power's transmission and distribution facilities during September 2017 and October
2016, respectively. The incremental restoration costs related to Hurricanes Irma and Matthew deferred in Georgia Power's
regulatory asset for storm damage totaled approximately $250 million. The rate of storm damage cost recovery is expected to be
adjusted as part of the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case and further adjusted in future regulatory proceedings as necessary. The
ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power –
Storm Damage Recovery" for additional information regarding Georgia Power's storm damage reserve.
Mississippi Power
Mississippi Power's retail base rates generally are set under the PEP, a rate plan approved by the Mississippi PSC. Two filings are
made for each calendar year: the PEP projected filing, which is typically filed prior to the beginning of the year based on a
projected revenue requirement, and the PEP lookback filing, which is filed after the end of the year and allows for review of the
actual revenue requirement compared to the projected filing.
On February 7, 2018, Mississippi Power revised its annual projected PEP filing for 2018 to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform
Legislation. The revised filing requested an increase of $26 million in annual revenues, based on a performance adjusted ROE of
9.33% and an increased equity ratio of 55%. On July 27, 2018, Mississippi Power and the MPUS entered into a settlement
agreement with respect to the 2018 PEP filing and all unresolved PEP filings for prior years (PEP Settlement Agreement), which
was approved by the Mississippi PSC on August 7, 2018. Rates under the PEP Settlement Agreement became effective with the
first billing cycle of September 2018. The PEP Settlement Agreement provides for an increase of approximately $21.6 million in
annual base retail revenues, which excludes certain compensation costs contested by the MPUS, as well as approximately $2
million which was subsequently approved for recovery through Mississippi Power's 2018 Energy Efficiency Cost Rider.
Pursuant to the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power's performance-adjusted allowed ROE is 9.31% and its allowed
equity ratio is capped at 51%, pending further review by the Mississippi PSC. In lieu of the requested equity ratio increase,
Mississippi Power retained $44 million of excess accumulated deferred income taxes resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation
until the conclusion of Mississippi Power's next base rate case, which is scheduled to be filed in the fourth quarter 2019
(Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case). Further, Mississippi Power agreed to seek equity contributions sufficient to restore its
equity ratio to 50% by December 31, 2018.
Pursuant to the PEP Settlement Agreement, PEP proceedings are suspended until after the conclusion of the Mississippi Power
2019 Base Rate Case and Mississippi Power is not required to make any PEP filings for regulatory years 2018, 2019, and 2020. The
PEP Settlement Agreement also resolved all open PEP filings with no change to customer rates.
Kemper County Energy Facility
In 2018, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax charges to income of $37 million ($27 million after tax), primarily resulting from the
abandonment and related closure activities and ongoing period costs, net of sales proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets
at the Kemper County energy facility. In addition, Mississippi Power recorded a credit to earnings of $95 million in the fourth
quarter 2018 primarily resulting from the reduction of a valuation allowance for a state income tax net operating loss (NOL)
carryforward associated with the Kemper County energy facility. Additional closure costs for the mine and gasifier-related assets,
currently estimated at up to $10 million pre-tax (excluding salvage, net of dismantlement costs), may be incurred through the first
half of 2020. In addition, period costs, including, but not limited to, costs for compliance and safety, ARO accretion, and property
taxes for the mine and gasifier-related assets, are estimated to total $11 million in 2019 and $2 million to $4 million annually in
II-40
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
2020 through 2023. Mississippi Power is currently evaluating its options regarding the final disposition of the CO2 pipeline,
including removal of the pipeline. This evaluation is expected to be complete later in 2019. If Mississippi Power ultimately decides
to remove the CO2 pipeline, the cost of removal could have a material impact on Southern Company's financial statements. The
ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
The combined cycle and associated common facilities portions of the Kemper County energy facility were dedicated as Plant
Ratcliffe on April 27, 2018.
For additional information on the Kemper County energy facility, see Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power –
Kemper County Energy Facility."
Reserve Margin Plan
On August 6, 2018, Mississippi Power filed its proposed Reserve Margin Plan (RMP), as required by the Mississippi PSC's order in
the docket established for the purposes of pursuing a global settlement of the costs related to the Kemper County energy facility.
Under the RMP, Mississippi Power proposed alternatives that would reduce its reserve margin, with the most economic of the
alternatives being the two-year and seven-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Watson Units 4 and 5, respectively, to the first
quarter 2022 and the four-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Greene County Units 1 and 2 to the third quarter 2021 and the
third quarter 2022, respectively, in order to lower or avoid operating costs. The Plant Greene County unit retirements would require
the completion by Alabama Power of proposed transmission and system reliability improvements, as well as agreement by Alabama
Power. The RMP filing also states that, in the event the Mississippi PSC ultimately approves an alternative that includes an
accelerated retirement, Mississippi Power would require authorization to defer in a regulatory asset for future recovery the
remaining net book value of the units at the time of retirement. A decision by the Mississippi PSC that does not include recovery of
the remaining book value of any generating units retired could have a material impact on Southern Company's financial
statements. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Government Grants
In 2010, the DOE, through a cooperative agreement with SCS, agreed to fund $270 million of the Kemper County energy facility
through the grants awarded to the project by the DOE under the Clean Coal Power Initiative Round 2. Through December 31, 2018,
Mississippi Power received total DOE grants of $387 million, of which $382 million reduced the construction costs of the Kemper
County energy facility and $5 million reimbursed Mississippi Power for expenses associated with DOE reporting. On December
12, 2018, Mississippi Power filed with the DOE its request for property closeout certification under the contract related to the
grants received. Mississippi Power and the DOE are currently in discussions regarding the requested closeout and property
disposition, which may require payment to the DOE for a portion of certain property that is to be retained by Mississippi Power.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time; however, it could have a significant impact on Southern
Company's financial statements.
Southern Company Gas
The natural gas distribution utilities are subject to regulation and oversight by their respective state regulatory agencies for the rates
charged to their customers and other matters.
The natural gas market for Atlanta Gas Light was deregulated in 1997. Accordingly, Marketers, rather than a traditional utility, sell
natural gas to end-use customers in Georgia and handle customer billing functions. Atlanta Gas Light earns revenue for its
distribution services by charging rates to its customers based primarily on monthly fixed charges that are set by the Georgia PSC
and adjusted periodically.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the natural gas distribution utilities are authorized by the relevant regulatory agencies in
the states in which they serve to use natural gas cost recovery mechanisms that adjust rates to reflect changes in the wholesale cost
of natural gas and ensure recovery of all costs prudently incurred in purchasing natural gas for customers. Natural gas cost recovery
revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable natural gas costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. Changes
in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on revenues or net income, but will affect cash flows. In addition to natural gas
cost recovery mechanisms, there are other cost recovery mechanisms, such as regulatory riders, which vary by utility but allow
recovery of certain costs, such as those related to infrastructure replacement programs, as well as environmental remediation and
energy efficiency plans. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Cost of Natural Gas" for additional information.
II-41
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital Projects
In addition to capital expenditures recovered through base rates by each of the natural gas distribution utilities, Nicor Gas and
Virginia Natural Gas have separate rate riders that provide timely recovery of capital expenditures for specific infrastructure
replacement programs. These infrastructure replacement programs and capital projects are risk-based and designed to update and
replace cast iron, bare steel, and mid-vintage plastic materials or expand the natural gas distribution systems to improve reliability
and meet operational flexibility and growth. The total expected investment under the infrastructure replacement programs for 2019
is $408 million. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Infrastructure Replacement Programs and
Capital Projects" for additional information.
Rate Proceedings
On February 23, 2018, Atlanta Gas Light revised its annual base rate filing to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation and
requested a $16 million rate reduction in 2018. On May 15, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation for Atlanta Gas Light's
annual base rates to remain at the 2017 level for 2018 and 2019, with customer credits of $8 million in each of July 2018 and
October 2018 to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. The Georgia PSC maintained Atlanta Gas Light's previously
authorized earnings band based on a ROE between 10.55% and 10.95% and increased the allowed equity ratio by 4% to an equity
ratio of 55% to address the negative cash flow and credit metric impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. Additionally, Atlanta Gas
Light is required to file a traditional base rate case on or before June 1, 2019 for rates effective January 1, 2020.
On January 31, 2018, the Illinois Commission approved a $137 million increase in Nicor Gas' annual base rate revenues, including
$93 million related to the recovery of investments under Nicor Gas' infrastructure program, effective February 8, 2018, based on a
ROE of 9.8%.
On May 2, 2018, the Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' rehearing request for revised base rates to incorporate the reduction
in the federal income tax rate as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. The resulting decrease of approximately $44 million in
annual base rate revenues became effective May 5, 2018. Nicor Gas' previously-authorized capital structure and ROE of 9.80%
were not addressed in the rehearing and remain unchanged. On November 9, 2018, Nicor Gas filed a general base rate case with the
Illinois Commission requesting a $230 million increase in annual base rate revenues. The requested increase is based on a projected
test year for the 12-month period ending September 30, 2020, a ROE of 10.6%, and an increase in the equity ratio from 52.0% to
54.0% to address the negative cash flow and credit metric impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. The Illinois Commission is
expected to rule on the requested increase within the 11-month statutory time limit, after which rate adjustments will be effective.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Fuel Cost Recovery
The traditional electric operating companies each have established fuel cost recovery rates approved by their respective state PSCs.
Fuel cost recovery revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel costs and amounts billed in current regulated
rates. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on Southern Company's revenues or net income,
but will affect cash flow. The traditional electric operating companies continuously monitor their under or over recovered fuel cost
balances and make appropriate filings with their state PSCs to adjust fuel cost recovery rates as necessary.
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Revenues" and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate
ECR," "Georgia Power – Fuel Cost Recovery," and "Mississippi Power – Fuel Cost Recovery" for additional information.
Construction Program
Overview
The subsidiary companies of Southern Company are engaged in continuous construction programs to accommodate existing and
estimated future loads on their respective systems. The Southern Company system intends to continue its strategy of developing
and constructing new electric generating facilities, adding environmental modifications to certain existing units, expanding and
improving the electric transmission and distribution systems, and updating and expanding the natural gas distribution systems. For
the traditional electric operating companies, major generation construction projects are subject to state PSC approval in order to be
included in retail rates. While Southern Power generally constructs and acquires generation assets covered by long-term PPAs, any
uncontracted capacity could negatively affect future earnings. Southern Company Gas is engaged in various infrastructure
improvement programs designed to update or expand the natural gas distribution systems of the natural gas distribution utilities to
improve reliability and meet operational flexibility and growth. The natural gas distribution utilities recover their investment and a
return associated with these infrastructure programs through their regulated rates. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Power" for additional information about costs relating to Southern Power's acquisitions that involve construction of
renewable energy facilities and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Infrastructure Replacement
II-42
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Programs and Capital Projects" for additional information regarding infrastructure improvement programs at the natural gas
distribution utilities.
The Southern Company system's construction program is currently estimated to total approximately $8.0 billion, $7.7 billion, $6.7
billion, $6.3 billion, and $6.0 billion for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023, respectively. The largest construction project currently
underway in the Southern Company system is Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (45.7% ownership interest by Georgia Power in the two
units, each with approximately 1,100 MWs). See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and
Contractual Obligations" herein for additional information regarding Southern Company's capital requirements for its subsidiaries'
construction programs.
Nuclear Construction
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In 2012, the NRC issued the related combined construction and operating licenses, which allowed full
construction of the two AP1000 nuclear units (with electric generating capacity of approximately 1,100 MWs each) and related
facilities to begin. Until March 2017, construction on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 continued under the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement,
which was a substantially fixed price agreement. In March 2017, the EPC Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter
11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.
In connection with the EPC Contractor's bankruptcy filing, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the Vogtle Owners,
entered into the Interim Assessment Agreement with the EPC Contractor to allow construction to continue. The Interim Assessment
Agreement expired in July 2017 when Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, and the EPC
Contractor entered into the Vogtle Services Agreement. Under the Vogtle Services Agreement, Westinghouse provides facility
design and engineering services, procurement and technical support, and staff augmentation on a time and materials cost basis. The
Vogtle Services Agreement provides that it will continue until the start-up and testing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are complete
and electricity is generated and sold from both units. The Vogtle Services Agreement is terminable by the Vogtle Owners upon 30
days' written notice.
In October 2017, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, executed the Bechtel Agreement, a cost
reimbursable plus fee arrangement, whereby Bechtel is reimbursed for actual costs plus a base fee and an at-risk fee, which is
subject to adjustment based on Bechtel's performance against cost and schedule targets. Each Vogtle Owner is severally (not
jointly) liable for its proportionate share, based on its ownership interest, of all amounts owed to Bechtel under the Bechtel
Agreement. The Vogtle Owners may terminate the Bechtel Agreement at any time for their convenience, provided that the Vogtle
Owners will be required to pay amounts related to work performed prior to the termination (including the applicable portion of the
base fee), certain termination-related costs, and, at certain stages of the work, the applicable portion of the at-risk fee. Bechtel may
terminate the Bechtel Agreement under certain circumstances, including certain Vogtle Owner suspensions of work, certain
breaches of the Bechtel Agreement by the Vogtle Owners, Vogtle Owner insolvency, and certain other events. Pursuant to the Loan
Guarantee Agreement between Georgia Power and the DOE, Georgia Power is required to obtain the DOE's approval of the Bechtel
Agreement prior to obtaining any further advances under the Loan Guarantee Agreement.
Cost and Schedule
Georgia Power's approximate proportionate share of the remaining estimated capital cost to complete Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 by
the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, is as follows:
 (in billions)
Base project capital cost forecast(a)(b)$ 8.0
Construction contingency estimate 0.4
Total project capital cost forecast(a)(b)8.4
Net investment as of December 31, 2018(b)(4.6)
Remaining estimate to complete(a)$ 3.8
(a)Excludes financing costs expected to be capitalized through AFUDC of approximately $315 million.
(b)Net of $1.7 billion received from Toshiba under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds.
Georgia Power estimates that its financing costs for construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will total approximately $3.1 billion,
of which $1.9 billion had been incurred through December 31, 2018.
As construction continues, challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, and vendors; labor productivity, availability,
and/or cost escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, and/or installation and testing, including any
II-43
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
required engineering changes, of plant systems, structures, and components (some of which are based on new technology that only
recently began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale); or other issues could arise and change the projected
schedule and estimated cost. Monthly construction production targets required to maintain the current project schedule will
continue to increase significantly throughout 2019. To meet these increasing monthly targets, existing craft construction
productivity must improve and additional craft laborers must be retained and deployed.
Georgia Power and Southern Nuclear believe it is a leading practice in connection with a construction project of this size and
complexity to periodically validate recent construction progress in comparison to the projected schedule and to verify and update
quantities of commodities remaining to install, labor productivity, and forecasted staffing needs. This verification process, led by
Southern Nuclear, was underway as of December 31, 2018 and is expected to be completed during the second quarter 2019.
Georgia Power currently does not anticipate any material changes to the total estimated project capital cost forecast for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 or the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, resulting from this verification
process. However, the ultimate impact on cost and schedule, if any, will not be known until the verification process is completed.
Georgia Power is required to report the results and any project impacts to the Georgia PSC by May 15, 2019.
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC, may
arise, which may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. If any license amendment requests or other
licensing-based compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result
in increased costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, any extension of the project schedule is
currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50 million per month, based on Georgia Power's
ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While Georgia Power is not precluded from seeking
recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately determine whether or not to seek recovery. Any
further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable through regulated rates will be required to be
charged to income and such charges could be material.
Joint Owner Contracts
In November 2017, the Vogtle Owners entered into an amendment to their joint ownership agreements for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 to provide for, among other conditions, additional Vogtle Owner approval requirements. Effective August 31, 2018, the Vogtle
Owners further amended the joint ownership agreements to clarify and provide procedures for certain provisions of the joint
ownership agreements related to adverse events that require the vote of the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to continue construction (as amended, and together with the November 2017 amendment, the Vogtle
Joint Ownership Agreements). The Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements also confirm that the Vogtle Owners' sole recourse against
Georgia Power or Southern Nuclear for any action or inaction in connection with their performance as agent for the Vogtle Owners
is limited to removal of Georgia Power and/or Southern Nuclear as agent, except in cases of willful misconduct.
As a result of the increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs as described below, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4 were required to vote to continue construction. On September 26, 2018, the Vogtle Owners unanimously voted to continue
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
In connection with the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into (i) the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet with the other
Vogtle Owners and MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG SPVJ, MEAG Power SPVM, LLC (MEAG SPVM), and MEAG
Power SPVP, LLC (MEAG SPVP) to take certain actions which partially mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle
Owners, including additional amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements and the purchase of PTCs from the other
Vogtle Owners, and (ii) the MEAG Term Sheet with MEAG and MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with respect to MEAG SPVJ's
ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (Project J) under certain circumstances. On January 14, 2019, Georgia Power,
MEAG, and MEAG SPVJ entered into an agreement to implement the provisions of the MEAG Term Sheet (MEAG Funding
Agreement). On February 18, 2019, Georgia Power, the other Vogtle Owners, and MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG
SPVJ, MEAG SPVM, and MEAG SPVP entered into certain amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements to implement
the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet (Global Amendments).
II-44
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
were modified as follows: (i) each Vogtle Owner must pay its proportionate share of qualifying construction costs for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 based on its ownership percentage up to the estimated cost at completion (EAC) for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 which
formed the basis of Georgia Power's forecast of $8.4 billion in the nineteenth VCM plus $800 million; (ii) Georgia Power will be
responsible for 55.7% of actual qualifying construction costs between $800 million and $1.6 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth
VCM (resulting in $80 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners responsible for
44.3% of such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests; and (iii) Georgia Power will be responsible for
65.7% of qualifying construction costs between $1.6 billion and $2.1 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth VCM (resulting in a
further $100 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners responsible for 34.3% of
such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
If the EAC is revised and exceeds the EAC in the nineteenth VCM by more than $2.1 billion, each of the other Vogtle Owners will
have a one-time option at the time the project budget forecast is so revised to tender a portion of its ownership interest to Georgia
Power in exchange for Georgia Power's agreement to pay 100% of such Vogtle Owner's remaining share of total construction costs
in excess of the EAC in the nineteenth VCM plus $2.1 billion. In this event, Georgia Power will have the option of cancelling the
project in lieu of purchasing a portion of the ownership interest of any other Vogtle Owner. If Georgia Power accepts the offer to
purchase a portion of another Vogtle Owner's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, the ownership interest(s) to be
conveyed from the tendering Vogtle Owner(s) to Georgia Power will be calculated based on the proportion of the cumulative
amount of construction costs paid by each such tendering Vogtle Owner(s) and by Georgia Power as of the COD of Plant Vogtle
Unit 4. For purposes of this calculation, payments made by Georgia Power on behalf of another Vogtle Owner in accordance with
the second and third items described in the paragraph above will be treated as payments made by the applicable Vogtle Owner.
In the event the actual costs of construction at completion of a Unit are less than the EAC reflected in the nineteenth VCM report
and such Unit is placed in service in accordance with the schedule projected in the nineteenth VCM report (i.e., Plant Vogtle Unit 3
is placed in service by November 2021 or Plant Vogtle Unit 4 is placed in service by November 2022), Georgia Power will be
entitled to 60.7% of the cost savings with respect to the relevant Unit and the remaining Vogtle Owners will be entitled to 39.3% of
such savings on a pro rata basis in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
For purposes of the foregoing provisions, qualifying construction costs will not include costs (i) resulting from force majeure
events, including governmental actions or inactions (or significant delays associated with issuance of such actions) that affect the
licensing, completion, start-up, operations, or financing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, administrative proceedings or litigation
regarding ITAAC or other regulatory challenges to commencement of operation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, and changes in laws
or regulations governing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, (ii) legal fees and legal expenses incurred due to litigation with contractors or
subcontractors that are not subsidiaries or affiliates of Southern Company, and (iii) additional costs caused by requests from the
Vogtle Owners other than Georgia Power, except for the exercise of a right to vote granted under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements, that increase costs by $100,000 or more.
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the provisions of the Vogtle Joint
Ownership Agreements requiring that Vogtle Owners holding 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 vote to
continue construction following certain adverse events (Project Adverse Events) were modified. Pursuant to the Global
Amendments, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 must vote to continue
construction if certain Project Adverse Events occur, including: (i) the bankruptcy of Toshiba; (ii) the termination or rejection in
bankruptcy of certain agreements, including the Vogtle Services Agreement, the Bechtel Agreement, or the agency agreement with
Southern Nuclear; (iii) Georgia Power publicly announces its intention not to submit for rate recovery any portion of its investment
in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 or the Georgia PSC determines that any of Georgia Power's costs relating to the construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will not be recovered in retail rates, excluding any additional amounts paid by Georgia Power on behalf of the
other Vogtle Owners pursuant to the Global Amendments described above and the first 6% of costs during any six-month VCM
reporting period that are disallowed by the Georgia PSC for recovery, or for which Georgia Power elects not to seek cost recovery,
through retail rates; and (iv) an incremental extension of one year or more over the most recently approved schedule. Under the
Global Amendments, Georgia Power may cancel the project at any time in its sole discretion.
In addition, pursuant to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements, the required approval of holders of ownership interests in Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is at least (i) 90% for a change of the primary construction contractor and (ii) 67% for material amendments to
the Vogtle Services Agreement or agreements with Southern Nuclear or the primary construction contractor, including the Bechtel
Agreement.
The Global Amendments provide that if the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests fail to vote in favor of continuing the
project following any future Project Adverse Event, work on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will continue for a period of 30 days if
II-45
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
the holders of more than 50% of the ownership interests vote in favor of continuing construction (Majority Voting Owners). In such
a case, the Vogtle Owners (i) have agreed to negotiate in good faith towards the resumption of the project, (ii) if no agreement is
reached during such 30-day period, the project will be cancelled, and (iii) in the event of such a cancellation, the Majority Voting
Owners will be obligated to reimburse any other Vogtle Owner for the incremental costs it incurred during such 30-day negotiation
period.
Purchase of PTCs During Commercial Operation
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, Georgia Power has agreed to purchase
additional PTCs from OPC, Dalton, MEAG SPVM, MEAG SPVP, and MEAG SPVJ (to the extent any MEAG SPVJ PTC rights
remain after any purchases required under the MEAG Funding Agreement as described below) at varying purchase prices
dependent upon the actual cost to complete construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 as compared to the EAC reflected in the
nineteenth VCM report. The purchases are at the option of the applicable Vogtle Owner.
Potential Funding to MEAG Project J
Pursuant to the MEAG Funding Agreement, and consistent with the MEAG Term Sheet, if MEAG SPVJ is unable to make its
payments due under the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements solely as a result of the occurrence of one of the following situations
that materially impedes access to capital markets for MEAG for Project J: (i) the conduct of JEA or the City of Jacksonville, such
as JEA's legal challenges of its obligations under a PPA with MEAG (PPA-J), or (ii) PPA-J is declared void by a court of competent
jurisdiction or rejected by JEA under the applicable provisions of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code (each of (i) and (ii), a JEA Default), at
MEAG's request, Georgia Power will purchase from MEAG SPVJ the rights to PTCs attributable to MEAG SPVJ's share of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (approximately 206 MWs) within 30 days of such request at varying prices dependent upon the stage of
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. The aggregate purchase price of the PTCs, together with any advances made as
described in the next paragraph, shall not exceed $300 million.
At the option of MEAG, as an alternative or supplement to Georgia Power's purchase of PTCs as described above, Georgia Power
has agreed to provide up to $250 million in funding to MEAG for Project J in the form of advances (either advances under the
Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements or the purchase of MEAG Project J bonds, at the discretion of Georgia Power), subject to any
required approvals of the Georgia PSC and the DOE.
In the event MEAG SPVJ certifies to Georgia Power that it is unable to fund its obligations under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements as a result of a JEA Default and Georgia Power becomes obligated to provide funding as described above, MEAG is
required to (i) assign to Georgia Power its right to vote on any future Project Adverse Event and (ii) diligently pursue JEA for its
breach of PPA-J. In addition, Georgia Power agreed that it will not sue MEAG for any amounts due from MEAG SPVJ under
MEAG's guarantee of MEAG SPVJ's obligations so long as MEAG SPVJ complies with the terms of the MEAG Funding
Agreement as to its payment obligations and the other non-payment provisions of the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements.
Under the terms of the MEAG Funding Agreement, Georgia Power may cancel the project in lieu of providing funding in the form
of advances or PTC purchases.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Regulatory Matters
In 2009, the Georgia PSC voted to certify construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 with a certified capital cost of $4.418 billion.
In addition, in 2009 the Georgia PSC approved inclusion of the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 related CWIP accounts in rate base, and
the State of Georgia enacted the Georgia Nuclear Energy Financing Act, which allows Georgia Power to recover financing costs for
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Financing costs are recovered on all applicable certified costs through annual adjustments to the NCCR
tariff up to the certified capital cost of $4.418 billion. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had recovered approximately $1.9
billion of financing costs. Financing costs related to capital costs above $4.418 billion will be recovered through AFUDC; however,
Georgia Power will not record AFUDC related to any capital costs in excess of the total deemed reasonable by the Georgia PSC
(currently $7.3 billion) and not requested for rate recovery. On December 18, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's
request to increase the NCCR tariff by $88 million annually, effective January 1, 2019.
Georgia Power is required to file semi-annual VCM reports with the Georgia PSC by February 28 and August 31 of each year. In
2013, in connection with the eighth VCM report, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation between Georgia Power and the staff of
the Georgia PSC to waive the requirement to amend the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 certificate in accordance with the 2009
certification order until the completion of Plant Vogtle Unit 3, or earlier if deemed appropriate by the Georgia PSC and Georgia
Power.
II-46
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
In 2016, the Georgia PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement (Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement) resolving certain prudency
matters in connection with the fifteenth VCM report. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC voted to approve (and issued its related
order on January 11, 2018) Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM report, which included a recommendation to continue construction
with Southern Nuclear as project manager and Bechtel serving as the primary construction contractor, and modified the Vogtle Cost
Settlement Agreement. The Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, as modified by the January 11, 2018 order, resolved the following
regulatory matters related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4: (i) none of the $3.3 billion of costs incurred through December 31, 2015
and reflected in the fourteenth VCM report should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of imprudence; (ii) the Contractor
Settlement Agreement was reasonable and prudent and none of the amounts paid pursuant to the Contractor Settlement Agreement
should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of imprudence; (iii) (a) capital costs incurred up to $5.68 billion would be
presumed to be reasonable and prudent with the burden of proof on any party challenging such costs, (b) Georgia Power would
have the burden to show that any capital costs above $5.68 billion were prudent, and (c) a revised capital cost forecast of $7.3
billion (after reflecting the impact of payments received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and related Customer Refunds)
was found reasonable; (iv) construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 should be completed, with Southern Nuclear serving as
project manager and Bechtel as primary contractor; (v) approved and deemed reasonable Georgia Power's revised schedule placing
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in service in November 2021 and November 2022, respectively; (vi) confirmed that the revised cost
forecast does not represent a cost cap and that prudence decisions on cost recovery will be made at a later date, consistent with
applicable Georgia law; (vii) reduced the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff (a) from 10.95% (the ROE rate setting point
authorized by the Georgia PSC in the 2013 ARP) to 10.00% effective January 1, 2016, (b) from 10.00% to 8.30%, effective January
1, 2020, and (c) from 8.30% to 5.30%, effective January 1, 2021 (provided that the ROE in no case will be less than Georgia
Power's average cost of long-term debt); (viii) reduced the ROE used for AFUDC equity for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 from
10.00% to Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt, effective January 1, 2018; and (ix) agreed that upon Unit 3 reaching
commercial operation, retail base rates would be adjusted to include carrying costs on those capital costs deemed prudent in the
Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement. The January 11, 2018 order also stated that if Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are not commercially
operational by June 1, 2021 and June 1, 2022, respectively, the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff will be further reduced by 10
basis points each month (but not lower than Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt) until the respective Unit is
commercially operational. The ROE reductions negatively impacted earnings by approximately $100 million, $25 million, and $20
million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively, and are estimated to have negative earnings impacts of approximately $75 million in
2019 and an aggregate of approximately $615 million from 2020 to 2022.
In its January 11, 2018 order, the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon which Georgia Power's
seventeenth VCM report are based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the decision to continue
construction.
On February 12, 2018, Georgia Interfaith Power & Light, Inc. (GIPL) and Partnership for Southern Equity, Inc. (PSE) filed a
petition appealing the Georgia PSC's January 11, 2018 order with the Fulton County Superior Court. On March 8, 2018, Georgia
Watch filed a similar appeal to the Fulton County Superior Court for judicial review of the Georgia PSC's decision and denial of
Georgia Watch's motion for reconsideration. On December 21, 2018, the Fulton County Superior Court granted Georgia Power's
motion to dismiss the two appeals. On January 9, 2019, GIPL, PSE, and Georgia Watch filed an appeal of this decision with the
Georgia Court of Appeals. Georgia Power believes the appeal has no merit; however, an adverse outcome in the appeal combined
with subsequent adverse action by the Georgia PSC could have a material impact on Southern Company's results of operations,
financial condition, and liquidity.
In preparation for its nineteenth VCM filing, Georgia Power requested Southern Nuclear to perform a full cost reforecast for the
project. This reforecast, performed prior to the nineteenth VCM filing, resulted in a $0.7 billion increase to the base capital cost
forecast reported in the second quarter 2018. This base cost increase primarily resulted from changed assumptions related to the
finalization of contract scopes and management responsibilities for Bechtel and over 60 subcontractors, labor productivity rates,
and craft labor incentives, as well as the related levels of project management, oversight, and support, including field supervision
and engineering support.
Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the Georgia
PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is not subject
to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for these cost increases included in the current base capital cost forecast (or
any related financing costs) in the nineteenth VCM report. In connection with future VCM filings, Georgia Power may request the
Georgia PSC to evaluate costs currently included in the construction contingency estimate for rate recovery as and when they are
appropriately included in the base capital cost forecast. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that exists regarding
the future recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of these matters is
subject to the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future regulatory
proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after
II-47
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
tax) in the second quarter 2018, which includes the total increase in the base capital cost forecast and construction contingency
estimate.
On August 31, 2018, Georgia Power filed its nineteenth VCM report with the Georgia PSC, which requested approval of $578
million of construction capital costs incurred from January 1, 2018 through June 30, 2018. On February 19, 2019, the Georgia PSC
approved the nineteenth VCM, but deferred approval of $51.6 million of expenditures related to Georgia Power's portion of an
administrative claim filed in the Westinghouse bankruptcy proceedings. Through the nineteenth VCM, the Georgia PSC has
approved total construction capital costs incurred through June 30, 2018 of $5.4 billion (before $1.7 billion of payments received
under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds). In addition, the staff of
the Georgia PSC requested, and Georgia Power agreed, to file its twentieth VCM report concurrently with the twenty-first VCM
report by August 31, 2019.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
DOE Financing
At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had borrowed $2.6 billion related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 costs through the Loan
Guarantee Agreement and a multi-advance credit facility among Georgia Power, the DOE, and the FFB, which provides for
borrowings of up to $3.46 billion, subject to the satisfaction of certain conditions. In September 2017, the DOE issued a conditional
commitment to Georgia Power for up to approximately $1.67 billion in additional guaranteed loans under the Loan Guarantee
Agreement. In September 2018, the DOE extended the conditional commitment to March 31, 2019. Any further extension must be
approved by the DOE. Final approval and issuance of these additional loan guarantees by the DOE cannot be assured and are
subject to the negotiation of definitive agreements, completion of due diligence by the DOE, receipt of any necessary regulatory
approvals, and satisfaction of other conditions. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan
Guarantee Borrowings" for additional information, including applicable covenants, events of default, mandatory prepayment events
(including any decision not to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4), and conditions to borrowing.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Income Tax Matters
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
In December 2017, the Tax Reform Legislation was signed into law and became effective on January 1, 2018. The Tax Reform
Legislation, among other things, reduced the federal corporate income tax rate to 21%, retained normalization provisions for public
utility property and existing renewable energy incentives, and repealed the corporate alternative minimum tax. In addition, under
the Tax Reform Legislation, NOLs generated after December 31, 2017 can no longer be carried back to previous tax years but can
be carried forward indefinitely, with utilization limited to 80% of taxable income of the subsequent tax year. The projected
reduction of the consolidated income tax liability resulting from the tax rate reduction also delays the expected utilization of
existing tax credit carryforwards.
Following the enactment of the Tax Reform Legislation, the SEC staff issued Staff Accounting Bulletin 118 – "Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" (SAB 118), which provided for a measurement period of up to one year
from the enactment date to complete accounting under GAAP for the tax effects of the legislation. Due to the complex and
comprehensive nature of the enacted tax law changes and their application under GAAP, Southern Company considered all
amounts recorded in the financial statements as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation "provisional" as discussed in SAB 118 and
subject to revision prior to filing its 2017 tax return in the fourth quarter 2018. Southern Company recognized tax benefits of $30
million and $264 million in 2018 and 2017, respectively, for a total net tax benefit of $294 million as a result of the Tax Reform
Legislation. In addition, in total, Southern Company recorded a $417 million decrease in regulatory assets and a $6.2 billion
increase in regulatory liabilities as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation and $16 million of stranded excess deferred tax balances
in AOCI at December 31, 2017 were adjusted through retained earnings in 2018. As of December 31, 2018, Southern Company
considered the measurement of impacts from the Tax Reform Legislation on deferred income tax assets and liabilities, primarily
due to the impact of the reduction of the corporate income tax rate, to be complete.
However, the IRS continues to issue regulations that provide further interpretation and guidance on the law and each state's
adoption of the provisions contained in the Tax Reform Legislation remains uncertain. In addition, the regulatory treatment of
certain impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation is subject to the discretion of the FERC and each state's regulatory commission. The
ultimate impact of these matters cannot be determined at this time. See Note 2 to the financial statements for additional information
regarding the traditional electric operating companies' and the natural gas distribution utilities' rate filings, including
II-48
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
amounts returned to customers during 2018, to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. Also see FINANCIAL
CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Credit Rating Risk" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and
Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
Bonus Depreciation
Under the Tax Reform Legislation, projects with binding contracts prior to September 28, 2017 and placed in service after
September 27, 2017 remain eligible for bonus depreciation under the PATH Act. The PATH Act allowed for 50% bonus
depreciation for 2015 through 2017, 40% bonus depreciation for 2018, and 30% bonus depreciation for 2019 and certain long-lived
assets placed in service in 2020. Based on provisional estimates, bonus depreciation is expected to result in positive cash flows of
approximately $300 million for the 2018 tax year and approximately $130 million for the 2019 tax year. The ultimate outcome of
this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Tax Credits
The Tax Reform Legislation retained the renewable energy incentives that were included in the PATH Act. The PATH Act allows
for 30% ITC for solar projects that commence construction by December 31, 2019; 26% ITC for solar projects that commence
construction in 2020; 22% ITC for solar projects that commence construction in 2021; and a permanent 10% ITC for solar projects
that commence construction on or after January 1, 2022. In addition, the PATH Act allows for 100% PTC for wind projects that
commenced construction in 2016; 80% PTC for wind projects that commenced construction in 2017; 60% PTC for wind projects
that commenced construction in 2018 and 40% PTC for wind projects that commence construction in 2019. Wind projects
commencing construction after 2019 will not be entitled to any PTCs. Southern Company has received ITCs and PTCs in
connection with investments in solar, wind, and biomass facilities primarily at Southern Power and Georgia Power. See Note 1 to
the financial statements under "Income Taxes" and Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes –
Tax Credit Carryforwards" for additional information regarding the utilization and amortization of credits and the tax benefit
related to basis differences.
Other Matters
Southern Company and its subsidiaries are involved in various other matters being litigated and regulatory matters that could affect
future earnings. In addition, Southern Company and its subsidiaries are subject to certain claims and legal actions arising in the
ordinary course of business. The business activities of Southern Company's subsidiaries are subject to extensive governmental
regulation related to public health and the environment, such as laws and regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of
other natural resources. Litigation over environmental issues and claims of various types, including property damage, personal
injury, common law nuisance, and citizen enforcement of environmental laws and regulations, has occurred throughout the U.S.
This litigation has included claims for damages alleged to have been caused by CO2 and other emissions, CCR, and alleged
exposure to hazardous materials, and/or requests for injunctive relief in connection with such matters.
The ultimate outcome of such pending or potential litigation or regulatory matters cannot be predicted at this time; however, for
current proceedings not specifically reported herein or in Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements, management does not anticipate
that the ultimate liabilities, if any, arising from such current proceedings would have a material effect on Southern Company's
financial statements. See Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements for a discussion of various other contingencies, regulatory
matters, and other matters being litigated which may affect future earnings potential.
Litigation
In January 2017, a putative securities class action complaint was filed against Southern Company, certain of its officers, and certain
former Mississippi Power officers in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia, Atlanta Division, by Monroe
County Employees' Retirement System on behalf of all persons who purchased shares of Southern Company's common stock
between April 25, 2012 and October 29, 2013. The complaint alleges that Southern Company, certain of its officers, and certain
former Mississippi Power officers made materially false and misleading statements regarding the Kemper County energy facility in
violation of certain provisions under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. The complaint seeks, among other things,
compensatory damages and litigation costs and attorneys' fees. In June 2017, the plaintiffs filed an amended complaint that
provided additional detail about their claims, increased the purported class period by one day, and added certain other former
Mississippi Power officers as defendants. In July 2017, the defendants filed a motion to dismiss the plaintiffs' amended complaint
with prejudice, to which the plaintiffs filed an opposition in September 2017. On March 29, 2018, the U.S. District Court for the
Northern District of Georgia, Atlanta Division, issued an order granting, in part, the defendants' motion to dismiss. The court
dismissed certain claims against certain officers of Southern Company and Mississippi Power and dismissed the allegations related
to a number of the statements that plaintiffs challenged as being false or misleading. On April 26, 2018, the
II-49
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
defendants filed a motion for reconsideration of the court's order, seeking dismissal of the remaining claims in the lawsuit. On
August 10, 2018, the court denied the motion for reconsideration and denied a motion to certify the issue for interlocutory appeal.
In February 2017, Jean Vineyard filed a shareholder derivative lawsuit and, in May 2017, Judy Mesirov filed a shareholder
derivative lawsuit, each in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia. Each of these lawsuits names as defendants
Southern Company, certain of its directors, certain of its officers, and certain former Mississippi Power officers. In August 2017,
these two shareholder derivative lawsuits were consolidated in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia. The
complaints allege that the defendants caused Southern Company to make false or misleading statements regarding the Kemper
County energy facility cost and schedule. Further, the complaints allege that the defendants were unjustly enriched and caused the
waste of corporate assets and also allege that the individual defendants violated their fiduciary duties. Each plaintiff seeks to
recover, on behalf of Southern Company, unspecified actual damages and, on each plaintiff's own behalf, attorneys' fees and costs
in bringing the lawsuit. Each plaintiff also seeks certain changes to Southern Company's corporate governance and internal
processes. On April 25, 2018, the court entered an order staying this lawsuit until 30 days after the resolution of any dispositive
motions or any settlement, whichever is earlier, in the putative securities class action.
In May 2017, Helen E. Piper Survivor's Trust filed a shareholder derivative lawsuit in the Superior Court of Gwinnett County, State
of Georgia that names as defendants Southern Company, certain of its directors, certain of its officers, and certain former
Mississippi Power officers. The complaint alleges that the individual defendants, among other things, breached their fiduciary
duties in connection with schedule delays and cost overruns associated with the construction of the Kemper County energy facility.
The complaint further alleges that the individual defendants authorized or failed to correct false and misleading statements
regarding the Kemper County energy facility schedule and cost and failed to implement necessary internal controls to prevent harm
to Southern Company. The plaintiff seeks to recover, on behalf of Southern Company, unspecified actual damages and
disgorgement of profits and, on its behalf, attorneys' fees and costs in bringing the lawsuit. The plaintiff also seeks certain
unspecified changes to Southern Company's corporate governance and internal processes. On May 4, 2018, the court entered an
order staying this lawsuit until 30 days after the resolution of any dispositive motions or any settlement, whichever is earlier, in the
putative securities class action.
On May 18, 2018, Southern Company and Mississippi Power received a notice of dispute and arbitration demand filed by Martin
Product Sales, LLC (Martin) based on two agreements, both related to Kemper IGCC byproducts for which Mississippi Power
provided termination notices in September 2017. Martin alleges breach of contract, breach of good faith and fair dealing, fraud and
misrepresentation, and civil conspiracy and makes a claim for damages in the amount of approximately $143 million, as well as
additional unspecified damages, attorney's fees, costs, and interest. In the first quarter 2019, Mississippi Power and Southern
Company filed motions to dismiss.
Southern Company believes these legal challenges have no merit; however, an adverse outcome in any of these proceedings could
have an impact on Southern Company's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity. Southern Company will vigorously
defend itself in these matters, the ultimate outcome of which cannot be determined at this time.
Investments in Leveraged Leases
A subsidiary of Southern Holdings has several leveraged lease agreements, with original terms ranging up to 45 years, which relate
to international and domestic energy generation, distribution, and transportation assets. Southern Company receives federal income
tax deductions for depreciation and amortization, as well as interest on long-term debt related to these investments. Southern
Company reviews all important lease assumptions at least annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances
indicate that a change in assumptions has occurred or may occur. These assumptions include the effective tax rate, the residual
value, the credit quality of the lessees, and the timing of expected tax cash flows. See Note 1 to the financial statements under
"Leveraged Leases" for additional information.
The ability of the lessees to make required payments to the Southern Holdings subsidiary is dependent on the operational
performance of the assets. In 2017, the financial and operational performance of one of the lessees and the associated generation
assets raised significant concerns about the short-term ability of the generation assets to produce cash flows sufficient to support
ongoing operations and the lessee's contractual obligations and its ability to make the remaining semi-annual lease payments to the
Southern Holdings subsidiary beginning in June 2018. As a result of operational improvements in 2018, the 2018 lease payments
were paid in full. However, operational issues and the resulting cash liquidity challenges persist and significant concerns continue
regarding the lessee's ability to make the remaining semi-annual lease payments. These operational challenges may also impact the
expected residual value of the assets at the end of the lease term in 2047. If any future lease payment is not paid in full, the
Southern Holdings subsidiary may be unable to make its corresponding payment to the holders of the underlying non-recourse debt
related to the generation assets. Failure to make the required payment to the debtholders could represent an event of default that
would give the debtholders the right to foreclose on, and take ownership of, the generation assets from the
II-50
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Holdings subsidiary, in effect terminating the lease and resulting in the write-off of the related lease receivable, which
would result in a reduction in net income of approximately $86 million after tax based on the lease receivable balance at
December 31, 2018. Southern Company has evaluated the recoverability of the lease receivable and the expected residual value of
the generation assets at the end of the lease under various scenarios and has concluded that its investment in the leveraged lease is
not impaired at December 31, 2018. Southern Company will continue to monitor the operational performance of the underlying
assets and evaluate the ability of the lessee to continue to make the required lease payments. The ultimate outcome of this matter
cannot be determined at this time.
Mississippi Power
In conjunction with Southern Company's sale of Gulf Power, Mississippi Power and Gulf Power have committed to seek a
restructuring of their 50% undivided ownership interests in Plant Daniel such that each of them would, after the restructuring, own
100% of a generating unit. On January 15, 2019, Gulf Power provided notice to Mississippi Power that Gulf Power will retire its
share of the generating capacity of Plant Daniel on January 15, 2024. Mississippi Power has the option to purchase Gulf Power's
ownership interest for $1 on January 15, 2024, provided that Mississippi Power exercises the option no later than 120 days prior to
that date. Mississippi Power is assessing the potential operational and economic effects of Gulf Power's notice. The ultimate
outcome of these matters remains subject to completion of Mississippi Power's evaluations and applicable regulatory approvals,
including the FERC and the Mississippi PSC, and cannot now be determined. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
Southern Power
On January 29, 2019, Pacific Gas & Electric Company (PG&E) filed petitions to reorganize under Chapter 11 of the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code. Southern Power, together with its noncontrolling partners, owns four solar facilities where PG&E is the energy
off-taker for approximately 207 MWs of capacity under long-term PPAs. PG&E is also the transmission provider for these facilities
and two of Southern Power's other solar facilities. Southern Power has evaluated the recoverability of its investments in these solar
facilities under various scenarios, including selling the related energy into the competitive markets, and has concluded they are not
impaired. At December 31, 2018, Southern Power had outstanding accounts receivables due from PG&E of $1 million related to
the PPAs and $36 million related to the transmission interconnections. Southern Company does not expect a material impact to its
financial statements if, as a result of the bankruptcy proceedings, PG&E does not perform in accordance with the PPAs or the terms
of the PPAs are renegotiated; however, the ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Company Gas
A wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas owns and operates a natural gas storage facility consisting of two salt dome
caverns in Louisiana. Periodic integrity tests are required in accordance with rules of the Louisiana Department of Natural
Resources (DNR). In August 2017, in connection with an ongoing integrity project, updated seismic mapping indicated the
proximity of one of the caverns to the edge of the salt dome may be less than the required minimum and could result in Southern
Company Gas retiring the cavern early. At December 31, 2018, the facility's property, plant, and equipment had a net book value of
$109 million, of which the cavern itself represents approximately 20%. A potential early retirement of this cavern is dependent
upon several factors including compliance with an order from the Louisiana DNR detailing the requirements to place the cavern
back in service, which includes, among other things, obtaining core samples to determine the composition of the sheath
surrounding the edge of the salt dome.
The cavern continues to maintain its pressures and overall structural integrity. Southern Company Gas intends to monitor the
cavern and comply with the Louisiana DNR order through 2020 and place the cavern back in service in 2021. These events were
considered in connection with Southern Company Gas' annual long-lived asset impairment analysis, which determined there was no
impairment as of December 31, 2018. Any changes in results of monitoring activities, rates at which expiring capacity contracts are
re-contracted, timing of placing the cavern back in service, or Louisiana DNR requirements could trigger impairment. Further, early
retirement of the cavern could trigger impairment of other long-lived assets associated with the natural gas storage facility. The
ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time, but could have a significant impact on Southern Company's
financial statements.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
Southern Company prepares its consolidated financial statements in accordance with GAAP. Significant accounting policies are
described in Notes 1, 5, and 6 to the financial statements. In the application of these policies, certain estimates are made that may
II-51
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
have a material impact on Southern Company's results of operations and related disclosures. Different assumptions and
measurements could produce estimates that are significantly different from those recorded in the financial statements. Senior
management has reviewed and discussed the following critical accounting policies and estimates with the Audit Committee of
Southern Company's Board of Directors.
Utility Regulation
Southern Company's traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities, which collectively comprised
approximately 85% of Southern Company's total operating revenues for 2018, are subject to retail regulation by their respective
state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies and wholesale regulation by the FERC. These regulatory agencies set the
rates the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities are permitted to charge customers based
on allowable costs, including a reasonable ROE. As a result, the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas
distribution utilities apply accounting standards which require the financial statements to reflect the effects of rate regulation.
Through the ratemaking process, the regulators may require the inclusion of costs or revenues in periods different than when they
would be recognized by a non-regulated company. This treatment may result in the deferral of expenses and the recording of related
regulatory assets based on anticipated future recovery through rates or the deferral of gains or creation of liabilities and the
recording of related regulatory liabilities. The application of the accounting standards has a further effect on Southern Company's
financial statements as a result of the estimates of allowable costs used in the ratemaking process. These estimates may differ from
those actually incurred by the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities; therefore, the
accounting estimates inherent in specific costs such as depreciation, AROs, and pension and other postretirement benefits have less
of a direct impact on Southern Company's results of operations and financial condition than they would on a non-regulated
company. See Note 15 to the financial statements for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power and three of Southern Company
Gas' natural gas distribution utilities.
As reflected in Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company – Regulatory Assets and Liabilities," significant
regulatory assets and liabilities have been recorded. Management reviews the ultimate recoverability of these regulatory assets and
any requirement to refund these regulatory liabilities based on applicable regulatory guidelines and GAAP. However, adverse
legislative, judicial, or regulatory actions could materially impact the amounts of such regulatory assets and liabilities and could
adversely impact Southern Company's financial statements.
Estimated Cost, Schedule, and Rate Recovery for the Construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
In 2016, the Georgia PSC approved the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, which resolved certain prudency matters in connection
with Georgia Power's fifteenth VCM report. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM
report, which included a recommendation to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, with Southern Nuclear serving as
project manager and Bechtel serving as the primary construction contractor, as well as a modification of the Vogtle Cost Settlement
Agreement. The Georgia PSC's related order stated that under the modified Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, (i) none of the $3.3
billion of costs incurred through December 31, 2015 should be disallowed as imprudent; (ii) capital costs incurred up to $5.68
billion would be presumed to be reasonable and prudent with the burden of proof on any party challenging such costs; (iii) Georgia
Power would have the burden of proof to show that any capital costs above $5.68 billion were prudent; (iv) Georgia Power's total
project capital cost forecast of $7.3 billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and
approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds) was found reasonable and did not represent a cost cap; and (v) prudence
decisions would be made subsequent to achieving fuel load for Unit 4.
In its order, the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon which Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM
report are based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the decision to continue construction.
In the second quarter 2018, Georgia Power revised its base cost forecast and estimated contingency to complete construction and
start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to $8.0 billion and $0.4 billion, respectively, for a total project capital cost forecast of $8.4
billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer
Refunds). Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the
Georgia PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is
not subject to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for the $0.7 billion increase in costs included in the current base
capital cost forecast in the nineteenth VCM report. In connection with future VCM filings, Georgia Power may request the Georgia
PSC to evaluate costs currently included in the construction contingency estimate for rate recovery as and when they are
appropriately included in the base capital cost forecast. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that exists regarding
the future recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of these matters is
subject to the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future
II-52
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
regulatory proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the
second quarter 2018.
Georgia Power's revised cost estimate reflects an expected in-service date of November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for
Unit 4.
As construction continues, challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, and vendors; labor productivity, availability,
and/or cost escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, and/or installation and testing, including any required
engineering changes, of plant systems, structures, and components (some of which are based on new technology that only recently
began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale); or other issues could arise and change the projected schedule and
estimated cost. Monthly construction production targets required to maintain the current project schedule will continue to increase
significantly throughout 2019. To meet these increasing monthly targets, existing craft construction productivity must improve and
additional craft laborers must be retained and deployed.
Georgia Power and Southern Nuclear believe it is a leading practice in connection with a construction project of this size and
complexity to periodically validate recent construction progress in comparison to the projected schedule and to verify and update
quantities of commodities remaining to install, labor productivity, and forecasted staffing needs. This verification process, led by
Southern Nuclear, was underway as of December 31, 2018 and is expected to be completed during the second quarter 2019.
Georgia Power currently does not anticipate any material changes to the total estimated project capital cost forecast for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 or the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, resulting from this verification
process. However, the ultimate impact on cost and schedule, if any, will not be known until the verification process is completed.
Georgia Power is required to report the results and any project impacts to the Georgia PSC by May 15, 2019.
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC, may
arise, which may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. If any license amendment requests or other
licensing-based compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result
in increased costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. Any extension of the in-service dates of November 2021
for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4 is currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50
million per month, based on Georgia Power's ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While
Georgia Power is not precluded from seeking recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately
determine whether or not to seek recovery. Any further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable
through regulated rates will be required to be charged to income and such charges could be material.
Given the significant complexity involved in estimating the future costs to complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units
3 and 4 and the significant management judgment necessary to assess the related uncertainties surrounding future rate recovery of
any projected cost increases, as well as the potential impact on Southern Company's results of operations and cash flows, Southern
Company considers these items to be critical accounting estimates. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power –
Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
Accounting for Income Taxes
The consolidated income tax provision and deferred income tax assets and liabilities, as well as any unrecognized tax benefits and
valuation allowances, require significant judgment and estimates. These estimates are supported by historical tax return data,
reasonable projections of taxable income, and interpretations of applicable tax laws and regulations across multiple taxing
jurisdictions. The effective tax rate reflects the statutory tax rates and calculated apportionments for the various states in which the
Southern Company system operates.
Southern Company files a consolidated federal income tax return and various state income tax returns, some of which are combined
or unitary. Under a joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement, each Southern Company subsidiary's current and deferred
tax expense is computed on a stand-alone basis and no subsidiary is allocated more current expense than would be paid if it filed a
separate income tax return. Certain deductions and credits can be limited at the consolidated or combined level resulting in NOL
and tax credit carryforwards that would not otherwise result on a stand-alone basis. Utilization of NOL and tax credit carryforwards
and the assessment of valuation allowances are based on significant judgment and extensive analysis of
II-53
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company's current financial position and result of operations, including currently available information about future
years, to estimate when future taxable income will be realized.
Current and deferred state income tax liabilities and assets are estimated based on laws of multiple states that determine the income
to be apportioned to their jurisdictions. States utilize various formulas to calculate the apportionment of taxable income, primarily
using sales, assets, or payroll within the jurisdiction compared to the consolidated totals. In addition, each state varies as to whether
a stand-alone, combined, or unitary filing methodology is required. The calculation of deferred state taxes considers apportionment
factors and filing methodologies that are expected to apply in future years. The apportionments and methodologies which are
ultimately finalized in a manner inconsistent with expectations could have a material effect on Southern Company's financial
statements.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating NOL and tax credit carryforwards and multi-state apportionments for all
subsidiaries, Southern Company considers federal and state deferred income tax liabilities and assets to be critical accounting
estimates.
Asset Retirement Obligations
AROs are computed as the fair value of the estimated costs for an asset's future retirement and are recorded in the period in which
the liability is incurred. The estimated costs are capitalized as part of the related long-lived asset and depreciated over the asset's
useful life. In the absence of quoted market prices, AROs are estimated using present value techniques in which estimates of future
cash outlays associated with the asset retirements are discounted using a credit-adjusted risk-free rate. Estimates of the timing and
amounts of future cash outlays are based on projections of when and how the assets will be retired and the cost of future removal
activities.
The liability for AROs primarily relates to facilities that are subject to the CCR Rule and the related state rules, principally ash
ponds, and the decommissioning of the Southern Company system's nuclear facilities – Alabama Power's Plant Farley and Georgia
Power's ownership interests in Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2. In addition, the Southern Company system has AROs
related to various landfill sites, asbestos removal, mine reclamation, land restoration related to solar and wind facilities, and
disposal of polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas also have identified retirement obligations, such as
obligations related to certain electric transmission and distribution facilities, certain asbestos containing material within long-term
assets not subject to ongoing repair and maintenance activities, certain wireless communication towers, the disposal of
polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers, leasehold improvements, equipment on customer property, and property
associated with the Southern Company system's rail lines and natural gas pipelines. However, liabilities for the removal of these
assets have not been recorded as the fair value of the retirement obligations cannot be reasonably estimated. A liability for these
retirement obligations will be recognized when sufficient information becomes available to support a reasonable estimation of the
retirement obligation.
The cost estimates for AROs related to the disposal of CCR are based on information using various assumptions related to closure
and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and discount rates, and the potential methods for complying with the
CCR Rule. During 2018, Alabama Power and Georgia Power recorded increases of approximately $1.2 billion and $3.1 billion,
respectively, to their AROs related to the disposal of CCR and increases of approximately $300 million and $130 million,
respectively, to their AROs related to updated nuclear decommissioning cost site studies. Alabama Power's CCR-related update
resulted from feasibility studies performed on ash ponds in use at the plants it operates, which indicated that additional closure
costs, primarily related to increases in estimated ash volume, water management requirements, and design revisions, will be
required to close these ash ponds under the planned closure-in-place methodology. Georgia Power's CCR-related update resulted
from a strategic assessment which indicated additional closure costs will be required to close its ash ponds, primarily due to
changes in closure strategies, the estimated amount of ash to be excavated, and additional water management requirements
necessary to support closure strategies. The traditional electric operating companies expect to periodically update their ARO cost
estimates. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal
Combustion Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating AROs, Southern Company considers the liabilities for AROs to be critical
accounting estimates.
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits
Southern Company's calculation of pension and other postretirement benefits expense is dependent on a number of assumptions.
These assumptions include discount rates, healthcare cost trend rates, expected long-term return on plan assets, mortality rates,
expected salary and wage increases, and other factors. Components of pension and other postretirement benefits expense include
II-54
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
interest and service cost on the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, expected return on plan assets, and amortization of
certain unrecognized costs and obligations. Actual results that differ from the assumptions utilized are accumulated and amortized
over future periods and, therefore, generally affect recognized expense and the recorded obligation in future periods. While
Southern Company believes that the assumptions used are appropriate, differences in actual experience or significant changes in
assumptions would affect its pension and other postretirement benefit costs and obligations.
Key elements in determining Southern Company's pension and other postretirement benefit expense are the expected long-term
return on plan assets and the discount rate used to measure the benefit plan obligations and the periodic benefit plan expense for
future periods. The expected long-term return on pension and other postretirement benefit plan assets is based on Southern
Company's investment strategy, historical experience, and expectations for long-term rates of return that consider external actuarial
advice. Southern Company determines the long-term return on plan assets by applying the long-term rate of expected returns on
various asset classes to Southern Company's target asset allocation. For purposes of determining its liability related to the pension
and other postretirement benefit plans, Southern Company discounts the future related cash flows using a single-point discount rate
for each plan developed from the weighted average of market-observed yields for high quality fixed income securities with
maturities that correspond to expected benefit payments.
The following table illustrates the sensitivity to changes in Southern Company's long-term assumptions with respect to the discount
rate, salary increases, and the long-term rate of return on plan assets:
Change in AssumptionIncrease/(Decrease)
in Total Benefit
Expense for 2019Increase/(Decrease)
in Projected
Obligation for
Pension Plan at
December 31, 2018 Increase/(Decrease)
in Projected
Obligation for Other
Postretirement
Benefit Plans at
December 31, 2018
 (in millions)
25 basis point change in discount rate $37/$(36) $434/$(411)  $50/$(48)
25 basis point change in salaries $11/$(11) $105/$(101)  $–/$–
25 basis point change in long-term return on plan assets $33/$(33) N/A  N/A
N/A – Not applicable
See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information regarding pension and other postretirement benefits.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
The acquisition method of accounting requires the assets acquired and liabilities assumed to be recorded at the date of acquisition at
their respective estimated fair values. Southern Company recognizes goodwill as of the acquisition date, as a residual over the fair
values of the identifiable net assets acquired. Goodwill is tested for impairment on an annual basis in the fourth quarter of the year
as well as on an interim basis as events and changes in circumstances occur. Primarily as a result of the acquisitions of Southern
Company Gas and PowerSecure in 2016, goodwill totaled approximately $5.3 billion at December 31, 2018. As a result of the
Southern Company Gas Dispositions, goodwill was reduced by $910 million during 2018. In addition, Southern Company Gas
recorded a $42 million goodwill impairment charge in 2018 in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions.
Definite-lived intangible assets acquired are amortized over the estimated useful lives of the respective assets to reflect the pattern
in which the economic benefits of the intangible assets are consumed. Whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that
the carrying amount of the intangible assets may not be recoverable, the intangible assets will be reviewed for impairment.
Primarily as a result of the acquisitions of Southern Company Gas and PowerSecure and PPA fair value adjustments resulting from
Southern Power's acquisitions, other intangible assets, net of amortization totaled approximately $613 million at December 31,
2018.
The judgments made in determining the estimated fair value assigned to each class of assets acquired and liabilities assumed, as
well as asset lives, can significantly impact Southern Company's results of operations. Fair values and useful lives are determined
based on, among other factors, the expected future period of benefit of the asset, the various characteristics of the asset, and
projected cash flows. As the determination of an asset's fair value and useful life involves management making certain estimates
and because these estimates form the basis for the determination of whether or not an impairment charge should be recorded,
Southern Company considers these estimates to be critical accounting estimates.
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets and Liabilities" for additional information
regarding Southern Company's goodwill and other intangible assets and Note 15 to the financial statements for additional
II-55
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
information related to Southern Company's 2016 acquisitions of Southern Company Gas and PowerSecure, as well as the Southern
Company Gas Dispositions.
Derivatives and Hedging Activities
Derivative instruments are recorded on the balance sheets as either assets or liabilities measured at their fair value, unless the
transactions qualify for the normal purchases or normal sales scope exception and are instead subject to traditional accrual
accounting. For those transactions that do not qualify as a normal purchase or normal sale, changes in the derivatives' fair values
are recognized concurrently in earnings unless specific hedge accounting criteria are met. If the derivatives meet those criteria,
derivative gains and losses offset related results of the hedged item in the income statement in the case of a fair value hedge, or
gains and losses are deferred in OCI until the hedged transaction affects earnings in the case of a cash flow hedge. Certain
subsidiaries of Southern Company enter into energy-related derivatives that are designated as regulatory hedges where gains and
losses are initially recorded as regulatory liabilities and assets and then are included in fuel expense as the underlying fuel is used in
operations and ultimately recovered through billings to customers.
Southern Company uses derivative instruments to reduce the impact to the results of operations due to the risk of changes in the
price of natural gas, to manage fuel hedging programs per guidelines of state regulatory agencies, and to mitigate residual changes
in the price of electricity, weather, interest rates, and foreign currency exchange rates. The fair value of commodity derivative
instruments used to manage exposure to changing prices reflects the estimated amounts that Southern Company would receive or
pay to terminate or close the contracts at the reporting date. To determine the fair value of the derivative instruments, Southern
Company utilizes market data or assumptions that market participants would use in pricing the derivative asset or liability,
including assumptions about risk and the risks inherent in the inputs of the valuation technique.
Southern Company classifies derivative assets and liabilities based on the lowest level of input that is significant to the fair value
measurement. The assessment of the significance of a particular input to the fair value measurement requires judgment and may
affect the valuation of fair value assets and liabilities and their placement within the fair value hierarchy. The determination of the
fair value of the derivative instruments incorporates various required factors. These factors include:
•the creditworthiness of the counterparties involved and the impact of credit enhancements (such as cash deposits and
letters of credit);
•events specific to a given counterparty; and
•the impact of Southern Company's nonperformance risk on its liabilities.
Given the assumptions used in pricing the derivative asset or liability, Southern Company considers the valuation of derivative
assets and liabilities a critical accounting estimate. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Market Price Risk" herein
and Note 14 to the financial statements for more information.
Contingent Obligations
Southern Company is subject to a number of federal and state laws and regulations as well as other factors and conditions that
subject it to environmental, litigation, and other risks. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL herein and Notes 2 and 3 to the
financial statements for more information regarding certain of these contingencies. Southern Company periodically evaluates its
exposure to such risks and records reserves for those matters where a non-tax-related loss is considered probable and reasonably
estimable. The adequacy of reserves can be significantly affected by external events or conditions that can be unpredictable; thus,
the ultimate outcome of such matters could materially affect Southern Company's results of operations, cash flows, or financial
condition.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" for additional information.
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842) (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires lessees to recognize on the
balance sheet a lease liability and a right-of-use asset for all leases. ASU 2016-02 also changes the recognition, measurement, and
presentation of expense associated with leases and provides clarification regarding the identification of certain components of
contracts that would represent a lease. The accounting required by lessors is relatively unchanged and there is no change to the
accounting for existing leveraged leases. ASU 2016-02 is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018 and
Southern Company adopted the new standard effective January 1, 2019.
Southern Company elected the transition methodology provided by ASU No. 2018-11, Leases (Topic 842): Targeted Improvements,
whereby the requirements of ASU 2016-02 are applied on a prospective basis as of the adoption date of January 1, 2019, without
restating prior periods. Southern Company elected the package of practical expedients provided by ASU 2016-02
II-56
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
that allows prior determinations of whether existing contracts are, or contain, leases and the classification of existing leases to
continue without reassessment. Additionally, Southern Company applied the use-of-hindsight practical expedient in determining
lease terms as of the date of adoption and elected the practical expedient that allows existing land easements not previously
accounted for as leases not to be reassessed. Southern Company also made accounting policy elections to account for short-term
leases in all asset classes as off-balance sheet leases and combined lease and non-lease components in the computations of lease
obligations and right-of-use assets for most asset classes.
The Southern Company system completed the implementation of a new application to track and account for its leases and updated
its internal controls and accounting policies to support the accounting for leases under ASU 2016-02. The Southern Company
system completed its lease inventory and determined its most significant leases involve PPAs, real estate, and communication
towers where certain of Southern Company's subsidiaries are the lessee and PPAs where certain of Southern Company's
subsidiaries are the lessor. In the first quarter 2019, the adoption of ASU 2016-02 resulted in recording lease liabilities and right-of-
use assets on Southern Company's balance sheet each totaling approximately $2.0 billion, with no impact on Southern Company's
statement of income.
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY
Overview
Earnings in all periods presented were negatively affected by charges associated with plants under construction; however, Southern
Company's financial condition remained stable at December 31, 2018.
The Southern Company system's cash requirements primarily consist of funding ongoing operations, common stock dividends,
capital expenditures, and debt maturities. The Southern Company system's capital expenditures and other investing activities
include investments to meet projected long-term demand requirements, including to build new electric generation facilities, to
maintain existing electric generation facilities, to comply with environmental regulations including adding environmental
modifications to certain existing electric generating units and closures of ash ponds, to expand and improve electric transmission
and distribution facilities, to update and expand natural gas distribution systems, and for restoration following major storms.
Operating cash flows provide a substantial portion of the Southern Company system's cash needs. For the three-year period from
2019 through 2021, Southern Company's projected common stock dividends, capital expenditures, and debt maturities are expected
to exceed operating cash flows. Southern Company plans to finance future cash needs in excess of its operating cash flows
primarily by accessing borrowings from financial institutions and through debt and equity issuances in the capital markets.
Southern Company intends to continue to monitor its access to short-term and long-term capital markets as well as bank credit
arrangements to meet future capital and liquidity needs. See "Sources of Capital," "Financing Activities," and "Capital
Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein for additional information.
Southern Company's investments in the qualified pension plans and the nuclear decommissioning trust funds decreased in value at
December 31, 2018 as compared to December 31, 2017. No contributions to the qualified pension plan were made for the year
ended December 31, 2018 and no mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plans are anticipated during 2019. See
"Contractual Obligations" herein and Notes 6 and 11 to the financial statements under "Nuclear Decommissioning" and "Pension
Plans," respectively, for additional information.
Net cash provided from operating activities in 2018 totaled $6.9 billion, an increase of $0.6 billion from 2017. The increase in net
cash provided from operating activities was primarily due to the timing of vendor payments and increased fuel cost recovery. Net
cash provided from operating activities in 2017 totaled $6.4 billion, an increase of $1.5 billion from 2016. Significant changes in
operating cash flow for 2017 as compared to 2016 included increases of $1.2 billion related to operating activities of Southern
Company Gas, which was acquired on July 1, 2016, and $1.0 billion related to voluntary contributions to the qualified pension plan
in 2016, partially offset by the timing of vendor payments.
Net cash used for investing activities in 2018, 2017, and 2016 totaled $5.8 billion, $7.2 billion, and $20.0 billion, respectively. The
cash used for investing activities in 2018 was primarily due to the traditional electric operating companies' installation of
equipment to comply with environmental standards and construction of electric generation, transmission, and distribution facilities
and capital expenditures for Southern Company Gas' infrastructure replacement programs, partially offset by proceeds from the sale
transactions described in Note 15 to the financial statements. The cash used for investing activities in 2017 was primarily due to the
traditional electric operating companies' installation of equipment to comply with environmental standards and construction of
electric generation, transmission, and distribution facilities, capital expenditures for Southern Company Gas' infrastructure
replacement programs, and Southern Power's renewable acquisitions. The cash used for investing activities in 2016 was primarily
due to the closing of the Merger, the acquisition of PowerSecure, Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG, the traditional
electric operating companies' construction of electric generation, transmission, and distribution facilities and
II-57
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
installation of equipment at electric generating facilities to comply with environmental standards, and Southern Power's
acquisitions and construction of renewable facilities and a natural gas facility.
Net cash used for financing activities totaled $1.8 billion in 2018 primarily due to net redemptions and repurchases of long-term
debt, common stock dividend payments, and a decrease in commercial paper borrowings, partially offset by net issuances of short-
term bank debt, proceeds from Southern Power's sales of non-controlling equity interests in entities indirectly owning substantially
all of its solar facilities and eight of its wind facilities, and the issuance of common stock. Net cash provided from financing
activities totaled $1.0 billion in 2017 primarily due to net issuances of long-term and short-term debt, partially offset by common
stock dividend payments. Net cash provided from financing activities totaled $15.7 billion in 2016 primarily due to issuances of
long-term debt and common stock associated with completing the Merger and funding the subsidiaries' continuous construction
programs, Southern Power's acquisitions, and Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG, partially offset by redemptions of long-
term debt and common stock dividend payments. Fluctuations in cash flow from financing activities vary from year to year based
on capital needs and the maturity or redemption of securities.
Significant balance sheet changes in 2018 included the reclassification of $5.7 billion and $3.3 billion in total assets and liabilities
held for sale, respectively, primarily associated with Gulf Power, as well as decreases of $3.0 billion and $0.4 billion in total assets
and liabilities, respectively, associated with the sales described in Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" and
"Southern Company Gas." Also see Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" and
"Assets Held for Sale" for additional information. After adjusting for these changes, other significant balance sheet changes
included an increase of $7.1 billion in total property, plant, and equipment primarily related to the $4.7 billion increase in AROs at
Alabama Power and Georgia Power, as well as the traditional electric operating companies' installation of equipment to comply
with environmental standards and construction of electric generation, transmission, and distribution facilities and Southern
Company Gas' capital expenditures for infrastructure replacement programs, partially offset by the second quarter 2018 charge
related to the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4; a decrease of $3.1 billion in long-term debt (including amounts due within
one year) resulting from the repayment of long-term debt; an increase of $3.0 billion in noncontrolling interests at Southern Power
as a result of sales of interests in entities indirectly owning substantially all of its solar facilities and eight of its wind facilities; and
an increase of $1.9 billion in other regulatory assets, deferred primarily related to AROs at Georgia Power. See Notes 2 and 15 to
the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" and "Southern Power – Sales of Renewable Facility
Interests," respectively, as well as Notes 6 and 8 to the financial statements and "Financing Activities" herein for additional
information.
At the end of 2018, the market price of Southern Company's common stock was $43.92 per share (based on the closing price as
reported on the NYSE) and the book value was $23.91 per share, representing a market-to-book value ratio of 184%, compared to
$48.09, $23.99, and 201%, respectively, at the end of 2017.
Southern Company's consolidated ratio of common equity to total capitalization plus short-term debt was 32.5% and 31.5% at
December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. See Note 8 to the financial statements for additional information.
Sources of Capital
Southern Company intends to meet its future capital needs through operating cash flows, borrowings from financial institutions,
and debt and equity issuances in the capital markets. Equity capital can be provided from any combination of Southern Company's
stock plans, private placements, or public offerings. The amount and timing of additional equity and debt issuances in 2019, as well
as in subsequent years, will be contingent on Southern Company's investment opportunities and the Southern Company system's
capital requirements and will depend upon prevailing market conditions and other factors. See "Capital Requirements and
Contractual Obligations" herein for additional information.
Except as described herein, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas plan to
obtain the funds required for construction and other purposes from operating cash flows, external security issuances, borrowings
from financial institutions, and equity contributions or loans from Southern Company. Southern Power also plans to utilize tax
equity partnership contributions, as well as funds resulting from its pending sale of Plant Mankato. However, the amount, type, and
timing of any future financings, if needed, will depend upon prevailing market conditions, regulatory approval, and other factors.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" herein for additional information.
In addition, in 2014, Georgia Power entered into the Loan Guarantee Agreement with the DOE, under which the proceeds of
borrowings may be used to reimburse Georgia Power for Eligible Project Costs incurred in connection with its construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Under the Loan Guarantee Agreement, the DOE agreed to guarantee borrowings of up to $3.46 billion (not to
exceed 70% of Eligible Project Costs) to be made by Georgia Power under a multi-advance credit facility (FFB Credit Facility)
among Georgia Power, the DOE, and the FFB. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had borrowed $2.6 billion under
II-58
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
the FFB Credit Facility. In July 2017, Georgia Power entered into an amendment to the Loan Guarantee Agreement, which provides
that further advances are conditioned upon the DOE's approval of any agreements entered into in replacement of the Vogtle 3 and 4
Agreement and satisfaction of certain other conditions.
In September 2017, the DOE issued a conditional commitment to Georgia Power for up to approximately $1.67 billion of
additional guaranteed loans under the Loan Guarantee Agreement. This conditional commitment expires on March 31, 2019,
subject to any further extension approved by the DOE. Final approval and issuance of these additional loan guarantees by the DOE
cannot be assured and are subject to the negotiation of definitive agreements, completion of due diligence by the DOE, receipt of
any necessary regulatory approvals, and satisfaction of other conditions. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term
Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" for additional information regarding the Loan Guarantee Agreement, including
applicable covenants, events of default, mandatory prepayment events (including any decision not to continue construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4), and additional conditions to borrowing. Also see Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power –
Nuclear Construction" for additional information regarding Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
The issuance of securities by the traditional electric operating companies and Nicor Gas is generally subject to the approval of the
applicable state PSC or other applicable state regulatory agency. The issuance of all securities by Mississippi Power and short-term
securities by Georgia Power is generally subject to regulatory approval by the FERC. Additionally, with respect to the public
offering of securities, Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries file registration statements with the SEC under the
Securities Act of 1933, as amended (1933 Act). The amounts of securities authorized by the appropriate regulatory authorities, as
well as the securities registered under the 1933 Act, are continuously monitored and appropriate filings are made to ensure
flexibility in the capital markets.
Southern Company, each traditional electric operating company, and Southern Power generally obtain financing separately without
credit support from any affiliate. The Southern Company system does not maintain a centralized cash or money pool. Therefore,
funds of each company are not commingled with funds of any other company in the Southern Company system.
In addition, Southern Company Gas Capital obtains external financing for Southern Company Gas and its subsidiaries, other than
Nicor Gas, which obtains financing separately without credit support from any affiliates. Nicor Gas' commercial paper program
supports its working capital needs as Nicor Gas is not permitted to make money pool loans to affiliates. All of the other Southern
Company Gas subsidiaries benefit from Southern Company Gas Capital's commercial paper program.
See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information.
At December 31, 2018, Southern Company's current liabilities exceeded current assets by $4.7 billion, primarily due to $3.2 billion
of long-term debt that is due within one year (including approximately $1.3 billion at the parent company, $0.2 billion at Alabama
Power, $0.6 billion at Georgia Power, $0.6 billion at Southern Power, and $0.4 billion at Southern Company Gas) and $2.9 billion
of notes payable (including approximately $1.8 billion at the parent company, $0.3 billion at Georgia Power, $0.1 billion at
Southern Power, and $0.7 billion at Southern Company Gas). Subsequent to December 31, 2018, using proceeds from the sale of
Gulf Power, the Southern Company parent entity repaid $0.7 billion of its long-term debt due within one year and all $1.8 billion of
its notes payable at December 31, 2018. See "Financing Activities" herein for additional information. To meet short-term cash
needs and contingencies, the Southern Company system has substantial cash flow from operating activities and access to capital
markets and financial institutions. Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern
Company Gas intend to utilize operating cash flows, as well as commercial paper, lines of credit, bank notes, and securities
issuances, as market conditions permit, as well as, under certain circumstances for the traditional electric operating companies,
Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas, equity contributions and/or loans from Southern Company to meet their short-term
capital needs.
II-59
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018, Southern Company and its subsidiaries had approximately $1.4 billion of cash and cash equivalents.
Committed credit arrangements with banks at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 Expires    Executable Term
LoansExpires Within
One Year
Company 2019 2020 2022 Total Unused(d) One
Year Two
YearsTerm
Out No Term
Out
 (in millions)
Southern Company(a)$ — $ — $2,000 $2,000 $ 1,999 $ — $ — $— $ —
Alabama Power 33 500 800 1,333 1,333 — — — 33
Georgia Power — — 1,750 1,750 1,736 — — — —
Mississippi Power 100 — — 100 100 — — — 100
Southern Power(b)— — 750 750 727 — — — —
Southern Company Gas(c)— — 1,900 1,900 1,895 — — — —
Other 30 — — 30 30 — — — 30
Southern Company
Consolidated(e)$163$500 $7,200 $7,863 $ 7,820 $ — $ — $— $ 163
(a)Represents the Southern Company parent entity.
(b)Does not include Southern Power Company's $120 million continuing letter of credit facility for standby letters of credit expiring in 2021, of which $17 million
was unused at December 31, 2018. Southern Power's subsidiaries are not parties to its bank credit arrangement.
(c)Southern Company Gas, as the parent entity, guarantees the obligations of Southern Company Gas Capital, which is the borrower of $1.4 billion of this
arrangement. Southern Company Gas' committed credit arrangement also includes $500 million for which Nicor Gas is the borrower and which is restricted for
working capital needs of Nicor Gas. Pursuant to this multi-year credit arrangement, the allocations between Southern Company Gas Capital and Nicor Gas may
be adjusted.
(d)Amounts used are for letters of credit.
(e)Excludes $280 million of committed credit arrangements of Gulf Power, which was sold on January 1, 2019. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for additional information.
See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information.
Most of these bank credit arrangements, as well as the term loan arrangements of Alabama Power and Southern Power Company,
contain covenants that limit debt levels and contain cross-acceleration or cross-default provisions to other indebtedness (including
guarantee obligations) that are restricted only to the indebtedness of the individual company. Such cross-default provisions to other
indebtedness would trigger an event of default if the applicable borrower defaulted on indebtedness or guarantee obligations over a
specified threshold. Such cross-acceleration provisions to other indebtedness would trigger an event of default if the applicable
borrower defaulted on indebtedness, the payment of which was then accelerated. At December 31, 2018, Southern Company, the
traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power Company, Southern Company Gas, and Nicor Gas were in compliance
with all such covenants. None of the bank credit arrangements contain material adverse change clauses at the time of borrowings.
Subject to applicable market conditions, Southern Company and its subsidiaries expect to renew or replace their bank credit
arrangements as needed, prior to expiration. In connection therewith, Southern Company and its subsidiaries may extend the
maturity dates and/or increase or decrease the lending commitments thereunder.
A portion of the unused credit with banks is allocated to provide liquidity support to the revenue bonds of the traditional electric
operating companies and the commercial paper programs of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies,
Southern Power Company, Southern Company Gas, and Nicor Gas. The amount of variable rate revenue bonds of the traditional
electric operating companies outstanding requiring liquidity support at December 31, 2018 was approximately $1.6 billion, which
included $82 million related to Gulf Power. In addition, at December 31, 2018, the traditional electric operating companies had
approximately $403 million of revenue bonds outstanding that are required to be remarketed within the next 12 months, which
included $58 million related to Gulf Power. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf
Power" for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power on January 1, 2019. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Georgia Power
redeemed approximately $108 million of obligations related to outstanding variable rate pollution control revenue bonds.
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Southern Power Company, Southern Company Gas, Nicor Gas, and SEGCO
make short-term borrowings primarily through commercial paper programs that have the liquidity support of the committed bank
credit arrangements described above. Short-term borrowings are included in notes payable in the balance sheets.
II-60
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Details of short-term borrowings were as follows:
 Short-term Debt at the End of
the Period  Short-term Debt During the Period (*)
 Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest Rate Average
Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest Rate Maximum
Amount
Outstanding
 (in millions)   (in millions)   (in millions)
December 31, 2018:     
Commercial paper $ 1,064 3.0% $ 1,655 2.3% $ 3,042
Short-term bank debt 1,851 3.1% 1,722 2.9% 2,504
Total $ 2,915 3.1% $ 3,377 2.6% 
December 31, 2017:     
Commercial paper $ 1,832 1.8% $ 2,117 1.3% $ 2,946
Short-term bank debt 607 2.3% 555 2.1% 1,020
Total $ 2,439 1.9% $ 2,672 1.5% 
December 31, 2016:     
Commercial paper $ 1,909 1.1% $ 976 0.8% $ 1,970
Short-term bank debt 123 1.7% 176 1.7% 500
Total $ 2,032 1.1% $ 1,152 1.1% 
(*)Average and maximum amounts are based upon daily balances during the 12-month periods ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016.
In addition to the short-term borrowings of Southern Power Company included in the table above, at December 31, 2016, Southern
Power Company subsidiaries assumed credit agreements (Project Credit Facilities) with the acquisition of certain solar facilities,
which were non-recourse to Southern Power Company, the proceeds of which were used to finance project costs related to such
solar facilities. The Project Credit Facilities were fully repaid in January 2017. For the year ended December 31, 2016, the Project
Credit Facilities had a maximum amount outstanding of $828 million and an average amount outstanding of $566 million at a
weighted average interest rate of 2.1% and had total amounts outstanding of $209 million at a weighted average interest rate of
2.1% at December 31, 2016.
Southern Company believes the need for working capital can be adequately met by utilizing commercial paper programs, lines of
credit, bank term loans, and operating cash flows.
Financing Activities
During 2018, Southern Company issued approximately 11.6 million shares of common stock primarily through employee equity
compensation plans and received proceeds of approximately $442 million.
In addition, during the third and fourth quarters 2018, Southern Company issued a total of approximately 12.1 million and 2.5
million shares, respectively, of common stock through at-the-market issuances pursuant to sales agency agreements related to
Southern Company's continuous equity offering program and received cash proceeds of approximately $540 million and $108
million, respectively, net of $5 million and $1 million in commissions, respectively.
II-61
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The following table outlines the long-term debt financing activities for Southern Company and its subsidiaries for the year ended
December 31, 2018:
CompanySenior
Note
IssuancesSenior Note
Maturities,
Redemptions,
and
RepurchasesRevenue
Bond
Issuances and
Reofferings
of Purchased
Bonds  Revenue
Bond
Maturities,
Redemptions,
 and
Repurchases Other
Long-Term
Debt
Issuances Other
Long-Term
Debt
Redemptions
and
Maturities(a)
 (in millions)
Southern Company(b)$ 750$ 1,000$ — $ — $ — $ —
Alabama Power 500 — 120 120 — 1
Georgia Power — 1,500 108 469 — 111
Mississippi Power 600 155 — 43 — 900
Southern Power — 350 — — — 420
Southern Company Gas — 155 — 200 300 —
Other(c)— 100 — — 100 13
Elimination(d)— — — — — (4)
Southern Company
Consolidated $ 1,850$ 3,260$ 228 $ 832 $ 400 $ 1,441
(a)Includes reductions in capital lease obligations resulting from cash payments under capital leases.
(b)Represents the Southern Company parent entity.
(c)In November 2018, SEGCO, as borrower, and Alabama Power, as guarantor, entered into a $100 million long-term delayed draw floating rate bank term loan
bearing interest based on three-month LIBOR, which SEGCO used to repay at maturity $100 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2013A Senior Notes
due December 1, 2018. See Note 9 to the financial statements under "Guarantees" for additional information.
(d)Represents reductions in affiliate capital lease obligations at Georgia Power, which are eliminated in Southern Company's consolidated financial statements.
Except as otherwise described herein, Southern Company and its subsidiaries used the proceeds of debt issuances for their
redemptions and maturities shown in the table above, to repay short-term indebtedness, and for general corporate purposes,
including working capital. The subsidiaries also used the proceeds for their construction programs.
In March 2018, Southern Company entered into a $900 million short-term floating rate bank loan bearing interest based on one-
month LIBOR, which was repaid in August 2018.
In April 2018, Southern Company borrowed $250 million pursuant to a short-term uncommitted bank credit arrangement, bearing
interest at a rate agreed upon by Southern Company and the bank from time to time and payable on no less than 30 days' demand
by the bank. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Southern Company repaid this loan.
In June 2018, Southern Company repaid at maturity two $100 million short-term floating rate bank term loans.
In August 2018, Southern Company issued $750 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2018A Floating Rate Senior Notes
due February 14, 2020 bearing interest based on three-month LIBOR, entered into a $1.5 billion short-term floating rate bank loan
bearing interest based on one-month LIBOR, and repaid $250 million borrowed in August 2017 pursuant to a short-term
uncommitted bank credit arrangement. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Southern Company repaid the $1.5 billion short-term
floating rate bank loan.
In the third quarter 2018, Southern Company repaid at maturity $500 million aggregate principal amount of 1.55% Senior Notes
and $500 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2013A 2.45% Senior Notes.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, through cash tender offers, Southern Company repurchased and retired approximately $522
million of the $1.0 billion aggregate principal amount outstanding of its 1.85% Senior Notes due July 1, 2019 (1.85% Notes),
approximately $180 million of the $350 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2014B 2.15% Senior Notes
due September 1, 2019 (Series 2014B Notes), and approximately $504 million of the $750 million aggregate principal amount
outstanding of its Series 2018A Floating Rate Notes due February 14, 2020 (Series 2018A Notes), for an aggregate purchase price,
excluding accrued and unpaid interest, of approximately $1.2 billion. In addition, subsequent to December 31, 2018, and following
the completion of the cash tender offers, Southern Company completed the redemption of all of the Series 2018A Notes remaining
outstanding and called for redemption all of the 1.85% Notes and Series 2014B Notes remaining outstanding.
II-62
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Alabama Power repaid at maturity $200 million aggregate principal amount of Series Z 5.125%
Senior Notes.
In January 2018, Georgia Power repaid its outstanding $150 million short-term floating rate bank loan due May 31, 2018.
In May 2018, through cash tender offers, Georgia Power repurchased and retired $89 million of the $250 million aggregate
principal amount outstanding of its Series 2007A 5.65% Senior Notes due March 1, 2037, $326 million of the $500 million
aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2009A 5.95% Senior Notes due February 1, 2039, and $335 million of the
$600 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2010B 5.40% Senior Notes due June 1, 2040, for an aggregate
purchase price, excluding accrued and unpaid interest, of $902 million.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Georgia Power redeemed approximately $13 million, $20 million, and $75 million aggregate
principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power
Company Plant Vogtle Project), First Series 1992, Eighth Series 1994, and Second Series 1995, respectively.
In March 2018, Mississippi Power entered into a $300 million short-term floating rate bank loan bearing interest based on one-
month LIBOR, of which $200 million was repaid in the second quarter 2018 and $100 million was repaid in the third quarter 2018.
The proceeds of this loan, together with the proceeds of Mississippi Power's $600 million senior notes issuances, were used to
repay Mississippi Power's $900 million unsecured floating rate term loan.
In October 2018, Mississippi Power completed the redemption of all 334,210 outstanding shares of its preferred stock (as well as
related depositary shares), with an aggregate par value of approximately $33.4 million.
In May 2018, Southern Power entered into two short-term floating rate bank loans, each for an aggregate principal amount of $100
million, which bear interest based on one-month LIBOR. In November 2018, Southern Power repaid one of these short-term loans.
During 2018, Southern Power received approximately $148 million of third-party tax equity related to certain of its renewable
facilities. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" for additional information.
Prior to its sale, in the second quarter 2018, Pivotal Utility Holdings caused $200 million aggregate principal amount of gas facility
revenue bonds to be redeemed.
In May 2018, Southern Company Gas Capital borrowed $95 million pursuant to a short-term uncommitted bank credit
arrangement, guaranteed by Southern Company Gas, bearing interest at a rate agreed upon by Southern Company Gas Capital and
the bank from time to time and payable on no less than 30 days' demand by the bank. In July 2018, Southern Company Gas Capital
repaid this loan.
Other long-term debt issuances for Southern Company Gas include the issuance by Nicor Gas of $300 million aggregate principal
amount of first mortgage bonds in a private placement, of which $100 million was issued in August 2018 and $200 million was
issued in November 2018.
In addition to any financings that may be necessary to meet capital requirements and contractual obligations, Southern Company
and its subsidiaries plan to continue, when economically feasible, a program to retire higher-cost securities and replace these
obligations with lower-cost capital if market conditions permit.
Credit Rating Risk
At December 31, 2018, Southern Company and its subsidiaries did not have any credit arrangements that would require material
changes in payment schedules or terminations as a result of a credit rating downgrade.
There are certain contracts that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of a credit rating change of
certain subsidiaries to BBB and/or Baa2 or below. These contracts are for physical electricity and natural gas purchases and sales,
fuel purchases, fuel transportation and storage, energy price risk management, transmission, interest rate management, and
construction of new generation at Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
II-63
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The maximum potential collateral requirements under these contracts at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
Credit RatingsMaximum
Potential
Collateral
Requirements(a)
 (in millions)
At BBB and/or Baa2 $ 30
At BBB- and/or Baa3 $ 542
At BB+ and/or Ba1(b)$ 2,176
(a)Includes potential collateral requirements related to Gulf Power of $111 million and $221 million at a credit rating of BBB- and/or Baa3 and BB+ and/or Ba1,
respectively. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power on
January 1, 2019.
(b)Any additional credit rating downgrades at or below BB- and/or Ba3 could increase collateral requirements up to an additional $38 million.
Generally, collateral may be provided by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit, or cash. Additionally, a credit rating
downgrade could impact the ability of Southern Company and its subsidiaries to access capital markets and would be likely to
impact the cost at which they do so.
On February 26, 2018, Moody's revised its rating outlook for Mississippi Power from stable to positive. On August 8, 2018,
Moody's upgraded Mississippi Power's senior unsecured rating to Baa3 from Ba1 and maintained the positive rating outlook.
On February 28, 2018, Fitch removed Mississippi Power from rating watch negative and revised its rating outlook from stable to
positive.
Also on February 28, 2018, Fitch downgraded the senior unsecured long-term debt rating of Southern Company to BBB+ from A-
with a stable outlook and of Georgia Power to A from A+ with a negative outlook. On August 9, 2018, Fitch downgraded the senior
unsecured long-term debt rating of Georgia Power to A- from A.
On March 14, 2018, S&P upgraded the senior unsecured long-term debt rating of Mississippi Power to A- from BBB+. The outlook
remained negative.
On August 8, 2018, Moody's downgraded the senior unsecured debt rating of Georgia Power to Baa1 from A3.
On September 28, 2018, Moody's revised its rating outlooks for Southern Company, Alabama Power, and Georgia Power from
negative to stable.
Also on September 28, 2018, Fitch assigned a negative rating outlook to the ratings of Southern Company and its subsidiaries
(excluding Mississippi Power).
As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, certain financial metrics, such as the funds from operations to debt percentage, used by
the credit rating agencies to assess Southern Company and its subsidiaries may be negatively impacted. Southern Company and
most of its regulated subsidiaries have taken actions to mitigate the resulting impacts, which, among other alternatives, include
adjusting capital structure. Absent actions by Southern Company and its subsidiaries that fully mitigate the impacts, the credit
ratings of Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries could be negatively affected. See Note 2 to the financial statements for
additional information related to state PSC or other regulatory agency actions related to the Tax Reform Legislation, including
approvals of capital structure adjustments for Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Atlanta Gas Light by their respective state PSCs,
which are expected to help mitigate the potential adverse impacts to certain of their credit metrics.
Market Price Risk
The Southern Company system is exposed to market risks, including commodity price risk, interest rate risk, weather risk, and
occasionally foreign currency exchange rate risk. To manage the volatility attributable to these exposures, the applicable company
nets the exposures, where possible, to take advantage of natural offsets and enters into various derivative transactions for the
remaining exposures pursuant to the applicable company's policies in areas such as counterparty exposure and risk management
practices. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas operations use various contracts in its commercial activities that generally meet
the definition of derivatives. For the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas' other
businesses, each company's policy is that derivatives are to be used primarily for hedging purposes and mandates strict adherence
to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative positions are monitored using techniques including, but not limited to,
market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity analysis.
II-64
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
To mitigate future exposure to a change in interest rates, Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries enter into derivatives
that have been designated as hedges. Derivatives that have been designated as hedges outstanding at December 31, 2018 have a
notional amount of $2.0 billion and are intended to mitigate interest rate volatility related to existing fixed rate obligations. The
weighted average interest rate on $5.8 billion of long-term variable interest rate exposure at December 31, 2018 was 3.02%. If
Southern Company sustained a 100 basis point change in interest rates for all long-term variable interest rate exposure, the change
would affect annualized interest expense by approximately $58 million at December 31, 2018. See Note 1 to the financial
statements under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
Southern Power Company had foreign currency denominated debt of €1.1 billion at December 31, 2018. Southern Power Company
has mitigated its exposure to foreign currency exchange rate risk through the use of foreign currency swaps converting all interest
and principal payments to fixed-rate U.S. dollars.
Due to cost-based rate regulation and other various cost recovery mechanisms, the traditional electric operating companies and
natural gas distribution utilities continue to have limited exposure to market volatility in interest rates, foreign currency exchange
rates, commodity fuel prices, and prices of electricity. In addition, Southern Power's exposure to market volatility in commodity
fuel prices and prices of electricity is limited because its long-term sales contracts shift substantially all fuel cost responsibility to
the purchaser. However, Southern Power has been and may continue to be exposed to market volatility in energy-related
commodity prices as a result of uncontracted generating capacity. To mitigate residual risks relative to movements in electricity
prices, the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power may enter into physical fixed-price contracts for the
purchase and sale of electricity through the wholesale electricity market and, to a lesser extent, financial hedge contracts for natural
gas purchases; however, a significant portion of contracts are priced at market. The traditional electric operating companies and
certain of the natural gas distribution utilities manage fuel-hedging programs implemented per the guidelines of their respective
state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies. Southern Company had no material change in market risk exposure for the
year ended December 31, 2018 when compared to the year ended December 31, 2017.
The changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts are substantially attributable to both the volume and the price of
natural gas. For the years ended December 31, the changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts, the majority of
which are composed of regulatory hedges, were as follows:
 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Contracts outstanding at the beginning of the period, assets (liabilities), net $ (163) $ 41
Contracts realized or settled 93 (8)
Current period changes(a)(131) (196)
Contracts outstanding at the end of the period, assets (liabilities), net(b)(c)$ (201) $ (163)
(a)Current period changes also include the changes in fair value of new contracts entered into during the period, if any.
(b)Excludes premium and intrinsic value associated with weather derivatives of $8 million and $11 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
(c)Includes $6 million of net liabilities related to Gulf Power. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for
information regarding the sale of Gulf Power on January 1, 2019.
The net hedge volumes of energy-related derivative contracts were 431 million mmBtu and 621 million mmBtu at December 31,
2018 and 2017, respectively.
For the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power, the weighted average swap contract cost above market prices
was approximately $0.12 per mmBtu at December 31, 2018 and $0.15 per mmBtu at December 31, 2017. The majority of the
natural gas hedge gains and losses are recovered through the traditional electric operating companies' fuel cost recovery clauses.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, a portion of the Southern Company system's energy-related derivative contracts were designated
as regulatory hedges and were related to the applicable company's fuel-hedging program. Therefore, gains and losses are initially
recorded as regulatory liabilities and assets, respectively, and then are included in fuel expense as they are recovered through the
energy cost recovery clause. Certain other gains and losses on energy-related derivatives, designated as cash flow hedges, are
initially deferred in OCI before being recognized in income in the same period as the hedged transaction. Gains and losses on
energy-related derivative contracts that are not designated or fail to qualify as hedges are recognized in the statements of income as
incurred. See Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
The Southern Company system uses exchange-traded market-observable contracts, which are categorized as Level 1 of the fair
value hierarchy, and over-the-counter contracts that are not exchange traded but are fair valued using prices which are market
II-65
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
observable, and thus fall into Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. See Note 13 to the financial statements for further discussion of
fair value measurements. The maturities of the energy-related derivative contracts at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements
 December 31, 2018
 Total
Fair ValueMaturity
 Year 1 Years 2&3 Years 4&5
 (in millions)
Level 1 $ (179)$ (59)$ (86)$ (34)
Level 2 (22) 20 (17) (25)
Level 3 — — — —
Fair value of contracts outstanding at end of period$ (201)$ (39)$ (103)$ (59)
The Southern Company system is exposed to market price risk in the event of nonperformance by counterparties to energy-related
and interest rate derivative contracts. The Southern Company system only enters into agreements and material transactions with
counterparties that have investment grade credit ratings by Moody's and S&P, or with counterparties who have posted collateral to
cover potential credit exposure. Therefore, the Southern Company system does not anticipate market risk exposure from
nonperformance by the counterparties. For additional information, see Note 1 to the financial statements under "Financial
Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements.
With the exception of Southern Company Gas' subsidiary, Atlanta Gas Light, and the Southern Company Gas wholesale gas
services business, the Southern Company system is not exposed to concentrations of credit risk. Concentration of credit risk occurs
at Atlanta Gas Light for amounts billed for services and other costs to its customers, which consist of 15 Marketers in Georgia
responsible for the retail sale of natural gas to end-use customers in Georgia. For 2018, the four largest Marketers based on
customer count, which includes SouthStar, accounted for 20% of Southern Company Gas' adjusted operating margin. Southern
Company Gas' wholesale gas services business has a concentration of credit risk for services it provides to its counterparties as
measured by its 30-day receivable exposure plus forward exposure. At December 31, 2018, Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas
services business' top 20 counterparties represented approximately 48%, or $298 million, of its total counterparty exposure and had
a weighted average S&P equivalent credit rating of A-, all of which is consistent with the prior year.
Southern Company performs periodic reviews of its leveraged lease transactions, both domestic and international, and the
creditworthiness of the lessees, including a review of the value of the underlying leased assets and the credit ratings of the lessees.
Southern Company's domestic lease transactions generally do not have any credit enhancement mechanisms; however, the lessees
in its international lease transactions have pledged various deposits as additional security to secure the obligations. The lessees in
Southern Company's international lease transactions are also required to provide additional collateral in the event of a credit
downgrade below a certain level.
Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations
The Southern Company system's construction program is currently estimated to total approximately $8.0 billion for 2019, $7.7
billion for 2020, $6.7 billion for 2021, $6.3 billion for 2022, and $6.0 billion for 2023. These amounts include expenditures of
approximately $1.5 billion, $1.2 billion, $1.0 billion, and $0.5 billion for the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in 2019,
2020, 2021, and 2022, respectively. These amounts do not include up to approximately $0.5 billion per year on average for 2019
through 2023 for Southern Power's planned expenditures for plant acquisitions and placeholder growth. These amounts also include
capital expenditures related to contractual purchase commitments for nuclear fuel and capital expenditures covered under LTSAs.
Estimated capital expenditures to comply with environmental laws and regulations included in these amounts are $0.5 billion, $0.2
billion, $0.3 billion, $0.3 billion, and $0.2 billion for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023, respectively. These estimated expenditures
do not include any potential compliance costs associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions from fossil fuel-fired electric
generating units. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations" and
" – Global Climate Issues" herein for additional information.
The traditional electric operating companies also anticipate costs associated with closure and monitoring of ash ponds in
accordance with the CCR Rule, which are reflected in Southern Company's ARO liabilities. These costs, which are expected to
change and could change materially as underlying assumptions are refined and the cost and the method and timing of compliance
activities continue to be evaluated, are currently estimated to be approximately $0.5 billion, $0.5 billion, $0.7 billion, $0.9 billion,
and $0.9 billion for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023, respectively. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental
II-66
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for
additional information.
The construction programs are subject to periodic review and revision, and actual construction costs may vary from these estimates
because of numerous factors. These factors include: changes in business conditions; changes in load projections; changes in
environmental laws and regulations; the outcome of any legal challenges to environmental rules; changes in electric generating
plants, including unit retirements and replacements and adding or changing fuel sources at existing electric generating units, to
meet regulatory requirements; changes in FERC rules and regulations; state regulatory agency approvals; changes in the expected
environmental compliance program; changes in legislation; the cost and efficiency of construction labor, equipment, and materials;
project scope and design changes; storm impacts; and the cost of capital. In addition, there can be no assurance that costs related to
capital expenditures will be fully recovered. Additionally, planned expenditures for plant acquisitions may vary due to market
opportunities and Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Power" for additional information regarding Southern Power's plant acquisitions.
The construction program also includes Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which includes components based on new technology that only
recently began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale and which may be subject to additional revised cost
estimates during construction. The ability to control costs and avoid cost and schedule overruns during the development,
construction, and operation of new facilities is subject to a number of factors, including, but not limited to, changes in labor costs,
availability, and productivity; challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, or vendors; adverse weather conditions;
shortages, increased costs, or inconsistent quality of equipment, materials, and labor; contractor or supplier delay; non-performance
under construction, operating, or other agreements; operational readiness, including specialized operator training and required site
safety programs; engineering or design problems; design and other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely
resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC; challenges with start-up activities, including major equipment failure
and system integration; and/or operational performance. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear
Construction" for information regarding Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 and additional factors that may impact construction
expenditures.
As a result of NRC requirements, Alabama Power and Georgia Power have external trust funds for nuclear decommissioning costs;
however, Alabama Power currently has no additional funding requirements. For additional information, see Note 6 to the financial
statements under "Nuclear Decommissioning."
In addition, as discussed in Note 11 to the financial statements, the Southern Company system provides postretirement benefits to
the majority of its employees and funds trusts to the extent required by PSCs, other applicable state regulatory agencies, or the
FERC.
Funding requirements related to obligations associated with scheduled maturities of long-term debt, as well as the related interest,
derivative obligations, preferred stock dividends of subsidiaries, leases, pipeline charges, storage capacity, gas supply, asset
management agreements, other purchase commitments, ARO settlements, and trusts are detailed in the contractual obligations table
that follows. See Notes 1, 6, 8, 9, 11, and 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
II-67
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Contractual Obligations
The Southern Company system's contractual obligations at December 31, 2018 (excluding Gulf Power) were as follows:
 2019  2020-
2021  2022-
2023 After 2023 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt(a) —     
Principal $ 3,133 $ 7,204 $ 4,354 $28,950 $43,641
Interest 1,668 3,082 2,270 25,796 32,816
Preferred stock dividends of subsidiaries(b)15 29 29 — 73
Financial derivative obligations(c)610 243 109 — 962
Operating leases(d)156 244 177 1,040 1,617
Capital leases(d)25 22 8 143 198
Pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas
supply(e)781 1,104 901 1,871 4,657
Asset management agreements(f)10 8 — — 18
Purchase commitments —    
Capital(g)7,600 13,608 11,486 — 32,694
Fuel(h)3,168 3,854 1,863 5,862 14,747
Purchased power(i)304 653 545 2,494 3,996
Other(j)328 642 464 2,265 3,699
ARO settlements(k)451 1,186 1,841 — 3,478
Trusts —    
Nuclear decommissioning(l)5 11 11 88 115
Pension and other postretirement benefit
plans(m)137 265 — — 402
Total $18,391 $32,155 $24,058 $68,509 $143,113
(a)All amounts are reflected based on final maturity dates except for amounts related to FFB borrowings and certain revenue bonds. As it relates to the FFB
borrowings, the final maturity date is February 20, 2044; however, principal amortization is reflected beginning in 2020. See Note 8 to the financial statements
under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" and "Securities Due Within One Year" for additional information. Southern Company and its
subsidiaries plan to continue, when economically feasible, to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with lower-cost capital if market
conditions permit. Variable rate interest obligations are estimated based on rates at December 31, 2018, as reflected in the statements of capitalization. Fixed
rates include, where applicable, the effects of interest rate derivatives employed to manage interest rate risk. Long-term debt excludes capital lease amounts
(shown separately).
(b)Represents preferred stock of Alabama Power. Preferred stock does not mature; therefore, amounts are provided for the next five years only.
(c)See Notes 1 and 14 to the financial statements.
(d)Excludes PPAs that are accounted for as leases and included in "Purchased power."
(e)Includes charges recoverable through a natural gas cost recovery mechanism, or alternatively billed to Marketers selling retail natural gas, and demand charges
associated with Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services. The gas supply balance includes amounts for gas commodity purchase commitments associated
with Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services of 47 million mmBtu at floating gas prices calculated using forward natural gas prices at December 31,
2018 and valued at $150 million. Southern Company Gas provides guarantees to certain gas suppliers for certain of its subsidiaries in support of payment
obligations.
(f)Represents fixed-fee minimum payments for asset management agreements associated with wholesale gas services.
(g)The Southern Company system provides estimated capital expenditures for a five-year period, including capital expenditures associated with environmental
regulations. These amounts exclude contractual purchase commitments for nuclear fuel, capital expenditures covered under LTSAs, and estimated capital
expenditures for AROs, which are reflected in "Fuel," "Other," and "ARO settlements," respectively. These amounts also exclude up to approximately $0.5
billion per year on average for 2019 through 2023 for Southern Power's planned expenditures for plant acquisitions and placeholder growth. At December 31,
2018, significant purchase commitments were outstanding in connection with the construction program. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations" and "Construction Programs" herein for additional information.
(h)Primarily includes commitments to purchase coal, nuclear fuel, and natural gas, as well as the related transportation and storage. In most cases, these contracts
contain provisions for price escalation, minimum purchase levels, and other financial commitments. Natural gas purchase commitments are based on various
indices at the time of delivery. Amounts reflected for natural gas purchase commitments have been estimated based on the NYMEX future prices at
December 31, 2018.
(i)Estimated minimum long-term obligations for various PPA purchases from gas-fired, biomass, and wind-powered facilities and capacity payments related to
Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2. See Note 9 to the financial statements under "Fuel and Power Purchase Agreements" for additional information.
II-68
    Table of
Contents                                Index to Financial Statements        
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
(j)Includes LTSAs, contracts for the procurement of limestone, contractual environmental remediation liabilities, and operation and maintenance agreements.
LTSAs include price escalation based on inflation indices.
(k)Represents estimated costs for a five-year period associated with closing and monitoring ash ponds in accordance with the CCR Rule and the related state rules,
which are reflected in Southern Company's ARO liabilities. Material expenditures in future years for ARO settlements also will be required for ash ponds,
nuclear decommissioning, and other liabilities reflected in Southern Company's AROs. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters –
Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
(l)Projections of nuclear decommissioning trust fund contributions for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 are based on the 2013 ARP for Georgia Power.
Alabama Power also has external trust funds for nuclear decommissioning costs; however, Alabama Power currently has no additional funding requirements.
See Note 6 to the financial statements under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
(m)The Southern Company system forecasts contributions to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans over a three-year period. Southern Company
anticipates no mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plans during the next three years. Amounts presented represent estimated benefit payments for
the nonqualified pension plans, estimated non-trust benefit payments for the other postretirement benefit plans, and estimated contributions to the other
postretirement benefit plan trusts, all of which will be made from corporate assets of Southern Company's subsidiaries. See Note 11 to the financial statements
for additional information related to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, including estimated benefit payments. Certain benefit payments will be
made through the related benefit plans. Other benefit payments will be made from corporate assets of Southern Company's subsidiaries.
II-69
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
OVERVIEW
Business Activities
Alabama Power operates as a vertically integrated utility providing electric service to retail and wholesale customers within its
traditional service territory located in the State of Alabama in addition to wholesale customers in the Southeast.
Many factors affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of Alabama Power's business of providing electric service. These
factors include the ability to maintain a constructive regulatory environment, to maintain and grow energy sales and customers, and
to effectively manage and secure timely recovery of costs. These costs include those related to projected long-term demand growth,
stringent environmental standards, including CCR rules, reliability, fuel, capital expenditures, including improving the electric
transmission and distribution systems, and restoration following major storms. Alabama Power has various regulatory mechanisms
that operate to address cost recovery. Effectively operating pursuant to these regulatory mechanisms and appropriately balancing
required costs and capital expenditures with customer prices will continue to challenge Alabama Power for the foreseeable future.
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved modifications to Rate RSE and other commitments designed to position Alabama
Power to address the retail rate impact and the growing pressure on its credit quality resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation. See
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters" and FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Credit
Rating Risk" herein for additional information.
Alabama Power continues to focus on several key performance indicators including, but not limited to, customer satisfaction, plant
availability, system reliability, and net income after dividends on preferred stock. Alabama Power's financial success is directly tied
to customer satisfaction. Key elements of ensuring customer satisfaction include outstanding service, high reliability, and
competitive prices. Management uses customer satisfaction surveys to evaluate Alabama Power's results and generally targets the
top quartile of these surveys in measuring performance.
See RESULTS OF OPERATIONS herein for information on Alabama Power's financial performance.
Earnings
Alabama Power's 2018 net income after dividends on preferred and preference stock was $930 million, representing an $82 million,
or 9.7%, increase over the previous year. The increase was primarily due to a decrease in income tax expense, partially offset by a
decrease in retail revenues associated with customer bill credits related to the Tax Reform Legislation. The increase also reflects an
increase in revenues associated with colder weather in the first quarter 2018 and warmer weather in the second and third quarters
2018 compared to the corresponding periods in 2017, partially offset by an accrual for a Rate RSE refund. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters – Rate RSE" herein for additional information.
Alabama Power's 2017 net income after dividends on preferred and preference stock was $848 million, representing a $26 million,
or 3.2%, increase over the previous year. The increase was primarily due to an increase in rates under Rate RSE effective in January
2017 and the impact of a Rate RSE refund recorded in 2016. These increases to income were partially offset by a decrease in retail
revenues associated with milder weather, lower customer usage, and an increase in non-fuel operations and maintenance expenses
in 2017 as compared to 2016. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters – Rate RSE" herein for
additional information.
II-70
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
A condensed income statement for Alabama Power follows:
 AmountIncrease (Decrease)
from Prior Year
 2018 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 6,032 $ (7) $ 150
Fuel 1,301 76 (72)
Purchased power 432 104 (6)
Other operations and maintenance 1,669 (40) 152
Depreciation and amortization 764 28 33
Taxes other than income taxes 389 5 4
Total operating expenses 4,555 173 111
Operating income 1,477 (180) 39
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 62 23 11
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 323 18 3
Other income (expense), net 20 (23) 17
Income taxes 291 (277) 37
Net income 945 79 27
Dividends on preferred and preference stock 15 (3) 1
Net income after dividends on preferred and preference stock $ 930 $ 82 $ 26
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2018 were $6.0 billion, reflecting a $7 million decrease from 2017. Details of operating revenues were as
follows:
 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Retail — prior year $ 5,458 $ 5,322
Estimated change resulting from —   
Rates and pricing (354) 362
Sales decline (10) (44)
Weather 137 (89)
Fuel and other cost recovery 136 (93)
Retail — current year 5,367 5,458
Wholesale revenues —   
Non-affiliates 279 276
Affiliates 119 97
Total wholesale revenues 398 373
Other operating revenues 267 208
Total operating revenues $ 6,032 $ 6,039
Percent change (0.1)% 2.6%
Retail revenues in 2018 were $5.4 billion. These revenues decreased $91 million, or 1.7%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year.
The decrease in 2018 was primarily due to customer bill credits related to the Tax Reform Legislation and an accrual for a Rate
RSE refund, partially offset by an increase in fuel revenues and colder weather in the first quarter and warmer weather in the
second and third quarters 2018 as compared to the corresponding periods in 2017.
II-71
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Retail revenues in 2017 were $5.5 billion. These revenues increased $136 million, or 2.6%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year.
The increase in 2017 was primarily due to an increase in rates under Rate RSE effective in January 2017, partially offset by a
decrease in fuel revenues and milder weather in the first and third quarters 2017 as compared to the corresponding periods in 2016.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate RSE" for additional information. See "Energy Sales" herein
for a discussion of changes in the volume of energy sold, including changes related to sales decline and weather.
Electric rates include provisions to recognize the recovery of fuel costs, purchased power costs, PPAs certificated by the Alabama
PSC, and costs associated with the natural disaster reserve. Under these provisions, fuel and other cost recovery revenues generally
equal fuel and other cost recovery expenses and do not affect net income. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail
Regulatory Matters – Rate ECR" herein for additional information.
Wholesale revenues from power sales to non-affiliated utilities were as follows:
 2018 2017  2016
 (in millions)
Capacity and other $ 101 $ 96 $ 93
Energy 178 180 190
Total non-affiliated $ 279 $ 276 $ 283
Wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates will vary depending on fuel prices, the market prices of wholesale energy compared
to the cost of Alabama Power's and the Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company
system's electric service territory, and availability of the Southern Company system's generation. Increases and decreases in energy
revenues that are driven by fuel prices are accompanied by an increase or decrease in fuel costs and do not affect net income. Short-
term opportunity energy sales are also included in wholesale energy sales to non-affiliates. These opportunity sales are made at
market-based rates that generally provide a margin above Alabama Power's variable cost to produce the energy.
In 2018, wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates increased $3 million, or 1.1%, as compared to the prior year. In 2017,
wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates decreased $7 million, or 2.5%, as compared to the prior year.
Wholesale revenues from sales to affiliated companies will vary depending on demand and the availability and cost of generating
resources at each company. These affiliate sales and purchases are made in accordance with the IIC, as approved by the FERC.
These transactions do not have a significant impact on earnings since this energy is generally sold at marginal cost and energy
purchases are generally offset by energy revenues through Alabama Power's energy cost recovery clause.
In 2018, wholesale revenues from sales to affiliates increased $22 million, or 22.7%, as compared to the prior year. In 2018, the
price of energy increased 12.3% as a result of higher natural gas prices and KWH sales increased 10.0% primarily due to an
increase in hydro generation. In 2017, wholesale revenues from sales to affiliates increased $28 million, or 40.6%, as compared to
the prior year. In 2017, KWH sales increased 31.1% as a result of supporting Southern Company system transmission reliability
and a 6.9% increase in the price of energy primarily due to higher natural gas prices.
In 2018, other operating revenues increased $59 million, or 28.4%, as compared to the prior year primarily due to revenues related
to unregulated sales of products and services that were reclassified as other revenues as a result of the adoption of ASC 606,
Revenue from Contracts with Customers (ASC 606). In prior periods, these revenues were included in other income (expense), net.
See Note 1 to the financial statements for additional information regarding Alabama Power's adoption of ASC 606. This increase
was partially offset by decreases in open access transmission tariff revenues primarily due to a lower rate related to the Tax Reform
Legislation.
II-72
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Energy Sales
Changes in revenues are influenced heavily by the change in the volume of energy sold from year to year. KWH sales for 2018 and
the percent change from the prior year were as follows:
 Total
KWHs Total KWH
Percent ChangeWeather-Adjusted
Percent Change
 2018  2018  2017 2018  2017
 (in billions)    
Residential 18.6 8.2% (6.1)% (0.4)% (1.2)%
Commercial 13.9 1.9 (3.4) (1.0) (1.3)
Industrial 23.0 1.4 1.7 1.4  1.7
Other 0.2 (5.7) (5.0) (5.7) (5.0)
Total retail 55.7 3.7 (2.3) 0.2 % (0.1)%
Wholesale      
Non-affiliates 5.0 (8.7) (6.5)  
Affiliates 4.6 9.6 31.1  
Total wholesale 9.6 (0.9) 6.6  
Total energy sales 65.3 3.0% (1.0)%  
Changes in retail energy sales are generally the result of changes in electricity usage by customers, changes in weather, and changes
in the number of customers. Retail energy sales in 2018 were 3.7% higher than in 2017. Residential sales and commercial sales
increased 8.2% and 1.9% in 2018, respectively, primarily due to colder weather in the first quarter and warmer weather in the
second and third quarters 2018 as compared to the corresponding periods in 2017. Weather-adjusted residential sales were 0.4%
lower in 2018 primarily due to lower customer usage resulting from an increase in penetration of energy-efficient residential
appliances. Weather-adjusted commercial sales were 1.0% lower in 2018 primarily due to lower customer usage resulting from
customer initiatives in energy savings and an ongoing migration to the electronic commerce business model. Industrial sales
increased 1.4% in 2018 as compared to 2017 as a result of an increase in demand resulting from changes in production levels
primarily in the primary metals, pipelines, and mining sectors offset by the paper sector.
Retail energy sales in 2017 were 2.3% lower than in 2016. Residential sales and commercial sales decreased 6.1% and 3.4% in
2017, respectively, primarily due to milder weather in the first and third quarters 2017 as compared to the corresponding periods in
2016. Weather-adjusted residential sales were 1.2% lower in 2017 primarily due to lower customer usage resulting from an increase
in penetration of energy-efficient residential appliances, partially offset by customer growth. Weather-adjusted commercial sales
were 1.3% lower in 2017 primarily due to lower customer usage resulting from customer initiatives in energy savings and an
ongoing migration to the electronic commerce business model, partially offset by customer growth. Industrial sales increased 1.7%
in 2017 as compared to 2016 as a result of an increase in demand resulting from changes in production levels primarily in the
primary metals, chemicals, and mining sectors offset by the pipelines and paper sectors.
See "Operating Revenues" above for a discussion of significant changes in wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates and
wholesale revenues from sales to affiliated companies related to changes in price and KWH sales.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
The mix of fuel sources for generation of electricity is determined primarily by the unit cost of fuel consumed, demand, and the
availability of generating units. Additionally, Alabama Power purchases a portion of its electricity needs from the wholesale market.
II-73
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Details of Alabama Power's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 2018 2017  2016
Total generation (in billions of KWHs) 60.5 60.3 60.2
Total purchased power (in billions of KWHs) 8.1 6.4 7.1
Sources of generation (percent) —   
Coal 50 50 53
Nuclear 23 24 23
Gas 19 20 19
Hydro 8 6 5
Cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)  —   
Coal 2.73 2.60 2.75
Nuclear 0.77 0.75 0.78
Gas 2.84 2.72 2.67
Average cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)(a)(b)2.26 2.14 2.26
Average cost of purchased power (in cents per net KWH)(c)5.47 5.29 4.80
(a)For 2018, cost of fuel, generated and average cost of fuel, generated excludes a $30 million adjustment associated with a May 2018 Alabama PSC
accounting order related to excess deferred income taxes. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters – Tax Reform Accounting
Order" herein for additional information.
(b)KWHs generated by hydro are excluded from the average cost of fuel, generated.
(c)Average cost of purchased power includes fuel, energy, and transmission purchased by Alabama Power for tolling agreements where power is generated by
the provider.
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $1.73 billion in 2018, an increase of $180 million, or 11.6%, compared to 2017. The
increase was primarily due to an $81 million net increase related to the volume of KWHs purchased and generated, a $54 million
increase in the average cost of fuel, and a $15 million increase in the average cost of purchased power.
In addition, fuel expense increased $30 million in 2018 as a result of an Alabama PSC accounting order authorizing the
amortization of a regulatory liability to offset under recovered fuel costs. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail
Regulatory Matters – Tax Reform Accounting Order" herein for additional information.
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $1.55 billion in 2017, a decrease of $78 million, or 4.8%, compared to 2016. The
decrease was primarily due to a $67 million net decrease related to the volume of KWHs generated and purchased and a $42
million decrease in the average cost of fuel, partially offset by a $31 million increase in the average cost of purchased power.
Fuel and purchased power energy transactions do not have a significant impact on earnings, since energy expenses are generally
offset by energy revenues through Alabama Power's energy cost recovery clause. Alabama Power, along with the Alabama PSC,
continuously monitors the under/over recovered balance to determine whether adjustments to billing rates are required. See Note 2
to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate ECR" for additional information.
Fuel
Fuel expenses were $1.3 billion in 2018, an increase of $76 million, or 6.2%, compared to 2017. The increase was primarily due to
a 5.0% increase in the average cost of KWHs generated by coal and a 4.4% increase in the average cost of KWHs generated by
natural gas, which excludes tolling agreements. These increases were partially offset by a 28.3% increase in the volume of KWHs
generated by hydro and a 2.1% decrease in the volume of KWHs generated by natural gas. Fuel expenses were $1.2 billion in 2017,
a decrease of $72 million, or 5.6%, compared to 2016. The decrease was primarily due to a 12.2% increase in the volume of KWHs
generated by hydro, a 5.8% decrease in the volume of KWHs generated by coal, and a 5.5% and 3.9% decrease in the average cost
of KWHs generated by coal and nuclear fuel, respectively. These decreases were partially offset by an 8.1% increase in the volume
of KWHs generated by nuclear fuel and a 4.0% increase in the volume of KWHs generated by natural gas.
In addition, fuel expense increased $30 million in 2018 as a result of an Alabama PSC accounting order authorizing the
amortization of a regulatory liability to offset under recovered fuel costs. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail
Regulatory Matters – Tax Reform Accounting Order" herein for additional information.
II-74
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Purchased Power – Non-Affiliates
Purchased power expense from non-affiliates was $216 million in 2018, an increase of $46 million, or 27.1%, compared to 2017.
This increase was primarily due to an 18.9% increase in the amount of energy purchased due to colder weather in the first quarter
and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 as compared to the corresponding periods in 2017 and a 6.6% increase in
the average cost per KWH purchased due to higher natural gas prices. Purchased power expense from non-affiliates was $170
million in 2017, an increase of $4 million, or 2.4%, compared to 2016.
Energy purchases from non-affiliates will vary depending on the market prices of wholesale energy as compared to the cost of the
Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company system's service territory, and the
availability of the Southern Company system's generation.
Purchased Power – Affiliates
Purchased power expense from affiliates was $216 million in 2018, an increase of $58 million, or 36.7%, compared to 2017. This
increase was primarily due to a 34.5% increase in the amount of energy purchased due to colder weather in the first quarter and
warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 as compared to the corresponding periods in 2017 and a 1.4% increase in the
average cost per KWH purchased due to higher natural gas prices. Purchased power expense from affiliates was $158 million in
2017, a decrease of $10 million, or 6.0%, compared to 2016. This decrease was primarily due to a 17.2% decrease in the amount of
energy purchased due to milder weather partially offset by a 13.9% increase in the average cost per KWH purchased due to higher
natural gas prices.
Energy purchases from affiliates will vary depending on demand for energy and the availability and cost of generating resources at
each company within the Southern Company system. These purchases are made in accordance with the IIC or other contractual
agreements, as approved by the FERC.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
In 2018, other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $40 million, or 2.3%, as compared to the prior year. Generation
costs decreased $34 million primarily due to fewer outages resulting in lower costs. Employee benefit costs, including pension
costs, decreased $26 million primarily due to lower active medical costs. Customer service costs decreased $10 million primarily
due to cost-saving initiatives. These decreases were partially offset by a $47 million increase in expenses from unregulated sales of
products and services that were reclassified as other operations and maintenance expenses as a result of the adoption of ASC 606.
In prior periods, these expenses were included in other income (expense), net. See Note 1 to the financial statements under
"Revenue" for additional information.
In 2017, other operations and maintenance expenses increased $152 million, or 9.8%, as compared to the prior year. Distribution
and transmission expenses increased $58 million primarily due to vegetation management expenses. Generation costs increased $38
million primarily due to outage costs. Employee benefit costs, including pension costs, increased $32 million.
See Note 11 to the financial statements under "Pension Plans" for additional information.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization increased $28 million, or 3.8%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year primarily due to additional
plant in service related to distribution, transmission, compliance-related steam, and other generation production projects.
Depreciation and amortization increased $33 million, or 4.7%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to additional
plant in service and an increase in generation-related depreciation rates, effective January 1, 2017, associated with compliance-
related steam projects and ARO recovery, partially offset by a decrease in distribution-related depreciation rates. See Note 5 to the
financial statements under "Depreciation and Amortization" for additional information.
Allowance for Equity Funds Used During Construction
AFUDC equity increased $23 million, or 59.0%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily associated with
steam and transmission construction projects. AFUDC equity increased $11 million, or 39.3%, in 2017 as compared to the prior
year. The increase was primarily associated with steam, transmission, and nuclear construction projects. See Note 1 to financial
statements under "Allowance for Funds Used During Construction" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized increased $18 million, or 5.9%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year primarily due to
an increase in debt outstanding and higher interest rates, partially offset by an increase in the amounts capitalized. Interest
II-75
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
expense, net of amounts capitalized increased $3 million, or 1.0%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Financing Activities" herein for additional information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net decreased $23 million, or 53.5%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year primarily due to an increase in
charitable donations and the reclassification of revenues and expenses associated with unregulated sales of products and services to
other revenues and operations and maintenance expenses, respectively, as a result of the adoption of ASC 606. See Note 1 to the
financial statements under "Revenue" for additional information. Other income (expense), net increased $17 million, or 65.4%, in
2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to increases in unregulated lighting services and a decrease in the non-service cost
components of net periodic pension and other postretirement benefits costs. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently
Adopted Accounting Standards" and Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information on net periodic pension and
other postretirement benefit costs.
Income Taxes
Income taxes decreased $277 million, or 48.8%, in 2018 as compared to the prior year primarily due to the reduction in the federal
income tax rate, the benefit from the flowback of excess deferred income taxes as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, and lower
pre-tax earnings. Income taxes increased $37 million, or 7.0%, in 2017 as compared to the prior year primarily due to higher pre-
tax earnings, an increase related to prior year tax return actualization, and an increase in income tax reserves, partially offset by an
increase in state income tax credits. The impact to net income as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation was not material due to the
application of regulatory accounting. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters – Federal Tax Reform
Legislation" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Effects of Inflation
Alabama Power is subject to rate regulation that is generally based on the recovery of historical and projected costs. The effects of
inflation can create an economic loss since the recovery of costs could be in dollars that have less purchasing power. Any adverse
effect of inflation on Alabama Power's results of operations has not been substantial in recent years. See Note 2 to the financial
statements under "Alabama Power – Rate RSE" for additional information.
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
General
Alabama Power operates as a vertically integrated utility providing electric service to retail and wholesale customers within its
traditional service territory located in the State of Alabama and to wholesale customers in the Southeast. Prices for electric service
provided by Alabama Power to retail customers are set by the Alabama PSC under cost-based regulatory principles. Retail rates and
earnings are reviewed and may be adjusted periodically within certain limitations. Prices for wholesale electric service,
interconnecting transmission lines, and the exchange of electric power are regulated by the FERC. See ACCOUNTING POLICIES
– "Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates – Utility Regulation" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements
under "Alabama Power" for additional information about regulatory matters.
The results of operations for the past three years are not necessarily indicative of future earnings potential. The level of Alabama
Power's future earnings depends on numerous factors that affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of Alabama Power's
primary business of providing electric service. These factors include Alabama Power's ability to maintain a constructive regulatory
environment that continues to allow for the timely recovery of prudently-incurred costs during a time of increasing costs and the
weak pace of growth in new customers and electricity use per customer, especially in residential and commercial markets. Earnings
will also depend upon maintaining and growing sales, considering, among other things, the adoption and/or penetration rates of
increasingly energy-efficient technologies and increasing volumes of electronic commerce transactions, both of which could
contribute to a net reduction in customer usage. Earnings are subject to a variety of other factors. These factors include weather,
competition, new energy contracts with other utilities, energy conservation practiced by customers, the use of alternative energy
sources by customers, the price of electricity, the price elasticity of demand, and the rate of economic growth or decline in Alabama
Power's service territory. Demand for electricity is primarily driven by the pace of economic growth that may be affected by
changes in regional and global economic conditions, which may impact future earnings.
II-76
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Environmental Matters
Alabama Power's operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and regulations
governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Alabama Power maintains comprehensive environmental
compliance and GHG strategies to assess upcoming requirements and compliance costs associated with these environmental laws
and regulations. The costs, including capital expenditures, operations and maintenance costs, and costs reflected in ARO liabilities,
required to comply with environmental laws and regulations and to achieve stated goals may impact future electric generating unit
retirement and replacement decisions, results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition. Related costs may result from
the installation of additional environmental controls, closure and monitoring of CCR facilities, unit retirements, or changing fuel
sources for certain existing units, as well as related upgrades to Alabama Power's transmission and distribution systems. A major
portion of these costs is expected to be recovered through existing ratemaking provisions. The ultimate impact of environmental
laws and regulations and the GHG goals discussed herein will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation
of requirements, the availability and cost of any deployed technology, fuel prices, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal
challenges.
New or revised environmental laws and regulations could affect many areas of Alabama Power's operations. The impact of any
such changes cannot be determined at this time. Environmental compliance costs could affect earnings if such costs cannot
continue to be recovered in rates on a timely basis. Environmental compliance costs are recovered through Rate CNP Compliance.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate CNP Compliance" for additional information. Further,
increased costs that are recovered through regulated rates could contribute to reduced demand for electricity, which could
negatively affect results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition. Additionally, many commercial and industrial
customers may also be affected by existing and future environmental requirements, which for some may have the potential to
ultimately affect their demand for electricity.
Through 2018, Alabama Power has invested approximately $5.4 billion in environmental capital retrofit projects to comply with
environmental requirements, with annual totals of approximately $681 million, $491 million, and $260 million for 2018, 2017, and
2016, respectively. Although the timing, requirements, and estimated costs could change as environmental laws and regulations are
adopted or modified, as compliance plans are revised or updated, and as legal challenges to rules are initiated or completed,
Alabama Power's current compliance strategy estimates capital expenditures of $635 million from 2019 through 2023, with annual
totals of approximately $226 million in 2019, $68 million in 2020, $118 million in 2021, $112 million in 2022, and $111 million in
2023. These estimates do not include any potential compliance costs associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions from
fossil fuel-fired electric generating units. See "Global Climate Issues" herein for additional information. Alabama Power also
anticipates substantial expenditures associated with ash pond closure and ground water monitoring under the CCR Rule, which are
reflected in Alabama Power's ARO liabilities. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and
Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Environmental Laws and Regulations
Air Quality
The EPA has set National Ambient Air Quality Standards (NAAQS) for six air pollutants (carbon monoxide, lead, nitrogen dioxide,
ozone, particulate matter, and SO2) to protect and improve the nation's air quality, which it reviews and revises periodically.
Following a NAAQS revision, states are required to develop an EPA-approved plan to protect air quality. These state plans can
require additional emission controls, improvements in control efficiency, or fuel changes which can result in increased compliance
and operational costs. NAAQS requirements can also adversely affect the siting of new electric generating facilities. No areas
within Alabama Power's service territory are currently designated nonattainment for any NAAQS. If areas are designated as
nonattainment in the future, increased compliance costs could result.
In 2011, the EPA finalized the Cross-State Air Pollution Rule (CSAPR) to address impacts of SO2 and NOX emissions from fossil
fuel-fired electric generating plants. CSAPR establishes emissions trading programs and budgets for certain states and allocates
emissions allowances for sources in those states. In 2016, the EPA published a final rule establishing more stringent ozone season
NOX emissions budgets in Alabama. Increases in either future fossil fuel-fired generation or the availability or cost of CSAPR
allowances could have a negative financial impact on results of operations for Alabama Power.
The EPA finalized regional haze regulations in 2005 and 2017. These regulations require states, tribal governments, and various
federal agencies to develop and implement plans to reduce pollutants that impair visibility and demonstrate reasonable progress
toward the goal of restoring natural visibility conditions in certain areas, including national parks and wilderness areas. States must
submit a revised state implementation plan (SIP) to the EPA demonstrating continued reasonable progress towards achieving
visibility improvement goals. The EPA approved the regional progress SIP for the State of Alabama.
II-77
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Water Quality
In 2014, the EPA finalized requirements under Section 316(b) of the Clean Water Act (CWA) to regulate cooling water intake
structures (CWIS) to minimize their effects on fish and other aquatic life at existing power plants (e.g. coal, natural gas, oil, and
nuclear generating plants) and manufacturing facilities. The regulation requires plant-specific studies to determine applicable CWIS
changes to protect organisms that either get caught on the intake screens (impingement) or are drawn into the cooling system
(entrainment). Alabama Power is conducting these studies and currently anticipates applicable CWIS changes may include fish-
friendly CWIS screens with fish return systems and minor additions of monitoring equipment at certain plants. However, the
ultimate impact of this rule will depend on the outcome of these plant-specific studies, any additional protective measures required
to be incorporated into each plant's National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit based on site-specific
factors, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In 2015, the EPA finalized the steam electric effluent limitations guidelines (ELG) rule (2015 ELG Rule) that set national standards
for wastewater discharges from new and existing steam electric generating units generating greater than 50 MWs. The 2015 ELG
Rule prohibits effluent discharges of certain waste streams and imposes stringent limits on flue gas desulfurization (scrubber)
wastewater discharges. The revised technology-based limits and the CCR Rule require extensive changes to existing ash and
wastewater management systems or the installation and operation of new ash and wastewater management systems. Compliance
with the 2015 ELG Rule is expected to require capital expenditures and increased operational costs primarily for Alabama Power's
coal-fired electric generation. State environmental agencies will incorporate specific compliance applicability dates in the NPDES
permitting process for each ELG waste stream no later than December 31, 2023. The EPA is scheduled to issue a new rulemaking
by December 2019 that could revise the limitations and applicability dates of two of the waste streams regulated in the 2015 ELG
Rule. The impact of any changes to the 2015 ELG Rule will depend on the content of the new rule and the outcome of any legal
challenges. Alabama Power does not anticipate that the unavailability of any units as a result of the ELG rule will have a material
impact on Alabama Power's operations or financial condition.
In 2015, the EPA and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers (Corps) jointly published a final rule that revised the regulatory definition
of waters of the United States (WOTUS) for all CWA programs. The rule significantly expanded the scope of federal jurisdiction
over waterbodies (such as rivers, streams, canals, and wastewater treatment ponds), which could impact new generation projects
and permitting and reporting requirements associated with the installation, expansion, and maintenance of transmission and
distribution projects. The EPA and the Corps are expected to publish a final rule in 2019 to replace the 2015 WOTUS definition.
The impact of any changes to the 2015 WOTUS rule will depend on the content of this final rule and the outcome of any legal
challenges.
Coal Combustion Residuals
In 2015, the EPA finalized non-hazardous solid waste regulations for the disposal of CCR, including coal ash and gypsum, in
landfills and surface impoundments (ash ponds) at active generating power plants. In addition to the EPA's CCR Rule, the State of
Alabama has also finalized regulations regarding the handling of CCR that have been provided to the EPA for review. This state
CCR rule is generally consistent with the federal CCR Rule. The EPA's CCR Rule requires landfills and ash ponds to be evaluated
against a set of performance criteria and potentially closed if minimum criteria are not met. Closure of existing landfills and ash
ponds could require installation of equipment and infrastructure to manage CCR in accordance with the CCR Rule. Based on cost
estimates for closure in place and monitoring of ash ponds pursuant to the CCR Rule, Alabama Power recorded AROs for each
CCR unit in 2015. As further analysis was performed and closure details were developed, Alabama Power has continued to
periodically update these cost estimates, as discussed further below.
The EPA published certain amendments to the CCR Rule, which became effective August 29, 2018. These amendments extend the
date from April 2019 to October 31, 2020 to cease sending CCR and other waste streams to ash ponds that demonstrate compliance
with all except two of the specified performance criteria.
On August 21, 2018, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit issued a decision suggesting the EPA should
regulate previously-excluded inactive ash ponds located at retired generation facilities and questioning both the ability of unlined
ash ponds to continue operating no matter the performance criteria results and the classification of clay-lined landfills and ash
ponds. These developments could impact the expected timing of Alabama Power's landfill and ash pond closure activities, but the
extent of any impact will depend on the outcome of ongoing litigation, anticipated EPA rulemaking action to establish further
guidance, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In June 2018, Alabama Power recorded an increase of approximately $1.2 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule. The revised
cost estimates were based on information from feasibility studies performed on ash ponds in use at plants operated by Alabama
Power. During the second quarter 2018, Alabama Power's management completed its analysis of these studies which indicated that
additional closure costs, primarily related to increases in estimated ash volume, water management requirements,
II-78
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
and design revisions, will be required to close these ash ponds under the planned closure-in-place methodology. As the level of
work becomes more defined in the next 12 months, it is likely that these cost estimates will change and the change could be
material.
Alabama Power expects to periodically update its ARO cost estimates. Absent continued recovery of ARO costs through regulated
rates, Alabama Power's results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition could be materially impacted. See FINANCIAL
CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the financial
statements for additional information.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Nuclear Decommissioning
In June 2018, Alabama Power completed an updated decommissioning cost site study for Plant Farley. The estimated cost of
decommissioning based on the study resulted in an increase in Alabama Power's ARO liability of approximately $300 million.
Amounts previously contributed to Alabama Power's external trust funds are currently projected to be adequate to meet the updated
decommissioning obligations. See Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Global Climate Issues
On August 31, 2018, the EPA published a proposed rule known as the Affordable Clean Energy (ACE) Rule, which is intended to
replace a regulation enacted in 2015 known as the Clean Power Plan (CPP), that would limit CO2 emissions from existing fossil
fuel-fired electric generating units. The CPP has been stayed by the U.S. Supreme Court since 2016. The ACE Rule would require
states to develop GHG unit-specific emission rate standards based on heat-rate efficiency improvements for existing fossil fuel-
fired steam units. As proposed, combustion turbines, including natural gas combined cycles, are not affected sources. As of January
1, 2019, Alabama Power has ownership interests in 20 fossil fuel-fired steam units to which the proposed ACE Rule is applicable.
The ultimate impact of this rule to Alabama Power is currently unknown and will depend on changes between the proposal and the
final rule, subsequent state plan developments and requirements, and any associated legal challenges.
On December 20, 2018, the EPA published a proposed review of the Standards of Performance for Greenhouse Gas Emissions from
New, Modified, and Reconstructed Stationary Sources: Electric Utility Generating Units final rule (2015 NSPS rule). The EPA's
final 2015 NSPS rule set standards of performance for new, modified, and reconstructed electric utility generating units which
included stationary combustion turbines and fossil-fired steam boilers. This proposal reduces the stringency of the 2015 NSPS rule
by not basing the new and reconstructed fossil-fired steam boiler and IGCC standards on partial carbon capture and sequestration.
The impact of any changes to this rule will depend on the content of the final rule and the outcome of any legal challenges.
The EPA's GHG reporting rule requires annual reporting of GHG emissions expressed in terms of metric tons of CO2 equivalent
emissions for a company's operational control of facilities. Based on ownership or financial control of facilities, Alabama Power's
2017 GHG emissions were approximately 37 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent. The preliminary estimate of Alabama Power's
2018 GHG emissions on the same basis is approximately 36 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent.
Through 2017, the Southern Company system has achieved an estimated GHG emission reduction of 36% since 2007. In April
2018, Southern Company established an intermediate goal of a 50% reduction in carbon emissions from 2007 levels by 2030 and a
long-term goal of low- to no-carbon operations by 2050. To achieve these goals, the Southern Company system expects to continue
growing its renewable energy portfolio, optimize technology advancements to modernize its transmission and distribution systems,
increase the use of natural gas for generation, complete ongoing construction projects, invest in energy efficiency, and continue
research and development efforts focused on technologies to lower GHG emissions. The Southern Company system's ability to
achieve these goals also will be dependent on many external factors, including supportive national energy policies, low natural gas
prices, and the development, deployment, and advancement of relevant energy technologies.
FERC Matters
Open Access Transmission Tariff
On May 10, 2018, AMEA and Cooperative Energy filed with the FERC a complaint against SCS and the traditional electric
operating companies (including Alabama Power) claiming that the current 11.25% base ROE used in calculating the annual
transmission revenue requirements of the traditional electric operating companies' (including Alabama Power's) open access
transmission tariff is unjust and unreasonable as measured by the applicable FERC standards. The complaint requested that the base
ROE be set no higher than 8.65% and that the FERC order refunds for the difference in revenue requirements that results from
applying a just and reasonable ROE established in this proceeding upon determining the current ROE is unjust and
II-79
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
unreasonable. On June 18, 2018, SCS and the traditional electric operating companies (including Alabama Power) filed their
response challenging the adequacy of the showing presented by the complainants and offering support for the current ROE. On
September 6, 2018, the FERC issued an order establishing a refund effective date of May 10, 2018 in the event a refund is due and
initiating an investigation and settlement procedures regarding the current base ROE. Through December 31, 2018, the estimated
maximum potential refund is not expected to be material to Alabama Power's results of operations or cash flows. The ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Retail Regulatory Matters
Alabama Power's revenues from regulated retail operations are collected through various rate mechanisms subject to the oversight
of the Alabama PSC. Alabama Power currently recovers its costs from the regulated retail business primarily through Rate RSE,
Rate CNP, Rate ECR, and Rate NDR. In addition, the Alabama PSC issues accounting orders to address current events impacting
Alabama Power. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power" for additional information regarding Alabama
Power's rate mechanisms and accounting orders.
Rate RSE
The Alabama PSC has adopted Rate RSE that provides for periodic annual adjustments based upon Alabama Power's projected
weighted common equity return (WCER) compared to an allowable range. Rate RSE adjustments are based on forward-looking
information for the applicable upcoming calendar year. Rate RSE adjustments for any two-year period, when averaged together,
cannot exceed 4.0% and any annual adjustment is limited to 5.0%. When the projected WCER is under the allowed range, there is
an adjusting point of 5.98% and eligibility for a performance-based adder of seven basis points, or 0.07%, to the WCER adjusting
point if Alabama Power (i) has an "A" credit rating equivalent with at least one of the recognized rating agencies or (ii) is in the top
one-third of a designated customer value benchmark survey. If Alabama Power's actual retail return is above the allowed WCER
range, the excess will be refunded to customers unless otherwise directed by the Alabama PSC; however, there is no provision for
additional customer billings should the actual retail return fall below the WCER range. Prior to January 2019, retail rates remained
unchanged when the WCER range was between 5.75% and 6.21%.
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved modifications to Rate RSE and other commitments designed to position Alabama
Power to address the growing pressure on its credit quality resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation, without increasing retail
rates under Rate RSE in the near term. Alabama Power plans to reduce growth in total debt by increasing equity, with
corresponding reductions in debt issuances, thereby de-leveraging its capital structure. Alabama Power's goal is to achieve an
equity ratio of approximately 55% by the end of 2025. At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's equity ratio was approximately
47%.
The approved modifications to Rate RSE began for billings in January 2019. The modifications include reducing the top of the
allowed WCER range from 6.21% to 6.15% and modifications to the refund mechanism applicable to prior year actual results. The
modifications to the refund mechanism allow Alabama Power to retain a portion of the revenue that causes the actual WCER for a
given year to exceed the allowed range.
Generally, if Alabama Power's actual WCER is between 6.15% and 7.65%, customers will receive 25% of the amount between
6.15% and 6.65%, 40% of the amount between 6.65% and 7.15%, and 75% of the amount between 7.15% and 7.65%. Customers
will receive all amounts in excess of an actual WCER of 7.65%.
In conjunction with these modifications to Rate RSE, on May 8, 2018, Alabama Power consented to a moratorium on any upward
adjustments under Rate RSE for 2019 and 2020 and will also return $50 million to customers through bill credits in 2019.
On November 30, 2018, Alabama Power made its required annual Rate RSE submission to the Alabama PSC of projected data for
calendar year 2019. Projected earnings were within the specified range; therefore, retail rates under Rate RSE remain unchanged
for 2019.
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's retail return exceeded the allowed WCER range, which resulted in Alabama Power
establishing a regulatory liability of $109 million for Rate RSE refunds. In accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on
February 5, 2019, Alabama Power will apply $75 million to reduce the Rate ECR under recovered balance and the remaining $34
million will be refunded to customers through bill credits in July through September 2019.
Rate CNP PPA
Alabama Power's retail rates, approved by the Alabama PSC, provide for adjustments under Rate CNP to recognize the placing of
new generating facilities into retail service. Alabama Power may also recover retail costs associated with certificated PPAs under
II-80
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Rate CNP PPA. No adjustments to Rate CNP PPA occurred during the period 2016 through 2018 and no adjustment is expected in
2019.
In accordance with an accounting order issued in February 2017 by the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power reclassified $69 million of
the December 31, 2016 Rate CNP PPA under recovered balance to a separate regulatory asset. The amortization of the new
regulatory asset through Rate RSE will begin concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study,
which is expected to occur no later than 2022.
Rate CNP Compliance
Rate CNP Compliance allows for the recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with laws, regulations, and other such
mandates directed at the utility industry involving the environment, security, reliability, safety, sustainability, or similar
considerations impacting Alabama Power's facilities or operations. Rate CNP Compliance is based on forward-looking information
and provides for the recovery of these costs pursuant to a factor that is calculated annually. Compliance costs to be recovered
include operations and maintenance expenses, depreciation, and a return on certain invested capital. Revenues for Rate CNP
Compliance, as recorded on the financial statements, are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable costs and amounts billed in
current regulated rates. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor will have no significant effect on Alabama Power's revenues or
net income, but will affect annual cash flow. Changes in Rate CNP Compliance-related operations and maintenance expenses and
depreciation generally will have no effect on net income.
In accordance with an accounting order issued in February 2017 by the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power reclassified $36 million of
its under recovered balance in Rate CNP Compliance to a separate regulatory asset. The amortization of the new regulatory asset
through Rate RSE will begin concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study, which is expected to
occur no later than 2022.
On November 30, 2018, Alabama Power submitted calculations associated with its cost of complying with environmental
mandates, as provided under Rate CNP Compliance. The filing reflected a projected unrecovered retail revenue requirement for
environmental compliance of approximately $205 million, which is being recovered in the billing months of January 2019 through
December 2019.
Rate ECR
Alabama Power has established energy cost recovery rates under Alabama Power's Rate ECR as approved by the Alabama PSC.
Rates are based on an estimate of future energy costs and the current over or under recovered balance. Revenues recognized under
Rate ECR and recorded on the financial statements are adjusted for the difference in actual recoverable fuel costs and amounts
billed in current regulated rates. The difference in the recoverable fuel costs and amounts billed give rise to the over or under
recovered amounts recorded as regulatory assets or liabilities. Alabama Power, along with the Alabama PSC, continually monitors
the over or under recovered cost balance to determine whether an adjustment to billing rates is required. Changes in the Rate ECR
factor have no significant effect on Alabama Power's net income, but will impact operating cash flows. Currently, the Alabama PSC
may approve billing rates under Rate ECR of up to 5.910 cents per KWH.
In accordance with an accounting order issued in February 2017 by the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power reclassified $36 million of
its under recovered balance in Rate ECR to a separate regulatory asset. The amortization of the new regulatory asset through Rate
RSE will begin concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study, which is expected to occur no later
than 2022. Alabama Power's current depreciation study became effective January 1, 2017.
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved an increase to Rate ECR from 2.015 cents per KWH to 2.353 cents per KWH
effective July 2018 through December 2018. On December 4, 2018, the Alabama PSC issued a consent order to leave this rate in
effect through December 31, 2019. This change is expected to increase collections by approximately $183 million in 2019. Absent
any further order from the Alabama PSC, in January 2020, the rates will return to the originally authorized 5.910 cents per KWH.
As discussed herein under "Rate RSE," in accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on February 5, 2019, Alabama Power will
utilize $75 million of the 2018 Rate RSE refund liability to reduce the Rate ECR under recovered balance.
Tax Reform Accounting Order
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved an accounting order that authorized Alabama Power to defer the benefits of federal
excess deferred income taxes associated with the Tax Reform Legislation for the year ended December 31, 2018 as a regulatory
liability and to use up to $30 million of such deferrals to offset under recovered amounts under Rate ECR. The estimated deferrals
for the year ended December 31, 2018 totaled approximately $63 million, subject to adjustment following the filing of the 2018 tax
return, of which $30 million was used to offset the Rate ECR under recovered balance and $33 million is recorded in other
II-81
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet to be used for the benefit of customers as determined by the Alabama PSC at a
future date. See Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
Software Accounting Order
On February 5, 2019, the Alabama PSC approved an accounting order that authorizes Alabama Power to establish a regulatory asset
for operations and maintenance costs associated with software implementation projects. The regulatory asset will be amortized
ratably over the life of the related software.
Plant Greene County
Alabama Power jointly owns Plant Greene County with an affiliate, Mississippi Power. See Note 5 to the financial statements under
"Joint Ownership Agreements" for additional information regarding the joint ownership agreement. On August 6, 2018, Mississippi
Power filed its proposed Reserve Margin Plan (RMP) with the Mississippi PSC, which proposes a four-year acceleration of the
retirement of Plant Greene County Units 1 and 2 to the third quarter 2021 and the third quarter 2022, respectively. Mississippi
Power's proposed Plant Greene County unit retirements would require the completion of proposed transmission and system
reliability improvements, as well as agreement by Alabama Power. Alabama Power will continue to monitor the status of
Mississippi Power's proposed RMP and associated regulatory process as well as the proposed transmission and system reliability
improvements. Alabama Power will review all the facts and circumstances and will evaluate all its alternatives prior to reaching a
final determination on the ongoing operations of Plant Greene County. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at
this time.
Request for Proposals for Future Generation
On September 21, 2018, Alabama Power issued a request for proposals of between 100 MWs and 1,200 MWs of capacity
beginning no later than 2023. On November 9, 2018, bids were received and an evaluation of those bids is in progress. Any
purchases will depend upon the cost competitiveness of the respective offers as well as other options available to Alabama Power.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Rate NDR
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power maintains a reserve for operations and maintenance expenses to cover
the cost of damages from major storms to its transmission and distribution facilities. The order approves a separate monthly Rate
NDR charge to customers consisting of two components. The first component is intended to establish and maintain a reserve
balance for future storms and is an on-going part of customer billing. When the reserve balance falls below $50 million, a reserve
establishment charge will be activated (and the on-going reserve maintenance charge concurrently suspended) until the reserve
balance reaches $75 million. In December 2017, the reserve maintenance charge was suspended and the reserve establishment
charge was activated as a result of the NDR balance falling below $50 million. Alabama Power expects to collect approximately
$16 million annually until the reserve balance is restored to $75 million. The NDR balance at December 31, 2018 was $20 million
and is included in other regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet.
The second component of the Rate NDR charge is intended to allow recovery of any existing deferred storm-related operations and
maintenance costs and any future reserve deficits over a 24-month period. The Alabama PSC order gives Alabama Power authority
to record a deficit balance in the NDR when costs of storm damage exceed any established reserve balance. Absent further Alabama
PSC approval, the maximum total Rate NDR charge consisting of both components is $10 per month per non-residential customer
account and $5 per month per residential customer account. Alabama Power has the authority, based on an order from the Alabama
PSC, to accrue certain additional amounts as circumstances warrant.
As revenue from the Rate NDR charge is recognized, an equal amount of operations and maintenance expenses related to the NDR
will also be recognized. As a result, the Rate NDR charge will not have an effect on net income but will impact operating cash
flows.
Environmental Accounting Order
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC (Environmental Accounting Order), Alabama Power is allowed to establish a regulatory
asset to record the unrecovered investment costs, including the unrecovered plant asset balance and the unrecovered costs
associated with site removal and closure associated with future unit retirements caused by environmental regulations. The
regulatory asset is being amortized and recovered over the affected unit's remaining useful life, as established prior to the decision
regarding early retirement through Rate CNP Compliance. At December 31, 2018, this regulatory asset had a balance of $42
million. See "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations" herein for additional information regarding
environmental regulations.
II-82
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Alabama Power determined that Plant Gorgas Units 8, 9, and 10 (approximately 1,000 MWs)
will be retired by April 15, 2019 due to the expected costs of compliance with federal and state environmental regulations. In
accordance with the Environmental Accounting Order, approximately $740 million of net investment costs will be transferred to a
regulatory asset at the retirement date and recovered over the affected units' remaining useful lives, as established prior to the
decision to retire.
Income Tax Matters
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
In December 2017, the Tax Reform Legislation was signed into law and became effective on January 1, 2018. The Tax Reform
Legislation, among other things, reduced the federal corporate income tax rate to 21%, retained normalization provisions for public
utility property and existing renewable energy incentives, and repealed the corporate alternative minimum tax. In addition, under
the Tax Reform Legislation, net operating losses (NOLs) generated after December 31, 2017 can no longer be carried back to
previous tax years but can be carried forward indefinitely, with utilization limited to 80% of taxable income of the subsequent tax
year. The projected reduction of Southern Company's consolidated income tax liability resulting from the tax rate reduction also
delays the expected utilization of existing tax credit carryforwards. See Note 10 to the financial statements for information on
Southern Company's joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement.
Following the enactment of the Tax Reform Legislation, the SEC staff issued Staff Accounting Bulletin 118 – "Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" (SAB 118), which provided for a measurement period of up to one year
from the enactment date to complete accounting under GAAP for the tax effects of the legislation. Due to the complex and
comprehensive nature of the enacted tax law changes and their application under GAAP, Alabama Power considered all amounts
recorded in the financial statements as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation "provisional" as discussed in SAB 118 and subject to
revision prior to filing its 2017 tax return in the fourth quarter 2018. Alabama Power recognized tax expense of $3 million in 2017
as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. In addition, in total, Alabama Power recorded a $281 million decrease in regulatory
assets and a $2.0 billion increase in regulatory liabilities as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. As of December 31, 2018,
Alabama Power considered the measurement of impacts from the Tax Reform Legislation on deferred income tax assets and
liabilities, primarily due to the impact of the reduction of the corporate income tax rate, to be complete.
However, the IRS continues to issue regulations that provide further interpretation and guidance on the law and each state's
adoption of the provisions contained in the Tax Reform Legislation remains uncertain. The regulatory treatment of certain impacts
of the Tax Reform Legislation is subject to the discretion of the FERC. The ultimate impact of this matter cannot be determined at
this time. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate RSE" for additional information regarding
modifications to Rate RSE to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. Also see FINANCIAL CONDITION AND
LIQUIDITY – "Credit Rating Risk" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for
additional information.
Bonus Depreciation
Under the Tax Reform Legislation, projects with binding contracts prior to September 28, 2017 and placed in service after
September 27, 2017 remain eligible for bonus depreciation under the PATH Act. The PATH Act allowed for 50% bonus
depreciation for 2015 through 2017, 40% bonus depreciation for 2018, and 30% bonus depreciation for 2019 and certain long-lived
assets placed in service in 2020. Based on provisional estimates, bonus depreciation is expected to result in positive cash flows of
approximately $100 million for the 2018 tax year and approximately $30 million for the 2019 tax year. See Note 10 to the financial
statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
Other Matters
Alabama Power is involved in various other matters being litigated and regulatory matters that could affect future earnings. In
addition, Alabama Power is subject to certain claims and legal actions arising in the ordinary course of business. Alabama Power's
business activities are subject to extensive governmental regulation related to public health and the environment, such as laws and
regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Litigation over environmental issues and claims of
various types, including property damage, personal injury, common law nuisance, and citizen enforcement of environmental laws
and regulations, has occurred throughout the U.S. This litigation has included claims for damages alleged to have been caused by
CO2 and other emissions, CCR, and alleged exposure to hazardous materials, and/or requests for injunctive relief in connection
with such matters.
II-83
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
The ultimate outcome of such pending or potential litigation or regulatory matters cannot be predicted at this time; however, for
current proceedings not specifically reported herein or in Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements, management does not anticipate
that the ultimate liabilities, if any, arising from such current proceedings would have a material effect on Alabama Power's financial
statements. See Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements for a discussion of various other contingencies, regulatory matters, and
other matters being litigated which may affect future earnings potential.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
Alabama Power prepares its financial statements in accordance with GAAP. Significant accounting policies are described in Notes
1, 5, and 6 to the financial statements. In the application of these policies, certain estimates are made that may have a material
impact on Alabama Power's results of operations and related disclosures. Different assumptions and measurements could produce
estimates that are significantly different from those recorded in the financial statements. Senior management has reviewed and
discussed the following critical accounting policies and estimates with the Audit Committee of Southern Company's Board of
Directors.
Utility Regulation
Alabama Power is subject to retail regulation by the Alabama PSC and wholesale regulation by the FERC. As a result, Alabama
Power applies accounting standards which require the financial statements to reflect the effects of rate regulation. Through the
ratemaking process, the regulators may require the inclusion of costs or revenues in periods different than when they would be
recognized by a non-regulated company. This treatment may result in the deferral of expenses and the recording of related
regulatory assets based on anticipated future recovery through rates or the deferral of gains or creation of liabilities and the
recording of related regulatory liabilities. The application of the accounting standards has a further effect on Alabama Power's
financial statements as a result of the estimates of allowable costs used in the ratemaking process. These estimates may differ from
those actually incurred by Alabama Power; therefore, the accounting estimates inherent in specific costs such as depreciation,
AROs, and pension and other postretirement benefits have less of a direct impact on Alabama Power's results of operations and
financial condition than they would on a non-regulated company.
As reflected in Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Regulatory Assets and Liabilities," significant
regulatory assets and liabilities have been recorded. Management reviews the ultimate recoverability of these regulatory assets and
any requirement to refund these regulatory liabilities based on applicable regulatory guidelines and GAAP. However, adverse
legislative, judicial, or regulatory actions could materially impact the amounts of such regulatory assets and liabilities and could
adversely impact Alabama Power's financial statements.
Asset Retirement Obligations
AROs are computed as the fair value of the estimated costs for an asset's future retirement and are recorded in the period in which
the liability is incurred. The estimated costs are capitalized as part of the related long-lived asset and depreciated over the asset's
useful life. In the absence of quoted market prices, AROs are estimated using present value techniques in which estimates of future
cash outlays associated with the asset retirements are discounted using a credit-adjusted risk-free rate. Estimates of the timing and
amounts of future cash outlays are based on projections of when and how the assets will be retired and the cost of future removal
activities.
The liability for AROs primarily relates to the decommissioning of Alabama Power's nuclear facility, Plant Farley, and facilities that
are subject to the CCR Rule and the related state rule, principally ash ponds. In addition, Alabama Power has AROs related to
various landfill sites, underground storage tanks, asbestos removal related to ongoing repair and maintenance, disposal of
polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers, and disposal of sulfur hexafluoride gas in certain substation breakers.
Alabama Power also has identified retirement obligations related to certain transmission and distribution facilities, asbestos
containing material within long-term assets not subject to ongoing repair and maintenance activities, and certain wireless
communication towers. However, liabilities for the removal of these assets have not been recorded because the settlement timing
for the retirement obligations related to these assets is indeterminable and, therefore, the fair value of the retirement obligations
cannot be reasonably estimated. A liability for these retirement obligations will be recognized when sufficient information becomes
available to support a reasonable estimation of the retirement obligation.
The cost estimates for AROs related to the disposal of CCR are based on information using various assumptions related to closure
and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and discount rates, and the potential methods for complying with the
CCR Rule requirements for closure in place. In June 2018, Alabama Power recorded increases of approximately $1.2 billion
II-84
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
to its AROs related to the CCR Rule and approximately $300 million to its AROs related to updated nuclear decommissioning cost
site studies. The revised CCR-related cost estimates as of June 30, 2018 were based on information from feasibility studies
performed on ash ponds in use at the plants Alabama Power operates. During the second quarter 2018, Alabama Power's
management completed its analysis of these studies which indicated that additional closure costs, primarily related to increases in
estimated ash volume, water management requirements, and design revisions, will be required to close these ash ponds under the
planned closure-in-place methodology. As the level of work becomes more defined in the next 12 months, it is likely that these cost
estimates will change and the change could be material. Alabama Power expects to periodically update its ARO cost estimates. See
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion
Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating AROs, Alabama Power considers the liabilities for AROs to be critical
accounting estimates.
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits
Alabama Power's calculation of pension and other postretirement benefits expense is dependent on a number of assumptions. These
assumptions include discount rates, healthcare cost trend rates, expected long-term return on plan assets, mortality rates, expected
salary and wage increases, and other factors. Components of pension and other postretirement benefits expense include interest and
service cost on the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, expected return on plan assets, and amortization of certain
unrecognized costs and obligations. Actual results that differ from the assumptions utilized are accumulated and amortized over
future periods and, therefore, generally affect recognized expense and the recorded obligation in future periods. While Alabama
Power believes that the assumptions used are appropriate, differences in actual experience or significant changes in assumptions
would affect its pension and other postretirement benefit costs and obligations.
Key elements in determining Alabama Power's pension and other postretirement benefit expense are the expected long-term return
on plan assets and the discount rate used to measure the benefit plan obligations and the periodic benefit plan expense for future
periods. The expected long-term return on pension and other postretirement benefit plan assets is based on Southern Company's
investment strategy, historical experience, and expectations for long-term rates of return that consider external actuarial advice.
Southern Company determines the long-term return on plan assets by applying the long-term rate of expected returns on various
asset classes to Southern Company's target asset allocation. For purposes of determining Alabama Power's liability related to the
pension and other postretirement benefit plans, Southern Company discounts the future related cash flows using a single-point
discount rate developed from the weighted average of market-observed yields for high quality fixed income securities with
maturities that correspond to expected benefit payments.
A 25 basis point change in any significant assumption (discount rate, salary increases, or long-term rate of return on plan assets)
would result in a $9 million or less change in total annual benefit expense, a $99 million or less change in the projected obligation
for the pension plan, and an $11 million or less change in the projected obligation for other post retirement benefit plans.
Alabama Power recorded pension costs of $27 million, $9 million, and $11 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively.
Postretirement benefit costs for Alabama Power were $2 million, $3 million, and $4 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively.
Such amounts are dependent on several factors including trust earnings and changes to the plans. A portion of pension and other
postretirement benefit costs is capitalized based on construction-related labor charges. Pension and other postretirement benefit
costs are a component of the regulated rates and generally do not have a long-term effect on net income.
See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information regarding pension and other postretirement benefits.
Contingent Obligations
Alabama Power is subject to a number of federal and state laws and regulations, as well as other factors and conditions that subject
it to environmental, litigation, and other risks. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL herein and Notes 2 and 3 to the financial
statements for more information regarding certain of these contingencies. Alabama Power periodically evaluates its exposure to
such risks and records reserves for those matters where a non-tax-related loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable. The
adequacy of reserves can be significantly affected by external events or conditions that can be unpredictable; thus, the ultimate
outcome of such matters could materially affect Alabama Power's results of operations, cash flows, or financial condition.
II-85
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" for additional information.
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842) (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires lessees to recognize on the
balance sheet a lease liability and a right-of-use asset for all leases. ASU 2016-02 also changes the recognition, measurement, and
presentation of expense associated with leases and provides clarification regarding the identification of certain components of
contracts that would represent a lease. The accounting required by lessors is relatively unchanged. ASU 2016-02 is effective for
fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018 and Alabama Power adopted the new standard effective January 1, 2019.
Alabama Power elected the transition methodology provided by ASU No. 2018-11, Leases (Topic 842): Targeted Improvements,
whereby the requirements of ASU 2016-02 are applied on a prospective basis as of the adoption date of January 1, 2019, without
restating prior periods. Alabama Power elected the package of practical expedients provided by ASU 2016-02 that allows prior
determinations of whether existing contracts are, or contain, leases and the classification of existing leases to continue without
reassessment. Additionally, Alabama Power applied the use-of-hindsight practical expedient in determining lease terms as of the
date of adoption and elected the practical expedient that allows existing land easements not previously accounted for as leases not
to be reassessed. Alabama Power also made accounting policy elections to account for short-term leases in all asset classes as off-
balance sheet leases and combined lease and non-lease components in the computations of lease obligations and right-of-use assets
for most asset classes.
Alabama Power completed the implementation of a new application to track and account for its leases and updated its internal
controls and accounting policies to support the accounting for leases under ASU 2016-02. Alabama Power completed its lease
inventory and determined its most significant leases involve PPAs. In the first quarter 2019, the adoption of ASU 2016-02 resulted
in recording lease liabilities and right-of-use assets on Alabama Power's balance sheet each totaling approximately $195 million,
with no impact on Alabama Power's statement of income.
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY
Overview
Alabama Power's financial condition remained stable at December 31, 2018. Alabama Power's cash requirements primarily consist
of funding ongoing operations, common stock dividends, capital expenditures, and debt maturities. Capital expenditures and other
investing activities include investments to meet projected long-term demand requirements, to maintain existing generation
facilities, to comply with environmental regulations including adding environmental modifications to certain existing generating
units and closures of ash ponds, to expand and improve transmission and distribution facilities, and for restoration following major
storms. Operating cash flows provide a substantial portion of Alabama Power's cash needs. For the three-year period from 2019
through 2021, Alabama Power's projected common stock dividends, capital expenditures, and debt maturities are expected to
exceed operating cash flows. Alabama Power plans to finance future cash needs in excess of its operating cash flows primarily
through external securities issuances, borrowings from financial institutions, or equity contributions from Southern Company.
Alabama Power plans to use commercial paper to manage seasonal variations in operating cash flows and for other working capital
needs. Alabama Power intends to continue to monitor its access to short-term and long-term capital markets as well as its bank
credit arrangements to meet future capital and liquidity needs. See "Sources of Capital," "Financing Activities," and "Capital
Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein for additional information.
Alabama Power's investments in the qualified pension plan and the nuclear decommissioning trust funds decreased in value as of
December 31, 2018 as compared to December 31, 2017. No contributions to the qualified pension plan were made for the year
ended December 31, 2018 and no mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan are anticipated during 2019. Alabama
Power's funding obligations for the nuclear decommissioning trust funds are based on the most recent site study completed in 2018,
and the next study is expected to be conducted by 2023. See Notes 6 and 11 to the financial statements under "Nuclear
Decommissioning" and "Pension Plans," respectively, for additional information.
Net cash provided from operating activities totaled $1.9 billion for 2018, an increase of $44 million as compared to 2017. The
increase in cash provided from operating activities was primarily due to an increase in weather-related revenues, fuel cost recovery,
and income tax refunds received in 2018, partially offset by materials and supplies purchases, the timing of vendor payments, and
settlement of AROs. Net cash provided from operating activities totaled $1.8 billion for 2017, a decrease of $112 million as
compared to 2017. The decrease in cash provided from operating activities was primarily due to the timing of income tax payments
in 2017 and the receipt of income tax refunds in 2016 as a result of bonus depreciation, partially offset by the voluntary
contribution to the qualified pension plan in 2016.
II-86
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Net cash used for investing activities totaled $2.3 billion for 2018, $1.9 billion for 2017, and $1.4 billion for 2016. These activities
were primarily related to gross property additions for environmental, distribution, transmission, and steam generation assets.
Net cash provided from financing activities totaled $177 million in 2018 primarily due to issuances of long-term debt and
additional capital contributions from Southern Company, partially offset by the payment of common stock dividends and a maturity
of long-term debt. Net cash provided from financing activities totaled $163 million in 2017 primarily due to issuances of long-term
debt and additional capital contributions from Southern Company, partially offset by the payment of common stock dividends and
maturities of long-term debt. Fluctuations in cash flow from financing activities vary from year to year based on capital needs and
the maturity or redemption of securities.
Significant balance sheet changes for 2018 included increases of $2.84 billion in property, plant, and equipment primarily due to
$1.35 billion in AROs and additions to nuclear, distribution, and transmission assets. Other changes include $522 million in capital
contributions from Southern Company and $295 million in long-term debt primarily due to a senior notes issuance. See Notes 6 and
8 to the financial statements for additional information related to changes in Alabama Power's AROs and financing activities,
respectively.
Alabama Power's ratio of common equity to total capitalization plus short-term debt was 47.0% and 46.3% at December 31, 2018
and 2017, respectively. See Note 8 to the financial statements for additional information.
Sources of Capital
Alabama Power plans to obtain the funds to meet its future capital needs from sources similar to those used in the past, which were
primarily from operating cash flows, external security issuances, borrowings from financial institutions, and equity contributions
from Southern Company. However, the amount, type, and timing of any future financings, if needed, will depend upon prevailing
market conditions, regulatory approval, and other factors. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Alabama Power received a capital
contribution totaling $1.225 billion from Southern Company.
Security issuances are subject to regulatory approval by the Alabama PSC. Additionally, with respect to the public offering of
securities, Alabama Power files registration statements with the SEC under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The amounts of
securities authorized by the Alabama PSC are continuously monitored and appropriate filings are made to ensure flexibility in the
capital markets.
Alabama Power obtains financing separately without credit support from any affiliate. See Note 8 to the financial statements under
"Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information. The Southern Company system does not maintain a centralized cash or
money pool. Therefore, funds of Alabama Power are not commingled with funds of any other company in the Southern Company
system.
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's current liabilities exceeded current assets by $50 million. Alabama Power's current
liabilities sometimes exceed current assets because of long-term debt maturities and the periodic use of short-term debt as a funding
source, as well as significant seasonal fluctuations in cash needs.
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power had approximately $313 million of cash and cash equivalents. Committed credit
arrangements with banks at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
Expires   Expires Within One Year
2019  2020 2022 Total Unused Term Out No Term Out
(in millions) (in millions) (in millions)
$ 33 $ 500 $ 800 $ 1,333 $ 1,333 $ — $ 33
See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information.
Most of these bank credit arrangements, as well as Alabama Power's term loan arrangements, contain covenants that limit debt
levels and contain cross-acceleration provisions to other indebtedness (including guarantee obligations) of Alabama Power. Such
cross-acceleration provisions to other indebtedness would trigger an event of default if Alabama Power defaulted on indebtedness,
the payment of which was then accelerated. At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power was in compliance with all such covenants.
None of the bank credit arrangements contain material adverse change clauses at the time of borrowings.
Subject to applicable market conditions, Alabama Power expects to renew or replace its bank credit arrangements as needed prior to
expiration. In connection therewith, Alabama Power may extend the maturity dates and/or increase or decrease the lending
commitments thereunder.
II-87
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
A portion of the unused credit with banks is allocated to provide liquidity support to Alabama Power's pollution control revenue
bonds and commercial paper programs. The amount of variable rate pollution control revenue bonds outstanding requiring liquidity
support was $854 million at December 31, 2018.
Alabama Power also has substantial cash flow from operating activities and access to the capital markets, including a commercial
paper program, to meet liquidity needs. Alabama Power may meet short-term cash needs through its commercial paper program.
Alabama Power may also meet short-term cash needs through a Southern Company subsidiary organized to issue and sell
commercial paper at the request and for the benefit of Alabama Power and the other traditional electric operating companies.
Proceeds from such issuances for the benefit of Alabama Power are loaned directly to Alabama Power. The obligations of each
traditional electric operating company under these arrangements are several and there is no cross-affiliate credit support.
Details of short-term borrowings were as follows:
 Short-term Debt at the End of
the Period  Short-term Debt During the Period (*)
 Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest
Rate  Average
Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest
Rate  Maximum
Amount
Outstanding
 (in millions)   (in millions)   (in millions)
December 31, 2018 $ — —% $ 27 2.3% $ 258
December 31, 2017 $ 3 3.7% $ 25 1.3% $ 223
December 31, 2016 $ — —% $ 16 0.6% $ 200
(*)Average and maximum amounts are based upon daily balances during the 12-month periods ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016.
Alabama Power believes that the need for working capital can be adequately met by utilizing commercial paper programs, lines of
credit, and operating cash flows.
Financing Activities
In June 2018, Alabama Power issued $500 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2018A 4.300% Senior Notes due July 15,
2048. The proceeds were used to repay outstanding commercial paper and for general corporate purposes, including Alabama
Power's continuous construction program.
In October 2018, Alabama Power purchased and held $120 million aggregate principal amount of The Industrial Development
Board of the City of Mobile, Alabama Pollution Control Revenue Bonds (Alabama Power Company Plant Barry Project), Series
2008. Alabama Power reoffered these bonds to the public in November 2018.
In November 2018, Alabama Power guaranteed a $100 million three-year bank term loan for SEGCO. See Note 9 to the financial
statements under "Guarantees" for additional information.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Alabama Power repaid at maturity $200 million aggregate principal amount of Series Z 5.125%
Senior Notes due February 15, 2019.
In addition to any financings that may be necessary to meet capital requirements and contractual obligations, Alabama Power plans
to continue, when economically feasible, a program to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with lower-cost
capital if market conditions permit.
Credit Rating Risk
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power did not have any credit arrangements that would require material changes in payment
schedules or terminations as a result of a credit rating downgrade.
II-88
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
There are certain contracts that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of a credit rating change to BBB
and/or Baa2 or below. These contracts are primarily for physical electricity purchases, fuel purchases, fuel transportation and
storage, energy price risk management, and transmission.
The maximum potential collateral requirements under these contracts at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
Credit RatingsMaximum Potential
Collateral
Requirements
 (in millions)
At BBB and/or Baa2 $ 1
At BBB- and/or Baa3 $ 1
Below BBB- and/or Baa3 $ 356
Included in these amounts are certain agreements that could require collateral in the event that either Alabama Power or Georgia
Power (an affiliate of Alabama Power) has a credit rating change to below investment grade. Generally, collateral may be provided
by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit, or cash. Additionally, a credit rating downgrade could impact the ability of
Alabama Power to access capital markets and would be likely to impact the cost at which it does so.
On September 28, 2018, Fitch assigned a negative rating outlook to the ratings of Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries
(including Alabama Power).
Also on September 28, 2018, Moody's revised its rating outlook for Alabama Power from negative to stable.
As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, certain financial metrics, such as the funds from operations to debt percentage, used by
the credit rating agencies to assess Southern Company and its subsidiaries, including Alabama Power, may be negatively impacted.
The modifications to Rate RSE and other commitments approved by the Alabama PSC are expected to help mitigate these potential
adverse impacts to certain credit metrics and will help Alabama Power meet its goal of achieving an equity ratio of approximately
55% by the end of 2025. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Alabama Power – Rate RSE" for additional information.
Market Price Risk
Due to cost-based rate regulation and other various cost recovery mechanisms, Alabama Power continues to have limited exposure
to market volatility in interest rates, commodity fuel prices, and prices of electricity. To manage the volatility attributable to these
exposures, Alabama Power nets the exposures, where possible, to take advantage of natural offsets and enters into various
derivative transactions for the remaining exposures pursuant to Alabama Power's policies in areas such as counterparty exposure
and risk management practices. Alabama Power's policy is that derivatives are to be used primarily for hedging purposes and
mandates strict adherence to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative positions are monitored using techniques
including, but not limited to, market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity analysis.
To mitigate future exposure to changes in interest rates, Alabama Power may enter into derivatives designated as hedges. The
weighted average interest rate on $1.1 billion of long-term variable interest rate exposure at December 31, 2018 was 2.5%. If
Alabama Power sustained a 100 basis point change in interest rates for all long-term variable interest rate exposure, the change
would affect annualized interest expense by approximately $11 million at December 31, 2018. See Note 1 to the financial
statements under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
To mitigate residual risks relative to movements in electricity prices, Alabama Power enters into physical fixed-price contracts for
the purchase and sale of electricity through the wholesale electricity market and financial hedge contracts for natural gas purchases.
Alabama Power continues to manage a retail fuel-hedging program implemented per the guidelines of the Alabama PSC. Alabama
Power had no material change in market risk exposure for the year ended December 31, 2018 when compared to the year ended
December 31, 2017.
In addition, Rate ECR allows the recovery of specific costs associated with the sales of natural gas that become necessary due to
operating considerations at Alabama Power's electric generating facilities. Rate ECR also allows recovery of the cost of financial
instruments used for hedging market price risk up to 75% of the budgeted annual amount of natural gas purchases. Alabama Power
may not engage in natural gas hedging activities that extend beyond a rolling 42-month window. Also, the premiums paid for
natural gas financial options may not exceed 5% of Alabama Power's natural gas budget for that year.
II-89
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
The changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts are substantially attributable to both the volume and the price of
natural gas. For the years ended December 31, the changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts, the majority of
which are composed of regulatory hedges, were as follows:
 2018
Changes2017
Changes
 Fair Value
 (in millions)
Contracts outstanding at the beginning of the period, assets (liabilities), net $ (6) $ 12
Contracts realized or settled (2) (1)
Current period changes(*)4 (17)
Contracts outstanding at the end of the period, assets (liabilities), net $ (4) $ (6)
(*)Current period changes also include the changes in fair value of new contracts entered into during the period, if any.
The net hedge volumes of energy-related derivative contracts at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows:
 2018  2017
 mmBtu Volume
 (in millions)
Commodity – Natural gas swaps 65 64
Commodity – Natural gas options 9 5
Total hedge volume 74 69
The weighted average swap contract cost above market prices was approximately $0.08 per mmBtu at December 31, 2018 and
December 31, 2017. The change in option fair value is primarily attributable to the volatility of the market and the underlying
change in the natural gas price. Substantially all of the natural gas hedge gains and losses are recovered through Alabama Power's
retail energy cost recovery clause.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, substantially all of Alabama Power's energy-related derivative contracts were designated as
regulatory hedges and were related to Alabama Power's fuel-hedging program. Therefore, gains and losses are initially recorded as
regulatory liabilities and assets, respectively, and then are included in fuel expense as they are recovered through the energy cost
recovery clause. Certain other gains and losses on energy-related derivatives, designated as cash flow hedges, are initially deferred
in OCI before being recognized in income in the same period as the hedged transaction. Gains and losses on energy-related
derivative contracts that are not designated or fail to qualify as hedges are recognized in the statements of income as incurred and
were not material for any year presented.
Alabama Power uses over-the-counter contracts that are not exchange traded but are fair valued using prices which are market
observable, and thus fall into Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. See Note 13 to the financial statements for further discussion of
fair value measurements. The maturities of the energy-related derivative contracts, which are primarily Level 2 of the fair value
hierarchy, at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
  Fair Value Measurements
  December 31, 2018
 Total Maturity
 Fair Value Year 1  Years 2&3
 (in millions)
Level 1 $ — $ — $ —
Level 2 (4) (1) (3)
Level 3 — — —
Fair value of contracts outstanding at end of period $ (4) $ (1) $ (3)
Alabama Power is exposed to market price risk in the event of nonperformance by counterparties to energy-related and interest rate
derivative contracts. Alabama Power only enters into agreements and material transactions with counterparties that have
II-90
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
investment grade credit ratings by Moody's and S&P, or with counterparties who have posted collateral to cover potential credit
exposure. Therefore, Alabama Power does not anticipate market risk exposure from nonperformance by the counterparties. For
additional information, see Note 1 to the financial statements under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements.
Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations
The construction program of Alabama Power is currently estimated to total $1.8 billion for 2019, $1.6 billion for 2020, $1.6 billion
for 2021, $1.4 billion for 2022, and $1.5 billion for 2023. The construction program includes capital expenditures related to
contractual purchase commitments for nuclear fuel and capital expenditures covered under LTSAs. Estimated capital expenditures
to comply with environmental laws and regulations included in these amounts are $226 million for 2019, $68 million for 2020,
$118 million for 2021, $112 million for 2022, and $111 million for 2023. These estimated expenditures do not include any potential
compliance costs associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions from fossil-fuel-fired electric generating units. See
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations" and "– Global Climate
Issues" herein for additional information.
Alabama Power also anticipates costs associated with closure-in-place and monitoring of ash ponds in accordance with the CCR
Rule, which are reflected in Alabama Power's ARO liabilities. These costs, which are expected to change and could change
materially as underlying assumptions are refined and the cost, method, and timing of compliance activities continue to be
evaluated, are currently estimated to be $232 million for 2019, $238 million for 2020, $246 million for 2021, $252 million for
2022, and $258 million for 2023. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and
Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information. Costs
associated with the CCR Rule are expected to be recovered through Rate CNP Compliance.
The construction program is subject to periodic review and revision, and actual construction costs may vary from these estimates
because of numerous factors. These factors include: changes in business conditions; changes in load projections; changes in
environmental laws and regulations; the outcome of any legal challenges to environmental rules; changes in generating plants,
including unit retirements and replacements and adding or changing fuel sources at existing generating units, to meet regulatory
requirements; changes in the expected environmental compliance program; changes in FERC rules and regulations; Alabama PSC
approvals; changes in legislation; the cost and efficiency of construction labor, equipment, and materials; project scope and design
changes; storm impacts; and the cost of capital. In addition, there can be no assurance that costs related to capital expenditures will
be fully recovered.
As a result of NRC requirements, Alabama Power has external trust funds for nuclear decommissioning costs; however, Alabama
Power currently has no additional funding requirements. For additional information, see Note 6 to the financial statements under
"Nuclear Decommissioning."
In addition, as discussed in Note 11 to the financial statements, Alabama Power provides postretirement benefits to substantially all
employees and funds trusts to the extent required by the Alabama PSC and the FERC.
Funding requirements related to obligations associated with scheduled maturities of long-term debt, as well as the related interest,
derivative obligations, pension and other postretirement benefit plans, preferred stock dividends, leases, other purchase
commitments, and ARO settlements are detailed in the contractual obligations table that follows. See Notes 1, 6, 8, 9, 11, and 14 to
the financial statements for additional information.
II-91
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Contractual Obligations
Contractual obligations at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 20192020-
2021  2022-
2023  After
2023  Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt(a) —       
Principal $ 200 $ 560 $1,050 $6,377 $8,187
Interest 330 630 575 4,751 6,286
Preferred stock dividends(b)15 29 29 — 73
Financial derivative obligations(c)4 6 — — 10
Operating leases(d)12 17 9 1 39
Capital lease 1 1 1 1 4
Purchase commitments —       
Capital(e)1,671 3,049 2,536 — 7,256
Fuel(f)1,072 1,342 531 1,108 4,053
Purchased power(g)83 178 140 512 913
Other(h)42 61 61 277 441
ARO settlements(i)232 485 510 — 1,227
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans(j)16 32 — — 48
Total $3,678 $6,390 $5,442 $13,027 $28,537
(a)All amounts are reflected based on final maturity dates. Alabama Power plans to continue, when economically feasible, to retire higher-cost securities and
replace these obligations with lower-cost capital if market conditions permit. Variable rate interest obligations are estimated based on rates at December 31,
2018, as reflected in the statements of capitalization. Fixed rates include, where applicable, the effects of interest rate derivatives employed to manage interest
rate risk. Long-term debt excludes capital lease amounts (shown separately).
(b)Preferred stock does not mature; therefore, amounts are provided for the next five years only.
(c)Includes derivative liabilities related to cash flow hedges of forecasted debt, as well as energy-related derivatives. For additional information, see Notes 1 and 14
to the financial statements.
(d)Excludes PPAs that are accounted for as leases and are included in purchased power.
(e)Alabama Power provides estimated capital expenditures for a five-year period, including capital expenditures associated with environmental regulations. These
amounts exclude contractual purchase commitments for nuclear fuel, capital expenditures covered under LTSAs, and estimated capital expenditures for AROs,
which are reflected in "Fuel," "Other," and "ARO settlements," respectively. At December 31, 2018, purchase commitments were outstanding in connection with
the construction program. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations" herein for additional
information.
(f)Includes commitments to purchase coal, nuclear fuel, and natural gas, as well as the related transportation and storage. In most cases, these contracts contain
provisions for price escalation, minimum purchase levels, and other financial commitments. Natural gas purchase commitments are based on various indices at
the time of delivery. Amounts reflected for natural gas purchase commitments have been estimated based on the NYMEX future prices at December 31, 2018.
(g)Estimated minimum long-term obligations for various long-term commitments for the purchase of capacity and energy.
(h)Includes LTSAs and contracts for the procurement of limestone. LTSAs include price escalation based on inflation indices.
(i)Represents estimated costs for a five-year period associated with closing and monitoring ash ponds in accordance with the CCR Rule and the related state rule,
which are reflected in Alabama Power's ARO liabilities. Material expenditures in future years for ARO settlements also will be required for ash ponds, nuclear
decommissioning, and other liabilities reflected in Alabama Power's AROs. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters –
Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
(j)Alabama Power forecasts contributions to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans over a three-year period. Alabama Power anticipates no mandatory
contributions to the qualified pension plan during the next three years. Amounts presented represent estimated benefit payments for the nonqualified pension
plans, estimated non-trust benefit payments for the other postretirement benefit plans, and estimated contributions to the other postretirement benefit plan trusts,
all of which will be made from Alabama Power's corporate assets. See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information related to the pension and
other postretirement benefit plans, including estimated benefit payments. Certain benefit payments will be made through the related benefit plans. Other benefit
payments will be made from Alabama Power's corporate assets.
II-92
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
OVERVIEW
Business Activities
Georgia Power operates as a vertically integrated utility providing electric service to retail customers within its traditional service
territory located within the State of Georgia and to wholesale customers in the Southeast.
Many factors affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of Georgia Power's business of providing electric service. These factors
include the ability to maintain a constructive regulatory environment, to maintain and grow energy sales and customers, and to
effectively manage and secure timely recovery of costs. These costs include those related to projected long-term demand growth,
stringent environmental standards, including CCR rules, reliability, fuel, capital expenditures, including new generating facilities
and expanding and improving transmission and distribution facilities, and restoration following major storms. Georgia Power has
various regulatory mechanisms that operate to address cost recovery. Effectively operating pursuant to these regulatory mechanisms
and appropriately balancing required costs and capital expenditures with customer prices will continue to challenge Georgia Power
for the foreseeable future. On April 3, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement,
which provides for a total of $330 million in customer refunds for 2018 and 2019 and the deferral of certain revenues and tax
benefits to be addressed in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The Georgia PSC also approved an increase to Georgia
Power's retail equity ratio to address some of the negative cash flow and credit metric impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. See
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters – Rate Plans" herein for additional information on the Georgia
Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement.
Georgia Power continues to focus on several key performance indicators, including, but not limited to, customer satisfaction, plant
availability, system reliability, the execution of major construction projects, and net income. Georgia Power's financial success is
directly tied to customer satisfaction. Key elements of ensuring customer satisfaction include outstanding service, high reliability,
and competitive prices. Management uses customer satisfaction surveys to evaluate Georgia Power's results and generally targets
the top quartile of these surveys in measuring performance.
See RESULTS OF OPERATIONS herein for information on Georgia Power's financial performance.
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 Status
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (with electric generating capacity of approximately
1,100 MWs each). Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In March 2017, the EPC
Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC
approved Georgia Power's recommendation to continue construction. The current expected in-service dates remain November 2021
for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4.
In the second quarter 2018, Georgia Power revised its base capital cost forecast and estimated contingency to complete construction
and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to $8.0 billion and $0.4 billion, respectively, for a total project capital cost forecast of
$8.4 billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related
Customer Refunds), with respect to Georgia Power's ownership interest. Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs
are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the Georgia PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically
states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is not subject to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for
the $0.7 billion increase in costs included in the current base capital cost forecast (or any related financing costs) in the nineteenth
VCM report that was approved by the Georgia PSC on February 19, 2019. In connection with future VCM filings, Georgia Power
may request the Georgia PSC to evaluate costs currently included in the construction contingency estimate for rate recovery as and
when they are appropriately included in the base capital cost forecast. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that
exists regarding the future recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of
these matters is subject to the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future
regulatory proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the
second quarter 2018.
As a result of the increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 were required
to vote to continue construction. On September 26, 2018, the Vogtle Owners unanimously voted to continue construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In connection with the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into (i) a binding term sheet
(Vogtle Owner Term Sheet) with the other Vogtle Owners and certain of MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries, including MEAG
Power SPVJ, LLC (MEAG SPVJ), to take certain actions which partially mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle
Owners and (ii) a term sheet (MEAG Term Sheet) with MEAG and MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with respect to MEAG
II-93
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
SPVJ's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 under certain circumstances. On January 14, 2019, Georgia Power, MEAG,
and MEAG SPVJ entered into an agreement to implement the provisions of the MEAG Term Sheet. On February 18, 2019, Georgia
Power, the other Vogtle Owners, and certain of MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries entered into certain amendments to their joint
ownership agreements to implement the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters – Nuclear Construction" herein for additional information
on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Earnings
Georgia Power's 2018 net income after dividends on preferred and preference stock was $0.8 billion, representing a $621 million,
or 43.9%, decrease from the previous year. The decrease was due primarily to a $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) charge in the
second quarter 2018 for an estimated probable loss related to Georgia Power's construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, revenues
deferred as a regulatory liability for customer bill credits related to the Tax Reform Legislation, an adjustment for an expected
refund to retail customers as a result of Georgia Power's retail ROE exceeding the allowed retail ROE range under the 2013 ARP in
2018, and higher non-fuel operations and maintenance expenses. Partially offsetting the decrease were lower federal income tax
expense as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation and an increase in retail revenues associated with colder weather in the first
quarter 2018 and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 compared to the corresponding periods in 2017.
Georgia Power's 2017 net income after dividends on preferred and preference stock was $1.4 billion, representing an $84 million,
or 6.3%, increase from the previous year. The increase was due primarily to lower non-fuel operations and maintenance expenses,
primarily as a result of cost containment and modernization initiatives, partially offset by lower revenues resulting from milder
weather and lower customer usage as compared to 2016.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
A condensed income statement for Georgia Power follows:
 AmountIncrease (Decrease)
from Prior Year
 2018 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 8,420 $ 110 $ (73)
Fuel 1,698 27 (136)
Purchased power 1,153 115 159
Other operations and maintenance 1,860 136 (279)
Depreciation and amortization 923 28 40
Taxes other than income taxes 437 28 4
Estimated loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 1,060 1,060 —
Total operating expenses 7,131 1,394 (212)
Operating income 1,289 (1,284) 139
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 397 (22) 31
Other income (expense), net 115 11 23
Income taxes 214 (616) 50
Net income 793 (635) 81
Dividends on preferred and preference stock — (14) (3)
Net income after dividends on preferred and preference stock $ 793 $ (621) $ 84
II-94
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2018 were $8.4 billion, reflecting a $110 million increase from 2017. Details of operating revenues were as
follows:
 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Retail — prior year $ 7,738 $ 7,772
Estimated change resulting from —   
Rates and pricing (363) 114
Sales growth (decline) 92 (33)
Weather 131 (166)
Fuel cost recovery 154 51
Retail — current year 7,752 7,738
Wholesale revenues —   
Non-affiliates 163 163
Affiliates 24 26
Total wholesale revenues 187 189
Other operating revenues 481 383
Total operating revenues $ 8,420 $ 8,310
Percent change 1.3% (0.9)%
Retail revenues of $7.8 billion in 2018 increased $14 million, or 0.2%, compared to 2017. The significant factors driving this
change are shown in the preceding table. The decrease in rates and pricing was primarily due to revenues deferred as a regulatory
liability for customer bill credits related to the Tax Reform Legislation and an adjustment for an expected refund to retail customers
as a result of Georgia Power's retail ROE exceeding the allowed retail ROE range under the 2013 ARP in 2018. See Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Georgia Power – Rate Plans" for additional information.
Retail revenues of $7.7 billion in 2017 decreased $34 million, or 0.4%, compared to 2016. The significant factors driving this
change are shown in the preceding table. The increase in rates and pricing was primarily due to an increase in revenues related to
the recovery of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 construction financing costs under the NCCR tariff. See Note 2 to the financial
statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction – Regulatory Matters" for additional information on the NCCR tariff.
See "Energy Sales" below for a discussion of changes in the volume of energy sold, including changes related to sales growth
(decline) and weather.
Electric rates include provisions to adjust billings for fluctuations in fuel costs, including the energy component of purchased power
costs. Under these fuel cost recovery provisions, fuel revenues generally equal fuel expenses and do not affect net income. See
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters – Fuel Cost Recovery" herein for additional information.
Wholesale revenues from power sales to non-affiliated utilities were as follows:
 2018 2017  2016
 (in millions)
Capacity and other $ 54 $ 67 $ 72
Energy 109 96 103
Total non-affiliated $ 163 $ 163 $ 175
Wholesale capacity revenues from PPAs are recognized either on a levelized basis over the appropriate contract period or the
amounts billable under the contract terms and provide for recovery of fixed costs and a return on investment. Wholesale revenues
from sales to non-affiliates will vary depending on fuel prices, the market prices of wholesale energy compared to the cost of
Georgia Power's and the Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company system's
electric service territory, and the availability of the Southern Company system's generation. Increases and decreases in energy
revenues that are driven by fuel prices are accompanied by an increase or decrease in fuel costs and do not have a significant
II-95
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
impact on net income. Short-term opportunity sales are made at market-based rates that generally provide a margin above Georgia
Power's variable cost of energy.
Wholesale revenues from non-affiliated sales remained flat in 2018 as compared to 2017. Capacity revenues decreased $13 million,
offset by a $13 million increase in energy revenues. The decrease in capacity revenues was primarily due to the expiration of a
wholesale contract in the fourth quarter 2017. The increase in energy revenues was primarily due to increased demand, partially
offset by the effects of expired contracts. Wholesale revenues from non-affiliated sales decreased $12 million, or 6.9%, in 2017 as
compared to 2016. The decrease was related to decreases of $5 million in capacity revenues and $7 million in energy revenues. The
decrease in capacity revenues reflects the expiration of wholesale contracts in the first and second quarters of 2016. The decrease in
energy revenues was primarily due to lower demand and the effects of the expired contracts.
Wholesale revenues from sales to affiliated companies will vary depending on demand and the availability and cost of generating
resources at each company. These affiliate sales are made in accordance with the IIC, as approved by the FERC. These transactions
do not have a significant impact on earnings since this energy is generally sold at marginal cost. In 2018, wholesale revenues from
sales to affiliates decreased $2 million as compared to 2017. In 2017, wholesale revenues from sales to affiliates decreased $16
million as compared to 2016 due to a 42.8% decrease in KWH sales as a result of the lower market cost of available energy
compared to the cost of Georgia Power-owned generation.
Other operating revenues increased $98 million, or 25.6%, in 2018 from the prior year largely due to $94 million of revenues
primarily from unregulated sales of products and services that were reclassified as other revenues as a result of the adoption of ASC
606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (ASC 606). In prior periods, these revenues were included in other income (expense),
net. See Note 1 to the financial statements for additional information regarding Georgia Power's adoption of ASC 606.
Other operating revenues decreased $11 million, or 2.8%, in 2017 from the prior year primarily due to a $15 million decrease in
open access transmission tariff revenues, primarily as a result of the expiration of long-term transmission services contracts, and a
$14 million adjustment in 2016 for customer temporary facilities services revenues, partially offset by a $13 million increase in
outdoor lighting sales revenues due to increased sales in new and replacement markets, primarily attributable to LED conversions.
Energy Sales
Changes in revenues are influenced heavily by the change in the volume of energy sold from year to year. KWH sales for 2018 and
the percent change from the prior year were as follows:
 Total
KWHs Total KWH
Percent Change  Weather-Adjusted
Percent Change
 2018  2018  2017  2018  2017
 (in billions)      
Residential 28.3 8.4 % (5.2)% 2.6% (0.2)%
Commercial 33.0 2.5  (2.4) 1.6 (0.9)
Industrial 23.7 0.6  (1.0) 0.2 (0.1)
Other 0.5 (6.0) (4.2) (6.3) (4.0)
Total retail 85.5 3.8  (2.9) 1.5% (0.4)%
Wholesale        
Non-affiliates 3.2 (4.2) (4.0)   
Affiliates 0.5 (34.2) (42.8)   
Total wholesale 3.7 (10.1) (15.3)   
Total energy sales 89.2 3.1 % (3.6)%   
Changes in retail energy sales are generally the result of changes in electricity usage by customers, changes in weather, and changes
in the number of customers.
In 2018, KWH sales for the residential class increased 8.4% compared to 2017 primarily due to colder weather in the first quarter
2018 and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 compared to the corresponding periods in 2017. Weather-adjusted
residential KWH sales and weather-adjusted commercial KWH sales increased by 2.6% and 1.6%, respectively, largely due to
customer growth. Weather-adjusted industrial KWH sales were essentially flat primarily due to increased demand in the primary
and fabricated metal sectors, offset by decreased demand in the textiles and stone, clay, and glass sectors. Additionally, customer
usage for all customer classes increased due to the negative impacts of Hurricane Irma in 2017.
II-96
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
In 2017, KWH sales for the residential class decreased 5.2% compared to 2016 primarily due to milder weather in 2017. Weather-
adjusted residential KWH sales decreased by 0.2% primarily due to a decline in average customer usage resulting from an increase
in multi-family housing and energy saving initiatives, partially offset by customer growth. Weather-adjusted commercial KWH
sales decreased by 0.9% primarily due to a decline in average customer usage resulting from an increase in electronic commerce
transactions and energy saving initiatives, partially offset by customer growth. Weather-adjusted industrial KWH sales were
essentially flat primarily due to decreased demand in the chemicals and paper sectors, offset by increased demand in the textile,
non-manufacturing, and rubber sectors. Additionally, Hurricane Irma negatively impacted customer usage for all customer classes
in 2017.
See "Operating Revenues" above for a discussion of significant changes in wholesale sales to non-affiliates and affiliated
companies.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
Fuel costs constitute one of the largest expenses for Georgia Power. The mix of fuel sources for the generation of electricity is
determined primarily by demand, the unit cost of fuel consumed, and the availability of generating units. Additionally, Georgia
Power purchases a portion of its electricity needs from the wholesale market.
Details of Georgia Power's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 2018 2017  2016
Total generation (in billions of KWHs) 65.2 63.2 68.4
Total purchased power (in billions of KWHs) 27.9 26.9 24.8
Sources of generation (percent) —    
Gas 42 41 38
Coal 30 32 36
Nuclear 25 25 24
Hydro 3 2 2
Cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)  —    
Gas 2.75 2.68 2.36
Coal 3.21 3.17 3.28
Nuclear 0.82 0.83 0.85
Average cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH) 2.40 2.36 2.33
Average cost of purchased power (in cents per net KWH)(*)4.79 4.62 4.53
(*) Average cost of purchased power includes fuel purchased by Georgia Power for tolling agreements where power is generated by the provider.
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $2.9 billion in 2018, an increase of $142 million, or 5.2%, compared to 2017. The
increase was primarily due to a $74 million increase in the average cost of fuel and purchased power primarily related to higher
natural gas and energy prices and an increase of $68 million related to the volume of KWHs generated and purchased primarily due
to colder weather in the first quarter 2018 and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 compared to the corresponding
periods in 2017.
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $2.7 billion in 2017, an increase of $23 million, or 0.9%, compared to 2016. The increase
was primarily due to an $84 million increase in the average cost of fuel and purchased power primarily related to higher natural gas
prices, partially offset by a net decrease of $61 million related to the volume of KWHs generated and purchased primarily due to
milder weather, resulting in lower customer demand.
Fuel and purchased power energy transactions do not have a significant impact on earnings since these fuel expenses are generally
offset by fuel revenues through Georgia Power's fuel cost recovery mechanism. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail
Regulatory Matters – Fuel Cost Recovery" herein for additional information.
Fuel
Fuel expense was $1.7 billion in 2018, an increase of $27 million, or 1.6%, compared to 2017. The increase was primarily due to an
increase of 2.6% in the average cost of natural gas per KWH generated and an increase of 1.9% in the volume of KWHs generated
largely due to colder weather in the first quarter 2018 and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 compared to the
corresponding periods in 2017. Fuel expense was $1.7 billion in 2017, a decrease of $136 million, or 7.5%,
II-97
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
compared to 2016. The decrease was primarily due to a decrease of 7.7% in the volume of KWHs generated largely due to milder
weather, resulting in lower customer demand, partially offset by an increase of 13.6% in the average cost of natural gas per KWH
generated.
Purchased Power - Non-Affiliates
Purchased power expense from non-affiliates was $430 million in 2018, an increase of $14 million, or 3.4%, compared to 2017.
The increase was primarily due to an 8.5% increase in the average cost per KWH purchased primarily due to higher energy prices,
partially offset by a decrease of 3.8% in volume of KWHs purchased primarily due to the higher market cost of available energy as
compared to Southern Company system resources. Purchased power expense from non-affiliates was $416 million in 2017, an
increase of $55 million, or 15.2%, compared to 2016. The increase was primarily due to a 13.4% increase in the volume of KWHs
purchased primarily due to unplanned outages at Georgia Power-owned generating units.
Energy purchases from non-affiliates will vary depending on the market prices of wholesale energy as compared to the cost of the
Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company system's electric service territory, and
the availability of the Southern Company system's generation.
Purchased Power - Affiliates
Purchased power expense from affiliates was $723 million in 2018, an increase of $101 million, or 16.2%, compared to 2017. The
increase was primarily due to a 6.3% increase in the volume of KWHs purchased due to colder weather in the first quarter 2018 and
scheduled generation outages and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 and a 3.0% increase in the average cost per
KWH purchased primarily resulting from higher energy prices. Purchased power expense from affiliates was $622 million in 2017,
an increase of $104 million, or 20.1%, compared to 2016. The increase was primarily due to a 7.0% increase in the volume of
KWHs purchased to support Southern Company system transmission reliability and as a result of unplanned outages at Georgia
Power-owned generating units and a 1.8% increase in the average cost per KWH purchased primarily resulting from higher natural
gas prices.
Energy purchases from affiliates will vary depending on the demand and the availability and cost of generating resources at each
company within the Southern Company system. These purchases are made in accordance with the IIC or other contractual
agreements, all as approved by the FERC.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
In 2018, other operations and maintenance expenses increased $136 million, or 7.9%, compared to 2017. The increase was
primarily due to $88 million of expenses from unregulated sales of products and services that were reclassified to other operations
and maintenance expenses as a result of the adoption of ASC 606. In prior periods, these expenses were included in other income
(expense), net. Also contributing to the increase were a $39 million decrease in gains on sales of assets and a $28 million increase
in transmission and distribution overhead line maintenance, primarily related to additional vegetation management, partially offset
by a decrease of $18 million associated with an employee attrition plan in 2017. See Note 1 to the financial statements for
additional information regarding Georgia Power's adoption of ASC 606.
In 2017, other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $279 million, or 13.9%, compared to 2016. The decrease was
primarily due to cost containment and modernization activities implemented in the third quarter 2016 that contributed to decreases
of $85 million in generation maintenance costs, $46 million in transmission and distribution overhead line maintenance, $22
million in employee benefits, and $22 million in customer accounts and sales costs. Other factors include a $40 million increase in
gains on sales of assets, a $19 million decrease in scheduled generation outage costs, and a $15 million decrease in customer
assistance expenses, primarily in demand-side management costs related to the timing of new programs.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization increased $28 million, or 3.1%, in 2018 compared to 2017. The increase was primarily due to
additional plant in service.
Depreciation and amortization increased $40 million, or 4.7%, in 2017 compared to 2016. The increase was primarily due to a $33
million increase related to additional plant in service and a $14 million decrease in amortization of regulatory liabilities related to
other cost of removal obligations that expired in December 2016, partially offset by a $9 million decrease in depreciation related to
generating unit retirements in 2016 and amortization of regulatory assets related to certain cancelled environmental and fuel
conversion projects that expired in December 2016.
See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Depreciation and Amortization" for additional information.
II-98
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Taxes Other Than Income Taxes
In 2018, taxes other than income taxes increased $28 million, or 6.8%, compared to 2017 primarily due to increases of $19 million
in property taxes as a result of an increase in the assessed value of property and $11 million in municipal franchise fees largely
related to higher retail revenues. In 2017, taxes other than income taxes increased $4 million, or 1.0%, compared to 2016.
Estimated Loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
In the second quarter 2018, an estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion was recorded to reflect Georgia Power's revised estimate to
complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which reflects the increase in costs included in the revised base
capital cost forecast for which Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery and costs included in the revised construction contingency
estimate for which Georgia Power may seek rate recovery as and when such costs are appropriately included in the base capital cost
forecast. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
In 2018, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized decreased $22 million, or 5.3%, compared to 2017 and increased $31 million,
or 8.0%, compared to 2016 primarily due to changes in outstanding borrowings.
Other Income (Expense), Net
In 2018, other income (expense), net increased $11 million compared to the prior year primarily due to an increase in AFUDC
equity of $29 million resulting from a higher AFUDC rate due to a higher equity ratio and lower short-term borrowings, partially
offset by a decrease of $21 million associated with revenues and expenses, net primarily from unregulated sales of products and
services. In 2018, these revenues and expenses are included in other revenues and other operations and maintenance expenses,
respectively, as a result of the adoption of ASC 606. See Note 1 to the financial statements for additional information regarding
Georgia Power's adoption of ASC 606.
In 2017, other income (expense), net increased $23 million compared to the prior year primarily due to a $28 million decrease in
the non-service cost components of net periodic pension and other postretirement benefit costs, a $7 million increase in third party
infrastructure services revenue, and a $6 million increase in wholesale operating fee revenue associated with contractual targets,
partially offset by a $10 million increase in charitable donations and an $8 million decrease in AFUDC equity resulting from higher
short-term borrowings. See Notes 1 under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" and 11 to the financial statements for
additional information on Georgia Power's net periodic pension and other postretirement benefit costs.
Income Taxes
Income taxes decreased $616 million, or 74.2%, in 2018 compared to the prior year primarily due to a lower federal income tax rate
as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation and the reduction in pre-tax earnings resulting from the estimated probable loss related to
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Income taxes increased $50 million, or 6.4%, in 2017 compared to the prior year primarily due to higher pre-tax earnings, partially
offset by an adjustment related to the Tax Reform Legislation.
See Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock
Dividends on preferred and preference stock decreased $14 million, or 100.0%, in 2018 compared to 2017 and decreased $3
million, or 17.6%, in 2017 compared to 2016. The decreases were due to the redemption in October 2017 of all outstanding shares
of Georgia Power's preferred and preference stock. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Outstanding Classes of Capital
Stock – Georgia Power" for additional information.
Effects of Inflation
Georgia Power is subject to rate regulation that is generally based on the recovery of historical and projected costs. The effects of
inflation can create an economic loss since the recovery of costs could be in dollars that have less purchasing power. Any adverse
effect of inflation on Georgia Power's results of operations has not been substantial in recent years.
II-99
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
General
Georgia Power operates as a vertically integrated utility providing electric service to retail customers within its traditional service
territory located in the State of Georgia and to wholesale customers in the Southeast. Prices for electricity provided by Georgia
Power to retail customers are set by the Georgia PSC under cost-based regulatory principles. Retail rates and earnings are reviewed
and may be adjusted periodically within certain limitations. Prices for wholesale electricity sales, interconnecting transmission
lines, and the exchange of electric power are regulated by the FERC. See ACCOUNTING POLICIES – "Application of Critical
Accounting Policies and Estimates – Utility Regulation" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power" for
additional information about regulatory matters.
The results of operations for the past three years are not necessarily indicative of future earnings potential. The level of Georgia
Power's future earnings depends on numerous factors that affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of Georgia Power's
business of providing electric service. These factors include Georgia Power's ability to maintain a constructive regulatory
environment that continues to allow for the timely recovery of prudently-incurred costs during a time of increasing costs, continued
customer growth, and the weak pace of growth in electricity use per customer, especially in residential and commercial markets.
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 construction and rate recovery are also major factors. Earnings will also depend upon maintaining and
growing sales, considering, among other things, the adoption and/or penetration rates of increasingly energy-efficient technologies,
increasing volumes of electronic commerce transactions, and more multi-family home construction, all of which could contribute to
a net reduction in customer usage. Earnings are subject to a variety of other factors. These factors include weather, competition,
new energy contracts with other utilities, energy conservation practiced by customers, the use of alternative energy sources by
customers, the price of electricity, the price elasticity of demand, and the rate of economic growth or decline in Georgia Power's
service territory. Demand for electricity is primarily driven by the pace of economic growth that may be affected by changes in
regional and global economic conditions, which may impact future earnings.
Environmental Matters
Georgia Power's operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and regulations
governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Georgia Power maintains comprehensive environmental
compliance and GHG strategies to assess upcoming requirements and compliance costs associated with these environmental laws
and regulations. The costs, including capital expenditures, operations and maintenance costs, and costs reflected in ARO liabilities,
required to comply with environmental laws and regulations and to achieve stated goals may impact future electric generating unit
retirement and replacement decisions, results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition. Related costs may result from
the installation of additional environmental controls, closure and monitoring of CCR facilities, unit retirements, or changing fuel
sources for certain existing units, as well as related upgrades to Georgia Power's transmission and distribution systems. A major
portion of these costs is expected to be recovered through retail rates. The ultimate impact of environmental laws and regulations
and the GHG goals discussed herein will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements, the
availability and cost of any deployed technology, fuel prices, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges.
New or revised environmental laws and regulations could affect many areas of Georgia Power's operations. The impact of any such
changes cannot be determined at this time. Environmental compliance costs could affect earnings if such costs cannot continue to
be recovered in rates on a timely basis. Georgia Power's Environmental Compliance Cost Recovery (ECCR) tariff allows for the
recovery of capital and operations and maintenance costs related to environmental controls mandated by state and federal
regulations. Further, increased costs that are recovered through regulated rates could contribute to reduced demand for electricity,
which could negatively affect results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition. Additionally, many commercial and
industrial customers may also be affected by existing and future environmental requirements, which for some may have the
potential to ultimately affect their demand for electricity.
Through 2018, Georgia Power has invested approximately $6.0 billion in environmental capital retrofit projects to comply with
environmental requirements, with annual totals of approximately $0.5 billion, $0.3 billion, and $0.2 billion for 2018, 2017, and
2016, respectively. Although the timing, requirements, and estimated costs could change as environmental laws and regulations are
adopted or modified, as compliance plans are revised or updated, and as legal challenges to rules are initiated or completed,
Georgia Power's current compliance strategy estimates capital expenditures of $0.7 billion from 2019 through 2023, with annual
totals of approximately $0.2 billion, $0.1 billion, $0.1 billion, $0.2 billion, and $0.1 billion for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023,
respectively. These estimates do not include any potential compliance costs associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions
from fossil fuel-fired electric generating units. See "Global Climate Issues" herein for additional information. Georgia Power also
anticipates substantial expenditures associated with ash pond closure and ground water monitoring under the CCR Rule, which
II-100
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
are reflected in Georgia Power's ARO liabilities. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and
Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Environmental Laws and Regulations
Air Quality
The EPA has set National Ambient Air Quality Standards (NAAQS) for six air pollutants (carbon monoxide, lead, nitrogen dioxide,
ozone, particulate matter, and SO2) to protect and improve the nation's air quality, which it reviews and revises periodically.
Following a NAAQS revision, states are required to develop an EPA-approved plan to protect air quality. These state plans can
require additional emission controls, improvements in control efficiency, or fuel changes which can result in increased compliance
and operational costs. NAAQS requirements can also adversely affect the siting of new electric generating facilities. All areas
within Georgia Power's service territory have been designated as attainment for all NAAQS except for a seven-county area within
metropolitan Atlanta that is not in attainment with the 2015 ozone NAAQS and the area surrounding Plant Hammond, which will
not be designated attainment or nonattainment for the 2010 SO2 standard until December 2020. If areas are designated as
nonattainment in the future, increased compliance costs could result. See "Retail Regulatory Matters – Integrated Resource Plan"
herein for information regarding Georgia Power's request to decertify and retire Plant Hammond.
In 2011, the EPA finalized the Cross-State Air Pollution Rule (CSAPR) to address impacts of SO2 and NOX emissions from fossil
fuel-fired electric generating plants. CSAPR establishes emissions trading programs and budgets for certain states and allocates
emissions allowances for sources in those states. In 2016, the EPA published a final rule establishing more stringent ozone season
NOX emissions budgets in Alabama. Georgia's ozone season NOX emissions budget remained unchanged. Increases in either future
fossil fuel-fired generation or the availability or cost of CSAPR allowances could have a negative financial impact on results of
operations for Georgia Power.
The EPA finalized regional haze regulations in 2005 and 2017. These regulations require states, tribal governments, and various
federal agencies to develop and implement plans to reduce pollutants that impair visibility and demonstrate reasonable progress
toward the goal of restoring natural visibility conditions in certain areas, including national parks and wilderness areas. States must
submit a revised state implementation plan (SIP) to the EPA demonstrating continued reasonable progress towards achieving
visibility improvement goals. The EPA has approved the regional progress SIP for the State of Georgia.
Water Quality
In 2014, the EPA finalized requirements under Section 316(b) of the Clean Water Act (CWA) to regulate cooling water intake
structures (CWIS) to minimize their effects on fish and other aquatic life at existing power plants (e.g. coal, natural gas, oil, and
nuclear generating plants) and manufacturing facilities. The regulation requires plant-specific studies to determine applicable CWIS
changes to protect organisms that either get caught on the intake screens (impingement) or are drawn into the cooling system
(entrainment). Georgia Power is conducting these studies and currently anticipates applicable CWIS changes may include fish-
friendly CWIS screens with fish return systems and minor additions of monitoring equipment at certain plants. However, the
ultimate impact of this rule will depend on the outcome of these plant-specific studies, any additional protective measures required
to be incorporated into each plant's National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit based on site-specific
factors, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In 2015, the EPA finalized the steam electric effluent limitations guidelines (ELG) rule (2015 ELG Rule) that set national standards
for wastewater discharges from new and existing steam electric generating units generating greater than 50 MWs. The 2015 ELG
Rule prohibits effluent discharges of certain waste streams and imposes stringent limits on flue gas desulfurization (scrubber)
wastewater discharges. The revised technology-based limits and the CCR Rule require extensive changes to existing ash and
wastewater management systems or the installation and operation of new ash and wastewater management systems. Compliance
with the 2015 ELG Rule is expected to require capital expenditures and increased operational costs primarily for Georgia Power's
coal-fired electric generation. State environmental agencies will incorporate specific compliance applicability dates in the NPDES
permitting process for each ELG waste stream no later than December 31, 2023. The EPA is scheduled to issue a new rulemaking
by December 2019 that could revise the limitations and applicability dates of two of the waste streams regulated in the 2015 ELG
Rule. The impact of any changes to the 2015 ELG Rule will depend on the content of the new rule and the outcome of any legal
challenges.
In 2015, the EPA and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers (Corps) jointly published a final rule that revised the regulatory definition
of waters of the United States (WOTUS) for all CWA programs. The rule significantly expanded the scope of federal jurisdiction
over waterbodies (such as rivers, streams, canals, and wastewater treatment ponds), which could impact new generation projects
and permitting and reporting requirements associated with the installation, expansion, and maintenance of transmission and
distribution projects. The EPA and the Corps are expected to publish a final rule in 2019 to replace the 2015
II-101
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
WOTUS definition. The impact of any changes to the 2015 WOTUS rule will depend on the content of this final rule and the
outcome of any legal challenges.
Coal Combustion Residuals
In 2015, the EPA finalized non-hazardous solid waste regulations for the disposal of CCR, including coal ash and gypsum, in
landfills and surface impoundments (ash ponds) at active generating power plants. In addition to the EPA's CCR Rule, the State of
Georgia has also finalized its own regulations regarding the handling of CCR. The EPA's CCR Rule requires landfills and ash
ponds to be evaluated against a set of performance criteria and potentially closed if minimum criteria are not met. Closure of
existing landfills and ash ponds could require installation of equipment and infrastructure to manage CCR in accordance with the
CCR Rule. Based on cost estimates for closure and monitoring of landfills and ash ponds pursuant to the CCR Rule, Georgia Power
recorded an update to the AROs for each CCR unit in 2015. As further analysis is performed and closure details are developed,
Georgia Power has continued to periodically update these cost estimates, as discussed further below.
The EPA published certain amendments to the CCR Rule, which became effective August 29, 2018. These amendments extend the
date from April 2019 to October 31, 2020 to cease sending CCR and other waste streams to ash ponds that demonstrate compliance
with all except two of the specified performance criteria. However, the Georgia Department of Natural Resources has not
incorporated these amendments into its state CCR rule.
On August 21, 2018, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit issued a decision suggesting the EPA should
regulate previously-excluded inactive ash ponds located at retired generation facilities and questioning both the ability of unlined
ash ponds to continue operating no matter the performance criteria results and the classification of clay-lined landfills and ash
ponds. These developments could impact the expected timing of Georgia Power's landfill and ash pond closure activities, but the
extent of any impact will depend on the outcome of ongoing litigation, anticipated EPA rulemaking action to establish further
guidance, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In December 2018, Georgia Power recorded an increase of approximately $3.1 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule and the
related state rule. During the second half of 2018, Georgia Power completed a strategic assessment related to its plans to close the
ash ponds at all of its generating plants in compliance with the CCR Rule and the related state rule. This assessment included
engineering and constructability studies related to design assumptions for ash pond closures and advanced engineering methods.
The results indicated that additional closure costs will be required to close these ash ponds, primarily due to changes in closure
strategies, the estimated amount of ash to be excavated, and additional water management requirements necessary to support
closure strategies. These factors also impact the estimated timing of future cash outlays.
Georgia Power expects to periodically update its ARO cost estimates. Absent continued recovery of ARO costs through regulated
rates, Georgia Power's results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition could be materially impacted. See "Retail
Regulatory Matters – Integrated Resource Plan" and FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and
Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Nuclear Decommissioning
In December 2018, Georgia Power completed updated decommissioning cost site studies for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1
and 2. The estimated cost of decommissioning based on the studies resulted in an increase in Georgia Power's ARO liability of
approximately $130 million. Georgia Power currently collects $4 million and $2 million annually in rates, which is used to fund
external nuclear decommissioning trusts for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2, respectively. Georgia Power expects the
Georgia PSC to review and adjust, if necessary, these amounts in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. See Note 6 to the
financial statements for additional information.
Environmental Remediation
Georgia Power must comply with environmental laws and regulations governing the handling and disposal of waste and releases of
hazardous substances. Under these various laws and regulations, Georgia Power may also incur substantial costs to clean up
affected sites. Georgia Power conducts studies to determine the extent of any required cleanup and has recognized the estimated
costs to clean up known impacted sites in its financial statements. Amounts for cleanup and ongoing monitoring costs were not
material for any year presented. Georgia Power has received authority from the Georgia PSC to recover approved environmental
compliance costs through regulatory mechanisms. Georgia Power may be liable for some or all required cleanup costs for
additional sites that may require environmental remediation. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "Environmental
Remediation" for additional information.
II-102
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Global Climate Issues
On August 31, 2018, the EPA published a proposed rule known as the Affordable Clean Energy (ACE) Rule, which is intended to
replace a regulation enacted in 2015 known as the Clean Power Plan (CPP), that would limit CO2 emissions from existing fossil
fuel-fired electric generating units. The CPP has been stayed by the U.S. Supreme Court since 2016. The ACE Rule would require
states to develop GHG unit-specific emission rate standards based on heat-rate efficiency improvements for existing fossil fuel-
fired steam units. As proposed, combustion turbines, including natural gas combined cycles, are not affected sources. As of January
1, 2019, Georgia Power has ownership interests in 20 fossil fuel-fired steam units to which the proposed ACE Rule is applicable.
The ultimate impact of this rule to Georgia Power is currently unknown and will depend on changes between the proposal and the
final rule, subsequent state plan developments and requirements, and any associated legal challenges.
On December 20, 2018, the EPA published a proposed review of the Standards of Performance for Greenhouse Gas Emissions from
New, Modified, and Reconstructed Stationary Sources: Electric Utility Generating Units final rule (2015 NSPS rule). The EPA's
final 2015 NSPS rule set standards of performance for new, modified, and reconstructed electric utility generating units which
included stationary combustion turbines and fossil-fired steam boilers. This proposal reduces the stringency of the 2015 NSPS rule
by not basing the new and reconstructed fossil-fired steam boiler and IGCC standards on partial carbon capture and sequestration.
The impact of any changes to this rule will depend on the content of the final rule and the outcome of any legal challenges.
The EPA's GHG reporting rule requires annual reporting of GHG emissions expressed in terms of metric tons of CO2 equivalent
emissions for a company's operational control of facilities. Based on ownership or financial control of facilities, Georgia Power's
2017 GHG emissions were approximately 30 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent. The preliminary estimate of Georgia Power's
2018 GHG emissions on the same basis is approximately 30 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent.
Through 2017, the Southern Company system has achieved an estimated GHG emission reduction of 36% since 2007. In April
2018, Southern Company established an intermediate goal of a 50% reduction in carbon emissions from 2007 levels by 2030 and a
long-term goal of low- to no-carbon operations by 2050. To achieve these goals, the Southern Company system expects to continue
growing its renewable energy portfolio, optimize technology advancements to modernize its transmission and distribution systems,
increase the use of natural gas for generation, complete ongoing construction projects, including Georgia Power's interest in Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4, invest in energy efficiency, and continue research and development efforts focused on technologies to lower
GHG emissions. The Southern Company system's ability to achieve these goals also will be dependent on many external factors,
including supportive national energy policies, low natural gas prices, and the development, deployment, and advancement of
relevant energy technologies.
FERC Matters
On May 10, 2018, AMEA and Cooperative Energy filed with the FERC a complaint against SCS and the traditional electric
operating companies (including Georgia Power) claiming that the current 11.25% base ROE used in calculating the annual
transmission revenue requirements of the traditional electric operating companies' (including Georgia Power's) open access
transmission tariff is unjust and unreasonable as measured by the applicable FERC standards. The complaint requested that the base
ROE be set no higher than 8.65% and that the FERC order refunds for the difference in revenue requirements that results from
applying a just and reasonable ROE established in this proceeding upon determining the current ROE is unjust and unreasonable.
On June 18, 2018, SCS and the traditional electric operating companies (including Georgia Power) filed their response challenging
the adequacy of the showing presented by the complainants and offering support for the current ROE. On September 6, 2018, the
FERC issued an order establishing a refund effective date of May 10, 2018 in the event a refund is due and initiating an
investigation and settlement procedures regarding the current base ROE. Through December 31, 2018, the estimated maximum
potential refund is not expected to be material to Georgia Power's results of operations or cash flows. The ultimate outcome of this
matter cannot be determined at this time.
Retail Regulatory Matters
Georgia Power's revenues from regulated retail operations are collected through various rate mechanisms subject to the oversight of
the Georgia PSC. Georgia Power currently recovers its costs from the regulated retail business through the 2013 ARP, which
includes traditional base tariff rates, Demand-Side Management (DSM) tariffs, ECCR tariffs, and Municipal Franchise Fee (MFF)
tariffs. Georgia Power is scheduled to file a base rate case by July 1, 2019, which may continue or modify these tariffs. In addition,
financing costs on certified construction costs of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are being collected through the NCCR tariff and fuel
costs are collected through a separate fuel cost recovery tariff. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Rate
Plans," " – Fuel Cost Recovery," and " – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
II-103
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
On November 16, 2018, Georgia Power completed the sale of its natural gas lateral pipeline serving Plant McDonough Units 4
through 6 to SNG at net book value, as approved by the Georgia PSC on January 16, 2018. Georgia Power expects payment of
$142 million from SNG to occur in the first quarter 2020. During the interim period, Georgia Power will receive a discounted
shipping rate to reflect the delayed consideration. Southern Company Gas, an affiliate of Georgia Power, owns a 50% equity
interest in SNG.
Rate Plans
Pursuant to the terms and conditions of a settlement agreement related to Southern Company's acquisition of Southern Company
Gas approved by the Georgia PSC in 2016, the 2013 ARP will continue in effect until December 31, 2019, and Georgia Power will
be required to file its next base rate case by July 1, 2019. Furthermore, through December 31, 2019, Georgia Power will retain its
merger savings, net of transition costs, as defined in the settlement agreement; through December 31, 2022, such net merger
savings will be shared on a 60/40 basis with customers; thereafter, all merger savings will be retained by customers.
There were no changes to Georgia Power's traditional base tariff rates, ECCR tariff, DSM tariffs, or MFF tariff in 2017 or 2018.
Under the 2013 ARP, Georgia Power's retail ROE is set at 10.95% and earnings are evaluated against a retail ROE range of 10.00%
to 12.00%. Two-thirds of any earnings above 12.00% will be directly refunded to customers, with the remaining one-third retained
by Georgia Power. There will be no recovery of any earnings shortfall below 10.00% on an actual basis. In 2016, Georgia Power's
retail ROE exceeded 12.00%, and Georgia Power refunded to retail customers in 2018 approximately $40 million as approved by
the Georgia PSC. On February 5, 2019, the Georgia PSC approved a settlement between Georgia Power and the staff of the Georgia
PSC under which Georgia Power's retail ROE for 2017 was stipulated to exceed 12.00% and Georgia Power will reduce certain
regulatory assets by approximately $4 million in lieu of providing refunds to retail customers. In 2018, Georgia Power's retail ROE
exceeded 12.00%, and Georgia Power accrued approximately $100 million to refund to retail customers, subject to review and
approval by the Georgia PSC.
On April 3, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. Pursuant to the Georgia Power
Tax Reform Settlement Agreement, to reflect the federal income tax rate reduction impact of the Tax Reform Legislation, Georgia
Power will refund to customers a total of $330 million through bill credits. Georgia Power issued bill credits of approximately $130
million in 2018 and will issue bill credits of approximately $95 million in June 2019 and $105 million in February 2020. In
addition, Georgia Power is deferring as a regulatory liability (i) the revenue equivalent of the tax expense reduction resulting from
legislation lowering the Georgia state income tax rate from 6.00% to 5.75% in 2019 and (ii) the entire benefit of federal and state
excess accumulated deferred income taxes, which is expected to total approximately $700 million at December 31, 2019. At
December 31, 2018, the related regulatory liability balance totaled $610 million. The amortization of these regulatory liabilities is
expected to be addressed in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. If there is not a base rate case in 2019, customers will receive
$185 million in annual bill credits beginning in 2020, with any additional federal and state income tax savings deferred as a
regulatory liability, until Georgia Power's next base rate case.
To address some of the negative cash flow and credit quality impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation, the Georgia PSC also
approved an increase in Georgia Power's retail equity ratio to the lower of (i) Georgia Power's actual common equity weight in its
capital structure or (ii) 55%, until the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power's actual retail
common equity ratio (on a 13-month average basis) was approximately 55%. Benefits from reduced federal income tax rates in
excess of the amounts refunded to customers will be retained by Georgia Power to cover the carrying costs of the incremental
equity in 2018 and 2019.
Integrated Resource Plan
See "Environmental Matters" herein for additional information regarding proposed and final EPA rules and regulations, including
revisions to ELG for steam electric power plants and additional regulations of CCR and CO2.
In 2016, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's triennial Integrated Resource Plan (2016 IRP) including the reclassification of
the remaining net book value of Plant Mitchell Unit 3 and costs associated with materials and supplies remaining at the unit
retirement date to a regulatory asset. Recovery of the unit's net book value will continue through December 31, 2019, as provided
in the 2013 ARP. The timing of the recovery of the remaining balance of the unit's net book value as of December 31, 2019 and
costs associated with materials and supplies remaining at the unit retirement date was deferred for consideration in the Georgia
Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
In the 2016 IRP, the Georgia PSC also approved recovery of costs up to $99 million through June 30, 2019 to preserve nuclear
generation as an option at a future generation site in Stewart County, Georgia. In March 2017, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia
Power's decision to suspend work at the site due to changing economics, including lower load forecasts and fuel costs. The timing
II-104
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
of recovery for costs incurred of approximately $50 million is expected to be determined by the Georgia PSC in the Georgia Power
2019 Base Rate Case.
On January 31, 2019, Georgia Power filed its triennial IRP (2019 IRP). The filing includes a request to decertify and retire Plant
Hammond Units 1 through 4 (840 MWs) and Plant McIntosh Unit 1 (142.5 MWs) upon approval of the 2019 IRP.
In the 2019 IRP, Georgia Power requested approval to reclassify the remaining net book value of Plant Hammond Units 1 through 4
(approximately $520 million at December 31, 2018) upon retirement to a regulatory asset to be amortized ratably over a period
equal to the applicable unit's remaining useful life through 2035. For Plant McIntosh Unit 1, Georgia Power requested approval to
reclassify the remaining net book value (approximately $40 million at December 31, 2018) upon retirement to a regulatory asset to
be amortized over a three-year period to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Georgia Power also requested
approval to reclassify any unusable material and supplies inventory balances remaining at the applicable unit's retirement date to a
regulatory asset for recovery over a period to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
The 2019 IRP also includes a request to certify approximately 25 MWs of capacity at Plant Scherer Unit 3 for the retail jurisdiction
beginning January 1, 2020, following the expiration of a wholesale PPA.
The 2019 IRP also includes details regarding ARO costs associated with ash pond and landfill closures and post-closure care.
Georgia Power requested the timing and rate of recovery of these costs be determined by the Georgia PSC in the Georgia Power
2019 Base Rate Case. See "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" and
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the
financial statements for additional information regarding Georgia Power's AROs.
Georgia Power also requested approval to issue two capacity-based requests for proposals (RFP). If approved, the first capacity-
based RFP will seek resources that can provide capacity beginning in 2022 or 2023 and the second capacity-based RFP will seek
resources that can provide capacity beginning in 2026, 2027, or 2028. Additionally, the 2019 IRP includes a request to procure an
additional 1,000 MWs of renewable resources through a competitive bidding process. Georgia Power also proposed to invest in a
portfolio of up to 50 MWs of battery energy storage technologies.
A decision from the Georgia PSC on the 2019 IRP is expected in mid-2019.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Georgia Power has established fuel cost recovery rates approved by the Georgia PSC. On August 16, 2018, the Georgia PSC
approved the deferral of Georgia Power's next fuel case to no later than March 16, 2020, with new rates, if any, to be effective June
1, 2020. Georgia Power continues to be allowed to adjust its fuel cost recovery rates under an interim fuel rider prior to the next
fuel case if the under or over recovered fuel balance exceeds $200 million. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power's under
recovered fuel balance was $115 million.
Georgia Power's fuel cost recovery mechanism includes costs associated with a natural gas hedging program, as revised and
approved by the Georgia PSC, allowing the use of an array of derivative instruments within a 48-month time horizon.
Fuel cost recovery revenues as recorded on the financial statements are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel costs and
amounts billed in current regulated rates. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on Georgia
Power's revenues or net income, but will affect operating cash flows.
Storm Damage Recovery
Georgia Power is accruing $30 million annually through December 31, 2019, as provided in the 2013 ARP, for incremental
operations and maintenance costs of damage from major storms to its transmission and distribution facilities. At December 31,
2018, the total balance in the regulatory asset related to storm damage was $416 million. During October 2018, Hurricane Michael
caused significant damage to Georgia Power's transmission and distribution facilities. The incremental restoration costs related to
this hurricane deferred in the regulatory asset for storm damage totaled approximately $115 million. Hurricanes Irma and Matthew
also caused significant damage to Georgia Power's transmission and distribution facilities during September 2017 and October
2016, respectively. The incremental restoration costs related to Hurricanes Irma and Matthew deferred in the regulatory asset for
storm damage totaled approximately $250 million. The rate of storm damage cost recovery is expected to be adjusted as part of the
Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case and further adjusted in future regulatory proceedings as necessary. The ultimate outcome of
this matter cannot be determined at this time. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Storm Damage
Recovery" for additional information regarding Georgia Power's storm damage reserve.
II-105
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Nuclear Construction
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In 2012, the NRC issued the related combined construction and operating licenses, which allowed full
construction of the two AP1000 nuclear units (with electric generating capacity of approximately 1,100 MWs each) and related
facilities to begin. Until March 2017, construction on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 continued under the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement,
which was a substantially fixed price agreement. In March 2017, the EPC Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter
11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.
In connection with the EPC Contractor's bankruptcy filing, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the Vogtle Owners,
entered into the Interim Assessment Agreement with the EPC Contractor to allow construction to continue. The Interim Assessment
Agreement expired in July 2017 when Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, and the EPC
Contractor entered into the Vogtle Services Agreement. Under the Vogtle Services Agreement, Westinghouse provides facility
design and engineering services, procurement and technical support, and staff augmentation on a time and materials cost basis. The
Vogtle Services Agreement provides that it will continue until the start-up and testing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are complete
and electricity is generated and sold from both units. The Vogtle Services Agreement is terminable by the Vogtle Owners upon 30
days' written notice.
In October 2017, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, executed the Bechtel Agreement, a cost
reimbursable plus fee arrangement, whereby Bechtel is reimbursed for actual costs plus a base fee and an at-risk fee, which is
subject to adjustment based on Bechtel's performance against cost and schedule targets. Each Vogtle Owner is severally (not
jointly) liable for its proportionate share, based on its ownership interest, of all amounts owed to Bechtel under the Bechtel
Agreement. The Vogtle Owners may terminate the Bechtel Agreement at any time for their convenience, provided that the Vogtle
Owners will be required to pay amounts related to work performed prior to the termination (including the applicable portion of the
base fee), certain termination-related costs, and, at certain stages of the work, the applicable portion of the at-risk fee. Bechtel may
terminate the Bechtel Agreement under certain circumstances, including certain Vogtle Owner suspensions of work, certain
breaches of the Bechtel Agreement by the Vogtle Owners, Vogtle Owner insolvency, and certain other events. Pursuant to the Loan
Guarantee Agreement between Georgia Power and the DOE, Georgia Power is required to obtain the DOE's approval of the Bechtel
Agreement prior to obtaining any further advances under the Loan Guarantee Agreement.
Cost and Schedule
Georgia Power's approximate proportionate share of the remaining estimated capital cost to complete Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 by
the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, is as follows:
(in billions)
Base project capital cost forecast(a)(b)$ 8.0
Construction contingency estimate 0.4
Total project capital cost forecast(a)(b)8.4
Net investment as of December 31, 2018(b)(4.6)
Remaining estimate to complete(a)$ 3.8
(a)Excludes financing costs expected to be capitalized through AFUDC of approximately $315 million.
(b)Net of $1.7 billion received from Toshiba under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds.
Georgia Power estimates that its financing costs for construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will total approximately $3.1 billion,
of which $1.9 billion had been incurred through December 31, 2018.
As construction continues, challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, and vendors; labor productivity, availability,
and/or cost escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, and/or installation and testing, including any required
engineering changes, of plant systems, structures, and components (some of which are based on new technology that only recently
began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale); or other issues could arise and change the projected schedule and
estimated cost. Monthly construction production targets required to maintain the current project schedule will continue to increase
significantly throughout 2019. To meet these increasing monthly targets, existing craft construction productivity must improve and
additional craft laborers must be retained and deployed.
Georgia Power and Southern Nuclear believe it is a leading practice in connection with a construction project of this size and
complexity to periodically validate recent construction progress in comparison to the projected schedule and to verify and update
quantities of commodities remaining to install, labor productivity, and forecasted staffing needs. This verification process, led by
II-106
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Southern Nuclear, was underway as of December 31, 2018 and is expected to be completed during the second quarter 2019.
Georgia Power currently does not anticipate any material changes to the total estimated project capital cost forecast for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 or the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, resulting from this verification
process. However, the ultimate impact on cost and schedule, if any, will not be known until the verification process is completed.
Georgia Power is required to report the results and any project impacts to the Georgia PSC by May 15, 2019.
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC, may
arise, which may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. If any license amendment requests or other
licensing-based compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result
in increased costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, any extension of the project schedule is
currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50 million per month, based on Georgia Power's
ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While Georgia Power is not precluded from seeking
recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately determine whether or not to seek recovery. Any
further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable through regulated rates will be required to be
charged to income and such charges could be material.
Joint Owner Contracts
In November 2017, the Vogtle Owners entered into an amendment to their joint ownership agreements for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 to provide for, among other conditions, additional Vogtle Owner approval requirements. Effective August 31, 2018, the Vogtle
Owners further amended the joint ownership agreements to clarify and provide procedures for certain provisions of the joint
ownership agreements related to adverse events that require the vote of the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to continue construction (as amended, and together with the November 2017 amendment, the Vogtle
Joint Ownership Agreements). The Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements also confirm that the Vogtle Owners' sole recourse against
Georgia Power or Southern Nuclear for any action or inaction in connection with their performance as agent for the Vogtle Owners
is limited to removal of Georgia Power and/or Southern Nuclear as agent, except in cases of willful misconduct.
As a result of the increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs as described below, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4 were required to vote to continue construction. On September 26, 2018, the Vogtle Owners unanimously voted to continue
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
In connection with the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into (i) the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet with the other
Vogtle Owners and MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG SPVJ, MEAG Power SPVM, LLC (MEAG SPVM), and MEAG
Power SPVP, LLC (MEAG SPVP) to take certain actions which partially mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle
Owners, including additional amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements and the purchase of PTCs from the other
Vogtle Owners, and (ii) the MEAG Term Sheet with MEAG and MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with respect to MEAG SPVJ's
ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (Project J) under certain circumstances. On January 14, 2019, Georgia Power,
MEAG, and MEAG SPVJ entered into an agreement to implement the provisions of the MEAG Term Sheet (MEAG Funding
Agreement). On February 18, 2019, Georgia Power, the other Vogtle Owners, and MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG
SPVJ, MEAG SPVM, and MEAG SPVP entered into certain amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements to implement
the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet (Global Amendments).
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
were modified as follows: (i) each Vogtle Owner must pay its proportionate share of qualifying construction costs for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 based on its ownership percentage up to the estimated cost at completion (EAC) for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 which
formed the basis of Georgia Power's forecast of $8.4 billion in the nineteenth VCM plus $800 million; (ii) Georgia Power will be
responsible for 55.7% of actual qualifying construction costs between $800 million and $1.6 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth
VCM (resulting in $80 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners responsible for
44.3% of such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests; and (iii) Georgia Power will be responsible for
65.7% of qualifying construction costs between $1.6 billion and $2.1 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth
II-107
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
VCM (resulting in a further $100 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners
responsible for 34.3% of such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
If the EAC is revised and exceeds the EAC in the nineteenth VCM by more than $2.1 billion, each of the other Vogtle Owners will
have a one-time option at the time the project budget forecast is so revised to tender a portion of its ownership interest to Georgia
Power in exchange for Georgia Power's agreement to pay 100% of such Vogtle Owner's remaining share of total construction costs
in excess of the EAC in the nineteenth VCM plus $2.1 billion. In this event, Georgia Power will have the option of cancelling the
project in lieu of purchasing a portion of the ownership interest of any other Vogtle Owner. If Georgia Power accepts the offer to
purchase a portion of another Vogtle Owner's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, the ownership interest(s) to be
conveyed from the tendering Vogtle Owner(s) to Georgia Power will be calculated based on the proportion of the cumulative
amount of construction costs paid by each such tendering Vogtle Owner(s) and by Georgia Power as of the COD of Plant Vogtle
Unit 4. For purposes of this calculation, payments made by Georgia Power on behalf of another Vogtle Owner in accordance with
the second and third items described in the paragraph above will be treated as payments made by the applicable Vogtle Owner.
In the event the actual costs of construction at completion of a Unit are less than the EAC reflected in the nineteenth VCM report
and such Unit is placed in service in accordance with the schedule projected in the nineteenth VCM report (i.e., Plant Vogtle Unit 3
is placed in service by November 2021 or Plant Vogtle Unit 4 is placed in service by November 2022), Georgia Power will be
entitled to 60.7% of the cost savings with respect to the relevant Unit and the remaining Vogtle Owners will be entitled to 39.3% of
such savings on a pro rata basis in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
For purposes of the foregoing provisions, qualifying construction costs will not include costs (i) resulting from force majeure
events, including governmental actions or inactions (or significant delays associated with issuance of such actions) that affect the
licensing, completion, start-up, operations, or financing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, administrative proceedings or litigation
regarding ITAAC or other regulatory challenges to commencement of operation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, and changes in laws
or regulations governing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, (ii) legal fees and legal expenses incurred due to litigation with contractors or
subcontractors that are not subsidiaries or affiliates of Southern Company, and (iii) additional costs caused by requests from the
Vogtle Owners other than Georgia Power, except for the exercise of a right to vote granted under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements, that increase costs by $100,000 or more.
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the provisions of the Vogtle Joint
Ownership Agreements requiring that Vogtle Owners holding 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 vote to
continue construction following certain adverse events (Project Adverse Events) were modified. Pursuant to the Global
Amendments, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 must vote to continue
construction if certain Project Adverse Events occur, including: (i) the bankruptcy of Toshiba; (ii) the termination or rejection in
bankruptcy of certain agreements, including the Vogtle Services Agreement, the Bechtel Agreement, or the agency agreement with
Southern Nuclear; (iii) Georgia Power publicly announces its intention not to submit for rate recovery any portion of its investment
in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 or the Georgia PSC determines that any of Georgia Power's costs relating to the construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will not be recovered in retail rates, excluding any additional amounts paid by Georgia Power on behalf of the
other Vogtle Owners pursuant to the Global Amendments described above and the first 6% of costs during any six-month VCM
reporting period that are disallowed by the Georgia PSC for recovery, or for which Georgia Power elects not to seek cost recovery,
through retail rates; and (iv) an incremental extension of one year or more over the most recently approved schedule. Under the
Global Amendments, Georgia Power may cancel the project at any time in its sole discretion.
In addition, pursuant to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements, the required approval of holders of ownership interests in Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is at least (i) 90% for a change of the primary construction contractor and (ii) 67% for material amendments to
the Vogtle Services Agreement or agreements with Southern Nuclear or the primary construction contractor, including the Bechtel
Agreement.
The Global Amendments provide that if the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests fail to vote in favor of continuing the
project following any future Project Adverse Event, work on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will continue for a period of 30 days if the
holders of more than 50% of the ownership interests vote in favor of continuing construction (Majority Voting Owners). In such a
case, the Vogtle Owners (i) have agreed to negotiate in good faith towards the resumption of the project, (ii) if no agreement is
reached during such 30-day period, the project will be cancelled, and (iii) in the event of such a cancellation, the Majority Voting
Owners will be obligated to reimburse any other Vogtle Owner for the incremental costs it incurred during such 30-day negotiation
period.
II-108
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Purchase of PTCs During Commercial Operation
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, Georgia Power has agreed to purchase
additional PTCs from OPC, Dalton, MEAG SPVM, MEAG SPVP, and MEAG SPVJ (to the extent any MEAG SPVJ PTC rights
remain after any purchases required under the MEAG Funding Agreement as described below) at varying purchase prices
dependent upon the actual cost to complete construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 as compared to the EAC reflected in the
nineteenth VCM report. The purchases are at the option of the applicable Vogtle Owner.
Potential Funding to MEAG Project J
Pursuant to the MEAG Funding Agreement, and consistent with the MEAG Term Sheet, if MEAG SPVJ is unable to make its
payments due under the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements solely as a result of the occurrence of one of the following situations
that materially impedes access to capital markets for MEAG for Project J: (i) the conduct of JEA or the City of Jacksonville, such
as JEA's legal challenges of its obligations under a PPA with MEAG (PPA-J), or (ii) PPA-J is declared void by a court of competent
jurisdiction or rejected by JEA under the applicable provisions of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code (each of (i) and (ii), a JEA Default), at
MEAG's request, Georgia Power will purchase from MEAG SPVJ the rights to PTCs attributable to MEAG SPVJ's share of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (approximately 206 MWs) within 30 days of such request at varying prices dependent upon the stage of
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. The aggregate purchase price of the PTCs, together with any advances made as
described in the next paragraph, shall not exceed $300 million.
At the option of MEAG, as an alternative or supplement to Georgia Power's purchase of PTCs as described above, Georgia Power
has agreed to provide up to $250 million in funding to MEAG for Project J in the form of advances (either advances under the
Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements or the purchase of MEAG Project J bonds, at the discretion of Georgia Power), subject to any
required approvals of the Georgia PSC and the DOE.
In the event MEAG SPVJ certifies to Georgia Power that it is unable to fund its obligations under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements as a result of a JEA Default and Georgia Power becomes obligated to provide funding as described above, MEAG is
required to (i) assign to Georgia Power its right to vote on any future Project Adverse Event and (ii) diligently pursue JEA for its
breach of PPA-J. In addition, Georgia Power agreed that it will not sue MEAG for any amounts due from MEAG SPVJ under
MEAG's guarantee of MEAG SPVJ's obligations so long as MEAG SPVJ complies with the terms of the MEAG Funding
Agreement as to its payment obligations and the other non-payment provisions of the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements.
Under the terms of the MEAG Funding Agreement, Georgia Power may cancel the project in lieu of providing funding in the form
of advances or PTC purchases.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Regulatory Matters
In 2009, the Georgia PSC voted to certify construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 with a certified capital cost of $4.418 billion.
In addition, in 2009 the Georgia PSC approved inclusion of the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 related CWIP accounts in rate base, and
the State of Georgia enacted the Georgia Nuclear Energy Financing Act, which allows Georgia Power to recover financing costs for
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Financing costs are recovered on all applicable certified costs through annual adjustments to the NCCR
tariff up to the certified capital cost of $4.418 billion. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had recovered approximately $1.9
billion of financing costs. Financing costs related to capital costs above $4.418 billion will be recovered through AFUDC; however,
Georgia Power will not record AFUDC related to any capital costs in excess of the total deemed reasonable by the Georgia PSC
(currently $7.3 billion) and not requested for rate recovery. On December 18, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's
request to increase the NCCR tariff by $88 million annually, effective January 1, 2019.
Georgia Power is required to file semi-annual VCM reports with the Georgia PSC by February 28 and August 31 of each year. In
2013, in connection with the eighth VCM report, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation between Georgia Power and the staff of
the Georgia PSC to waive the requirement to amend the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 certificate in accordance with the 2009
certification order until the completion of Plant Vogtle Unit 3, or earlier if deemed appropriate by the Georgia PSC and Georgia
Power.
In 2016, the Georgia PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement (Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement) resolving certain prudency
matters in connection with the fifteenth VCM report. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC voted to approve (and issued its related
order on January 11, 2018) Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM report, which included a recommendation to continue construction
with Southern Nuclear as project manager and Bechtel serving as the primary construction contractor, and modified the Vogtle Cost
Settlement Agreement. The Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, as modified by the January 11, 2018 order, resolved the following
regulatory matters related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4: (i) none of the $3.3 billion of costs incurred
II-109
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
through December 31, 2015 and reflected in the fourteenth VCM report should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of
imprudence; (ii) the Contractor Settlement Agreement was reasonable and prudent and none of the amounts paid pursuant to the
Contractor Settlement Agreement should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of imprudence; (iii) (a) capital costs incurred up
to $5.68 billion would be presumed to be reasonable and prudent with the burden of proof on any party challenging such costs, (b)
Georgia Power would have the burden to show that any capital costs above $5.68 billion were prudent, and (c) a revised capital cost
forecast of $7.3 billion (after reflecting the impact of payments received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and related
Customer Refunds) was found reasonable; (iv) construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 should be completed, with Southern
Nuclear serving as project manager and Bechtel as primary contractor; (v) approved and deemed reasonable Georgia Power's
revised schedule placing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in service in November 2021 and November 2022, respectively; (vi) confirmed
that the revised cost forecast does not represent a cost cap and that prudence decisions on cost recovery will be made at a later date,
consistent with applicable Georgia law; (vii) reduced the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff (a) from 10.95% (the ROE rate
setting point authorized by the Georgia PSC in the 2013 ARP) to 10.00% effective January 1, 2016, (b) from 10.00% to 8.30%,
effective January 1, 2020, and (c) from 8.30% to 5.30%, effective January 1, 2021 (provided that the ROE in no case will be less
than Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt); (viii) reduced the ROE used for AFUDC equity for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 from 10.00% to Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt, effective January 1, 2018; and (ix) agreed that upon Unit 3
reaching commercial operation, retail base rates would be adjusted to include carrying costs on those capital costs deemed prudent
in the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement. The January 11, 2018 order also stated that if Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are not
commercially operational by June 1, 2021 and June 1, 2022, respectively, the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff will be further
reduced by 10 basis points each month (but not lower than Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt) until the respective
Unit is commercially operational. The ROE reductions negatively impacted earnings by approximately $100 million, $25 million,
and $20 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively, and are estimated to have negative earnings impacts of approximately $75
million in 2019 and an aggregate of approximately $615 million from 2020 to 2022.
In its January 11, 2018 order, the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon which Georgia Power's
seventeenth VCM report are based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the decision to continue
construction.
On February 12, 2018, Georgia Interfaith Power & Light, Inc. (GIPL) and Partnership for Southern Equity, Inc. (PSE) filed a
petition appealing the Georgia PSC's January 11, 2018 order with the Fulton County Superior Court. On March 8, 2018, Georgia
Watch filed a similar appeal to the Fulton County Superior Court for judicial review of the Georgia PSC's decision and denial of
Georgia Watch's motion for reconsideration. On December 21, 2018, the Fulton County Superior Court granted Georgia Power's
motion to dismiss the two appeals. On January 9, 2019, GIPL, PSE, and Georgia Watch filed an appeal of this decision with the
Georgia Court of Appeals. Georgia Power believes the appeal has no merit; however, an adverse outcome in the appeal combined
with subsequent adverse action by the Georgia PSC could have a material impact on Georgia Power's results of operations,
financial condition, and liquidity.
In preparation for its nineteenth VCM filing, Georgia Power requested Southern Nuclear to perform a full cost reforecast for the
project. This reforecast, performed prior to the nineteenth VCM filing, resulted in a $0.7 billion increase to the base capital cost
forecast reported in the second quarter 2018. This base cost increase primarily resulted from changed assumptions related to the
finalization of contract scopes and management responsibilities for Bechtel and over 60 subcontractors, labor productivity rates,
and craft labor incentives, as well as the related levels of project management, oversight, and support, including field supervision
and engineering support.
Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the Georgia
PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is not subject
to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for these cost increases included in the current base capital cost forecast (or
any related financing costs) in the nineteenth VCM report. In connection with future VCM filings, Georgia Power may request the
Georgia PSC to evaluate costs currently included in the construction contingency estimate for rate recovery as and when they are
appropriately included in the base capital cost forecast. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that exists regarding
the future recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of these matters is
subject to the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future regulatory
proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter
2018, which includes the total increase in the base capital cost forecast and construction contingency estimate.
On August 31, 2018, Georgia Power filed its nineteenth VCM report with the Georgia PSC, which requested approval of $578
million of construction capital costs incurred from January 1, 2018 through June 30, 2018. On February 19, 2019, the Georgia PSC
approved the nineteenth VCM, but deferred approval of $51.6 million of expenditures related to Georgia Power's portion of
II-110
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
an administrative claim filed in the Westinghouse bankruptcy proceedings. Through the nineteenth VCM, the Georgia PSC has
approved total construction capital costs incurred through June 30, 2018 of $5.4 billion (before $1.7 billion of payments received
under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds). In addition, the staff of
the Georgia PSC requested, and Georgia Power agreed, to file its twentieth VCM report concurrently with the twenty-first VCM
report by August 31, 2019.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
DOE Financing
At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had borrowed $2.6 billion related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 costs through the Loan
Guarantee Agreement and a multi-advance credit facility among Georgia Power, the DOE, and the FFB, which provides for
borrowings of up to $3.46 billion, subject to the satisfaction of certain conditions. In September 2017, the DOE issued a conditional
commitment to Georgia Power for up to approximately $1.67 billion in additional guaranteed loans under the Loan Guarantee
Agreement. In September 2018, the DOE extended the conditional commitment to March 31, 2019. Any further extension must be
approved by the DOE. Final approval and issuance of these additional loan guarantees by the DOE cannot be assured and are
subject to the negotiation of definitive agreements, completion of due diligence by the DOE, receipt of any necessary regulatory
approvals, and satisfaction of other conditions. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan
Guarantee Borrowings" for additional information, including applicable covenants, events of default, mandatory prepayment events
(including any decision not to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4), and conditions to borrowing.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Income Tax Matters
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
In December 2017, the Tax Reform Legislation was signed into law and became effective on January 1, 2018. The Tax Reform
Legislation, among other things, reduced the federal corporate income tax rate to 21%, retained normalization provisions for public
utility property and existing renewable energy incentives, and repealed the corporate alternative minimum tax. In addition, under
the Tax Reform Legislation, net operating losses generated after December 31, 2017 can no longer be carried back to previous tax
years but can be carried forward indefinitely, with utilization limited to 80% of taxable income of the subsequent tax year. The
projected reduction of Southern Company's consolidated income tax liability resulting from the tax rate reduction also delays the
expected utilization of existing tax credit carryforwards at Georgia Power. See Note 10 to the financial statements for information
on Southern Company's joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement.
Following the enactment of the Tax Reform Legislation, the SEC staff issued Staff Accounting Bulletin 118 – "Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" (SAB 118), which provided for a measurement period of up to one year
from the enactment date to complete accounting under GAAP for the tax effects of the legislation. Due to the complex and
comprehensive nature of the enacted tax law changes and their application under GAAP, Georgia Power considered all amounts
recorded in the financial statements as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation "provisional" as discussed in SAB 118 and subject to
revision prior to filing its 2017 tax return in the fourth quarter 2018. Georgia Power recognized tax benefits of $50 million and $8
million in 2018 and 2017, respectively, for a total of $58 million as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. In addition, in total,
Georgia Power recorded a $147 million decrease in regulatory assets and a $3.0 billion increase in regulatory liabilities as a result
of the Tax Reform Legislation and $2 million of stranded excess deferred tax balances in AOCI at December 31, 2017 were
adjusted through retained earnings in 2018. As of December 31, 2018, Georgia Power considered the measurement of impacts from
the Tax Reform Legislation on deferred income tax assets and liabilities, primarily due to the impact of the reduction of the
corporate income tax rate, to be complete.
However, the IRS continues to issue regulations that provide further interpretation and guidance on the law and each state's
adoption of the provisions contained in the Tax Reform Legislation remains uncertain. The ultimate impact of this matter cannot be
determined at this time. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Rate Plans" for additional information
regarding the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. The regulatory treatment of certain impacts of the Tax Reform
Legislation remains subject to the discretion of the Georgia PSC in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case and the FERC. Also,
see FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Credit Rating Risk" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements under
"Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
II-111
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Bonus Depreciation
Under the Tax Reform Legislation, projects with binding contracts prior to September 28, 2017 and placed in service after
September 27, 2017 remain eligible for bonus depreciation under the PATH Act. The PATH Act allowed for 50% bonus
depreciation for 2015 through 2017, 40% bonus depreciation for 2018, and 30% bonus depreciation for 2019 and certain long-lived
assets placed in service in 2020. Based on provisional estimates, bonus depreciation is expected to result in positive cash flows of
approximately $80 million for the 2018 tax year and approximately $30 million for the 2019 tax year. The ultimate outcome of this
matter cannot be determined at this time.
Other Matters
Georgia Power is involved in various other matters being litigated and regulatory matters that could affect future earnings. In
addition, Georgia Power is subject to certain claims and legal actions arising in the ordinary course of business. Georgia Power's
business activities are subject to extensive governmental regulation related to public health and the environment, such as laws and
regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Litigation over environmental issues and claims of
various types, including property damage, personal injury, common law nuisance, and citizen enforcement of environmental laws
and regulations, has occurred throughout the U.S. This litigation has included claims for damages alleged to have been caused by
CO2 and other emissions, CCR, and alleged exposure to hazardous materials, and/or requests for injunctive relief in connection
with such matters.
The ultimate outcome of such pending or potential litigation or regulatory matters cannot be predicted at this time; however, for
current proceedings not specifically reported herein or in Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements, management does not anticipate
that the ultimate liabilities, if any, arising from such current proceedings would have a material effect on Georgia Power's financial
statements. See Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements for a discussion of various other contingencies, regulatory matters, and
other matters being litigated which may affect future earnings potential.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
Georgia Power prepares its financial statements in accordance with GAAP. Significant accounting policies are described in Notes 1,
5, and 6 to the financial statements. In the application of these policies, certain estimates are made that may have a material impact
on Georgia Power's results of operations and related disclosures. Different assumptions and measurements could produce estimates
that are significantly different from those recorded in the financial statements. Senior management has reviewed and discussed the
following critical accounting policies and estimates with the Audit Committee of Southern Company's Board of Directors.
Utility Regulation
Georgia Power is subject to retail regulation by the Georgia PSC and wholesale regulation by the FERC. These regulatory agencies
set the rates Georgia Power is permitted to charge customers based on allowable costs. As a result, Georgia Power applies
accounting standards which require the financial statements to reflect the effects of rate regulation. Through the ratemaking
process, the regulators may require the inclusion of costs or revenues in periods different than when they would be recognized by a
non-regulated company. This treatment may result in the deferral of expenses and the recording of related regulatory assets based
on anticipated future recovery through rates or the deferral of gains or creation of liabilities and the recording of related regulatory
liabilities. The application of the accounting standards has a further effect on Georgia Power's financial statements as a result of the
estimates of allowable costs used in the ratemaking process. These estimates may differ from those actually incurred by Georgia
Power; therefore, the accounting estimates inherent in specific costs such as depreciation, AROs, and pension and other
postretirement benefits have less of a direct impact on Georgia Power's results of operations and financial condition than they
would on a non-regulated company.
As reflected in Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Regulatory Assets and Liabilities," significant regulatory
assets and liabilities have been recorded. Management reviews the ultimate recoverability of these regulatory assets and any
requirement to refund these regulatory liabilities based on applicable regulatory guidelines and GAAP. However, adverse
legislative, judicial, or regulatory actions could materially impact the amounts of such regulatory assets and liabilities and could
adversely impact Georgia Power's financial statements.
Estimated Cost, Schedule, and Rate Recovery for the Construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
In 2016, the Georgia PSC approved the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, which resolved certain prudency matters in connection
with Georgia Power's fifteenth VCM report. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM
II-112
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
report, which included a recommendation to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, with Southern Nuclear serving as
project manager and Bechtel serving as the primary construction contractor, as well as a modification of the Vogtle Cost Settlement
Agreement. The Georgia PSC's related order stated that under the modified Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, (i) none of the $3.3
billion of costs incurred through December 31, 2015 should be disallowed as imprudent; (ii) capital costs incurred up to $5.68
billion would be presumed to be reasonable and prudent with the burden of proof on any party challenging such costs; (iii) Georgia
Power would have the burden of proof to show that any capital costs above $5.68 billion were prudent; (iv) Georgia Power's total
project capital cost forecast of $7.3 billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and
approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds) was found reasonable and did not represent a cost cap; and (v) prudence
decisions would be made subsequent to achieving fuel load for Unit 4.
In its order, the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon which Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM
report are based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the decision to continue construction.
In the second quarter 2018, Georgia Power revised its base cost forecast and estimated contingency to complete construction and
start-up of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to $8.0 billion and $0.4 billion, respectively, for a total project capital cost forecast of $8.4
billion (net of $1.7 billion received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer
Refunds). Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the
Georgia PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is
not subject to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for the $0.7 billion increase in costs included in the current base
capital cost forecast in the nineteenth VCM report. In connection with future VCM filings, Georgia Power may request the Georgia
PSC to evaluate costs currently included in the construction contingency estimate for rate recovery as and when they are
appropriately included in the base capital cost forecast. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that exists regarding
the future recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of these matters is
subject to the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future regulatory
proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter
2018.
Georgia Power's revised cost estimate reflects an expected in-service date of November 2021 for Unit 3 and November 2022 for
Unit 4.
As construction continues, challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, and vendors; labor productivity, availability,
and/or cost escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, and/or installation and testing, including any required
engineering changes, of plant systems, structures, and components (some of which are based on new technology that only recently
began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale); or other issues could arise and change the projected schedule and
estimated cost. Monthly construction production targets required to maintain the current project schedule will continue to increase
significantly throughout 2019. To meet these increasing monthly targets, existing craft construction productivity must improve and
additional craft laborers must be retained and deployed.
Georgia Power and Southern Nuclear believe it is a leading practice in connection with a construction project of this size and
complexity to periodically validate recent construction progress in comparison to the projected schedule and to verify and update
quantities of commodities remaining to install, labor productivity, and forecasted staffing needs. This verification process, led by
Southern Nuclear, was underway as of December 31, 2018 and is expected to be completed during the second quarter 2019.
Georgia Power currently does not anticipate any material changes to the total estimated project capital cost forecast for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 or the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, resulting from this verification
process. However, the ultimate impact on cost and schedule, if any, will not be known until the verification process is completed.
Georgia Power is required to report the results and any project impacts to the Georgia PSC by May 15, 2019.
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC, may
arise, which may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. If any license amendment requests or other
licensing-based compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result
in increased costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. Any extension of the in-service dates of November 2021
for Unit 3 and November 2022 for Unit 4 is currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50
million per month, based on Georgia Power's ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While
II-113
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Georgia Power is not precluded from seeking recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately
determine whether or not to seek recovery. Any further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable
through regulated rates will be required to be charged to income and such charges could be material.
Given the significant complexity involved in estimating the future costs to complete construction and start-up of Plant Vogtle Units
3 and 4 and the significant management judgment necessary to assess the related uncertainties surrounding future rate recovery of
any projected cost increases, as well as the potential impact on Georgia Power's results of operations and cash flows, Georgia
Power considers these items to be critical accounting estimates. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power –
Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
Asset Retirement Obligations
AROs are computed as the fair value of the estimated costs for an asset's future retirement and are recorded in the period in which
the liability is incurred. The estimated costs are capitalized as part of the related long-lived asset and depreciated over the asset's
useful life. In the absence of quoted market prices, AROs are estimated using present value techniques in which estimates of future
cash outlays associated with the asset retirements are discounted using a credit-adjusted risk-free rate. Estimates of the timing and
amounts of future cash outlays are based on projections of when and how the assets will be retired and the cost of future removal
activities.
The liability for AROs primarily relates to the decommissioning of Georgia Power's nuclear facilities, which include Georgia
Power's ownership interests in Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2, and facilities that are subject to the CCR Rule and the
related state rule, principally ash ponds. In addition, Georgia Power has AROs related to various landfill sites, underground storage
tanks, and asbestos removal.
Georgia Power also has identified retirement obligations related to certain transmission and distribution facilities, including the
disposal of polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers; leasehold improvements; equipment on customer property; and
property associated with Georgia Power's rail lines and natural gas pipelines. However, liabilities for the removal of these assets
have not been recorded because the settlement timing for the retirement obligations related to these assets is indeterminable and,
therefore, the fair value of the retirement obligations cannot be reasonably estimated. A liability for these retirement obligations will
be recognized when sufficient information becomes available to support a reasonable estimation of the retirement obligation.
Georgia Power previously recorded AROs as a result of state requirements in Georgia which closely align with the requirements of
the CCR Rule discussed above. The cost estimates for AROs related to the disposal of CCR are based on information using various
assumptions related to closure and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and discount rates, and the potential
methods for complying with the CCR Rule and the related state rule. In December 2018, Georgia Power recorded an increase of
approximately $3.1 billion to its AROs related to the disposal of CCR as a result of a strategic assessment which indicated
additional closure costs will be required to close the ash ponds, primarily due to changes in closure strategies, the estimated amount
of ash to be excavated, and additional water management requirements necessary to support closure strategies. Also in December
2018, Georgia Power recorded an increase of approximately $130 million to its AROs as a result of updated decommissioning cost
site studies for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2. Georgia Power expects to periodically update its ARO cost estimates.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion
Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating AROs, Georgia Power considers the liabilities for AROs to be critical
accounting estimates.
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits
Georgia Power's calculation of pension and other postretirement benefits expense is dependent on a number of assumptions. These
assumptions include discount rates, healthcare cost trend rates, expected long-term return on plan assets, mortality rates, expected
salary and wage increases, and other factors. Components of pension and other postretirement benefits expense include interest and
service cost on the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, expected return on plan assets, and amortization of certain
unrecognized costs and obligations. Actual results that differ from the assumptions utilized are accumulated and amortized over
future periods and, therefore, generally affect recognized expense and the recorded obligation in future periods. While Georgia
Power believes that the assumptions used are appropriate, differences in actual experience or significant changes in assumptions
would affect its pension and other postretirement benefit costs and obligations.
Key elements in determining Georgia Power's pension and other postretirement benefit expense are the expected long-term return
on plan assets and the discount rate used to measure the benefit plan obligations and the periodic benefit plan expense for future
periods. The expected long-term return on pension and other postretirement benefit plan assets is based on Southern Company's
investment strategy, historical experience, and expectations for long-term rates of return that consider external actuarial advice.
II-114
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company determines the long-term return on plan assets by applying the long-term rate of expected returns on various
asset classes to Southern Company's target asset allocation. For purposes of determining Georgia Power's liability related to the
pension and other postretirement benefit plans, Southern Company discounts the future related cash flows using a single-point
discount rate for each plan developed from the weighted average of market-observed yields for high quality fixed income securities
with maturities that correspond to expected benefit payments.
A 25 basis point change in any significant assumption (discount rate, salary increases, or long-term rate of return on plan assets)
would result in a $10 million or less change in total annual benefit expense, a $128 million or less change in the projected
obligation for the pension plan, and an $18 million or less change in the projected obligation for other postretirement benefit plans.
See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information regarding pension and other postretirement benefits.
Contingent Obligations
Georgia Power is subject to a number of federal and state laws and regulations, as well as other factors and conditions that subject it
to environmental, litigation, and other risks. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL herein and Notes 2 and 3 to the financial
statements for more information regarding certain of these contingencies. Georgia Power periodically evaluates its exposure to such
risks and records reserves for those matters where a non-tax-related loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable. The
adequacy of reserves can be significantly affected by external events or conditions that can be unpredictable; thus, the ultimate
outcome of such matters could materially affect Georgia Power's results of operations, cash flows, or financial condition.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" for additional information.
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842) (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires lessees to recognize on the
balance sheet a lease liability and a right-of-use asset for all leases. ASU 2016-02 also changes the recognition, measurement, and
presentation of expense associated with leases and provides clarification regarding the identification of certain components of
contracts that would represent a lease. The accounting required by lessors is relatively unchanged. ASU 2016-02 is effective for
fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018 and Georgia Power adopted the new standard effective January 1, 2019.
Georgia Power elected the transition methodology provided by ASU No. 2018-11, Leases (Topic 842): Targeted Improvements,
whereby the requirements of ASU 2016-02 are applied on a prospective basis as of the adoption date of January 1, 2019, without
restating prior periods. Georgia Power elected the package of practical expedients provided by ASU 2016-02 that allows prior
determinations of whether existing contracts are, or contain, leases and the classification of existing leases to continue without
reassessment. Additionally, Georgia Power applied the use-of-hindsight practical expedient in determining lease terms as of the
date of adoption and elected the practical expedient that allows existing land easements not previously accounted for as leases not
to be reassessed. Georgia Power also made accounting policy elections to account for short-term leases in all asset classes as off-
balance sheet leases and combined lease and non-lease components in the computations of lease obligations and right-of-use assets
for most asset classes.
Georgia Power completed the implementation of a new application to track and account for its leases and updated its internal
controls and accounting policies to support the accounting for leases under ASU 2016-02. Georgia Power completed its lease
inventory and determined its most significant leases involve PPAs and real estate. In the first quarter 2019, the adoption of ASU
2016-02 resulted in recording lease liabilities and right-of-use assets on Georgia Power's balance sheet each totaling approximately
$1.5 billion, with no impact on Georgia Power's statement of income.
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY
Overview
Georgia Power's financial condition remained stable at December 31, 2018. Georgia Power's cash requirements primarily consist of
funding ongoing operations, common stock dividends, capital expenditures, and debt maturities. Capital expenditures and other
investing activities include investments to build new generation facilities, including Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, to maintain existing
generation facilities, to comply with environmental regulations including adding environmental modifications to existing
generating units and closures of ash ponds, to expand and improve transmission and distribution facilities, and for restoration
following major storms. Operating cash flows provide a substantial portion of Georgia Power's cash needs. For the three-year
period from 2019 through 2021, Georgia Power's projected common stock dividends, capital expenditures, and debt maturities are
expected to exceed operating cash flows. Georgia Power plans to finance future cash needs in excess of its operating cash flows
primarily through external securities issuances, equity contributions from Southern Company, borrowings from financial
II-115
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
institutions, and borrowings through the FFB. Georgia Power plans to use commercial paper to manage seasonal variations in
operating cash flows and for other working capital needs. Georgia Power intends to continue to monitor its access to short-term and
long-term capital markets as well as bank credit arrangements to meet future capital and liquidity needs. See "Sources of Capital,"
"Financing Activities," and "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein for additional information.
Georgia Power's investments in the qualified pension plan and nuclear decommissioning trust funds decreased in value as of
December 31, 2018 as compared to December 31, 2017. No contributions to the qualified pension plan were made for the year
ended December 31, 2018 and no mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan are anticipated during 2019. Georgia
Power also funded approximately $5 million to its nuclear decommissioning trust funds in 2018. See "Contractual Obligations"
herein and Notes 6 and 11 to the financial statements under "Nuclear Decommissioning" and "Pension Plans," respectively, for
additional information.
Net cash provided from operating activities totaled $2.8 billion in 2018, an increase of $857 million from 2017, primarily due to the
timing of vendor and property tax payments and income tax refunds, a decrease in current income taxes related to the Tax Reform
Legislation, increased fuel cost recovery, and the timing of fossil fuel stock purchases, partially offset by payments of customer
refunds primarily related to the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. Net
cash provided from operating activities totaled $1.9 billion in 2017, a decrease of $513 million from 2016, primarily due to the
timing of vendor payments and increases in under-recovered fuel costs and prepaid federal income taxes, partially offset by a
decrease in voluntary contributions to the qualified pension plan. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters
– Federal Tax Reform Legislation" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information regarding federal
income taxes.
Net cash used for investing activities totaled $3.1 billion, $0.9 billion, and $2.3 billion in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively, due to
gross property additions primarily related to installation of equipment to comply with environmental standards and construction of
generation, transmission, and distribution facilities, including a total of $2.7 billion related to the construction of Plant Vogtle Units
3 and 4, partially offset in 2017 by $1.7 billion in payments received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement. The majority of
funds needed for gross property additions for the last several years has been provided from operating activities, capital
contributions from Southern Company, and the issuance of debt. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory
Matters – Nuclear Construction" herein for additional information on the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and construction of
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Net cash used for financing activities totaled $400 million, $151 million, and $142 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively.
The increase in cash used in 2018 compared to 2017 was primarily due to lower issuances of senior notes and short-term bank debt
and higher redemptions and repurchases of senior notes, partially offset by higher capital contributions from Southern Company
and an increase in notes payable. The increase in cash used in 2017 compared to 2016 was primarily due to a decrease in notes
payable, a decrease in borrowings from the FFB for construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, and the redemption of all
outstanding shares of Georgia Power's preferred and preference stock, partially offset by higher issuances of senior notes and junior
subordinated notes and a decrease in maturities of senior notes. Fluctuations in cash flow from financing activities vary from year
to year based on capital needs and the maturity or redemption of securities.
Significant balance sheet changes in 2018 included an increase in property, plant, and equipment of $2.6 billion primarily related to
the $3.2 billion increase in AROs, as well as the installation of equipment to comply with environmental standards and the
construction of generation, transmission, and distribution facilities, and net of the $1.1 billion charge related to the construction of
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4; an increase of $2.0 billion in other regulatory assets, deferred primarily related to AROs; and a decrease
of $1.9 billion in long-term debt (including securities due within one year) primarily due to the redemption, repurchase, and
maturity of senior notes and the purchase of pollution control revenue bonds. Total common stockholder's equity increased $2.4
billion primarily due to a $3.0 billion increase in paid-in capital resulting from capital contributions received from Southern
Company, partially offset by a $0.6 billion decrease in retained earnings primarily due to the charge related to Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4. See Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information on AROs and Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information regarding Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Georgia Power's ratio of common equity to total capitalization plus short-term debt was 58.2% at December 31, 2018 and 49.7% at
December 31, 2017. See Note 8 to the financial statements for additional information.
Sources of Capital
Georgia Power plans to obtain the funds required for construction and other purposes from sources similar to those used in the past,
which were primarily from operating cash flows, external security issuances, borrowings from financial institutions, equity
contributions from Southern Company, and borrowings from the FFB. However, the amount, type, and timing of any future
financings, if needed, will depend upon regulatory approvals, prevailing market conditions, and other factors.
II-116
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
In 2014, Georgia Power entered into the Loan Guarantee Agreement with the DOE, under which the proceeds of borrowings may
be used to reimburse Georgia Power for Eligible Project Costs incurred in connection with its construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4. Under the Loan Guarantee Agreement, the DOE agreed to guarantee borrowings of up to $3.46 billion (not to exceed 70% of
Eligible Project Costs) to be made by Georgia Power under a multi-advance credit facility (FFB Credit Facility) among Georgia
Power, the DOE, and the FFB. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had borrowed $2.6 billion under the FFB Credit Facility. In
July 2017, Georgia Power entered into an amendment to the Loan Guarantee Agreement, which provides that further advances are
conditioned upon the DOE's approval of any agreements entered into in replacement of the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement and
satisfaction of certain other conditions.
In September 2017, the DOE issued a conditional commitment to Georgia Power for up to approximately $1.67 billion of
additional guaranteed loans under the Loan Guarantee Agreement. This conditional commitment expires on March 31, 2019,
subject to any further extension approved by the DOE. Final approval and issuance of these additional loan guarantees by the DOE
cannot be assured and are subject to the negotiation of definitive agreements, completion of due diligence by the DOE, receipt of
any necessary regulatory approvals, and satisfaction of other conditions. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term
Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" for additional information regarding the Loan Guarantee Agreement, including
applicable covenants, events of default, mandatory prepayment events (including any decision not to continue construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4), and additional conditions to borrowing. Also see Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power –
Nuclear Construction" for additional information regarding Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
The issuance of long-term securities by Georgia Power is subject to the approval of the Georgia PSC. In addition, the issuance of
short-term debt securities by Georgia Power is subject to regulatory approval by the FERC. Additionally, with respect to the public
offering of securities, Georgia Power files registration statements with the SEC under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The
amounts of securities authorized by the Georgia PSC and the FERC are continuously monitored and appropriate filings are made to
ensure flexibility in the capital markets.
Georgia Power obtains financing separately without credit support from any affiliate. See Note 8 to the financial statements under
"Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information. The Southern Company system does not maintain a centralized cash or
money pool. Therefore, funds of Georgia Power are not commingled with funds of any other company in the Southern Company
system.
At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power's current liabilities exceeded current assets by $1.4 billion primarily as a result of $0.6
billion of long-term debt that is due within one year and $0.3 billion of notes payable. Georgia Power's current liabilities frequently
exceed current assets because of scheduled maturities of long-term debt and the periodic use of short-term debt as a funding source,
as well as significant seasonal fluctuations in cash needs.
At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had approximately $4 million of cash and cash equivalents. Georgia Power's committed
credit arrangement with banks was $1.75 billion at December 31, 2018, of which $1.74 billion was unused. This credit arrangement
expires in 2022.
This bank credit arrangement contains a covenant that limits debt levels and contains a cross-acceleration provision to other
indebtedness (including guarantee obligations) of Georgia Power. Such cross-acceleration provision to other indebtedness would
trigger an event of default if Georgia Power defaulted on indebtedness, the payment of which was then accelerated. At
December 31, 2018, Georgia Power was in compliance with this covenant. This bank credit arrangement does not contain a
material adverse change clause at the time of borrowing.
Subject to applicable market conditions, Georgia Power expects to renew or replace this credit arrangement as needed prior to
expiration. In connection therewith, Georgia Power may extend the maturity date and/or increase or decrease the lending
commitments thereunder.
See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information.
A portion of the $1.74 billion unused credit with banks is allocated to provide liquidity support to Georgia Power's pollution control
revenue bonds and commercial paper program. The amount of variable rate pollution control revenue bonds outstanding requiring
liquidity support at December 31, 2018 was $659 million as compared to $550 million at December 31, 2017. In addition, at
December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had obligations related to $345 million of pollution control revenue bonds outstanding that are
required to be remarketed within the next 12 months. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Georgia Power redeemed approximately
$108 million of these obligations.
Georgia Power may also meet short-term cash needs through a Southern Company subsidiary organized to issue and sell
commercial paper at the request and for the benefit of Georgia Power and the other traditional electric operating companies.
Proceeds from such issuances for the benefit of Georgia Power are loaned directly to Georgia Power. The obligations of each
II-117
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
traditional electric operating company under these arrangements are several and there is no cross-affiliate credit support. Short-term
borrowings are included in notes payable in the balance sheets.
Details of short-term borrowings were as follows:
Short-term Debt at the End of
the Period Short-term Debt During the Period (*)
Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest
RateAverage
Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest
RateMaximum
Amount
Outstanding
(in millions) (in millions) (in millions)
December 31, 2018:
Commercial paper $ 294 3.1% $ 127 2.5% $ 710
Short-term bank debt — —% 12 2.3% 150
Total $ 294 3.1% $ 139 2.5%
December 31, 2017:
Commercial paper $ — —% $ 135 1.3% $ 760
Short-term bank debt 150 2.2% 292 2.0% 800
Total $ 150 2.2% $ 427 1.8%
December 31, 2016:
Commercial paper $ 392 1.1% $ 87 0.8% $ 443
(*)Average and maximum amounts are based upon daily balances during the 12-month periods ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016.
Georgia Power believes the need for working capital can be adequately met by utilizing the commercial paper program, lines of
credit, short-term bank notes, and operating cash flows.
Financing Activities
In addition to any financings that may be necessary to meet capital requirements and contractual obligations, Georgia Power plans
to continue, when economically feasible, a program to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with lower-cost
capital if market conditions permit.
Senior Notes
In April 2018, Georgia Power redeemed all $250 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2008B 5.40% Senior Notes due
June 1, 2018.
In May 2018, through cash tender offers, Georgia Power repurchased and retired $89 million of the $250 million aggregate
principal amount outstanding of its Series 2007A 5.65% Senior Notes due March 1, 2037, $326 million of the $500 million
aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2009A 5.95% Senior Notes due February 1, 2039, and $335 million of the
$600 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2010B 5.40% Senior Notes due June 1, 2040, for an aggregate
purchase price, excluding accrued and unpaid interest, of $902 million.
In December 2018, Georgia Power repaid at maturity $500 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2015A 1.95% Senior
Notes.
Pollution Control Revenue Bonds
During 2018, Georgia Power purchased and held the following pollution control revenue bonds, which may be reoffered to the
public at a later date:
•approximately $105 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution
Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), First Series 2013
•$173 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Bartow County (Georgia) Pollution Control
Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Bowen Project), First Series 2009
•$55 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control Revenue
Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), Fifth Series 1994
II-118
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
•$65 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control Revenue
Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), Second Series 2008
•approximately $72 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Bartow County (Georgia) Pollution
Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Bowen Project), First Series 2013
In December 2018, the Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) issued approximately $108 million aggregate principal
amount of Pollution Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), First Series 2018 due November 1,
2052 for the benefit of Georgia Power. The proceeds were used to redeem, in January 2019, approximately $13 million, $20
million, and $75 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control
Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), First Series 1992, Eighth Series 1994, and Second Series 1995,
respectively.
Other
In January 2018, Georgia Power repaid its outstanding $150 million and $100 million floating rate bank loans due May 31, 2018
and October 26, 2018, respectively.
Credit Rating Risk
At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power did not have any credit arrangements that would require material changes in payment
schedules or terminations as a result of a credit rating downgrade.
There are certain contracts that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of a credit rating change to BBB-
and/or Baa3 or below. These contracts are for physical electricity purchases and sales, fuel purchases, fuel transportation and
storage, energy price risk management, transmission, interest rate management, and construction of new generation at Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4.
The maximum potential collateral requirements under these contracts at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
Credit RatingsMaximum
Potential
Collateral
Requirements
 (in millions)
At BBB- and/or Baa3 $ 92
Below BBB- and/or Baa3 $ 1,106
Included in these amounts are certain agreements that could require collateral in the event that either Georgia Power or Alabama
Power (an affiliate of Georgia Power) has a credit rating change to below investment grade. Generally, collateral may be provided
by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit, or cash. Additionally, a credit rating downgrade could impact the ability of
Georgia Power to access capital markets and would be likely to impact the cost at which it does so.
On February 28, 2018, Fitch downgraded the senior unsecured long-term debt rating of Georgia Power to A from A+ with a
negative outlook. On August 9, 2018, Fitch downgraded the senior unsecured long-term debt rating of Georgia Power to A- from A.
On September 28, 2018, Fitch assigned a negative rating outlook to the ratings of Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries
(including Georgia Power).
On August 8, 2018, Moody's downgraded the senior unsecured debt rating of Georgia Power to Baa1 from A3. On September 28,
2018, Moody's revised its rating outlook for Georgia Power from negative to stable.
As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, certain financial metrics, such as the funds from operations to debt percentage, used by
the credit rating agencies to assess Southern Company and its subsidiaries (including Georgia Power) may be negatively impacted.
The Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement approved by the Georgia PSC on April 3, 2018 is expected to help mitigate
these potential adverse impacts to certain credit metrics by allowing a higher retail equity ratio until the conclusion of the Georgia
Power 2019 Base Rate Case. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia Power – Rate Plans" for additional information.
Market Price Risk
Due to cost-based rate regulation and other various cost recovery mechanisms, Georgia Power continues to have limited exposure
to market volatility in interest rates, commodity fuel prices, and prices of electricity. To manage the volatility attributable to these
exposures, Georgia Power nets the exposures, where possible, to take advantage of natural offsets and enters into various
II-119
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
derivative transactions for the remaining exposures pursuant to Georgia Power's policies in areas such as counterparty exposure and
risk management practices. Georgia Power's policy is that derivatives are to be used primarily for hedging purposes and mandates
strict adherence to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative positions are monitored using techniques including, but not
limited to, market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity analysis.
To mitigate future exposure to changes in interest rates, Georgia Power may enter into derivatives designated as hedges. The
weighted average interest rate on $0.9 billion of long-term variable interest rate exposure at December 31, 2018 was 2.57%. If
Georgia Power sustained a 100 basis point change in interest rates for all long-term variable interest rate exposure, the change
would affect annualized interest expense by approximately $9 million at December 31, 2018. See Note 1 to the financial statements
under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
To mitigate residual risks relative to movements in electricity prices, Georgia Power enters into physical fixed-price contracts for
the purchase and sale of electricity through the wholesale electricity market and, to a lesser extent, financial hedge contracts for
natural gas purchases. Georgia Power continues to manage a fuel-hedging program implemented per the guidelines of the Georgia
PSC. Georgia Power had no material change in market risk exposure for the year ended December 31, 2018 when compared to the
December 31, 2017 reporting period.
The changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts are substantially attributable to both the volume and the price of
natural gas. For the years ended December 31, the changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts, the majority of
which are composed of regulatory hedges, were as follows:
 2018
Changes 2017
Changes
 Fair Value
 (in millions)
Contracts outstanding at the beginning of the period, assets (liabilities), net $ (13) $ 36
Contracts realized or settled:   
Swaps realized or settled 1 (13)
Options realized or settled — (1)
Current period changes(*):   
Swaps (3) (28)
Options 1 (7)
Contracts outstanding at the end of the period, assets (liabilities), net $ (14) $ (13)
(*)Current period changes also include the changes in fair value of new contracts entered into during the period, if any.
The net hedge volumes of energy-related derivative contracts at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows:
 2018  2017
 mmBtu Volume
 (in millions)
Commodity – Natural gas swaps 141 146
Commodity – Natural gas options 12 17
Total hedge volume 153 163
The weighted average swap contract cost above market prices was approximately $0.10 per mmBtu and $0.08 per mmBtu at
December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. The change in option fair value is primarily attributable to the volatility of the market
and the underlying change in the natural gas price. All natural gas hedge gains and losses are recovered through Georgia Power's
fuel cost recovery mechanism.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, substantially all of Georgia Power's energy-related derivative contracts were designated as
regulatory hedges and were related to Georgia Power's fuel-hedging program, which had a time horizon up to 48 months. Hedging
gains and losses are initially recorded as regulatory liabilities and assets, respectively, and then are included in fuel expense as they
are recovered through the fuel cost recovery mechanism. Gains and losses on energy-related derivative contracts that are not
designated or fail to qualify as hedges are recognized in the statements of income as incurred and were not material for any year
presented.
II-120
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Georgia Power uses over-the-counter contracts that are not exchange traded but are fair valued using prices which are market
observable, and thus fall into Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. See Note 13 to the financial statements for further discussion of
fair value measurements. The maturities of the energy-related derivative contracts, which are all Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy,
at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements
December 31, 2018
 Total Maturity
 Fair Value Year 1 Years 2&3 
 (in millions)
Level 1 $ — $ — $ —
Level 2 (14) (6) (8)
Level 3 — — —
Fair value of contracts outstanding at end of period $ (14) $ (6) $ (8)
Georgia Power is exposed to market price risk in the event of nonperformance by counterparties to the energy-related and interest
rate derivative contracts. Georgia Power only enters into agreements and material transactions with counterparties that have
investment grade credit ratings by Moody's and S&P or with counterparties who have posted collateral to cover potential credit
exposure. Therefore, Georgia Power does not anticipate market risk exposure from nonperformance by the counterparties. For
additional information, see Note 1 to the financial statements under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements.
Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations
The construction program of Georgia Power is currently estimated to total $3.7 billion for 2019, $3.5 billion for 2020, $3.4 billion
for 2021, $3.4 billion for 2022, and $2.9 billion for 2023. These amounts include expenditures of approximately $1.5 billion, $1.2
billion, $1.0 billion, and $0.5 billion for the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in 2019, 2020, 2021, and 2022, respectively.
These amounts also include capital expenditures related to contractual purchase commitments for nuclear fuel and capital
expenditures covered under LTSAs. Estimated capital expenditures to comply with environmental laws and regulations included in
these amounts are $0.2 billion, $0.1 billion, $0.1 billion, $0.2 billion, and $0.1 billion for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023,
respectively. These estimated expenditures do not include any potential compliance costs associated with pending regulation of
CO2 emissions from fossil fuel-fired electric generating units. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters
– Environmental Laws and Regulations" and " – Global Climate Issues" herein for additional information.
Georgia Power also anticipates costs associated with closure and monitoring of ash ponds and landfills in accordance with the CCR
Rule, which are reflected in Georgia Power's ARO liabilities. In December 2018, Georgia Power recorded an increase of
approximately $3.1 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule and the related state rule. These costs, which are expected to
change and could change materially as underlying assumptions are refined and the cost and the method and timing of compliance
activities continue to be evaluated, are currently estimated to be $0.2 billion for 2019, $0.3 billion for 2020, $0.4 billion for 2021,
$0.7 billion for 2022, and $0.6 billion for 2023. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters –
Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional
information.
The construction program is subject to periodic review and revision, and actual construction costs may vary from these estimates
because of numerous factors. These factors include: changes in business conditions; changes in load projections; changes in
environmental laws and regulations; the outcome of any legal challenges to environmental rules; changes in generating plants,
including unit retirements and replacements and adding or changing fuel sources at existing generating units, to meet regulatory
requirements; changes in FERC rules and regulations; Georgia PSC approvals; changes in the expected environmental compliance
program; changes in legislation; the cost and efficiency of construction labor, equipment, and materials; project scope and design
changes; storm impacts; and the cost of capital. In addition, there can be no assurance that costs related to capital expenditures will
be fully recovered. The construction program also includes Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which includes components based on new
technology that only recently began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale and which may be subject to
additional revised cost estimates during construction. The ability to control costs and avoid cost and schedule overruns during the
development, construction, and operation of new facilities is subject to a number of factors, including, but not limited to, changes in
labor costs, availability, and productivity; challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, or vendors; adverse weather
conditions; shortages, increased costs, or inconsistent quality of equipment, materials, and labor; contractor or supplier
II-121
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
delay; non-performance under construction, operating, or other agreements; operational readiness, including specialized operator
training and required site safety programs; engineering or design problems; design and other licensing-based compliance matters,
including the timely resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC; challenges with start-up activities, including major
equipment failure and system integration; and/or operational performance. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Georgia
Power – Nuclear Construction" for information regarding additional factors that may impact construction expenditures.
As a result of requirements by the NRC, Georgia Power has established external trust funds for nuclear decommissioning costs. For
additional information, see Note 6 to the financial statements under "Nuclear Decommissioning."
In addition, as discussed in Note 11 to the financial statements, Georgia Power provides postretirement benefits to substantially all
employees and funds trusts to the extent required by the Georgia PSC and the FERC.
Funding requirements related to obligations associated with scheduled maturities of long-term debt, as well as the related interest,
derivative obligations, leases, other purchase commitments, ARO settlements, and trusts are detailed in the contractual obligations
table that follows. See Notes 1, 6, 8, 9, 11, and 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
II-122
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Contractual Obligations
Contractual obligations at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 20192020-
20212022-
2023  After
2023  Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt(a) —      
Principal $ 608 $1,363 $ 641 $7,343 $9,955
Interest 339 615 562 4,660 6,176
Financial derivative obligations(b)8 12 — — 20
Operating leases(c)23 27 11 13 74
Capital leases(c)9 7 — — 16
Purchase commitments —      
Capital(d)3,512 6,305 5,876  15,693
Fuel(e)1,117 1,400 764 4,586 7,867
Purchased power(f)270 536 549 2,054 3,409
Other(g)42 179 109 267 597
ARO settlements(h)202 674 1,283  2,159
Trusts —      
Nuclear decommissioning(i)5 11 11 88 115
Pension and other postretirement benefit
plans(j)43 79   122
Total $6,178 $11,208 $9,806 $19,011 $46,203
(a)All amounts are reflected based on final maturity dates except for amounts related to FFB borrowings and certain pollution control revenue bonds. As it relates
to the FFB borrowings, the final maturity date is February 20, 2044; however, principal amortization is reflected beginning in 2020. See Note 8 to the financial
statements under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" for additional information. Georgia Power plans to continue, when economically
feasible, to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with lower-cost capital if market conditions permit. Variable rate interest obligations are
estimated based on rates at December 31, 2018, as reflected in the statements of capitalization. Fixed rates include, where applicable, the effects of interest rate
derivatives employed to manage interest rate risk. Long-term debt excludes capital lease amounts (shown separately).
(b)See Notes 1 and 14 to the financial statements.
(c)Excludes PPAs that are accounted for as leases and included in "Purchased power." See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Long-term Debt – Capital
Leases – Georgia Power" and Note 9 to the financial statements under "Operating Leases" for additional information.
(d)Georgia Power provides estimated capital expenditures for a five-year period, including capital expenditures associated with environmental regulations. These
amounts exclude contractual purchase commitments for nuclear fuel, capital expenditures covered under LTSAs, and estimated capital expenditures for AROs,
which are reflected in "Fuel," "Other," and "ARO settlements," respectively. At December 31, 2018, significant purchase commitments were outstanding in
connection with the construction program. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations" and
"Retail Regulatory Matters – Nuclear Construction" herein for additional information.
(e)Includes commitments to purchase coal, nuclear fuel, and natural gas, as well as the related transportation and storage. In most cases, these contracts contain
provisions for price escalation, minimum purchase levels, and other financial commitments. Natural gas purchase commitments are based on various indices at
the time of delivery. Amounts reflected for natural gas purchase commitments have been estimated based on the NYMEX future prices at December 31, 2018.
(f)Estimated minimum long-term obligations for various PPA purchases from gas-fired, biomass, and wind-powered facilities and capacity payments related to
Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2. See Note 9 to the financial statements under "Fuel and Power Purchase Agreements" for additional information.
(g)Includes LTSAs and contracts for the procurement of limestone. LTSAs include price escalation based on inflation indices.
(h)Represents estimated costs for a five-year period associated with closing and monitoring ash ponds and landfills in accordance with the CCR Rule and the
related state rule, which are reflected in Georgia Power's AROs. Material expenditures in future years for ARO settlements also will be required for ash ponds,
nuclear decommissioning, and other liabilities and are reflected in Georgia Power's AROs. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters
– Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
(i)Projections of nuclear decommissioning trust fund contributions for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 are based on the 2013 ARP. See Note 6 to the
financial statements under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
(j)Georgia Power forecasts contributions to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans over a three-year period. Georgia Power anticipates no mandatory
contributions to the qualified pension plan during the next three years. Amounts presented represent estimated benefit payments for the nonqualified pension
plans, estimated non-trust benefit payments for the other postretirement benefit plans, and estimated contributions to the other postretirement benefit plan trusts,
all of which will be made from Georgia Power's corporate assets. See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information related to the pension and
other postretirement benefit plans, including estimated benefit payments. Certain benefit payments will be made through the related benefit plans. Other benefit
payments will be made from Georgia Power's corporate assets.
II-123
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
OVERVIEW
Business Activities
Mississippi Power operates as a vertically integrated utility providing electric service to retail customers within its traditional
service territory located within the State of Mississippi and to wholesale customers in the Southeast.
Many factors affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of Mississippi Power's business of providing electric service. These
factors include Mississippi Power's ability to maintain and grow energy sales and to operate in a constructive regulatory
environment that provides timely recovery of prudently-incurred costs. These costs include those related to reliability, fuel, and
stringent environmental standards, as well as ongoing capital and operations and maintenance expenditures and restoration
following major storms. Appropriately balancing required costs and capital expenditures with customer prices will continue to
challenge Mississippi Power for the foreseeable future. Mississippi Power is scheduled to file a base rate case in the fourth quarter
2019 (Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case).
As a result of the Mississippi PSC's stated intent to issue an order establishing a new docket for a global settlement under which the
Kemper County energy facility would be operated as a natural gas plant, rather than an IGCC plant (Kemper Settlement Docket),
on June 28, 2017, Mississippi Power notified the Mississippi PSC that it would begin a process to suspend operations and start-up
activities on the gasifier portion of the Kemper County energy facility. At the time of project suspension, the total cost estimate for
the Kemper County energy facility was approximately $7.38 billion, including approximately $5.95 billion of costs subject to the
construction cost cap. In the aggregate, Mississippi Power had incurred charges of $3.07 billion ($1.89 billion after tax) for changes
in the cost estimate above the cost cap through May 31, 2017.
Given the Mississippi PSC's stated intent regarding no additional rate increases for the Kemper County energy facility and the
subsequent suspension of construction, cost recovery of the gasification portions was no longer probable. Therefore, Mississippi
Power recorded a charge to income in June 2017 of $2.8 billion ($2.0 billion after tax) for the estimated costs associated with the
gasification portions of the plant and lignite mine. During the third and fourth quarters 2017, Mississippi Power recorded further
charges to income totaling $242 million ($206 million after tax), including $164 million for ongoing project costs, estimated mine
and gasifier-related costs, and certain termination costs during the suspension period prior to conclusion of the Kemper Settlement
Docket, as well as a charge associated with the Kemper Settlement Agreement discussed below.
On February 6, 2018, the Mississippi PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement related to cost recovery for the Kemper County
energy facility among Mississippi Power, the MPUS, and certain intervenors (Kemper Settlement Agreement), which resolved all
cost recovery issues, modified the CPCN to limit the Kemper County energy facility to natural gas combined cycle operation, and
provided for an annual revenue requirement of approximately $99.3 million for costs related to the Kemper County energy facility,
which included the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation. The revenue requirement is based on (i) a fixed ROE for 2018 of 8.6%
excluding any performance adjustment, (ii) a ROE for 2019 calculated in accordance with PEP, excluding the performance
adjustment, (iii) for future years, a performance-based ROE calculated pursuant to PEP, and (iv) amortization periods for the related
regulatory assets and liabilities of eight years and six years, respectively. The revenue requirement also reflects a disallowance
related to a portion of Mississippi Power's investment in the Kemper County energy facility requested for inclusion in rate base,
which was recorded in the fourth quarter 2017 as an additional charge to income of approximately $78 million ($85 million net of
accumulated depreciation of $7 million) pre-tax ($48 million after tax). Under the Kemper Settlement Agreement, retail customer
rates reflect a reduction of approximately $26.8 million annually, effective with the first billing cycle of April 2018, and include no
recovery for costs associated with the gasifier portion of the Kemper County energy facility in 2018 or at any future date.
In 2018, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax charges to income of $37 million ($27 million after tax), primarily resulting from the
abandonment and related closure activities and ongoing period costs, net of sales proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets
at the Kemper County energy facility. In addition, Mississippi Power recorded a credit to earnings of $95 million in the fourth
quarter 2018 primarily resulting from the reduction of a valuation allowance for a state income tax net operating loss (NOL)
carryforward associated with the Kemper County energy facility. Additional closure costs for the mine and gasifier-related assets,
currently estimated at up to $10 million pre-tax (excluding salvage, net of dismantlement costs), may be incurred through the first
half of 2020. In addition, period costs, including, but not limited to, costs for compliance and safety, ARO accretion, and property
taxes for the mine and gasifier-related assets, are estimated to total $11 million in 2019 and $2 million to $4 million annually in
2020 through 2023. Mississippi Power is currently evaluating its options regarding the final disposition of the CO2 pipeline,
including removal of the pipeline. This evaluation is expected to be complete later in 2019. If Mississippi Power ultimately decides
to remove the CO2 pipeline, the cost of removal would have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements. The
ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
II-124
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County Energy Facility" and Note 10 to the financial statements for
additional information.
On August 7, 2018 the Mississippi PSC approved settlement agreements between Mississippi Power and the MPUS with respect to
the 2018 PEP filing and all unresolved PEP filings for prior years (PEP Settlement Agreement) and the 2018 ECO Plan filing (ECO
Settlement Agreement). Rates under the PEP Settlement Agreement and the ECO Settlement Agreement resulted in annual revenue
increases of approximately $21.6 million and $17 million, respectively, effective with the first billing cycle of September 2018 and
are expected to continue through the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
In August 2018, the Mississippi PSC began an operations review of Mississippi Power, for which the final report is expected prior
to the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Mississippi Power expects that the review will include, but not be
limited to, a comparative analysis of its costs, its cost recovery framework, and ways in which it may streamline management
operations for the reasonable benefit of ratepayers. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Mississippi Power" for additional information.
Mississippi Power continues to focus on several key performance indicators. In recognition that Mississippi Power's long-term
financial success is dependent upon how well it satisfies its customers' needs, Mississippi Power's retail base rate mechanism, PEP,
includes performance indicators that directly tie customer service indicators to Mississippi Power's allowed ROE. PEP measures
Mississippi Power's performance on a 10-point scale as a weighted average of results in three areas: average customer price, as
compared to prices of other regional utilities (weighted at 40%); service reliability, measured in percentage of time customers had
electric service (40%); and customer satisfaction, measured in a survey of residential customers (20%). Mississippi Power also
focuses on broader measures of customer satisfaction, plant availability, system reliability, and net income.
Mississippi Power's financial success is directly tied to customer satisfaction. Key elements of ensuring customer satisfaction
include outstanding service, high reliability, and competitive prices. Management uses customer satisfaction surveys to evaluate
Mississippi Power's results and generally targets top-quartile performance.
See RESULTS OF OPERATIONS herein for information on Mississippi Power's financial performance.
Earnings
Mississippi Power's net income after dividends on preferred stock was $235 million in 2018 compared to a $2.59 billion net loss in
2017 and a $50 million net loss in 2016. The changes were primarily the result of pre-tax charges associated with the Kemper
IGCC of $37 million, $3.36 billion, and $428 million, in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. The increase in net income in 2018
was partially offset by lower tax benefits and a decrease in AFUDC. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County
Energy Facility" for additional information.
II-125
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
A condensed statement of operations follows:
 Amount Increase (Decrease)
from Prior Year
 2018  2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 1,265 $ 78 $ 24
Fuel 405 10 52
Purchased power 41 16 (9)
Other operations and maintenance 313 22 (26)
Depreciation and amortization 169 8 29
Taxes other than income taxes 107 3 (5)
Estimated loss on Kemper IGCC 37 (3,325) 2,934
Total operating expenses 1,072 (3,266) 2,975
Operating income 193 3,344 (2,951)
Allowance for equity funds used during construction — (72) (52)
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 76 34 (32)
Other income (expense), net 17 16 3
Income taxes (benefit) (102) 430 (428)
Net income 236 2,824 (2,540)
Dividends on preferred stock 1 (1) —
Net income after dividends on preferred stock $ 235 $ 2,825 $ (2,540)
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2018 were $1.3 billion, reflecting a $78 million increase from 2017. Details of operating revenues were as
follows:
 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Retail — prior year $ 854 $ 859
Estimated change resulting from —   
Rates and pricing 24 (7)
Sales growth 4 4
Weather 12 (15)
Fuel and other cost recovery (5) 13
Retail — current year 889 854
Wholesale revenues —   
Non-affiliates 263 259
Affiliates 91 56
Total wholesale revenues 354 315
Other operating revenues 22 18
Total operating revenues $ 1,265 $ 1,187
Percent change 6.6% 2.1%
Total retail revenues for 2018 increased $35 million, or 4.1%, compared to 2017 primarily due to the PEP and ECO Plan rate
changes that became effective for the first billing cycle of September 2018, each resulting in retail revenue increases of $12 million.
In addition, as a result of the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power recognized revenues of $5 million previously
II-126
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
reserved in connection with the 2012 PEP lookback filing and deferred $17 million of revenue in 2017 following the complete
amortization of certain regulatory assets related to the Kemper County energy facility. These increases were offset by a decrease of
$16 million annually for base rates related to the Kemper County energy facility that became effective for the first billing cycle of
April 2018 and the recognition in 2018 of regulatory liabilities of $5 million and $2 million, respectively, related to the equity ratio
provisions of the PEP and ECO Settlement Agreements. Additionally, there was a $12 million increase as a result of colder weather
in the first quarter and warmer weather in the second and third quarters in 2018 as compared to the corresponding periods in 2017
and a $5 million decrease in fuel and other cost recovery.
Total retail revenues for 2017 decreased $5 million, or 0.6%, compared to 2016 primarily due to a $15 million decrease as a result
of milder weather in 2017 as compared to 2016 and the deferral of $17 million of revenue following the complete amortization of
certain regulatory assets related to the Kemper County energy facility in July 2017. These decreases were partially offset by a $10
million net increase related to ECO Plan rate changes in the third quarter 2016 and the second quarter 2017 and an increase of $13
million in fuel cost recovery.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Environmental Compliance Overview Plan," " – Performance
Evaluation Plan," and " – Kemper County Energy Facility – Rate Recovery" for additional information. See "Energy Sales" below
for a discussion of changes in the volume of energy sold, including changes related to sales and weather.
Electric rates for Mississippi Power include provisions to adjust billings for fluctuations in fuel costs, including the energy
component of purchased power costs. Under these provisions, fuel revenues generally equal fuel expenses, including the energy
component of purchased power costs, and do not affect net income. Recoverable fuel costs include fuel and purchased power
expenses reduced by the fuel and emissions portion of wholesale revenues from energy sold to customers outside Mississippi
Power's service territory. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Retail Regulatory Matters – Fuel Cost Recovery" herein for
additional information.
Wholesale revenues from power sales to non-affiliated utilities, including FERC-regulated MRA sales as well as market-based
sales, were as follows:
 2018  2017  2016
 (in millions)
Capacity and other $ 6 $ 15 $ 16
Energy 257 244 245
Total non-affiliated $ 263 $ 259 $ 261
Wholesale revenues from sales to non-affiliates will vary depending on fuel prices, the market prices of wholesale energy compared
to the cost of Mississippi Power's and the Southern Company system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern
Company system's electric service territory, and the availability of the Southern Company system's generation. Increases and
decreases in energy revenues that are driven by fuel prices are accompanied by an increase or decrease in fuel costs and do not have
a significant impact on net income. In addition, Mississippi Power provides service under long-term contracts with rural electric
cooperative associations and municipalities located in southeastern Mississippi under cost-based electric tariffs which are subject to
regulation by the FERC. The contracts with these wholesale customers represented 17.3% of Mississippi Power's total operating
revenues in 2018 and are generally subject to 10-year rolling cancellation notices. Historically, these wholesale customers have
acted as a group and any changes in contractual relationships for one customer are likely to be followed by the other wholesale
customers.
Short-term opportunity energy sales are also included in sales for resale to non-affiliates. These opportunity sales are made at
market-based rates that generally provide a margin above Mississippi Power's variable cost to produce the energy.
Wholesale revenues from sales to affiliates will vary depending on demand and the availability and cost of generating resources at
each company. These affiliate sales are made in accordance with the IIC, as approved by the FERC. These transactions do not have
a significant impact on earnings since this energy is generally sold at marginal cost.
Wholesale revenues from sales to affiliates increased $35 million, or 62.5%, in 2018 compared to 2017 and increased $30 million,
or 115.4%, in 2017 compared to 2016. The increases in 2018 and 2017 were primarily due to $19 million and $9 million,
respectively, associated with higher natural gas prices and $16 million and $21 million, respectively, associated with increases in
KWH sales due to the dispatch of Mississippi Power's lower cost generation resources to serve Southern Company system
territorial load.
II-127
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Energy Sales
Changes in revenues are influenced heavily by the change in the volume of energy sold from year to year. KWH sales for 2018 and
the percent change from the prior year were as follows:
 Total
KWHsTotal KWH
Percent Change  Weather-Adjusted Percent
Change
 2018 2018  2017  2018  2017
 (in millions)        
Residential 2,113 8.7 % (5.2)% 1.4 % 1.4 %
Commercial 2,797 1.2  (2.7) (0.7) (0.1)
Industrial 4,924 1.7  (1.3) 1.7  (1.3)
Other 37 (4.1) (1.6) (4.1) (1.6)
Total retail 9,871 2.9  (2.5) 0.9 % (0.4)%
Wholesale        
Non-affiliated 3,980 8.4  (6.3)    
Affiliated 2,584 27.7  82.7     
Total wholesale 6,564 15.3  14.0     
Total energy sales 16,435 7.5 % 2.8 %    
Changes in retail energy sales are generally the result of changes in electricity usage by customers, changes in weather, and changes
in the number of customers. Retail energy sales increased 2.9% in 2018 as compared to the prior year. This increase was primarily
the result of colder weather in the first quarter and warmer weather in the second and third quarters 2018 as compared to the
corresponding periods in 2017. Weather-adjusted residential KWH sales increased in 2018 primarily due to increased customer
usage. Weather-adjusted commercial KWH sales decreased primarily due to decreased customer usage slightly offset by customer
growth. The increase in industrial KWH energy sales was primarily due to Hurricane Nate, which negatively impacted several large
industrial customers in 2017.
Retail energy sales decreased 2.5% in 2017 as compared to the prior year. This decrease was primarily the result of milder weather
in 2017 as compared to 2016. Weather-adjusted residential KWH sales increased in 2017 primarily due to increased customer
usage. Weather-adjusted commercial KWH sales decreased primarily due to decreased customer usage largely offset by customer
growth. The decrease in industrial KWH energy sales was primarily due to Hurricane Nate, which negatively impacted several
large industrial customers.
See "Operating Revenues" above for a discussion of significant changes in wholesale revenues to affiliated companies.
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
The mix of fuel sources for generation of electricity is determined primarily by demand, the unit cost of fuel consumed, and the
availability of generating units. Additionally, Mississippi Power purchases a portion of its electricity needs from the wholesale
market.
II-128
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Details of Mississippi Power's generation and purchased power were as follows:
 2018 2017  2016
Total generation (in millions of KWHs) 15,966 15,319 14,514
Total purchased power (in millions of KWHs)(*)1,210 724 1,098
Sources of generation (percent) –    
Gas 93 92 91
Coal 7 8 9
Cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH)  –    
Gas 2.65 2.69 2.41
Coal 3.50 3.64 3.91
Average cost of fuel, generated (in cents per net KWH) 2.72 2.77 2.55
Average cost of purchased power (in cents per net KWH)(*)3.39 3.50 3.07
(*)Adjusted to include the impacts of station service in 2018 and test period energy produced in 2017 and 2016 for the Kemper County energy facility, which was
accounted for in accordance with FERC guidance.
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $446 million in 2018, an increase of $26 million, or 6.2%, as compared to the prior year.
The increase was primarily due to a $35 million increase in KWHs generated and purchased, partially offset by a $9 million
decrease in the average cost of generation and purchased power.
Fuel and purchased power expenses were $420 million in 2017, an increase of $43 million, or 11.4%, as compared to the prior year.
The increase was primarily due to a $36 million increase in the average cost of generation and purchased power and a net increase
of $7 million in KWHs generated from gas generation.
Fuel and purchased power energy transactions do not have a significant impact on earnings, since energy expenses are generally
offset by energy revenues through Mississippi Power's fuel cost recovery clauses. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Retail Regulatory Matters – Fuel Cost Recovery" herein and Note 1 to the financial statements under "Fuel Costs" for additional
information.
Fuel
Fuel expense increased $10 million, or 2.5%, in 2018 compared to 2017 primarily due to a 5.2% increase in KWHs generated from
gas generation. Fuel expense increased $52 million, or 15.2%, in 2017 compared to 2016 primarily due to an 11.6% higher cost of
natural gas.
Purchased Power
Purchased power expense increased $16 million, or 64.0%, in 2018 compared to 2017. The increase was primarily the result of a
67% increase in the volume of KWHs purchased. Purchased power expense decreased $9 million, or 26.5%, in 2017 compared to
2016. The decrease was primarily the result of a 34% decrease in the volume of KWHs purchased, offset by a 13.9% increase in the
average cost per KWH purchased compared to 2016. The changes in the volume of KWHs purchased primarily reflect the impact
of test period energy offsets in 2017.
Energy purchases will vary depending on the market prices of wholesale energy as compared to the cost of the Southern Company
system's generation, demand for energy within the Southern Company system's service territory, and the availability of the
Southern Company system's generation. These purchases are made in accordance with the IIC or other contractual agreements, as
approved by the FERC.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
Other operations and maintenance expenses increased $22 million, or 7.6%, in 2018 compared to the prior year. The increase was
primarily due to a $15 million increase related to an employee attrition plan, a $12 million increase in planned generation outage
cost, and a $7 million increase related to overhead line maintenance and vegetation management. These increases were partially
offset by the deferral of $4 million of compensation costs in accordance with the PEP Settlement Agreement. See Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Performance Evaluation Plan" for additional information.
Other operations and maintenance expenses decreased $26 million, or 8.2%, in 2017 compared to the prior year. The decrease was
primarily due to a $10 million decrease in transmission and distribution expenses related to overhead line maintenance, an $8
million decrease in contractor services related to facilities, corporate advertising, and employee compensation and benefits, and an
II-129
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
$8 million decrease related to the combined cycle and the associated common facilities portion of the Kemper County energy
facility.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization increased $8 million, or 5.0%, in 2018 compared to 2017 primarily due to $8 million of amortization
related to the ECO Plan and $6 million of depreciation for additional plant in service. These increases were partially offset by a
decrease of $4 million in amortization of regulatory assets associated with Mercury and Air Toxics Standards (MATS) rule
compliance.
Depreciation and amortization increased $29 million, or 22.0%, in 2017 compared to 2016 primarily due to $13 million of
amortization related to the ECO Plan, $7 million of depreciation for additional plant in service, and $6 million in additional
amortization of regulatory assets associated with MATS rule compliance.
See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Depreciation and Amortization" and Note 2 to the financial statements under "FERC
Matters" and "Mississippi Power – Environmental Compliance Overview Plan" for additional information.
Estimated Loss on Kemper IGCC
In 2018, 2017, and 2016, charges of $37 million, $3.36 billion, and $428 million, respectively, associated with the Kemper IGCC
were recorded. The 2018 pre-tax charge of $37 million primarily resulted from the abandonment and related closure activities and
ongoing period costs, net of sales proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets at the Kemper County energy facility. In June
2017, Mississippi Power suspended the gasifier portion of the project and recorded a charge to earnings for the remaining $2.8
billion book value of the gasifier portion of the project. Prior to the suspension, Mississippi Power recorded losses for revisions of
estimated costs expected to be incurred on construction of the Kemper IGCC in excess of the $2.88 billion cost cap established by
the Mississippi PSC, net of $245 million of grants awarded to the project by the DOE under the Clean Coal Power Initiative Round
2 and excluding the cost of the lignite mine and equipment, the cost of the CO2 pipeline facilities, AFUDC, and certain general
exceptions (Cost Cap Exceptions).
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
Allowance for Equity Funds Used During Construction
AFUDC equity decreased $72 million, or 100.0%, in 2018 as compared to 2017 and $52 million, or 41.9%, in 2017 as compared to
2016 as a result of suspending construction of the Kemper IGCC in June 2017. See Note 2 to the financial statements under
"Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized increased $34 million, or 81.0%, in 2018 compared to 2017. The increase was
primarily associated with a $33 million net reduction in interest recorded in 2017 following a settlement with the IRS related to
research and experimental (R&E) deductions. The increase also reflects a $29 million reduction in interest capitalized as a result of
suspending construction of the Kemper IGCC in June 2017, offset by decreases of $12 million in interest expense as a result of
lower average outstanding debt, $8 million related to uncertain tax positions, and $7 million due to the completion of Kemper
IGCC carrying cost amortization in 2017.
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized decreased $32 million, or 43.2%, in 2017 compared to 2016. The decrease was
primarily associated with a $33 million net reduction in interest following a settlement with the IRS related to R&E deductions.
Also contributing to the decrease was the amortization of $6 million in interest deferrals in accordance with an order the
Mississippi PSC issued in December 2015 (In-Service Asset Rate Order) and a $7 million decrease in interest related to outstanding
debt as a result of lower balances and lower rates. These decreases were partially offset by a $20 million reduction in interest
capitalized as a result of suspending construction of the Kemper IGCC.
See Note 10 to the financial statements under "Section 174 Research and Experimental Deduction" for additional information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net increased $16 million in 2018 compared to 2017. The increase primarily reflects the $24 million
settlement of Mississippi Power's Deepwater Horizon claim in May 2018, partially offset by a $7 million increase in charitable
donations. See Note 3 to the financial statements under "General Litigation Matters – Mississippi Power" for additional
information. Other income (expense), net increased $3 million in 2017 compared to 2016.
II-130
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Income Taxes (Benefit)
Income tax benefits decreased $430 million, or 80.8%, in 2018 compared to 2017 primarily due to a $1.07 billion increase in
income tax expense from higher pre-tax earnings primarily due to lower charges related to the Kemper County energy facility, net
of the non-deductible AFUDC equity portion. This increase in income tax expense was partially offset by a $434 million decrease
in income tax expense due to the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation, including $407 million primarily associated with the
revaluation of 2017 deferred tax assets related to the Kemper IGCC recorded in 2017 and $23 million associated with the lower
federal income tax rate applicable in 2018, as well as $194 million related to the reduction in 2018 of a valuation allowance for a
state income tax NOL carryforward recorded in 2017.
Income tax benefits increased $428 million, or 411.5%, in 2017 compared to 2016 primarily due to $809 million in tax benefits on
the estimated probable losses on the Kemper IGCC, net of the non-deductible AFUDC equity portion and the related state valuation
allowances, partially offset by $372 million resulting from Tax Reform Legislation. Tax Reform Legislation earnings impacts are
primarily due to revaluing deferred tax assets related to the Kemper County energy facility.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional
information.
Effects of Inflation
Mississippi Power is subject to rate regulation that is generally based on the recovery of historical and projected costs. The effects
of inflation can create an economic loss since the recovery of costs could be in dollars that have less purchasing power. Any
adverse effect of inflation on Mississippi Power's results of operations has not been substantial in recent years.
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
General
Mississippi Power operates as a vertically integrated utility providing electric service to retail customers within its traditional
service territory located in southeast Mississippi and to wholesale customers in the Southeast. Prices for electricity provided by
Mississippi Power to retail customers are set by the Mississippi PSC under cost-based regulatory principles. Retail rates and
earnings are reviewed and may be adjusted periodically within certain limitations. Prices for wholesale electricity sales,
interconnecting transmission lines, and the exchange of electric power are regulated by the FERC. See "FERC Matters" herein,
ACCOUNTING POLICIES – "Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates – Utility Regulation" herein, and Note 2
to the financial statements for additional information about regulatory matters.
The results of operations for the past three years are not necessarily indicative of future earnings potential. The level of Mississippi
Power's future earnings depends on numerous factors that affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of Mississippi Power's
business of providing electric service. These factors include Mississippi Power's ability to recover its prudently-incurred costs in a
timely manner during a time of increasing costs and its ability to prevail against legal challenges associated with the Kemper
County energy facility. Future earnings will be driven primarily by continued customer growth and the weak pace of growth in
electricity use per customer, especially in residential and commercial markets. Earnings will also depend upon maintaining and
growing sales, considering, among other things, the adoption and/or penetration rates of increasingly energy-efficient technologies
and increasing volumes of electronic commerce transactions, both of which could contribute to a net reduction in customer usage.
Earnings are subject to a variety of other factors. These factors include weather, competition, developing new and maintaining
existing energy contracts and associated load requirements with other utilities and other wholesale customers, energy conservation
practiced by customers, the use of alternative energy sources by customers, the price of electricity, the price elasticity of demand,
and the rate of economic growth or decline in Mississippi Power's service territory. Demand for electricity is primarily driven by
the pace of economic growth that may be affected by changes in regional and global economic conditions, which may impact future
earnings.
Mississippi Power's retail base rates are set under the PEP, a rate plan approved by the Mississippi PSC. Typically, two filings are
made for each calendar year: the PEP projected filing, which is typically filed prior to the beginning of the year based on a
projected revenue requirement, and the PEP lookback filing, which is filed after the end of the year and allows for review of the
actual return compared to the allowed return range. Pursuant to the PEP Settlement Agreement, PEP proceedings are suspended
until after the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case and Mississippi Power is not required to make any PEP
filings for regulatory years 2018, 2019, and 2020. See "Retail Regulatory Matters" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements
under "Mississippi Power – Performance Evaluation Plan" for more information.
On October 2, 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved the executed agreements between Mississippi Power and its largest retail
customer, Chevron, for Mississippi Power to continue providing retail service to the Chevron refinery in Pascagoula, Mississippi
II-131
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
through 2038. The new agreements are not expected to have a material impact on Mississippi Power's earnings; however, the co-
generation assets located at the refinery are accounted for as a sales-type lease in accordance with the new lease accounting rules
that became effective in 2019. These assets are also subject to a security interest granted to Chevron. See FINANCIAL
CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Credit Rating Risk" herein for additional information.
Mississippi Power provides service under long-term contracts with rural electric cooperative associations and municipalities located
in southeastern Mississippi under cost-based electric tariffs which are subject to regulation by the FERC. The contracts with these
wholesale customers represented 17.3% of Mississippi Power's total operating revenues in 2018 and are generally subject to 10-
year rolling cancellation notices. Historically, these wholesale customers have acted as a group and any changes in contractual
relationships for one customer are likely to be followed by the other wholesale customers.
Environmental Matters
Mississippi Power's operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and regulations
governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Mississippi Power maintains comprehensive environmental
compliance and GHG strategies to assess upcoming requirements and compliance costs associated with these environmental laws
and regulations. The costs, including capital expenditures, operations and maintenance costs, and costs reflected in ARO liabilities,
required to comply with environmental laws and regulations and to achieve stated goals may impact future electric generating unit
retirement and replacement decisions, results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition. Related costs may result from
the installation of additional environmental controls, closure and monitoring of CCR facilities, unit retirements, or changing fuel
sources for certain existing units, as well as related upgrades to Mississippi Power's transmission and distribution systems. A major
portion of these costs is expected to be recovered through retail and wholesale rates. The ultimate impact of environmental laws
and regulations and the GHG goals discussed herein will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of
requirements, the availability and cost of any deployed technology, fuel prices, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal
challenges.
New or revised environmental laws and regulations could affect many areas of Mississippi Power's operations. The impact of any
such changes cannot be determined at this time. Environmental compliance costs could affect earnings if such costs cannot
continue to be recovered in rates on a timely basis or through long-term wholesale agreements. Further, increased costs that are
recovered through regulated rates could contribute to reduced demand for electricity, which could negatively affect results of
operations, cash flows, and/or financial condition. Additionally, many commercial and industrial customers may also be affected by
existing and future environmental requirements, which for some may have the potential to ultimately affect their demand for
electricity. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Environmental Compliance Overview Plan" for
additional information.
Through 2018, Mississippi Power has invested approximately $654 million in environmental capital retrofit projects to comply
with environmental requirements, with annual totals of approximately $11 million, $9 million, and $17 million for 2018, 2017, and
2016, respectively. Although the timing, requirements, and estimated costs could change as environmental laws and regulations are
adopted or modified, as compliance plans are revised or updated, and as legal challenges to rules are initiated or completed,
Mississippi Power's current compliance strategy estimates capital expenditures of $73 million from 2019 through 2023, with annual
totals of approximately $18 million, $20 million, $17 million, $5 million, and $13 million for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023,
respectively. These estimates do not include any potential compliance costs associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions
from fossil fuel-fired electric generating units. See "Global Climate Issues" herein for additional information. Mississippi Power
also anticipates expenditures associated with ash pond closure and ground water monitoring under the CCR Rule, which are
reflected in Mississippi Power's ARO liabilities. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and
Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Environmental Laws and Regulations
Air Quality
The EPA has set National Ambient Air Quality Standards (NAAQS) for six air pollutants (carbon monoxide, lead, nitrogen dioxide,
ozone, particulate matter, and SO2) to protect and improve the nation's air quality, which it reviews and revises periodically.
Following a NAAQS revision, states are required to develop an EPA-approved plan to protect air quality. These state plans can
require additional emission controls, improvements in control efficiency, or fuel changes which can result in increased compliance
and operational costs. NAAQS requirements can also adversely affect the siting of new electric generating facilities. All areas
within Mississippi Power's service territory have been designated as attainment for all NAAQS. If areas are designated as
nonattainment in the future, increased compliance costs could result.
II-132
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
In 2011, the EPA finalized the Cross-State Air Pollution Rule (CSAPR) to address impacts of SO2 and NOX emissions from fossil
fuel-fired electric generating plants. CSAPR establishes emissions trading programs and budgets for certain states and allocates
emissions allowances for sources in those states. In 2016, the EPA published a final rule establishing more stringent ozone season
NOX emissions budgets in Alabama and Mississippi. The outcome of ongoing CSAPR litigation concerning the 2016 CSAPR rule,
to which Mississippi Power is a party, could have an impact on the State of Mississippi's ozone season NOX emissions budget.
Increases in either future fossil fuel-fired generation or the availability or cost of CSAPR allowances could have a negative
financial impact on results of operations for Mississippi Power.
The EPA finalized regional haze regulations in 2005 and 2017. These regulations require states, tribal governments, and various
federal agencies to develop and implement plans to reduce pollutants that impair visibility and demonstrate reasonable progress
toward the goal of restoring natural visibility conditions in certain areas, including national parks and wilderness areas. States must
submit a revised state implementation plan (SIP) to the EPA demonstrating continued reasonable progress towards achieving
visibility improvement goals. These plans could require reductions in certain pollutants, such as particulate matter, SO2, and NOX,
which could result in increased compliance costs. The EPA issued a limited approval of the regional progress SIP for the State of
Mississippi because Mississippi must revise the best available retrofit technology (BART) provisions of its SIP. Therefore, Plant
Daniel continues to be evaluated under the regional haze BART provisions. Mississippi Power is required to submit Plant Daniel's
BART analysis to the State of Mississippi by summer 2019. Requirements for further reduction of these pollutants at Plant Daniel
could increase compliance costs.
Water Quality
In 2014, the EPA finalized requirements under Section 316(b) of the Clean Water Act (CWA) to regulate cooling water intake
structures (CWIS) to minimize their effects on fish and other aquatic life at existing power plants (e.g. coal, natural gas, oil, and
nuclear generating plants) and manufacturing facilities. The regulation requires plant-specific studies to determine applicable CWIS
changes to protect organisms that either get caught on the intake screens (impingement) or are drawn into the cooling system
(entrainment). Mississippi Power is conducting these studies and currently anticipates applicable CWIS changes may include fish-
friendly CWIS screens with fish return systems and minor additions of monitoring equipment at certain plants. However, the
ultimate impact of this rule will depend on the outcome of these plant-specific studies, any additional protective measures required
to be incorporated into each plant's National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit based on site-specific
factors, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In 2015, the EPA finalized the steam electric effluent limitations guidelines (ELG) rule (2015 ELG Rule) that set national standards
for wastewater discharges from new and existing steam electric generating units generating greater than 50 MWs. The 2015 ELG
Rule prohibits effluent discharges of certain waste streams and imposes stringent limits on flue gas desulfurization (scrubber)
wastewater discharges. The revised technology-based limits and the CCR Rule require extensive changes to existing ash and
wastewater management systems or the installation and operation of new ash and wastewater management systems. Compliance
with the 2015 ELG Rule is expected to require capital expenditures and increased operational costs primarily for Mississippi
Power's coal-fired electric generation. State environmental agencies will incorporate specific compliance applicability dates in the
NPDES permitting process for each ELG waste stream no later than December 31, 2023. The EPA is scheduled to issue a new
rulemaking by December 2019 that could revise the limitations and applicability dates of two of the waste streams regulated in the
2015 ELG Rule. The impact of any changes to the 2015 ELG Rule will depend on the content of the new rule and the outcome of
any legal challenges.
In 2015, the EPA and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers (Corps) jointly published a final rule that revised the regulatory definition
of waters of the United States (WOTUS) for all CWA programs. The rule significantly expanded the scope of federal jurisdiction
over waterbodies (such as rivers, streams, canals, and wastewater treatment ponds), which could impact new generation projects
and permitting and reporting requirements associated with the installation, expansion, and maintenance of transmission and
distribution projects. The EPA and the Corps are expected to publish a final rule in 2019 to replace the 2015 WOTUS definition.
The impact of any changes to the 2015 WOTUS rule will depend on the content of this final rule and the outcome of any legal
challenges.
Coal Combustion Residuals
In 2015, the EPA finalized non-hazardous solid waste regulations for the disposal of CCR, including coal ash and gypsum, in
landfills and surface impoundments (ash ponds) at active generating power plants. The EPA's CCR Rule requires landfills and ash
ponds to be evaluated against a set of performance criteria and potentially closed if minimum criteria are not met. Closure of
existing landfills and ash ponds could require installation of equipment and infrastructure to manage CCR in accordance with the
CCR Rule. Based on cost estimates for closure and monitoring of landfills and ash ponds pursuant to the CCR Rule, Mississippi
II-133
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Power recorded AROs for each CCR unit in 2015. As further analysis was performed and closure details were developed,
Mississippi Power has continued to periodically update these cost estimates, as discussed further below.
The EPA published certain amendments to the CCR Rule, which became effective August 29, 2018. These amendments extend the
date from April 2019 to October 31, 2020 to cease sending CCR and other waste streams to ash ponds that demonstrate compliance
with all except two of the specified performance criteria.
On August 21, 2018, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit issued a decision suggesting the EPA should
regulate previously-excluded inactive ash ponds located at retired generation facilities and questioning both the ability of unlined
ash ponds to continue operating no matter the performance criteria results and the classification of clay-lined landfills and ash
ponds. These developments could impact the expected timing of Mississippi Power's landfill and ash pond closure activities, but the
extent of any impact will depend on the outcome of ongoing litigation, anticipated EPA rulemaking action to establish further
guidance, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
During 2018, Mississippi Power recorded increases of approximately $16 million to its AROs related to the CCR Rule. The
increases include approximately $11 million based on information from feasibility studies performed on an ash pond at Plant
Greene County, which is co-owned with Alabama Power, and approximately $5 million related to increases in post-closure care for
Plant Watson's ash pond and landfill. The Alabama Power studies for Plant Greene County indicated that additional closure costs,
primarily related to increases in estimated ash volume, water management requirements, and design revisions, will be required to
close the ash pond under the planned closure-in-place methodology. As the level of work becomes more defined in the next 12
months, it is likely that these cost estimates will change and the change could be material. Mississippi Power expects to periodically
update its ARO cost estimates.
In 2016, the Mississippi PSC granted a CPCN to Mississippi Power authorizing certain projects associated with complying with the
CCR Rule. Additionally in this order, the Mississippi PSC also authorized Mississippi Power to recover any costs associated with
the CPCN, including future monitoring costs, through the ECO clause. Absent continued recovery of ARO costs through regulated
rates, Mississippi Power's results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition could be materially impacted. See FINANCIAL
CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 6 to the financial
statements for additional information regarding Mississippi Power's AROs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Environmental Remediation
Mississippi Power must comply with environmental laws and regulations governing the handling and disposal of waste and releases
of hazardous substances. Under these various laws and regulations, Mississippi Power may also incur substantial costs to clean up
affected sites. Mississippi Power has authority from the Mississippi PSC to recover approved environmental compliance costs
through established regulatory mechanisms. Mississippi Power recognizes a liability for environmental remediation costs only
when it determines a loss is probable and reasonably estimable.
Global Climate Issues
On August 31, 2018, the EPA published a proposed rule known as the Affordable Clean Energy (ACE) Rule, which is intended to
replace a regulation enacted in 2015 known as the Clean Power Plan (CPP), that would limit CO2 emissions from existing fossil
fuel-fired electric generating units. The CPP has been stayed by the U.S. Supreme Court since 2016. The ACE Rule would require
states to develop GHG unit-specific emission rate standards based on heat-rate efficiency improvements for existing fossil fuel-
fired steam units. As proposed, combustion turbines, including natural gas combined cycles, are not affected sources. As of January
1, 2019, Mississippi Power has ownership interests in six fossil fuel-fired steam units to which the proposed ACE Rule is
applicable. The ultimate impact of this rule to Mississippi Power is currently unknown and will depend on changes between the
proposal and the final rule, subsequent state plan developments and requirements, and any associated legal challenges.
On December 20, 2018, the EPA published a proposed review of the Standards of Performance for Greenhouse Gas Emissions from
New, Modified, and Reconstructed Stationary Sources: Electric Utility Generating Units final rule (2015 NSPS rule). The EPA's
final 2015 NSPS rule set standards of performance for new, modified, and reconstructed electric utility generating units which
included stationary combustion turbines and fossil-fired steam boilers. This proposal reduces the stringency of the 2015 NSPS rule
by not basing the new and reconstructed fossil-fired steam boiler and IGCC standards on partial carbon capture and sequestration.
The impact of any changes to this rule will depend on the content of the final rule and the outcome of any legal challenges.
The EPA's GHG reporting rule requires annual reporting of GHG emissions expressed in terms of metric tons of CO2 equivalent
emissions for a company's operational control of facilities. Based on ownership or financial control of facilities, Mississippi
II-134
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Power's 2017 GHG emissions were approximately 8 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent. The preliminary estimate of Mississippi
Power's 2018 GHG emissions on the same basis is approximately 8 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent.
Through 2017, the Southern Company system has achieved an estimated GHG emission reduction of 36% since 2007. In April
2018, Southern Company established an intermediate goal of a 50% reduction in carbon emissions from 2007 levels by 2030 and a
long-term goal of low- to no-carbon operations by 2050. To achieve these goals, the Southern Company system expects to continue
growing its renewable energy portfolio, optimize technology advancements to modernize its transmission and distribution systems,
increase the use of natural gas for generation, complete ongoing construction projects, invest in energy efficiency, and continue
research and development efforts focused on technologies to lower GHG emissions. The Southern Company system's ability to
achieve these goals also will be dependent on many external factors, including supportive national energy policies, low natural gas
prices, and the development, deployment, and advancement of relevant energy technologies.
FERC Matters
Municipal and Rural Associations Tariff
Mississippi Power provides wholesale electric service to Cooperative Energy, East Mississippi Electric Power Association, and the
City of Collins, all located in southeastern Mississippi, under a long-term cost-based, FERC-regulated MRA tariff.
In 2016, Mississippi Power reached a settlement agreement with its wholesale customers, which was subsequently approved by the
FERC, for an increase in wholesale base revenues under the MRA cost-based electric tariff, primarily as a result of placing
scrubbers for Plant Daniel Units 1 and 2 in service in 2015. The settlement agreement became effective for services rendered
beginning May 1, 2016, resulting in an estimated annual revenue increase of $7 million under the MRA cost-based electric tariff.
Additionally, under the settlement agreement, the tariff customers agreed to similar regulatory treatment for MRA tariff ratemaking
as the treatment approved for retail ratemaking under the In-Service Asset Rate Order. This regulatory treatment primarily included
(i) recovery of the operational Kemper County energy facility assets providing service to customers and other related costs, (ii)
amortization of the Kemper County energy facility-related regulatory assets included in rates under the settlement agreement over
the 36 months ending April 30, 2019, (iii) Kemper County energy facility-related expenses included in rates under the settlement
agreement no longer being deferred and charged to expense, and (iv) removing all of the Kemper County energy facility CWIP
from rate base with a corresponding increase in accrual of AFUDC, which totaled approximately $22 million through the
suspension of Kemper IGCC start-up activities.
Mississippi Power expects to reach a subsequent settlement agreement with its wholesale customers and will make a filing with the
FERC during the first quarter 2019. The settlement agreement is intended to be consistent with the Kemper Settlement Agreement,
including the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
In September 2017, Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy executed a Shared Service Agreement (SSA), as part of the MRA
tariff, under which Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy will share in providing electricity to all Cooperative Energy delivery
points, in lieu of the current arrangement under which each delivery point is specifically assigned to either entity. The SSA accepted
by the FERC in October 2017 became effective on January 1, 2018 and may be cancelled by Cooperative Energy with 10 years
notice after December 31, 2020. The SSA provides Cooperative Energy the option to decrease its use of Mississippi Power's
generation services under the MRA tariff, subject to annual and cumulative caps and a one-year notice requirement. In the event
Cooperative Energy elects to reduce these services, the related reduction in Mississippi Power's revenues is not expected to be
significant through 2020.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Mississippi Power has a wholesale MRA and a Market Based (MB) fuel cost recovery factor. Effective with the first billing cycle
for January 2018, fuel rates increased $11 million annually for wholesale MRA customers and $1 million annually for wholesale
MB customers. Effective January 1, 2019, the wholesale MRA fuel rate decreased $16 million annually and the wholesale MB fuel
rate decreased by an immaterial amount. At December 31, 2018, over recovered wholesale MRA fuel costs included in other
regulatory liabilities, current on the balance sheet were approximately $6 million compared to an immaterial amount at December
31, 2017. Under recovered wholesale MB fuel costs included in the balance sheets were immaterial at December 31, 2018 and
2017.
Mississippi Power's operating revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel cost and amounts billed in accordance
with the currently approved cost recovery rate. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor should have no significant effect on
Mississippi Power's revenues or net income, but will affect cash flow.
II-135
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Open Access Transmission Tariff
On May 10, 2018, AMEA and Cooperative Energy filed with the FERC a complaint against SCS and the traditional electric
operating companies (including Mississippi Power) claiming that the current 11.25% base ROE used in calculating the annual
transmission revenue requirements of the traditional electric operating companies' (including Mississippi Power's) open access
transmission tariff is unjust and unreasonable as measured by the applicable FERC standards. The complaint requested that the base
ROE be set no higher than 8.65% and that the FERC order refunds for the difference in revenue requirements that results from
applying a just and reasonable ROE established in this proceeding upon determining the current ROE is unjust and unreasonable.
On June 18, 2018, SCS and the traditional electric operating companies (including Mississippi Power) filed their response
challenging the adequacy of the showing presented by the complainants and offering support for the current ROE. On September 6,
2018, the FERC issued an order establishing a refund effective date of May 10, 2018 in the event a refund is due and initiating an
investigation and settlement procedures regarding the current base ROE. Through December 31, 2018, the estimated maximum
potential refund is not expected to be material to Mississippi Power's results of operations or cash flows. The ultimate outcome of
this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Cooperative Energy Power Supply Agreement
In 2008, Mississippi Power entered into a 10-year power supply agreement (PSA) with Cooperative Energy for approximately 152
MWs, which became effective in 2011. Following certain plant retirements, the PSA capacity was reduced to 86 MWs. On
February 5, 2018, Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy executed an amendment to extend the PSA through March 31, 2021,
effective April 1, 2018, which increased total capacity by 286 MWs.
Cooperative Energy also has a 10-year network integration transmission service agreement (NITSA) with SCS for transmission
service to certain delivery points on Mississippi Power's transmission system that became effective in 2011. As a result of the PSA
amendment, Cooperative Energy and SCS amended the terms of the NITSA, which the FERC approved, to provide for the
purchase of incremental transmission capacity for service beginning April 1, 2018 through March 31, 2021.
Retail Regulatory Matters
Mississippi Power's rates and charges for service to retail customers are subject to the regulatory oversight of the Mississippi PSC.
Mississippi Power's rates are a combination of base rates and several separate cost recovery clauses for specific categories of costs.
These separate cost recovery clauses address such items as fuel and purchased power, energy efficiency programs, ad valorem
taxes, property damage, and the costs of compliance with environmental laws and regulations. Costs not addressed through one of
the specific cost recovery clauses are expected to be recovered through Mississippi Power's base rates. See Note 2 to the financial
statements under "Mississippi Power" for additional information.
Operations Review
In August 2018, the Mississippi PSC began an operations review of Mississippi Power, for which the final report is expected prior
to the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Mississippi Power expects that the review will include, but not be
limited to, a comparative analysis of its costs, its cost recovery framework, and ways in which it may streamline management
operations for the reasonable benefit of ratepayers. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Performance Evaluation Plan
Mississippi Power's retail base rates generally are set under the PEP, a rate plan approved by the Mississippi PSC. Two filings are
made for each calendar year: the PEP projected filing, which is typically filed prior to the beginning of the year based on a
projected revenue requirement, and the PEP lookback filing, which is filed after the end of the year and allows for review of the
actual revenue requirement compared to the projected filing.
In 2011, Mississippi Power submitted its annual PEP lookback filing for 2010, which recommended no surcharge or refund. Later
in 2011, the MPUS disputed certain items in the 2010 PEP lookback filing. In 2012, the Mississippi PSC issued an order canceling
Mississippi Power's PEP lookback filing for 2011. In 2013, the MPUS contested Mississippi Power's PEP lookback filing for 2012,
which indicated a refund due to customers of $5 million. In 2014 through 2018, Mississippi Power submitted its annual PEP
lookback filings for the prior years, which for each of 2013, 2014, and 2017 indicated no surcharge or refund and for each of 2015
and 2016 indicated a $5 million surcharge. Additionally, in July 2016, in November 2016, and in November 2017, Mississippi
Power submitted its annual projected PEP filings for 2016, 2017, and 2018, respectively, which for 2016 and 2017 indicated no
change in rates and for 2018 indicated a rate increase of 4%, or $38 million in annual revenues. The Mississippi PSC suspended
each of these filings to allow more time for review.
II-136
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
On February 7, 2018, Mississippi Power revised its annual projected PEP filing for 2018 to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform
Legislation. The revised filing requested an increase of $26 million in annual revenues, based on a performance adjusted ROE of
9.33% and an increased equity ratio of 55%. On July 27, 2018, Mississippi Power and the MPUS entered into the PEP Settlement
Agreement, which was approved by the Mississippi PSC on August 7, 2018. Rates under the PEP Settlement Agreement became
effective with the first billing cycle of September 2018. The PEP Settlement Agreement provides for an increase of approximately
$21.6 million in annual base retail revenues, which excludes certain compensation costs contested by the MPUS, as well as
approximately $2 million which was subsequently approved for recovery through the 2018 Energy Efficiency Cost Rider as
discussed below. Under the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power is deferring the contested compensation costs for 2018
and 2019 as a regulatory asset, which totaled $4 million as of December 31, 2018 and is included in other regulatory assets,
deferred on the balance sheet. The Mississippi PSC is currently expected to rule on the appropriate treatment for such costs in
connection with the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this
time.
Pursuant to the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power's performance-adjusted allowed ROE is 9.31% and its allowed
equity ratio is capped at 51%, pending further review by the Mississippi PSC. In lieu of the requested equity ratio increase,
Mississippi Power retained $44 million of excess accumulated deferred income taxes resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation
until the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Further, Mississippi Power agreed to seek equity contributions
sufficient to restore its equity ratio to 50% by December 31, 2018. Since Mississippi Power's actual average equity ratio for 2018
was more than 1% lower than the 50% target, Mississippi Power deferred the corresponding difference in its revenue requirement
of approximately $4 million as a regulatory liability for resolution in the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Pursuant to the
PEP Settlement Agreement, PEP proceedings are suspended until after the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate
Case and Mississippi Power is not required to make any PEP filings for regulatory years 2018, 2019, and 2020. The PEP Settlement
Agreement also resolved all open PEP filings with no change to customer rates. As a result, in the third quarter 2018, Mississippi
Power recognized revenues of $5 million previously reserved in connection with the 2012 PEP lookback filing.
Energy Efficiency
In 2013, the Mississippi PSC approved an energy efficiency and conservation rule requiring electric and gas utilities in Mississippi
serving more than 25,000 customers to implement energy efficiency programs and standards. Quick Start Plans, which include a
portfolio of energy efficiency programs that are intended to provide benefits to a majority of customers, were extended by an order
issued by the Mississippi PSC in July 2016, until the time the Mississippi PSC approves a comprehensive portfolio plan program.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
On May 8, 2018, the Mississippi PSC issued an order approving Mississippi Power's revised annual projected Energy Efficiency
Cost Rider 2018 compliance filing, which increased annual retail revenues by approximately $3 million effective with the first
billing cycle for June 2018.
On February 5, 2019, the Mississippi PSC issued an order approving Mississippi Power's Energy Efficiency Cost Rider 2019
compliance filing, which included a slight decrease in annual retail revenues, effective with the first billing cycle in March 2019.
Environmental Compliance Overview Plan
In accordance with a 2011 accounting order from the Mississippi PSC, Mississippi Power has the authority to defer in a regulatory
asset for future recovery all plant retirement- or partial retirement-related costs resulting from environmental regulations. The
Mississippi PSC approved $41 million and $17 million of costs that were reclassified to regulatory assets associated with the fuel
conversion of Plant Watson and Plant Greene County, respectively, for amortization over five-year periods that began in July 2016
and July 2017, respectively. As a result, these decisions are not expected to have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial
statements.
In August 2016, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's revised ECO Plan filing for 2016, which requested the
maximum 2% annual increase in revenues, or approximately $18 million, primarily related to the Plant Daniel Units 1 and 2
scrubbers placed in service in 2015. The revised rates became effective with the first billing cycle for September 2016.
Approximately $22 million of related revenue requirements in excess of the 2% maximum was deferred for inclusion in the 2017
filing, along with related carrying costs.
In May 2017, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's ECO Plan filing for 2017, which requested the maximum 2%
annual increase in revenues, or approximately $18 million, primarily related to the carryforward from the prior year. The rates
became effective with the first billing cycle for June 2017. Approximately $26 million, plus carrying costs, of related revenue
requirements in excess of the 2% maximum was deferred for inclusion in the 2018 filing.
II-137
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
On February 14, 2018, Mississippi Power submitted its ECO Plan filing for 2018, including the effects of the Tax Reform
Legislation, which requested the maximum 2% annual increase in revenues, or approximately $17 million, primarily related to the
carryforward from the prior year.
On August 3, 2018, Mississippi Power and the MPUS entered into the ECO Settlement Agreement, which provides for an increase
of approximately $17 million in annual base retail revenues and was approved by the Mississippi PSC on August 7, 2018. Rates
under the ECO Settlement Agreement became effective with the first billing cycle of September 2018 and will continue in effect
until modified by the Mississippi PSC. These revenues are expected to be sufficient to recover the costs included in Mississippi
Power's request for 2018, as well as the remaining deferred amounts, totaling $26 million at December 31, 2018, along with the
related carrying costs. In accordance with the ECO Settlement Agreement, ECO Plan proceedings are suspended until after the
conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case and Mississippi Power is not required to make any ECO Plan filings for
2018, 2019, and 2020, with any necessary adjustments to be reflected in the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The ECO
Settlement Agreement contains the same terms as the PEP Settlement Agreement described herein with respect to allowed ROE and
equity ratio. At December 31, 2018, Mississippi Power has recorded $2 million in other regulatory liabilities, deferred on the
balance sheet related to the actual December 31, 2018 average equity ratio differential from target applicable to the ECO Plan.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Mississippi Power establishes, annually, a retail fuel cost recovery factor that is approved by the Mississippi PSC. Mississippi
Power is required to file for an adjustment to the retail fuel cost recovery factor annually. In January 2017, the Mississippi PSC
approved the 2017 retail fuel cost recovery factor, effective February 2017 through January 2018, which resulted in an annual
revenue increase of $55 million. On January 16, 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved the 2018 retail fuel cost recovery factor,
effective February 2018 through January 2019, which resulted in an annual revenue increase of $39 million. At December 31, 2018,
the amount of over recovered retail fuel costs included in the balance sheet in other accounts payable was approximately $8 million
compared to $6 million under recovered at December 31, 2017. On January 10, 2019, the Mississippi PSC approved the 2019 retail
fuel cost recovery factor, effective February 2019, which results in a $35 million decrease in annual revenues as a result of lower
expected fuel costs.
Mississippi Power's operating revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel cost and amounts billed in accordance
with the currently approved cost recovery rate. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor should have no significant effect on
Mississippi Power's revenues or net income but will affect operating cash flows.
Ad Valorem Tax Adjustment
Mississippi Power establishes annually an ad valorem tax adjustment factor that is approved by the Mississippi PSC to collect the
ad valorem taxes paid by Mississippi Power. On May 8, 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's annual ad
valorem tax adjustment factor filing for 2018, which included a rate increase of 0.8%, or $7 million, effective with the first billing
cycle for June 2018.
Kemper County Energy Facility
Overview
The Kemper County energy facility was designed to utilize IGCC technology with an expected output capacity of 582 MWs and to
be fueled by locally mined lignite (an abundant, lower heating value coal) from a mine owned by Mississippi Power and situated
adjacent to the Kemper County energy facility. The mine, operated by North American Coal Corporation, started commercial
operation in 2013. In connection with the Kemper County energy facility construction, Mississippi Power constructed
approximately 61 miles of CO2 pipeline infrastructure for the transport of captured CO2 for use in enhanced oil recovery.
Schedule and Cost Estimate
In 2012, the Mississippi PSC issued an order (2012 MPSC CPCN Order), confirming the CPCN originally approved by the
Mississippi PSC in 2010 authorizing the acquisition, construction, and operation of the Kemper County energy facility. The
certificated cost estimate of the Kemper County energy facility included in the 2012 MPSC CPCN Order was $2.4 billion, net of
approximately $0.57 billion in Cost Cap Exceptions. The 2012 MPSC CPCN Order approved a construction cost cap of up to $2.88
billion, with recovery of prudently-incurred costs subject to approval by the Mississippi PSC. The Kemper County energy facility
was originally projected to be placed in service in May 2014. Mississippi Power placed the combined cycle and the associated
common facilities portion of the Kemper County energy facility in service in August 2014. The combined cycle and associated
common facilities portions of the Kemper County energy facility were dedicated as Plant Ratcliffe on April 27, 2018.
II-138
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
On June 21, 2017, the Mississippi PSC stated its intent to issue an order, which occurred on July 6, 2017, directing Mississippi
Power to pursue a settlement under which the Kemper County energy facility would be operated as a natural gas plant, rather than
an IGCC plant, and address all issues associated with the Kemper County energy facility. The order established the Kemper
Settlement Docket. On June 28, 2017, Mississippi Power notified the Mississippi PSC that it would begin a process to suspend
operations and start-up activities on the gasifier portion of the Kemper County energy facility, given the uncertainty as to its future.
At the time of project suspension in June 2017, the total cost estimate for the Kemper County energy facility was approximately
$7.38 billion, including approximately $5.95 billion of costs subject to the construction cost cap, and was net of the $137 million in
additional grants from the DOE received in April 2016 (Additional DOE Grants). In the aggregate, Mississippi Power had recorded
charges to income of $3.07 billion ($1.89 billion after tax) as a result of changes in the cost estimate above the cost cap for the
Kemper IGCC through May 31, 2017.
Given the Mississippi PSC's stated intent regarding no further rate increase for the Kemper County energy facility and the
subsequent suspension, cost recovery of the gasifier portions became no longer probable; therefore, Mississippi Power recorded an
additional charge to income in June 2017 of $2.8 billion ($2.0 billion after tax), which included estimated costs associated with the
gasification portions of the plant and lignite mine. During the third and fourth quarters of 2017, Mississippi Power recorded charges
to income of $242 million ($206 million after tax), including $164 million for ongoing project costs, estimated mine and gasifier-
related costs, and certain termination costs during the suspension period prior to conclusion of the Kemper Settlement Docket, as
well as the charge associated with the Kemper Settlement Agreement discussed below.
In 2018, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax charges to income of $37 million ($27 million after tax), primarily resulting from the
abandonment and related closure activities and ongoing period costs, net of sales proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets
at the Kemper County energy facility. In addition, Mississippi Power recorded a credit to earnings of $95 million in the fourth
quarter 2018 primarily resulting from the reduction of a valuation allowance for a state income tax NOL carryforward associated
with the Kemper County energy facility. Additional closure costs for the mine and gasifier-related assets, currently estimated at up
to $10 million pre-tax (excluding salvage, net of dismantlement costs), may be incurred through the first half of 2020. In addition,
period costs, including, but not limited to, costs for compliance and safety, ARO accretion, and property taxes for the mine and
gasifier-related assets, are estimated to total $11 million in 2019 and $2 million to $4 million annually in 2020 through 2023.
Mississippi Power is currently evaluating its options regarding the final disposition of the CO2 pipeline, including removal of the
pipeline. This evaluation is expected to be complete later in 2019. If Mississippi Power ultimately decides to remove the CO2
pipeline, the cost of removal would have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements. The ultimate outcome of
these matters cannot be determined at this time.
See Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Rate Recovery
Kemper Settlement Agreement
In 2015, the Mississippi PSC issued the In-Service Asset Rate Order regarding the Kemper County energy facility assets that were
commercially operational and providing service to customers (the transmission facilities, combined cycle, natural gas pipeline, and
water pipeline) and other related costs. The In-Service Asset Rate Order provided for retail rate recovery of an annual revenue
requirement of approximately $126 million which went into effect on December 17, 2015.
On February 6, 2018, the Mississippi PSC voted to approve the Kemper Settlement Agreement, which resolved all cost recovery
issues, modified the CPCN to limit the Kemper County energy facility to natural gas combined cycle operation, and provided for an
annual revenue requirement of approximately $99.3 million for costs related to the Kemper County energy facility, which included
the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation. The revenue requirement is based on (i) a fixed ROE for 2018 of 8.6% excluding any
performance adjustment, (ii) a ROE for 2019 calculated in accordance with PEP, excluding the performance adjustment, (iii) for
future years, a performance-based ROE calculated pursuant to PEP, and (iv) amortization periods for the related regulatory assets
and liabilities of eight years and six years, respectively. The revenue requirement also reflects a disallowance related to a portion of
Mississippi Power's investment in the Kemper County energy facility requested for inclusion in rate base, which was recorded in
the fourth quarter 2017 as an additional charge to income of approximately $78 million ($85 million net of accumulated
depreciation of $7 million) pre-tax ($48 million after tax).
Under the Kemper Settlement Agreement, retail customer rates reflect a reduction of approximately $26.8 million annually,
effective with the first billing cycle of April 2018, and include no recovery for costs associated with the gasifier portion of the
Kemper County energy facility in 2018 or at any future date.
II-139
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Reserve Margin Plan
On August 6, 2018, Mississippi Power filed its proposed Reserve Margin Plan (RMP), as required by the Mississippi PSC's order in
the Kemper Settlement Docket. Under the RMP, Mississippi Power proposed alternatives that would reduce its reserve margin, with
the most economic of the alternatives being the two-year and seven-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Watson Units 4 and
5, respectively, to the first quarter 2022 and the four-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Greene County Units 1 and 2 to the
third quarter 2021 and the third quarter 2022, respectively, in order to lower or avoid operating costs. The Plant Greene County unit
retirements would require the completion by Alabama Power of proposed transmission and system reliability improvements, as
well as agreement by Alabama Power. The RMP filing also states that, in the event the Mississippi PSC ultimately approves an
alternative that includes an accelerated retirement, Mississippi Power would require authorization to defer in a regulatory asset for
future recovery the remaining net book value of the units at the time of retirement. A decision by the Mississippi PSC that does not
include recovery of the remaining book value of any generating units retired could have a material impact on Mississippi Power's
financial statements. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Lignite Mine and CO2 Pipeline Facilities
Mississippi Power owns the lignite mine and equipment and mineral reserves located around the Kemper County energy facility
site. The mine started commercial operation in June 2013.
In 2010, Mississippi Power executed a 40-year management fee contract with Liberty Fuels Company, LLC (Liberty Fuels), a
wholly-owned subsidiary of The North American Coal Corporation, which developed, constructed, and is responsible for the
mining operations through the end of the mine reclamation. As the mining permit holder, Liberty Fuels has a legal obligation to
perform mine reclamation and Mississippi Power has a contractual obligation to fund all reclamation activities. As a result of the
abandonment of the Kemper IGCC, final mine reclamation began in 2018 and is expected to be substantially completed in 2020,
with monitoring expected to continue through 2027. See Note 6 to the financial statements and Note 7 to the financial statements
under "Mississippi Power" for additional information.
In addition, Mississippi Power constructed the CO2 pipeline for the planned transport of captured CO2 for use in enhanced oil
recovery and entered into an agreement with Denbury Onshore (Denbury) to purchase the captured CO2. The agreement with
Denbury was terminated in December 2018 and did not have a material impact on Mississippi Power's results of operations.
Mississippi Power is currently evaluating its options regarding the final disposition of the CO2 pipeline, including removal of the
pipeline. This evaluation is expected to be complete later in 2019. If Mississippi Power ultimately decides to remove the CO2
pipeline, the cost of removal would have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements. The ultimate outcome of
this matter cannot be determined at this time.
For additional information on the Kemper County energy facility, see Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power –
Kemper County Energy Facility."
Government Grants
In 2010, the DOE, through a cooperative agreement with SCS, agreed to fund $270 million of the Kemper County energy facility
through the grants awarded to the project by the DOE under the Clean Coal Power Initiative Round 2. Through December 31, 2018,
Mississippi Power received total DOE grants of $387 million, of which $382 million reduced the construction costs of the Kemper
County energy facility and $5 million reimbursed Mississippi Power for expenses associated with DOE reporting. On December
12, 2018, Mississippi Power filed with the DOE its request for property closeout certification under the contract related to the
grants received. Mississippi Power and the DOE are currently in discussions regarding the requested closeout and property
disposition, which may require payment to the DOE for a portion of certain property that is to be retained by Mississippi Power.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time; however, it could have a material impact on Mississippi
Power's financial statements.
Income Tax Matters
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
In December 2017, the Tax Reform Legislation was signed into law and became effective on January 1, 2018. The Tax Reform
Legislation, among other things, reduced the federal corporate income tax rate to 21%, retained normalization provisions for public
utility property and existing renewable energy incentives, and repealed the corporate alternative minimum tax. In addition, under
the Tax Reform Legislation, NOLs generated after December 31, 2017 can no longer be carried back to previous tax years but can
be carried forward indefinitely, with utilization limited to 80% of taxable income of the subsequent tax year. The projected
reduction of Southern Company's consolidated income tax liability resulting from the tax rate reduction also delays the expected
II-140
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
utilization of existing tax credit carryforwards. See Note 10 to the financial statements for information on Southern Company's joint
consolidated income tax allocation agreement.
Following the enactment of the Tax Reform Legislation, the SEC staff issued Staff Accounting Bulletin 118 – "Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" (SAB 118), which provided for a measurement period of up to one year
from the enactment date to complete accounting under GAAP for the tax effects of the legislation. Due to the complex and
comprehensive nature of the enacted tax law changes and their application under GAAP, Mississippi Power considered all amounts
recorded in the financial statements as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation "provisional" as discussed in SAB 118 and subject to
revision prior to filing its 2017 tax return in the fourth quarter 2018. Mississippi Power recognized tax expense of $372 million in
2017. Following the filing of its 2017 tax return, Mississippi Power recorded tax benefits of $35 million to adjust the provisional
amount for a total net tax expense of $337 million as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. In addition, in total, Mississippi Power
recorded an $11 million increase in regulatory assets and a $395 million increase in regulatory liabilities as a result of the Tax
Reform Legislation and $1 million of stranded excess deferred tax balances in AOCI at December 31, 2017 were adjusted through
retained earnings in 2018. As of December 31, 2018, Mississippi Power considered the measurement of impacts from the Tax
Reform Legislation on deferred income tax assets and liabilities, primarily due to the impact of the reduction of the corporate
income tax rate, to be complete.
However, the IRS continues to issue regulations that provide further interpretation and guidance on the law and each state's
adoption of the provisions contained in the Tax Reform Legislation remains uncertain. In addition, the regulatory treatment of
certain impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation is subject to the discretion of the FERC and the Mississippi PSC. The ultimate
impact of this matter cannot be determined at this time. See Note 2 to the financial statements for additional information regarding
the PEP Settlement Agreement and the ECO Settlement Agreement, which reflect certain impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation.
Also see FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Credit Rating Risk" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements
under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
Bonus Depreciation
Under the Tax Reform Legislation, projects with binding contracts prior to September 28, 2017 and placed in service after
September 27, 2017 remain eligible for bonus depreciation under the PATH Act. The PATH Act allowed for 50% bonus
depreciation for 2015 through 2017, 40% bonus depreciation for 2018, and 30% bonus depreciation for 2019 and certain long-lived
assets placed in service in 2020. Based on provisional estimates, bonus depreciation is expected to result in positive cash flows of
approximately $10 million for the 2018 tax year and Mississippi Power does not expect material positive cash flows from bonus
depreciation for the 2019 tax year. See Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for
additional information. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Other Matters
Mississippi Power is involved in various other matters being litigated and regulatory matters that could affect future earnings. In
addition, Mississippi Power is subject to certain claims and legal actions arising in the ordinary course of business. Mississippi
Power's business activities are subject to extensive governmental regulation related to public health and the environment, such as
laws and regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Litigation over environmental issues and
claims of various types, including property damage, personal injury, common law nuisance, and citizen enforcement of
environmental laws and regulations, has occurred throughout the U.S. This litigation has included claims for damages alleged to
have been caused by CO2 and other emissions, CCR, and alleged exposure to hazardous materials, and/or requests for injunctive
relief in connection with such matters.
The ultimate outcome of such pending or potential litigation or regulatory matters cannot be predicted at this time; however, for
current proceedings not specifically reported herein or in Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements, management does not anticipate
that the ultimate liabilities, if any, arising from such current proceedings would have a material effect on Mississippi Power's
financial statements. See Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements for a discussion of various other contingencies, regulatory
matters, and other matters being litigated which may affect future earnings potential.
To mitigate customer rate impacts associated with rising costs and declining sales, Mississippi Power management approved an
employee attrition plan on July 13, 2018. In 2018, Mississippi Power recorded $16 million in expenses related to this plan.
On October 2, 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved the executed agreements between Mississippi Power and its largest retail
customer, Chevron, for Mississippi Power to continue providing retail service to the Chevron refinery in Pascagoula, Mississippi
through 2038. The new agreements are not expected to have a material impact on earnings.
In conjunction with Southern Company's sale of Gulf Power, Mississippi Power and Gulf Power have committed to seek a
restructuring of their 50% undivided ownership interests in Plant Daniel such that each of them would, after the restructuring,
II-141
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
own 100% of a generating unit. On January 15, 2019, Gulf Power provided notice to Mississippi Power that Gulf Power will retire
its share of the generating capacity of Plant Daniel on January 15, 2024. Mississippi Power has the option to purchase Gulf Power's
ownership interest for $1 on January 15, 2024, provided that Mississippi Power exercises the option no later than 120 days prior to
that date. Mississippi Power is assessing the potential operational and economic effects of Gulf Power's notice. The ultimate
outcome of these matters remains subject to completion of Mississippi Power's evaluations and applicable regulatory approvals,
including the FERC and the Mississippi PSC, and cannot now be determined. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
Litigation
On May 18, 2018, Southern Company and Mississippi Power received a notice of dispute and arbitration demand filed by Martin
Product Sales, LLC (Martin) based on two agreements, both related to Kemper IGCC byproducts for which Mississippi Power
provided termination notices in September 2017. Martin alleges breach of contract, breach of good faith and fair dealing, fraud and
misrepresentation, and civil conspiracy and makes a claim for damages in the amount of approximately $143 million, as well as
additional unspecified damages, attorney's fees, costs, and interest. In the first quarter 2019, Mississippi Power and Southern
Company filed motions to dismiss.
On November 21, 2018, Ray C. Turnage and 10 other individual plaintiffs filed a putative class action complaint against
Mississippi Power and the three current members of the Mississippi PSC in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of
Mississippi. Mississippi Power received Mississippi PSC approval in 2013 to charge a mirror CWIP rate premised upon including
in its rate base pre-construction and construction costs for the Kemper IGCC prior to placing the Kemper IGCC into service. The
Mississippi Supreme Court reversed that approval and ordered Mississippi Power to refund the amounts paid by customers under
the previously-approved mirror CWIP rate. The plaintiffs allege that the initial approval process, and the amount approved, were
improper. They also allege that Mississippi Power underpaid customers in the refund process because it applied the wrong interest
rate to the payments. The plaintiffs seek to recover, on behalf of themselves and their putative class, actual damages, punitive
damages, pre-judgment interest, post-judgment interest, attorney's fees, and costs.
Mississippi Power believes these legal challenges have no merit; however, an adverse outcome in either of these proceedings could
have a material impact on Mississippi Power's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity. Mississippi Power will
vigorously defend itself in these matters, the ultimate outcome of which cannot be determined at this time.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
Mississippi Power prepares its financial statements in accordance with GAAP. Significant accounting policies are described in
Notes 1, 5, and 6 to the financial statements. In the application of these policies, certain estimates are made that may have a
material impact on Mississippi Power's results of operations and related disclosures. Different assumptions and measurements
could produce estimates that are significantly different from those recorded in the financial statements. Senior management has
reviewed and discussed the following critical accounting policies and estimates with the Audit Committee of Southern Company's
Board of Directors.
Utility Regulation
Mississippi Power is subject to retail regulation by the Mississippi PSC and wholesale regulation by the FERC. These regulatory
agencies set the rates Mississippi Power is permitted to charge customers based on allowable costs. As a result, Mississippi Power
applies accounting standards which require the financial statements to reflect the effects of rate regulation. Through the ratemaking
process, the regulators may require the inclusion of costs or revenues in periods different than when they would be recognized by a
non-regulated company. This treatment may result in the deferral of expenses and the recording of related regulatory assets based
on anticipated future recovery through rates or the deferral of gains or creation of liabilities and the recording of related regulatory
liabilities. The application of the accounting standards has a further effect on Mississippi Power's financial statements as a result of
the estimates of allowable costs used in the ratemaking process. These estimates may differ from those actually incurred by
Mississippi Power; therefore, the accounting estimates inherent in specific costs such as depreciation and pension and other
postretirement benefits have less of a direct impact on Mississippi Power's results of operations and financial condition than they
would on a non-regulated company.
As reflected in Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power – Regulatory Assets and Liabilities," significant
regulatory assets and liabilities have been recorded. Management reviews the ultimate recoverability of these regulatory assets and
any requirement to refund these regulatory liabilities based on applicable regulatory guidelines and GAAP. However, adverse
II-142
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
legislative, judicial, or regulatory actions could materially impact the amounts of such regulatory assets and liabilities and could
adversely impact Mississippi Power's financial statements.
Kemper County Energy Facility Closure Costs
For periods prior to the second quarter 2017, significant accounting estimates included Kemper County energy facility estimated
construction costs, project completion date, and rate recovery. In the aggregate, Mississippi Power had recorded charges to income
of $3.07 billion ($1.89 billion after tax) as a result of changes in the cost estimate above the cost cap for the Kemper IGCC through
May 31, 2017, of which $305 million ($188 million after tax) occurred in 2017 and $428 million ($264 million after tax) occurred
in 2016.
On June 21, 2017, the Mississippi PSC stated its intent to issue an order (which occurred on July 6, 2017) directing Mississippi
Power to pursue a settlement under which the Kemper County energy facility would be operated as a natural gas plant rather than
an IGCC plant; therefore, Mississippi Power suspended the operation and start-up of the gasifier portion of the Kemper County
energy facility on June 28, 2017.
As a result of these events, cost recovery of the gasification portions became no longer probable; therefore, Mississippi Power
recorded an additional charge to income in June 2017 of $2.8 billion ($2.0 billion after tax), which included estimated costs
associated with the gasification portions of the plant and lignite mine. During the third and fourth quarters of 2017, Mississippi
Power recorded charges to income of $242 million ($206 million after tax), including $164 million for ongoing project costs,
estimated mine and gasifier-related costs, and certain termination costs during the suspension period prior to conclusion of the
Kemper Settlement Docket, as well as a charge of $78 million associated with the Kemper Settlement Agreement. The estimated
construction costs and project completion date were no longer considered significant accounting estimates for 2017 following the
suspension and related charges to earnings. In addition, the Kemper Settlement Agreement was approved by the Mississippi PSC on
February 6, 2018 and resolved all related cost recovery issues.
In 2018, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax charges to income of $37 million ($27 million after tax), primarily resulting from the
abandonment and related closure activities and ongoing period costs, net of sales proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets
at the Kemper County energy facility. Additional closure costs for the mine and gasifier-related assets, currently estimated at up to
$10 million pre-tax (excluding salvage, net of dismantlement costs), may be incurred through the first half of 2020. During the
fourth quarter 2018, Mississippi Power began evaluating its options regarding the final disposition of the CO2 pipeline, including
removal of the pipeline. This evaluation is expected to be complete later in 2019. If Mississippi Power ultimately decides to remove
the CO2 pipeline, the cost of removal would have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements. In addition, in
December 2018, Mississippi Power filed with the DOE its request for property closeout certification under the contract related to
the grants received. Mississippi Power and the DOE are currently in discussions regarding the requested closeout and property
disposition, which may require payment to the DOE for a portion of certain property that is to be retained by Mississippi Power and
could have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements. Given the significant judgment and uncertainty involved
in estimating these remaining costs associated with the abandonment and closure activities for the mine and gasifier-related assets
at the Kemper County energy facility, Mississippi Power considers the related liabilities to be critical accounting estimates.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information. The ultimate outcome of
these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Asset Retirement Obligations
AROs are computed as the fair value of the estimated costs for an asset's future retirement and are recorded in the period in which
the liability is incurred. The estimated costs are capitalized as part of the related long-lived asset and depreciated over the asset's
useful life. In the absence of quoted market prices, AROs are estimated using present value techniques in which estimates of future
cash outlays associated with the asset retirements are discounted using a credit-adjusted risk-free rate. Estimates of the timing and
amounts of future cash outlays are based on projections of when and how the assets will be retired and the cost of future removal
activities.
The liability for AROs primarily relates to facilities that are subject to the CCR Rule, principally ash ponds. In addition, Mississippi
Power has AROs related to various landfill sites, underground storage tanks, water wells, mine reclamation, and asbestos removal.
Mississippi Power also has identified retirement obligations related to certain transmission and distribution facilities and certain
wireless communication towers. However, liabilities for the removal of these assets have not been recorded because the settlement
timing for the retirement obligations related to these assets is indeterminable and, therefore, the fair value of the retirement
obligations cannot be reasonably estimated. A liability for these retirement obligations will be recognized when sufficient
II-143
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
information becomes available to support a reasonable estimation of the retirement obligation. In 2018, Mississippi Power incurred
$16 million in ARO revisions, including $11 million at Plant Greene County, which is co-owned with Alabama Power.
The cost estimates for AROs related to the disposal of CCR are based on information using various assumptions related to closure
and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and discount rates, and the potential methods for complying with the
CCR Rule requirements for closure. Mississippi Power expects to periodically update its ARO cost estimates. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion Residuals"
herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating AROs, Mississippi Power considers the liabilities for AROs to be critical
accounting estimates.
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits
Mississippi Power's calculation of pension and other postretirement benefits expense is dependent on a number of assumptions.
These assumptions include discount rates, healthcare cost trend rates, expected long-term return on plan assets, mortality rates,
expected salary and wage increases, and other factors. Components of pension and other postretirement benefits expense include
interest and service cost on the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, expected return on plan assets, and amortization of
certain unrecognized costs and obligations. Actual results that differ from the assumptions utilized are accumulated and amortized
over future periods and, therefore, generally affect recognized expense and the recorded obligation in future periods. While
Mississippi Power believes that the assumptions used are appropriate, differences in actual experience or significant changes in
assumptions would affect its pension and other postretirement benefit costs and obligations.
Key elements in determining Mississippi Power's pension and other postretirement benefit expense are the expected long-term
return on plan assets and the discount rate used to measure the benefit plan obligations and the periodic benefit plan expense for
future periods. The expected long-term return on pension and other postretirement benefit plan assets is based on Southern
Company's investment strategy, historical experience, and expectations for long-term rates of return that consider external actuarial
advice. Southern Company determines the long-term return on plan assets by applying the long-term rate of expected returns on
various asset classes to Southern Company's target asset allocation. For purposes of determining Mississippi Power's liability
related to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, Southern Company discounts the future related cash flows using a
single-point discount rate developed from the weighted average of market-observed yields for high quality fixed income securities
with maturities that correspond to expected benefit payments.
A 25 basis point change in any significant assumption (discount rate, salary increases, or long-term rate of return on plan assets)
would result in a $1 million or less change in total annual benefit expense, a $19 million or less change in the projected obligation
for the pension plan, and a $2 million or less change in the projected obligation for other post retirement benefit plans.
See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information regarding pension and other postretirement benefits.
Contingent Obligations
Mississippi Power is subject to a number of federal and state laws and regulations as well as other factors and conditions that
subject it to environmental, litigation, and other risks. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL herein and Notes 2 and 3 to the
financial statements for more information regarding certain of these contingencies. Mississippi Power periodically evaluates its
exposure to such risks and records reserves for those matters where a non-tax-related loss is considered probable and reasonably
estimable. The adequacy of reserves can be significantly affected by external events or conditions that can be unpredictable; thus,
the ultimate outcome of such matters could materially affect Mississippi Power's results of operations, cash flows, or financial
condition.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" for additional information.
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842) (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires lessees to recognize on the
balance sheet a lease liability and a right-of-use asset for all leases. ASU 2016-02 also changes the recognition, measurement, and
presentation of expense associated with leases and provides clarification regarding the identification of certain components of
contracts that would represent a lease. The accounting required by lessors is relatively unchanged. ASU 2016-02 is effective for
fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018 and Mississippi Power adopted the new standard effective January 1, 2019.
Mississippi Power elected the transition methodology provided by ASU No. 2018-11, Leases (Topic 842): Targeted Improvements,
whereby the requirements of ASU 2016-02 are applied on a prospective basis as of the adoption date of January 1, 2019, without
restating prior periods. Mississippi Power elected the package of practical expedients provided by ASU 2016-02
II-144
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
that allows prior determinations of whether existing contracts are, or contain, leases and the classification of existing leases to
continue without reassessment. Additionally, Mississippi Power applied the use-of-hindsight practical expedient in determining
lease terms as of the date of adoption and elected the practical expedient that allows existing land easements not previously
accounted for as leases not to be reassessed. Mississippi Power also made accounting policy elections to account for short-term
leases in all asset classes as off-balance sheet leases and combined lease and non-lease components in the computations of lease
obligations and right-of-use assets for most asset classes.
Mississippi Power completed the implementation of a new application to track and account for its leases and updated its internal
controls and accounting policies to support the accounting for leases under ASU 2016-02. Mississippi Power completed its lease
inventory and determined its most significant leases involve equipment and railcar leases. In the first quarter 2019, adoption of
ASU 2016-02 did not have a material impact on Mississippi Power's balance sheet or statement of income.
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY
Overview
Earnings for all periods presented were negatively affected by charges associated with the Kemper IGCC. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Kemper County Energy Facility" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements for additional
information.
Mississippi Power's financial condition remained stable at December 31, 2018. Mississippi Power's cash requirements primarily
consist of funding ongoing operations, common stock dividends, capital expenditures, and debt maturities. Capital expenditures and
other investing activities include investments to maintain existing generation facilities, to comply with environmental regulations
including adding environmental modifications to certain existing generating units and closures of ash ponds, to expand and improve
transmission and distribution facilities, and for restoration following major storms. Operating cash flows provide a substantial
portion of Mississippi Power's cash needs. For the three-year period from 2019 through 2021, Mississippi Power's projected
common stock dividends, capital expenditures, and debt maturities are expected to exceed operating cash flows. Mississippi Power
plans to finance future cash needs in excess of its operating cash flows primarily through external securities issuances, borrowings
from financial institutions, including commercial paper to the extent Mississippi Power is eligible to participate, and equity
contributions from Southern Company. Mississippi Power intends to continue to monitor its access to short-term and long-term
capital markets as well as its bank credit arrangements to meet future capital and liquidity needs. See "Sources of Capital,"
"Financing Activities," and "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein for additional information.
Mississippi Power's investments in the qualified pension plan decreased in value as of December 31, 2018 as compared to
December 31, 2017. No contributions to the qualified pension plan were made for the year ended December 31, 2018 and no
mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan are anticipated during 2019. See Note 11 to the financial statements under
"Pension Plans" for additional information.
Net cash provided from operating activities totaled $804 million for 2018, an increase of $301 million as compared to 2017. The
increase in cash provided from operating activities in 2018 was primarily related to increased income tax refunds in 2018 primarily
related to the tax abandonment of the Kemper IGCC. Net cash provided from operating activities totaled $503 million for 2017, an
increase of $274 million as compared to 2016. The increase in cash provided from operating activities in 2017 was primarily due to
tax refunds associated with the Section 174 R&E settlement, largely offset by a decrease in income taxes related to the Kemper
County energy facility and the Tax Reform Legislation.
Net cash used for investing activities in 2018, 2017, and 2016 totaled $232 million, $504 million, and $697 million, respectively.
The cash used for investing activities in 2018 was primarily due to gross property additions related to other production, distribution,
transmission, and steam production. The cash used for investing activities in 2017 and 2016 was primarily due to gross property
additions related to the Kemper County energy facility. The cash used for investing activities in 2016 was partially offset by the
receipt of Additional DOE Grants.
Net cash used for financing activities totaled $527 million in 2018 primarily due to redemption of preferred stock, long-term debt,
short-term borrowings, and senior notes, partially offset by the issuance of senior notes and short-term borrowings. Net cash
provided from financing activities totaled $25 million in 2017 primarily from capital contributions from Southern Company, largely
offset by redemptions of long-term debt and short-term borrowings. Net cash provided from financing activities totaled $594
million in 2016 primarily due to long-term debt financings and capital contributions from Southern Company, partially offset by a
decrease in short-term borrowings and redemptions of long-term debt.
Significant balance sheet changes in 2018 included increases of $442 million in long-term debt primarily due to the issuance of
senior notes, a net change of $475 million in accumulated deferred income taxes primarily due to the tax abandonment of the
II-145
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Kemper IGCC, and a decrease of $949 million in securities due within one year primarily due to the repayment of a $900 million
unsecured term loan. See "Financing Activities" herein and Notes 8 and 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Mississippi Power's ratio of common equity to total capitalization plus short-term debt was 50% and 39% at December 31, 2018
and 2017, respectively. The increase was primarily due to repayment of debt obligations in 2018. See Note 8 to the financial
statements for additional information.
Sources of Capital
Mississippi Power plans to obtain the funds to meet its future capital needs from operating cash flows, external securities issuances,
borrowings from financial institutions, including commercial paper to the extent Mississippi Power is eligible to participate, and
equity contributions from Southern Company. However, the amount, type, and timing of any future financing, if needed, will
depend upon prevailing market conditions, regulatory approval, and other factors.
The issuance of securities by Mississippi Power is subject to regulatory approval by the FERC. Additionally, with respect to the
public offering of securities, Mississippi Power files registration statements with the SEC under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended. The amounts of securities authorized by the FERC, as well as the securities registered under the Securities Act of 1933,
as amended, are continuously monitored and appropriate filings are made to ensure flexibility in raising capital. Any future
financing through secured debt would also require approval by the Mississippi PSC.
Mississippi Power obtains financing separately without credit support from any affiliate. See Note 8 to the financial statements
under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information. The Southern Company system does not maintain a centralized cash
or money pool. Therefore, funds of Mississippi Power are not commingled with funds of any other company in the Southern
Company system.
Mississippi Power's current liabilities sometimes exceed current assets because of long-term debt maturities and the periodic use of
short-term debt as a funding source, as well as significant seasonal fluctuations in cash needs. At December 31, 2018, Mississippi
Power had approximately $293 million of cash and cash equivalents. Committed credit arrangements with banks at December 31,
2018 were $100 million, all of which is unused. In October 2018, Mississippi Power amended its one-year credit arrangements in
an aggregate amount of $100 million to extend the maturity dates from 2018 to 2019.
See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information.
All of these bank credit arrangements contain covenants that limit debt levels and typically contain cross acceleration provisions to
other indebtedness (including guarantee obligations) of Mississippi Power. Such cross-acceleration provisions to other indebtedness
would trigger an event of default if Mississippi Power defaulted on indebtedness, the payment of which was then accelerated. At
December 31, 2018, Mississippi Power was in compliance with all such covenants. None of the bank credit arrangements contain
material adverse change clauses at the time of borrowing.
Subject to applicable market conditions, Mississippi Power expects to renew or replace its credit arrangements as needed, prior to
expiration. In connection therewith, Mississippi Power may extend the maturity dates and/or increase or decrease the lending
commitments thereunder.
A portion of the $100 million unused credit arrangements with banks is allocated to provide liquidity support to Mississippi Power's
revenue bonds. The amount of variable rate revenue bonds outstanding requiring liquidity support at December 31, 2018 was
approximately $40 million.
Short-term borrowings are included in notes payable in the balance sheets. Details of short-term borrowing were as follows:
 Short-term Debt at the End of
the Period Short-term Debt During the Period (*)
 Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest
RateAverage
Outstanding Weighted
Average
Interest
Rate  Maximum
Amount
Outstanding
 (in millions)  (in millions)   (in millions)
December 31, 2018 $ — —% $ 68 2.0% $ 300
December 31, 2017 $ 4 3.8% $ 18 3.0% $ 36
December 31, 2016 $ 23 2.6% $ 112 2.0% $ 500
(*)Average and maximum amounts are based upon daily balances during the 12-month periods ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016.
II-146
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Mississippi Power believes the need for working capital can be adequately met by utilizing lines of credit, short-term bank notes,
commercial paper to the extent Mississippi Power is eligible to participate, and operating cash flows.
Financing Activities
In March 2018, Mississippi Power issued $300 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2018A Floating Rate Senior Notes due
March 27, 2020 bearing interest based on three-month LIBOR and $300 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2018B 3.95%
Senior Notes due March 30, 2028. In March 2018, Mississippi Power also entered into a $300 million short-term floating rate bank
loan bearing interest based on one-month LIBOR, of which $200 million was repaid in the second quarter 2018 and $100 million
was repaid in the third quarter 2018. Mississippi Power used the proceeds from these financings to repay a $900 million unsecured
floating rate term loan.
In July 2018, Mississippi Power purchased and held approximately $43 million aggregate principal amount of Mississippi Business
Finance Corporation Pollution Control Revenue Refunding Bonds, Series 2002. Mississippi Power may reoffer these bonds to the
public at a later date.
In October 2018, Mississippi Power completed the redemption of all 334,210 outstanding shares of its preferred stock (as well as
related depositary shares), with an aggregate par value of approximately $33.4 million; all $30 million aggregate principal amount
outstanding of its Series G 5.40% Senior Notes due July 1, 2035; and all $125 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of its
Series 2009A 5.55% Senior Notes due March 1, 2019.
In December 2018, Southern Company made equity contributions totaling $17 million to Mississippi Power.
In addition to any financings that may be necessary to meet capital requirements and contractual obligations, Mississippi Power
plans, when economically feasible, to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with lower-cost capital if market
conditions permit.
Credit Rating Risk
At December 31, 2018, Mississippi Power does not have any credit arrangements that would require material changes in payment
schedules or terminations as a result of a credit rating downgrade.
On October 2, 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved executed agreements between Mississippi Power and its largest retail customer,
Chevron, for Mississippi Power to continue providing retail service to the Chevron refinery in Pascagoula, Mississippi through
2038. The agreements grant Chevron a security interest in the co-generation assets, with a net book value of approximately $101
million at December 31, 2018, located at the refinery that is exercisable upon the occurrence of (i) certain bankruptcy events or (ii)
other events of default coupled with specific reductions in steam output at the facility and a downgrade of Mississippi Power's
credit rating to below investment grade by two of the three rating agencies.
There are certain contracts that have required or could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of a credit rating
change to BBB and/or Baa2 or below. These contracts are for physical electricity purchases and sales, fuel transportation and
storage, energy price risk management, and transmission. At December 31, 2018, the maximum potential collateral requirements at
a rating below BBB- and/or Baa3 equaled approximately $283 million.
Included in these amounts are certain agreements that could require collateral in the event that either Alabama Power or Georgia
Power (affiliate companies of Mississippi Power) has a credit rating change to below investment grade. Generally, collateral may
be provided by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit, or cash. Additionally, a credit rating downgrade could impact the
ability of Mississippi Power to access capital markets and would be likely to impact the cost at which it does so.
On February 26, 2018, Moody's revised its rating outlook for Mississippi Power from stable to positive. On August 8, 2018,
Moody's upgraded Mississippi Power's senior unsecured rating to Baa3 from Ba1 and maintained the positive rating outlook.
On February 28, 2018, Fitch removed Mississippi Power from rating watch negative and revised its rating outlook from stable to
positive.
On March 14, 2018, S&P upgraded the senior unsecured long-term debt rating of Mississippi Power to A- from BBB+. The outlook
remained negative.
As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, certain financial metrics, such as the funds from operations to debt percentage, used by
the credit rating agencies to assess Southern Company and its subsidiaries, including Mississippi Power, may be negatively
impacted. The PEP Settlement Agreement is expected to help mitigate these potential adverse impacts by allowing Mississippi
Power to retain the excess deferred taxes resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation until the conclusion of the Mississippi Power
2019 Base Rate Case. In addition, Mississippi Power has committed to seek equity contributions sufficient to restore its equity ratio
to the 50% target. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Mississippi Power" for additional information.
II-147
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Market Price Risk
Due to cost-based rate regulation and other various cost recovery mechanisms, Mississippi Power continues to have limited
exposure to market volatility in interest rates, commodity fuel prices, and prices of electricity. To manage the volatility attributable
to these exposures, Mississippi Power nets the exposures, where possible, to take advantage of natural offsets and enters into
various derivative transactions for the remaining exposures pursuant to Mississippi Power's policies in areas such as counterparty
exposure and risk management practices. Mississippi Power's policy is that derivatives are to be used primarily for hedging
purposes and mandates strict adherence to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative positions are monitored using
techniques that include, but are not limited to, market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity analysis.
To mitigate future exposure to a change in interest rates, Mississippi Power may enter into derivatives that have been designated as
hedges. The weighted average interest rate on $340 million of long-term variable interest rate exposure at December 31, 2018 was
3.32%. If Mississippi Power sustained a 100 basis point change in interest rates for all long-term variable interest rate exposure, the
change would have an immaterial effect on annualized interest expense at December 31, 2018. See Note 1 to the financial
statements under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
To mitigate residual risks relative to movements in electricity prices, Mississippi Power enters into physical fixed-price contracts
for the purchase and sale of electricity through the wholesale electricity market and, to a lesser extent, financial hedge contracts for
natural gas purchases. Mississippi Power continues to manage retail fuel-hedging programs implemented per the guidelines of the
Mississippi PSC and wholesale fuel-hedging programs under agreements with wholesale customers. Mississippi Power had no
material change in market risk exposure for the year ended December 31, 2018 when compared to the year ended December 31,
2017.
The changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts are substantially attributable to both the volume and the price of
natural gas. For the years ended December 31, the changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts, the majority of
which are composed of regulatory hedges, were as follows:
 2018
Changes 2017
Changes
 Fair Value
 (in millions)
Contracts outstanding at the beginning of the period, assets (liabilities), net $ (7) $ (7)
Contracts realized or settled 3 8
Current period changes(*)(2) (8)
Contracts outstanding at the end of the period, assets (liabilities), net $ (6) $ (7)
(*)Current period changes also include the changes in fair value of new contracts entered into during the period, if any.
The net hedge volumes of energy-related derivative contracts at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows:
 2018  2017
 mmBtu Volume
 (in millions)
Natural gas options 3 —
Natural gas swaps 60 53
Total hedge volume 63 53
For natural gas hedges, the weighted average swap contract cost above market prices was approximately $0.10 per mmBtu at
December 31, 2018 and $0.14 per mmBtu at December 31, 2017. The options outstanding were immaterial for the reporting
periods presented. The costs associated with natural gas hedges are recovered through Mississippi Power's ECM clause.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, substantially all of Mississippi Power's energy-related derivative contracts were designated as
regulatory hedges and were related to Mississippi Power's fuel-hedging program. Therefore, gains and losses are initially recorded
as regulatory liabilities and assets, respectively, and then are included in fuel expense as they are recovered through the ECM
clause.
II-148
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Mississippi Power uses over-the-counter contracts that are not exchange traded but are fair valued using prices which are market
observable, and thus fall into Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. See Note 13 to the financial statements for further discussion of
fair value measurements. The maturities of the energy-related derivative contracts, which are all Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy,
at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements
December 31, 2018
 Total  Maturity
 Fair Value Year 1 Years 2&3 
 (in millions)
Level 1 $ — $ — $ —
Level 2 (6) (2) (4)
Level 3 — — —
Fair value of contracts outstanding at end of period $ (6) $ (2) $ (4)
Mississippi Power is exposed to market price risk in the event of nonperformance by counterparties to the energy-related derivative
contracts. Mississippi Power only enters into agreements and material transactions with counterparties that have investment grade
credit ratings by Moody's and S&P or with counterparties who have posted collateral to cover potential credit exposure. Therefore,
Mississippi Power does not anticipate market risk exposure from nonperformance by the counterparties. For additional information,
see Note 1 to the financial statements under "Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements.
Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations
The construction program of Mississippi Power is currently estimated to total $222 million for 2019, $230 million for 2020, $216
million for 2021, $220 million for 2022, and $184 million for 2023. The construction program includes capital expenditures
covered under LTSAs. Estimated capital expenditures to comply with environmental laws and regulations included in these
amounts are $18 million, $20 million, $17 million, $5 million, and $13 million for 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023, respectively.
These estimated expenditures do not include any potential compliance costs associated with pending regulation of CO2 emissions
from fossil fuel-fired electric generating units. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters –
Environmental Laws and Regulations" and "– Global Climate Issues" herein for additional information.
Mississippi Power also anticipates costs associated with closure and monitoring of ash ponds in accordance with the CCR Rule,
which are reflected in Mississippi Power's ARO liabilities. These costs, which are expected to change and could change materially
as underlying assumptions are refined and the cost and the method and timing of compliance activities continue to be evaluated, are
currently estimated to be $9 million, $9 million, $12 million, $14 million, and $15 million for the years 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022,
and 2023, respectively. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations
– Coal Combustion Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
The construction program is subject to periodic review and revision, and actual construction costs may vary from these estimates
because of numerous factors. These factors include: changes in business conditions; changes in load projections; storm impacts;
changes in environmental laws and regulations; the outcome of any legal challenges to environmental rules; changes in generating
plants, including unit retirements and replacements and adding or changing fuel sources at existing electric generating units, to
meet regulatory requirements; changes in FERC rules and regulations; Mississippi PSC approvals; changes in the expected
environmental compliance program; changes in legislation; the cost and efficiency of construction labor, equipment, and materials;
project scope and design changes; and the cost of capital. In addition, there can be no assurance that costs related to capital
expenditures will be fully recovered.
In addition, as discussed in Note 11 to the financial statements, Mississippi Power provides postretirement benefits to substantially
all employees and funds trusts to the extent required by the FERC.
Funding requirements related to obligations associated with scheduled maturities of long-term debt, as well as the related interest,
derivative obligations, pension and other post-retirement benefit plans, leases, other purchase commitments, and ARO settlements
are detailed in the contractual obligations table that follows. See Notes 1, 6, 8, 9, 11, and 14 to the financial statements for
additional information.
II-149
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Contractual Obligations
Contractual obligations at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 20192020-
20212022-
2023After
2023 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt(a) —  
Principal $ — $ 577 $ — $ 983 $ 1,560
Interest 70 130 80 577 857
Financial derivative obligations(b)3 5 — — 8
Operating leases(c)3 3 2 2 10
Purchase commitments —  
Capital(d)222 410 352 — 984
Fuel(e)378 368 199 136 1,081
Long-term service agreements(f)27 57 70 250 404
Purchased power(g)11 35 36 435 517
ARO settlements(h)9 21 29 — 59
Pension and other postretirement benefits plans(i)8 15 — — 23
Total $ 731 $ 1,621 $ 768 $ 2,383 $ 5,503
(a)All amounts are reflected based on final maturity dates. Mississippi Power plans to continue, when economically feasible, to retire higher-cost securities and
replace these obligations with lower-cost capital if market conditions permit. Variable rate interest obligations are estimated based on rates at December 31,
2018, as reflected in the statements of capitalization. Fixed rates include, where applicable, the effects of interest rate derivatives employed to manage interest
rate risk. For additional information, see Note 8 to the financial statements.
(b)Derivative obligations are for energy-related derivatives. For additional information, see Notes 1 and 14 to the financial statements.
(c)See Note 9 to the financial statements for additional information.
(d)Mississippi Power provides estimated capital expenditures for a five-year period, including capital expenditures associated with environmental regulations. At
December 31, 2018, significant purchase commitments were outstanding in connection with the construction program. These amounts exclude capital
expenditures covered under LTSAs and estimated capital expenditures for AROs, which are reflected separately. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Environmental Matters" for additional information.
(e)Includes commitments to purchase coal and natural gas, as well as the related transportation and storage. In most cases, these contracts contain provisions for
price escalation, minimum purchase levels, and other financial commitments. Natural gas purchase commitments are based on various indices at the time of
delivery. Amounts reflected for natural gas purchase commitments have been estimated based on the NYMEX future prices at December 31, 2018.
(f)LTSAs include price escalation based on inflation indices.
(g)Estimated minimum long-term commitments for the purchase of solar energy. Energy costs associated with solar PPAs are recovered through the fuel clause.
See Notes 2 and 9 to the financial statements for additional information.
(h)Represents estimated costs for a five-year period associated with closing and monitoring ash ponds in accordance with the CCR Rule, which are reflected in
Mississippi Power's ARO liabilities. Material expenditures in future years for ARO settlements also will be required for ash ponds and other liabilities reflected
in Mississippi Power's AROs. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Environmental Matters – Environmental Laws and Regulations – Coal Combustion
Residuals" herein and Note 6 to the financial statements for additional information.
(i)Mississippi Power forecasts contributions to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans over a three-year period. Mississippi Power anticipates no
mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan during the next three years. Amounts presented represent estimated benefit payments for the nonqualified
pension plans, estimated non-trust benefit payments for the other postretirement benefit plans, and estimated contributions to the other postretirement benefit
plan trusts, all of which will be made from Mississippi Power's corporate assets. See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information related to the
pension and other postretirement benefit plans, including estimated benefit payments. Certain benefit payments will be made through the related benefit plans.
Other benefit payments will be made from Mississippi Power's corporate assets.
II-150
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
OVERVIEW
Business Activities
Southern Power develops, constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy projects,
and sells electricity at market-based rates in the wholesale market. Southern Power continually seeks opportunities to execute its
strategy to create value through various transactions including acquisitions, dispositions, and sales of partnership interests,
development and construction of new generating facilities, and entry into PPAs primarily with investor-owned utilities, IPPs,
municipalities, electric cooperatives, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial customers. In general,
Southern Power commits to the construction or acquisition of new generating capacity only after entering into or assuming long-
term PPAs for the new facilities.
During 2018, Southern Power acquired and placed in service the 20-MW Gaskell West 1 solar facility, placed in service the 148-
MW Cactus Flats wind facility, acquired and began construction of the 100-MW Wild Horse Mountain and the 200-MW Reading
wind facilities, and continued construction of the expansion of the 385-MW Mankato natural gas facility. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Acquisitions" and "Construction Projects" herein for additional information.
Also during 2018, Southern Power completed the following sales of noncontrolling interests and sales of assets resulting in
approximately $2.6 billion in proceeds:
•On May 22, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership indirectly
owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, for approximately $1.2 billion.
•On December 4, 2018, Southern Power sold all of its equity interests in Plant Oleander and Plant Stanton Unit A (together,
the Florida Plants) to NextEra Energy for $203 million.
•On December 11, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, a holding company owning
a portfolio of eight operating wind facilities, for approximately $1.2 billion.
In addition, on November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement to sell all of its equity interests in Plant Mankato
(including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction) for an aggregate purchase price of approximately $650 million.
The completion of the disposition is subject to the expansion unit reaching commercial operation as well as various other
customary conditions to closing, including FERC and state commission approvals, and the sale is expected to close mid-2019. The
ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
At December 31, 2018, Southern Power's generation fleet, which is owned in part with its various partners, totaled 11,888 MWs of
nameplate capacity in commercial operation (including 4,508 MWs of nameplate capacity owned by its subsidiaries and including
Plant Mankato, which is classified as held for sale in the financial statements). The average remaining duration of Southern Power's
total portfolio of wholesale contracts is approximately 14 years, which reduces remarketing risk for Southern Power. With the
inclusion of the PPAs and investments associated with renewable and natural gas facilities currently under construction, Southern
Power has an average investment coverage ratio, at December 31, 2018, of 93% through 2023 and 91% through 2028 (including
Plant Mankato, which is classified as held for sale in the financial statements).
Southern Power's future earnings will be materially decreased as a result of the asset and non-controlling interest sales described
above. In addition, Southern Power's future earnings will depend on the parameters of the wholesale market and the efficient
operation of its wholesale generating assets, as well as Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy and to develop and
construct generating facilities. In addition, Southern Power's future earnings may be impacted by the availability of federal and
state solar ITCs and wind PTCs on its renewable energy projects, which could be impacted by future tax legislation. See FUTURE
EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "General," "Acquisitions," "Construction Projects," and "Income Tax Matters" herein and Notes 10
and 15 to the financial statements for additional information.
To evaluate operating results and to ensure Southern Power's ability to meet its contractual commitments to customers, Southern
Power continues to focus on several key performance indicators, including, but not limited to, peak season equivalent forced outage
rate, contract availability, and net income.
See RESULTS OF OPERATIONS herein for information on Southern Power's financial performance.
Earnings
Southern Power's 2018 net income was $187 million, an $884 million decrease from 2017, primarily attributable to $743 million of
tax benefits recognized in 2017 and $79 million in tax expense recognized in 2018, both related to the Tax Reform Legislation.
Also contributing to the decrease were asset impairment charges in 2018 totaling $156 million ($120 million pre-tax for the
II-151
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Florida Plants and $36 million pre-tax for turbine equipment held for development projects, which together totaled $117 million
after tax), partially offset by approximately $65 million in state income tax benefits arising from reorganizations of legal entities
that own and operate certain of Southern Power's solar and wind facilities.
Southern Power's 2017 net income was $1.1 billion, a $733 million increase from 2016, primarily attributable to $743 million in tax
benefits recognized in 2017 related to the Tax Reform Legislation. Also contributing to the change were increases in operating
expenses and interest expense related to Southern Power's growth strategy and continuous construction program, largely offset by
increased renewable energy sales.
In addition, tax benefits from wind PTCs significantly impacted Southern Power's net income in 2018 and 2017. Tax benefits from
solar ITCs related to the acquisition and construction of new facilities also significantly impacted Southern Power's net income in
2017 and 2016. See Note 10 to the financial statements under "Effective Tax Rate" for additional information.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
A condensed statement of income follows:
 AmountIncrease (Decrease)
from Prior Year
 2018 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 2,205 $ 130 $ 498
Fuel 699 78 165
Purchased power 176 27 47
Other operations and maintenance 395 9 32
Depreciation and amortization 493 (10) 151
Taxes other than income taxes 46 (2) 25
Asset impairment 156 156 —
Gain on disposition (2) (2) —
Total operating expenses 1,963 256 420
Operating income 242 (126) 78
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 183 (8) 74
Other income (expense), net 23 22 (5)
Income taxes (benefit) (164) 775 (744)
Net income 246 (871) 743
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 59 13 10
Net income attributable to Southern Power $ 187 $ (884) $ 733
Operating Revenues
Total operating revenues include PPA capacity revenues, which are derived primarily from long-term contracts involving natural
gas and biomass generating facilities, and PPA energy revenues from Southern Power's generation facilities. To the extent Southern
Power has capacity not contracted under a PPA, it may sell power into an accessible wholesale market, or, to the extent those
generation assets are part of the FERC-approved IIC, it may sell power into the power pool.
Natural Gas and Biomass Capacity and Energy Revenue
Capacity revenues generally represent the greatest contribution to operating income and are designed to provide recovery of fixed
costs plus a return on investment.
Energy is generally sold at variable cost or is indexed to published natural gas indices. Energy revenues will vary depending on the
energy demand of Southern Power's customers and their generation capacity, as well as the market prices of wholesale energy
compared to the cost of Southern Power's energy. Energy revenues also include fees for support services, fuel storage, and unit start
charges. Increases and decreases in energy revenues under PPAs that are driven by fuel or purchased power prices are accompanied
by an increase or decrease in fuel and purchased power costs and do not have a significant impact on net income.
II-152
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Solar and Wind Energy Revenue
Southern Power's energy sales from solar and wind generating facilities are predominantly through long-term PPAs that do not have
a capacity charge. Customers either purchase the energy output of a dedicated renewable facility through an energy charge or pay a
fixed price related to the energy generated from the respective facility and sold to the grid. As a result, Southern Power's ability to
recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance expenses is dependent upon the level of energy generated from these
facilities, which can be impacted by weather conditions, equipment performance, transmission constraints, and other factors.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Power Sales Agreements" herein for additional information regarding Southern
Power's PPAs.
Details of Southern Power's operating revenues were as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
  (in millions)
PPA capacity revenues $ 580 $ 599 $ 541
PPA energy revenues 1,140 970 694
Total PPA revenues 1,720 1,569 1,235
Non-PPA revenues 472 494 330
Other revenues 13 12 12
Total operating revenues $ 2,205 $ 2,075 $ 1,577
Operating revenues for 2018 were $2.2 billion, reflecting a $130 million, or 6%, increase from 2017. The increase in operating
revenues was primarily due to the following:
•PPA capacity revenues decreased $19 million, or 3%, primarily due to decreases of $16 million from the contractual expiration
of an affiliate natural gas PPA and $5 million from the Florida Plants sold in December 2018.
•PPA energy revenues increased $170 million, or 18%, primarily due to a $142 million increase in sales related to existing
natural gas facilities driven by an $88 million increase in the average cost of fuel and a $54 million increase in the volume of
KWHs sold due to customer load, a $12 million increase related to PPAs associated with new renewable facilities, and a $16
million increase related to PPAs associated with existing renewable facilities primarily due to an increase in the volume of
KWHs sold.
•Non-PPA revenues decreased $22 million, or 4%, primarily due to a $56 million decrease in the volume of KWHs sold from
uncovered natural gas capacity through short-term sales, partially offset by a $35 million increase in the market price of energy.
Operating revenues for 2017 were $2.1 billion, reflecting a $498 million, or 32%, increase from 2016. The increase in operating
revenues was primarily due to the following:
•PPA capacity revenues increased $58 million, or 11%, primarily due to additional customer capacity requirements and a new
PPA related to Plant Mankato acquired in late 2016.
•PPA energy revenues increased $276 million, or 40%, primarily due to a $213 million increase in renewable energy sales arising
from new solar and wind facilities and a $50 million increase in sales related to existing natural gas PPAs primarily due to an
$85 million increase in the average cost of fuel, partially offset by a $35 million decrease in the volume of KWHs sold primarily
due to reduced customer load.
•Non-PPA revenues increased $164 million, or 50%, primarily due to a $156 million increase in the volume of KWHs sold
primarily from uncovered natural gas capacity through short-term opportunity sales, as well as an $8 million increase in the
market price of energy.
II-153
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Fuel and Purchased Power Expenses
Details of Southern Power's generation and purchased power were as follows:
Total
KWHsTotal KWH
% ChangeTotal
KWHsTotal KWH
% Change
2018 2017  
(in billions of KWHs)
Generation 46 44  
Purchased power 4 5  
Total generation and purchased power 50 2% 49 23%
Total generation and purchased power, excluding solar, wind, and tolling
agreements 29 4% 28 22%
Southern Power's PPAs for natural gas and biomass generation generally provide that the purchasers are responsible for either
procuring the fuel (tolling agreements) or reimbursing Southern Power for substantially all of the cost of fuel relating to the energy
delivered under such PPAs. Consequently, changes in such fuel costs are generally accompanied by a corresponding change in
related fuel revenues and do not have a significant impact on net income. Southern Power is responsible for the cost of fuel for
generating units that are not covered under PPAs. Power from these generating units is sold into the wholesale market or into the
power pool for capacity owned directly by Southern Power.
Purchased power expenses will vary depending on demand, availability, and the cost of generating resources throughout the
Southern Company system and other contract resources. Load requirements are submitted to the power pool on an hourly basis and
are fulfilled with the lowest cost alternative, whether that is generation owned by Southern Power, an affiliate company, or external
parties. Such purchased power costs are generally recovered through PPA revenues.
Details of Southern Power's fuel and purchased power expenses were as follows:
 2018  2017  2016
  (in millions) 
Fuel $ 699 $ 621 $ 456
Purchased power 176 149 102
Total fuel and purchased power expenses $ 875 $ 770 $ 558
In 2018, total fuel and purchased power expenses increased $105 million, or 14%, compared to 2017. Fuel expense increased $78
million, or 13%, primarily due to a $60 million increase associated with the volume of KWHs generated, excluding solar, wind, and
tolling agreements, primarily due to customer load, and an $18 million increase associated with the average cost of natural gas per
KWH generated. Purchased power expense increased $27 million, or 18%, primarily due to a $43 million increase associated with
the average cost of purchased power, primarily in the first quarter 2018, partially offset by a $16 million decrease associated with
the volume of KWHs purchased.
In 2017, total fuel and purchased power expenses increased $212 million, or 38%, compared to 2016. Fuel expense increased $165
million, or 36%, primarily due to an $83 million increase associated with the volume of KWHs generated, excluding solar, wind,
and tolling agreements, and an $82 million increase associated with the average cost of natural gas per KWH generated. Purchased
power expense increased $47 million, or 46%, primarily due to a $37 million increase associated with the volume of KWHs
purchased and an $11 million increase associated with the average cost of purchased power.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
In 2018, other operations and maintenance expenses increased $9 million, or 2%, compared to 2017. The increase was primarily
due to scheduled outage and maintenance expenses. In 2017, other operations and maintenance expenses increased $32 million, or
9%, compared to 2016. The increase was primarily due to increases of $56 million associated with new facilities, $21 million in
business development and support expenses, and $6 million in employee compensation, all associated with Southern Power's
overall growth. These 2017 increases were partially offset by decreases of $35 million associated with scheduled outage and
maintenance expenses and $15 million in non-outage operations and maintenance expenses.
II-154
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Depreciation and Amortization
In 2018, depreciation and amortization decreased $10 million, or 2%, compared to 2017, primarily due to the cessation of
depreciation on the Florida Plants and Plant Mankato that were classified as held for sale in May and November 2018, respectively.
In 2017, depreciation and amortization increased $151 million, or 43%, compared to 2016, primarily due to additional depreciation
related to new solar, wind, and natural gas facilities placed in service. See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Depreciation
and Amortization – Southern Power" and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" and "Assets Held for Sale"
for additional information.
Taxes Other Than Income Taxes
In 2018, taxes other than income taxes decreased $2 million, or 4%, compared to 2017. In 2017, taxes other than income taxes were
$48 million compared to $23 million in 2016, primarily due to additional property taxes on new facilities.
Asset Impairment
In 2018, asset impairment charges were $156 million. In the second quarter 2018, a $119 million asset impairment charge was
recorded in contemplation of the sale of the Florida Plants. In addition, in the third quarter 2018, a $36 million asset impairment
charge was recorded on wind turbine equipment held for development projects. There were no asset impairment charges recorded
in 2017 or 2016. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" and " –
Development Projects" for additional information.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
In 2018, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized decreased $8 million, or 4%, compared to 2017. The decrease was primarily
due to an increase in capitalized interest associated with construction projects. In 2017, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized
increased $74 million, or 63%, compared to 2016. The increase was primarily due to an increase of $44 million in interest expense
related to an increase in average outstanding long-term debt, primarily to fund Southern Power's growth strategy and continuous
construction program, as well as a $30 million decrease in capitalized interest associated with completing construction of and
placing in service solar facilities.
Other Income (Expense), Net
In 2018, other income (expense), net increased $22 million compared to 2017 primarily due to a $14 million gain from a joint-
development wind project, which is attributable to Southern Power's partner in the project and fully offset within noncontrolling
interests. In 2017, other income (expense), net decreased $5 million compared to 2016.
Income Taxes (Benefit)
In 2018, income tax benefit was $164 million compared to $939 million for 2017, a decrease of $775 million, primarily attributable
to a $743 million tax benefit in 2017 and a $79 million tax expense in 2018, both related to the remeasurement of accumulated
deferred income taxes in accordance with the Tax Reform Legislation. In addition, income tax benefits associated with solar ITCs
decreased by $58 million as a result of fewer solar facilities being placed in service in 2018 as compared to 2017. These decreases
were partially offset by $65 million of income tax benefits related to certain changes in state apportionment rates arising from
reorganizations of Southern Power's legal entities that own and operate certain of its solar and wind facilities and a decrease of $47
million of income tax expense as a result of lower pre-tax earnings and the lower federal tax rate.
In 2017, income tax benefit was $939 million compared to $195 million for 2016 of which $743 million of the increase was related
to the Tax Reform Legislation. The remaining increase in tax benefit was primarily due to an increase of $89 million in PTCs from
wind generation in 2017 and other state income taxes, significantly offset by a decrease in tax benefits associated with lower ITCs
from solar facilities placed in service.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters – Federal Tax Reform Legislation" herein and Notes 1 and 10 to
the financial statements under "Income and Other Taxes" and "Effective Tax Rate," respectively, for additional information.
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
In 2018, net income attributable to noncontrolling interests increased $13 million, or 28%, compared to 2017. The increase was
primarily due to $20 million of net income allocations due to the sale of a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar and $14
million of other income allocations attributable to a joint-development wind project, partially offset by a reduction of $19 million
due to HLBV income allocations between Southern Power and tax equity partners for partnerships entered into during 2018. In
II-155
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
2017, noncontrolling interests increased $10 million, or 28%, compared to 2016 primarily due to additional net income allocations
from new solar partnerships.
Effects of Inflation
Southern Power is party to long-term contracts reflecting market-based rates, including inflation expectations. Any adverse effect of
inflation on Southern Power's results of operations has not been substantial in recent years.
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
General
The results of operations for the past three years are not necessarily indicative of Southern Power's future earnings potential.
Southern Power completed multiple sales of noncontrolling interests and assets in 2018 as described below. These sales will
materially decrease future earnings and cash flows to Southern Power. See below for a summary of the 2018 disposition activity.
The level of Southern Power's future earnings also depends on numerous factors that affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks
of Southern Power's competitive wholesale business. These factors include: Southern Power's ability to achieve sales growth while
containing costs; regulatory matters; creditworthiness of customers; total generating capacity available in Southern Power's market
areas; the successful remarketing of capacity as current contracts expire; and Southern Power's ability to execute its growth strategy
through the development or acquisition of renewable facilities and other energy projects.
On May 22, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership
indirectly owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, to Global Atlantic Financial Group Limited (Global Atlantic)
for an aggregate purchase price of approximately $1.2 billion. Accordingly, Global Atlantic will receive 33% of all cash
distributions paid by SP Solar. Southern Power continues to consolidate the assets and liabilities of SP Solar with Global Atlantic's
share of partnership earnings included in net income attributable to noncontrolling interests in the consolidated statements of
income, which was $20 million for the period from May 22, 2018 to December 31, 2018.
Southern Power completed the sale of all of its equity interests in the Florida Plants to NextEra Energy on December 4, 2018, for
an aggregate purchase price of $203 million. Pre-tax net income for the Florida Plants was $49 million and $37 million for the
period from January 1, 2018 to December 4, 2018 and for the year ended December 31, 2017, respectively.
On December 11, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, which owns a
portfolio of eight operating wind facilities, to three financial investors, for approximately $1.2 billion. The tax equity investors
together will generally receive 40% of the cash distributions from available cash and will receive a 99% allocation of tax attributes,
including PTCs. Southern Power continues to consolidate the assets and liabilities of SP Wind with the investors' shares of
partnership earnings reflected in net income attributable to noncontrolling interests in the consolidated statements of income.
On November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement with Northern States Power to sell all of its equity interests in
Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction) for an aggregate purchase price of approximately
$650 million. The completion of the disposition is subject to the expansion unit reaching commercial operation as well as various
other customary conditions to closing, including working capital and timing adjustments. Pre-tax net income for Plant Mankato was
immaterial for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017. This transaction is subject to FERC and state commission approvals
and is expected to close mid-2019. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Demand for electricity is primarily driven by the pace of economic growth that may be affected by changes in regional and global
economic conditions, as well as renewable portfolio standards, which may impact future earnings. Other factors that could
influence future earnings include weather, transmission constraints, cost of generation from units within the power pool, and
operational limitations.
Power Sales Agreements
General
Southern Power has PPAs with some of Southern Company's traditional electric operating companies, other investor-owned
utilities, IPPs, municipalities, and other load-serving entities, as well as commercial and industrial customers. The PPAs are
expected to provide Southern Power with a stable source of revenue during their respective terms.
Many of Southern Power's PPAs have provisions that require Southern Power or the counterparty to post collateral or an acceptable
substitute guarantee in the event that S&P or Moody's downgrades the credit ratings of the respective company to an unacceptable
credit rating or if the counterparty is not rated or fails to maintain a minimum coverage ratio.
II-156
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
On January 29, 2019, Pacific Gas & Electric Company (PG&E) filed petitions to reorganize under Chapter 11 of the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code. Southern Power, together with its noncontrolling partners, owns four solar facilities where PG&E is the energy
off-taker for approximately 207 MWs of capacity under long-term PPAs. PG&E is also the transmission provider for these facilities
and two of Southern Power's other solar facilities. Southern Power has evaluated the recoverability of its investments in these solar
facilities under various scenarios, including selling the related energy into the competitive markets, and has concluded they are not
impaired. At December 31, 2018, Southern Power had outstanding accounts receivables due from PG&E of $1 million related to
the PPAs and $36 million related to the transmission interconnections (of which $17 million is classified in other deferred charges
and assets). Southern Power does not expect a material impact to its financial statements if, as a result of the bankruptcy
proceedings, PG&E does not perform in accordance with the PPAs or the terms of the PPAs are renegotiated; however, the ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Power is working to maintain and expand its share of the wholesale markets. Southern Power expects there to be new
demand for capacity that will develop in the 2019-2021 timeframe. The amount of available demand and timing will vary across
the wholesale markets. Southern Power calculates an investment coverage ratio for its generating assets, which includes those
assets owned in part with its various partners, based on the ratio of investment under contract to total investment using the
respective generation facilities' net book value (or expected in-service value for facilities under construction) as the investment
amount. With the inclusion of investments associated with the wind and natural gas facilities currently under construction, as well
as other capacity and energy contracts, Southern Power has an average investment coverage ratio of 93% through 2023 and 91%
through 2028, with an average remaining contract duration of approximately 14 years (including Plant Mankato, which is classified
as held for sale in the financial statements). See "Acquisitions" and "Construction Projects" herein for additional information.
Natural Gas and Biomass
Southern Power's electricity sales from natural gas and biomass generating units are primarily through long-term PPAs that consist
of two types of agreements. The first type, referred to as a unit or block sale, is a customer purchase from a dedicated generating
unit where all or a portion of the generation from that unit is reserved for that customer. Southern Power typically has the ability to
serve the unit or block sale customer from an alternate resource. The second type, referred to as requirements service, provides that
Southern Power serve the customer's capacity and energy requirements from a combination of the customer's own generating units
and from Southern Power resources not dedicated to serve unit or block sales. Southern Power has rights to purchase power
provided by the requirements customers' resources when economically viable.
As a general matter, substantially all of the PPAs provide that the purchasers are responsible for either procuring the fuel (tolling
agreements) or reimbursing Southern Power for substantially all of the cost of fuel or purchased power relating to the energy
delivered under such PPAs. To the extent a particular generating facility does not meet the operational requirements contemplated
in the PPAs, Southern Power may be responsible for excess fuel costs. With respect to fuel transportation risk, most of Southern
Power's PPAs provide that the counterparties are responsible for the availability of fuel transportation to the particular generating
facility.
Capacity charges that form part of the PPA payments are designed to recover fixed and variable operation and maintenance costs
based on dollars-per-kilowatt year. In general, to reduce Southern Power's exposure to certain operation and maintenance costs,
Southern Power has LTSAs. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Long-Term Service Agreements" for additional
information.
Solar and Wind
Southern Power's electricity sales from solar and wind (renewables) generating facilities are also made pursuant to long-term PPAs;
however, these solar and wind PPAs do not have a capacity charge and customers either purchase the energy output of a dedicated
renewable facility through an energy charge or provide Southern Power a certain fixed price for the electricity sold to the grid. As a
result, Southern Power's ability to recover fixed and variable operations and maintenance expenses is dependent upon the level of
energy generated from these facilities, which can be impacted by weather conditions, equipment performance, transmission
constraints, and other factors. Generally, under the solar and wind generation PPAs, the purchasing party retains the right to keep or
resell the renewable energy credits.
Environmental Matters
Southern Power's operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and regulations
governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Southern Power maintains a comprehensive environmental
compliance strategy to assess upcoming requirements and compliance costs associated with these environmental laws and
regulations. The costs, including capital expenditures and operations and maintenance costs, required to comply with
II-157
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
environmental laws and regulations may impact results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition. Compliance costs may
result from the installation of additional environmental controls. The ultimate impact of the environmental laws and regulations
discussed below will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements, the availability and
cost of any deployed control technology, fuel prices, and the outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges.
New or revised environmental laws and regulations could affect many areas of Southern Power's operations. Southern Power's
PPAs generally contain provisions that permit charging the counterparty with some of the new costs incurred as a result of changes
in environmental laws and regulations.
Since Southern Power's units are newer natural gas and renewable generating facilities, costs associated with environmental
compliance for these facilities have been less significant than for similarly situated coal or older natural gas generating facilities.
Environmental, natural resource, and land use concerns, including the applicability of air quality limitations, the potential presence
of wetlands or threatened and endangered species, the availability of water withdrawal rights, uncertainties regarding aesthetic
impacts such as increased light or noise, and concerns about potential adverse health impacts, can, however, increase the cost of
siting and operating any type of future electric generating facility. The impact of such laws and regulations on Southern Power and
subsequent recovery through PPA provisions cannot be determined at this time.
Environmental Laws and Regulations
Air Quality
In 2011, the EPA finalized the Cross-State Air Pollution Rule (CSAPR) to address impacts of SO2 and NOX emissions from fossil
fuel-fired electric generating plants. CSAPR establishes emissions trading programs and budgets for certain states and allocates
emissions allowances for sources in those states. In 2016, the EPA published a final rule establishing more stringent ozone season
NOX emissions budgets in Alabama and Texas. The EPA also removed North Carolina from this particular CSAPR program.
Georgia's ozone season NOX emissions budget remained unchanged. Increases in either future fossil fuel-fired generation or the
availability or cost of CSAPR allowances could have a negative financial impact on results of operations for Southern Power.
Water Quality
In 2014, the EPA finalized requirements under Section 316(b) of the Clean Water Act (CWA) to regulate cooling water intake
structures (CWIS) to minimize their effects on fish and other aquatic life at existing power plants (e.g. coal, natural gas, oil, and
nuclear generating plants) and manufacturing facilities. The regulation requires plant-specific studies to determine applicable CWIS
changes to protect organisms that either get caught on the intake screens (impingement) or are drawn into the cooling system
(entrainment). Southern Power is conducting these studies and currently anticipates such changes will be limited to minor additions
of monitoring equipment at certain of its electric generating plants. However, the ultimate impact of this rule will depend on the
outcome of these plant-specific studies, any additional protective measures required to be incorporated into each plant's National
Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit based on site-specific factors, and the outcome of any legal challenges.
In 2015, the EPA and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers (Corps) jointly published a final rule that revised the regulatory definition
of waters of the United States (WOTUS) for all CWA programs. The rule significantly expanded the scope of federal jurisdiction
over waterbodies (such as rivers, streams, canals, and wastewater treatment ponds), which could impact new generation projects.
The EPA and the Corps are expected to publish a final rule in 2019 to replace the 2015 WOTUS definition. The impact of any
changes to the 2015 WOTUS rule will depend on the content of this final rule and the outcome of any legal challenges.
Global Climate Issues
On December 20, 2018, the EPA published a proposed review of the Standards of Performance for Greenhouse Gas Emissions from
New, Modified, and Reconstructed Stationary Sources: Electric Utility Generating Units final rule (2015 NSPS rule). The EPA's
final 2015 NSPS rule set standards of performance for new, modified, and reconstructed electric utility generating units which
included stationary combustion turbines and fossil-fired steam boilers. This proposal reduces the stringency of the 2015 NSPS rule
by not basing the new and reconstructed fossil-fired steam boiler standards on partial carbon capture and sequestration. The impact
of any changes to this rule will depend on the content of the final rule and the outcome of any legal challenges.
The EPA's GHG reporting rule requires annual reporting of GHG emissions expressed in terms of metric tons of CO2 equivalent
emissions for a company's operational control of facilities. Based on ownership or financial control of facilities, Southern Power's
2017 GHG emissions were approximately 13 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent. The preliminary estimate of Southern Power's
2018 GHG emissions on the same basis is approximately 14 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent.
II-158
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Income Tax Matters
Consolidated Income Taxes
On behalf of Southern Power, Southern Company files a consolidated federal income tax return and various state income tax
returns, some of which are combined or unitary. Under a joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement, each Southern
Company subsidiary's current and deferred tax expense is computed on a stand-alone basis and no subsidiary is allocated more
current expense than would be paid if it filed a separate income tax return. In accordance with IRS regulations, each company is
jointly and severally liable for the federal tax liability.
The impact of certain tax events at Southern Company and/or its other subsidiaries can, and does, affect Southern Power's ability to
utilize certain tax credits. See "Tax Credits" and ACCOUNTING POLICIES – "Application of Critical Accounting Policies and
Estimates" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Southern Power currently has unutilized federal ITC and PTC carryforwards totaling approximately $2.1 billion, and thus has
utilized tax equity partnerships where the tax partner will take significantly all of the respective federal tax benefits on a
prospective basis. These tax equity partnerships are consolidated in Southern Power's financial statements using the HLBV
methodology to allocate partnership gains and losses. See Note 1 to the financial statements for additional information.
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
In December 2017, the Tax Reform Legislation was signed into law and became effective on January 1, 2018. The Tax Reform
Legislation, among other things, reduced the federal corporate income tax rate to 21%, retained existing renewable energy
incentives, and repealed the corporate alternative minimum tax. In addition, under the Tax Reform Legislation, NOLs generated
after December 31, 2017 can no longer be carried back to previous tax years but can be carried forward indefinitely, with utilization
limited to 80% of taxable income of the subsequent tax year. The projected reduction of Southern Company's consolidated income
tax liability resulting from the tax rate reduction also delays the expected utilization of existing tax credit carryforwards.
Following the enactment of the Tax Reform Legislation, the SEC staff issued Staff Accounting Bulletin 118 – "Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" (SAB 118), which provided for a measurement period of up to one year
from the enactment date to complete accounting under GAAP for the tax effects of the legislation. Due to the complex and
comprehensive nature of the enacted tax law changes and their application under GAAP, Southern Power considered all amounts
recorded in the financial statements as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation "provisional" as discussed in SAB 118 and subject to
revision prior to filing its 2017 tax return in the fourth quarter 2018. Southern Power recognized tax benefits of $743 million in
2017. Following the filing of its 2017 tax return, Southern Power recorded tax expense of $79 million to adjust the provisional
amount for a total net tax benefit of $664 million as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. As of December 31, 2018, Southern
Power considered the measurement of impacts from the Tax Reform Legislation on deferred income tax assets and liabilities,
primarily due to the impact of the reduction of the corporate income tax rate, to be complete.
However, the IRS continues to issue regulations that provide further interpretation and guidance on the law and each state's
adoption of the provisions contained in the Tax Reform Legislation remains uncertain. The ultimate impact of this matter cannot be
determined at this time. In addition, the regulatory treatment of certain impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation is subject to the
discretion of the FERC. See Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional
information.
Tax Credits
The Tax Reform Legislation retained the renewable energy incentives that were included in the PATH Act. The PATH Act allows
for 30% ITC for solar projects that commence construction by December 31, 2019; 26% ITC for solar projects that commence
construction in 2020; 22% ITC for solar projects that commence construction in 2021; and a permanent 10% ITC for solar projects
that commence construction on or after January 1, 2022. In addition, the PATH Act allows for 100% PTC for wind projects that
commenced construction in 2016; 80% PTC for wind projects that commenced construction in 2017; 60% PTC for wind projects
that commence construction in 2018; and 40% PTC for wind projects that commence construction in 2019. Wind projects
commencing construction after 2019 will not be entitled to any PTCs. Southern Power has received ITCs related to its investment
in new solar facilities acquired or constructed and receives PTCs related to the first 10 years of energy production from its wind
facilities, which have had, and may continue to have, a material impact on Southern Power's cash flows and net income. In 2018,
Southern Power sold noncontrolling tax equity interests in SP Wind and Cactus Flats, which both qualify for PTCs, and Gaskell
West 1, which qualifies for ITCs. Under these partnerships, the tax equity investors will receive 99% of the PTC and ITC tax
benefits and, therefore, Southern Power's tax benefits will be materially reduced. At December 31, 2018,
II-159
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Power had approximately $2.1 billion of unutilized ITCs and PTCs, which are currently expected to be fully utilized by
2022, but could be further delayed. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Income and Other Taxes" and Note 10 to the
financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes – Tax Credit Carryforwards" and "Effective Tax Rate" for
additional information regarding utilization and amortization of credits and the tax benefit related to associated basis differences.
Bonus Depreciation
Under the Tax Reform Legislation, projects with binding contracts prior to September 28, 2017 and placed in service after
September 27, 2017 remain eligible for bonus depreciation under the PATH Act. The PATH Act allowed for 50% bonus
depreciation for 2015 through 2017, 40% bonus depreciation for 2018, and 30% bonus depreciation for 2019 and certain long-lived
assets placed in service in 2020. Southern Power is not expecting material cash flows from bonus depreciation for the 2018 or 2019
tax years. However, any cash flows resulting from bonus depreciation would also be impacted by Southern Power's use of tax
equity partnerships. See Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Acquisitions
During 2018, Southern Power acquired and completed the project below and acquired the Wild Horse Mountain and Reading wind
facilities discussed under "Construction Projects" herein. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" for
additional information.
Project Facility Resour ceSeller ,
Acquisition DateAppr oximate
Nameplate
Capacity
(MW) LocationOwnership
Percentage Actual CODPPA
CounterpartiesPPA
Contract
Period
Gaskell West 1 Solar Recurrent Ener gy
Development
Holdings, LLC,
January 26, 201820 Kern County ,
CA100% of
Class B(*)March 2018 Southern
California Edison20 years
(*)Southern Power owns 100% of the class B membership interests under a tax equity partnership.
The Gaskell West 1 facility did not have operating revenues or activities prior to being placed in service during March 2018.
Construction Projects
Construction Projects Completed and/or in Progress
During 2018, in accordance with its growth strategy, Southern Power started, continued, or completed construction of the projects
set forth in the table below.
Project Facility Resour ceAppr oximate
Nameplate
Capacity
(MW)  LocationOwnership
PercentageActual /
Expected
COD PPA CounterpartiesPPA
Contract
Period
Construction Pr ojects Completed During the Year Ended December  31, 2018
Cactus Flats (a)Wind 148
 Concho County , TX 100% of
Class B
 July 2018 General Motors, LLC and
General Mills Operations,
LLC12 years and
15 years
Projects Under  Construction at December  31, 2018
Mankato
expansion (b)Natural
Gas385
 Mankato, MN 100%
 Second
quarter
2019Northern States Power
Company20 years
Wild Horse
Mountain (c)Wind 100
 Pushmataha County , OK 100%
 Fourth
quarter
2019Arkansas Electric
Cooperative20 years
Reading (d)Wind 200
 Osage and L yon
Counties, KS100%
 Second
quarter
2020Royal Caribbean Cruises
LTD12 years
(a)In July 2017, Southern Power purchased 100% of the Cactus Flats facility. In August 2018, Southern Power closed on a tax equity partnership and now owns
100% of the class B membership interests.
(b)In November 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement to sell all of its equity interests in Plant Mankato, including this expansion currently under
construction. See "Sales of Natural Gas Plants" below.
II-160
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
(c)In May 2018, Southern Power purchased 100% of the Wild Horse Mountain facility. Southern Power may enter into a tax equity partnership, in which case it
would then own 100% of the class B membership interests. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
(d)In August 2018, Southern Power purchased 100% of the membership interests of the Reading facility from the joint development arrangement with Renewable
Energy Systems Americas, Inc. described below. Southern Power may enter into a tax equity partnership, in which case it would then own 100% of the class B
membership interests. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Total aggregate construction costs for projects under construction at December 31, 2018, excluding acquisition costs, are expected
to be between $575 million and $640 million for the Plant Mankato expansion, Wild Horse Mountain, and Reading facilities. At
December 31, 2018, total costs of construction incurred for these projects was $289 million, and is included in CWIP, except for the
Plant Mankato expansion, which is included in assets held for sale in the financial statements. See Note 15 to the financial
statements under "Southern Power" and "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information.
Development Projects
During 2017, Southern Power purchased wind turbine equipment to be used for various development and construction projects.
Any wind projects using this equipment and reaching commercial operation by the end of 2021 are expected to qualify for 80%
PTCs.
During 2016, Southern Power entered into a joint development agreement with Renewable Energy Systems Americas, Inc. (RES)
to develop and construct wind projects. Concurrent with the agreement, Southern Power purchased wind turbine equipment from
Siemens Wind Power, Inc. and Vestas-American Wind Technology, Inc. to be used for construction of these projects. Several wind
projects using this equipment, as well as other purchased equipment, have successfully originated, directly or indirectly, from the
partnership with RES and are expected to reach commercial operation before the end of 2020, thus qualifying for 100% PTCs.
Southern Power continues to evaluate and refine the deployment of the wind turbine equipment to potential joint development and
construction projects as well as the amount of MW capacity to be constructed. During the third quarter 2018, as a result of a review
of various options for probable dispositions of wind turbine equipment not deployed to development or construction projects,
Southern Power recorded a $36 million asset impairment charge on the equipment.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018 and as part of management's continuous review of disposition options, approximately $53
million of this equipment is being marketed for sale and will be classified as held for sale.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Sales of Renewable Facility Interests
On May 22, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership
indirectly owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, to Global Atlantic for approximately $1.2 billion. Since
Southern Power retains control of the limited partnership through its wholly-owned general partner, the sale was recorded as an
equity transaction and Southern Power will continue to consolidate SP Solar in its financial statements. On the date of the
transaction, the noncontrolling interest was increased by $511 million to reflect 33% of the carrying value of the partnership. This
difference, partially offset by the tax impact and other related transaction charges, also resulted in a $410 million decrease to
Southern Power's common stockholder's equity.
On December 11, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, which owns a
portfolio of eight operating wind facilities, to three financial investors for approximately $1.2 billion. The tax equity investors
together will generally receive 40% of the cash distributions from available cash and will receive 99% of the tax attributes,
including future production tax credits. Since Southern Power retains control of SP Wind, Southern Power will continue to
consolidate SP Wind in its financial statements.
Sales of Natural Gas Plants
On December 4, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of all of its equity interests in the Florida Plants to NextEra Energy for
$203 million. In contemplation of this sale transaction, Southern Power recorded an asset impairment charge of approximately $119
million ($89 million after tax) in May 2018. Pre-tax net income for the Florida Plants was $49 million and $37 million for the
period from January 1, 2018 to December 4, 2018 and for the year ended December 31, 2017, respectively.
On November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement with Northern States Power to sell all of its equity interests in
Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction) for an aggregate purchase price of approximately
$650 million. The completion of the disposition is subject to the expansion unit reaching commercial operation as well as various
other customary conditions to closing, including working capital and timing adjustments. The ultimate purchase price will decrease
$66,667 per day for each day after June 1, 2019 that the expansion has not achieved commercial operation, not to exceed $15
million. Pre-tax net income for Plant Mankato was immaterial for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017. This
II-161
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
transaction is subject to FERC and state commission approvals and is expected to close mid-2019. The assets and liabilities of Plant
Mankato are classified as held for sale as of December 31, 2018.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" and "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information. The ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Other Matters
Southern Power is involved in various other matters being litigated and regulatory matters that could affect future earnings. In
addition, Southern Power is subject to certain claims and legal actions arising in the ordinary course of business. Southern Power's
business activities are subject to extensive governmental regulation related to public health and the environment, such as laws and
regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Litigation over environmental issues and claims of
various types, including property damage, personal injury, common law nuisance, and citizen enforcement of environmental laws
and regulations, has occurred throughout the U.S. This litigation has included claims for damages alleged to have been caused by
CO2 and other emissions and alleged exposure to hazardous materials, and/or requests for injunctive relief in connection with such
matters.
The ultimate outcome of such pending or potential litigation or regulatory matters cannot be predicted at this time; however, for
current proceedings not specifically reported in Note 3 to the financial statements herein, management does not anticipate that the
ultimate liabilities, if any, arising from such current proceedings would have a material effect on Southern Power's financial
statements.
Southern Power indirectly owns a 51% membership interest in RE Roserock LLC (Roserock), the owner of the Roserock facility in
Pecos County, Texas. Prior to the facility being placed in service in 2016, certain solar panels were damaged during installation by
the construction contractor, McCarthy Building Companies, Inc. (McCarthy), and certain solar panels were damaged by a hail event
that also occurred during construction. In connection therewith, Southern Power is withholding payments of approximately $26
million from the construction contractor, which has placed a lien on the Roserock facility for the same amount. In May 2017,
Roserock filed a lawsuit in the state district court in Pecos County, Texas, (State Court lawsuit) against XL Insurance America, Inc.
(XL) and North American Elite Insurance Company (North American Elite) seeking recovery from an insurance policy for damages
resulting from the hail storm and McCarthy's installation practices. On June 1, 2018, the court in the State Court lawsuit granted
Roserock's motion for partial summary judgment, finding that the insurers were in breach of contract and in violation of the Texas
Insurance Code for failing to pay any monies owed for the hail claim. In addition to the State Court lawsuit, lawsuits were filed
between Roserock and McCarthy, as well as other parties, and that litigation has been consolidated in the U.S. District Court for the
Western District of Texas. Southern Power intends to vigorously pursue and defend these matters, the ultimate outcome of which
cannot be determined at this time.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
Southern Power prepares its consolidated financial statements in accordance with GAAP. Significant accounting policies are
described in Notes 1, 4, and 10 to the financial statements. In the application of these policies, certain estimates are made that may
have a material impact on Southern Power's results of operations and related disclosures. Different assumptions and measurements
could produce estimates that are significantly different from those recorded in the financial statements. Senior management has
reviewed and discussed the following critical accounting policies and estimates with the Audit Committee of Southern Company's
Board of Directors.
Revenue Recognition
Southern Power's revenue recognition depends on appropriate classification and documentation of transactions in accordance with
GAAP. In general, Southern Power's power sale transactions, which include PPAs, can be classified in one of four categories:
leases, non-derivatives or normal sale derivatives, derivatives designated as cash flow hedges, and derivatives not designated as
hedges. For more information on derivative transactions, see FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Market Price Risk"
herein and Notes 1 and 14 to the financial statements. Southern Power's revenues are dependent upon significant judgments used to
determine the appropriate transaction classification, which must be documented upon the inception of each contract.
Lease Transactions
Southern Power considers the following factors to determine whether the sales contract is a lease:
•Assessing whether specific property is explicitly or implicitly identified in the agreement;
II-162
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
•Determining whether the fulfillment of the arrangement is dependent on the use of the identified property; and
•Assessing whether the arrangement conveys to the purchaser the right to use the identified property.
If the contract meets the above criteria for a lease, Southern Power performs further analysis as to whether the lease is classified as
operating, financing, or sales-type. All of Southern Power's power sales contracts that are determined to be leases are accounted for
as operating leases and the capacity revenue is recognized on a straight-line basis over the term of the contract and is included in
Southern Power's operating revenues. Energy revenues and other contingent revenues are recognized in the period the energy is
delivered or the service is rendered.
Non-Derivative and Normal Sale Derivative Transactions
If the power sales contract is not classified as a lease, Southern Power further considers the following factors to determine proper
classification:
•Assessing whether the contract meets the definition of a derivative;
•Assessing whether the contract meets the definition of a capacity contract;
•Assessing the probability at inception and throughout the term of the individual contract that the contract will result in
physical delivery; and
•Ensuring that the contract quantities do not exceed available generating capacity (including purchased capacity).
Contracts that do not meet the definition of a derivative or are designated as normal sales (i.e. capacity contracts which provide for
the sale of electricity that involve physical delivery in quantities within Southern Power's available generating capacity) are
accounted for as executory contracts. For contracts that have a capacity charge, the revenue is generally recognized in the period
that it becomes billable. Revenues related to energy and ancillary services are recognized in the period the energy is delivered or
the service is rendered. See Note 4 to the financial statements for additional information.
Cash Flow Hedge Transactions
Southern Power further considers the following in designating other derivative contracts for the sale of electricity as cash flow
hedges of anticipated sale transactions:
•Identifying the hedging instrument, the forecasted hedged transaction, and the nature of the risk being hedged; and
•Assessing hedge effectiveness at inception and throughout the contract term.
These contracts are accounted for on a fair value basis and are recorded in AOCI over the life of the contract. Realized gains and
losses are then recognized in operating revenues as incurred.
Derivative (Non-Hedge) Transactions
Contracts for sales of electricity, which meet the definition of a derivative and that either do not qualify or are not designated as
normal sales or as cash flow hedges, are accounted for on a fair value basis and are recorded in operating revenues.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets and Intangibles
Southern Power's investments in long-lived assets are primarily generation assets, whether in service or under construction.
Southern Power's intangible assets arise from certain acquisitions and consist of acquired PPAs, which are amortized to revenue
over the term of the respective PPAs. Southern Power evaluates the carrying value of these assets whenever indicators of potential
impairment exist. Examples of impairment indicators could include significant changes in construction schedules, current period
losses combined with a history of losses or a projection of continuing losses, a significant decrease in market prices, the inability to
remarket generating capacity for an extended period, the unplanned termination of a customer contract or inability of a customer to
perform under the terms of the contract, or the inability to deploy wind turbine equipment to a development project. If an indicator
exists, the asset is tested for recoverability by comparing the asset carrying value to the sum of the undiscounted expected future
cash flows directly attributable to the asset. If the estimate of undiscounted future cash flows is less than the carrying value of the
asset, the fair value of the asset is determined and a loss is recorded. A high degree of judgment is required in developing estimates
related to these evaluations, which are based on projections of various factors, including the following:
•Future demand for electricity based on projections of economic growth and estimates of available generating capacity;
•Future power and natural gas prices, which have been quite volatile in recent years; and
•Future operating costs.
II-163
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
In addition, when assets are identified as held for sale, an impairment loss is recognized to the extent that the carrying value of the
assets or asset group exceeds the asset fair value less cost to sell. In 2018, an impairment charge of $119 million was recorded for
the Florida Plants concurrent with the assets being identified as held for sale as a result of a signed purchase and sale agreement.
Also in 2018, an impairment charge of $36 million was recorded for wind turbine equipment that is no longer likely to be deployed
to a wind generation project.
Acquisition Accounting
Southern Power may acquire generation assets as part of its overall growth strategy. At the time of an acquisition, Southern Power
will assess if these assets and activities meet the definition of a business. For acquisitions that meet the definition of a business,
Southern Power includes operating results from the date of acquisition in its consolidated financial statements. The purchase price,
including any contingent consideration, is allocated based on the fair value of the identifiable assets acquired and liabilities
assumed (including any intangible assets). Assets acquired that do not meet the definition of a business are accounted for as an asset
acquisition.
The purchase price of each asset acquisition is allocated based on the relative fair value of assets acquired. Determining the fair
value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed requires management judgment and Southern Power may engage independent
valuation experts to assist in this process. Fair values are determined by using market participant assumptions, and typically include
the timing and amounts of future cash flows, incurred construction costs, the nature of acquired contracts, discount rates, power
market prices, and expected asset lives. Any due diligence or transition costs incurred by Southern Power for potential or successful
acquisitions are expensed as incurred.
Contingent consideration primarily relates to fixed amounts due to the seller once the facility is placed in service. For contingent
consideration with variable payments, Southern Power fair values the arrangement with any changes recorded in the consolidated
statements of income. See Note 13 to the financial statements for additional fair value information and Note 15 to the financial
statements for additional information on recent acquisitions.
Accounting for Income Taxes
The consolidated income tax provision and deferred income tax assets and liabilities, as well as any unrecognized tax benefits and
valuation allowances, require significant judgment and estimates. These estimates are supported by historical tax return data,
reasonable projections of taxable income, and interpretations of applicable tax laws and regulations across multiple taxing
jurisdictions. The effective tax rate reflects the statutory tax rates and calculated apportionments for the various states in which
Southern Power operates.
On behalf of Southern Power, Southern Company files a consolidated federal income tax return and various state income tax
returns, some of which are combined or unitary. Under a joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement, each Southern
Company subsidiary's current and deferred tax expense is computed on a stand-alone basis and no subsidiary is allocated more
current expense than would be paid if it filed a separate income tax return. Certain deductions and credits can be limited at the
consolidated or combined level resulting in NOL and tax credit carryforwards that would not otherwise result on a stand-alone
basis. Utilization of NOL and tax credit carryforwards and the assessment of valuation allowances are based on significant
judgment and extensive analysis of Southern Power's, as well as Southern Company's, current financial position and results of
operations, including currently available information about future years, to estimate when future taxable income will be realized.
Current and deferred state income tax liabilities and assets are estimated based on laws of multiple states that determine the income
to be apportioned to their jurisdictions. States utilize various formulas to calculate the apportionment of taxable income, primarily
using sales, assets, or payroll within the jurisdiction compared to the consolidated totals. In addition, each state varies as to whether
a stand-alone, combined, or unitary filing methodology is required. The calculation of deferred state taxes considers apportionment
factors and filing methodologies that are expected to apply in future years. The apportionments and methodologies which are
ultimately finalized in a manner inconsistent with expectations could have a material effect on Southern Power's financial
statements.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating NOL and tax credit carryforwards and multi-state apportionments for all
subsidiaries, Southern Power considers federal and state deferred income tax liabilities and assets to be critical accounting
estimates.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" for additional information.
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842) (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires lessees to recognize on the
balance sheet a lease liability and a right-of-use asset for all leases. ASU 2016-02 also changes the recognition, measurement,
II-164
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
and presentation of expense associated with leases and provides clarification regarding the identification of certain components of
contracts that would represent a lease. The accounting required by lessors is relatively unchanged. ASU 2016-02 is effective for
fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018 and Southern Power adopted the new standard effective January 1, 2019.
Southern Power elected the transition methodology provided by ASU No. 2018-11, Leases (Topic 842): Targeted Improvements,
whereby the requirements of ASU 2016-02 are applied on a prospective basis as of the adoption date of January 1, 2019, without
restating prior periods. Southern Power elected the package of practical expedients provided by ASU 2016-02 that allows prior
determinations of whether existing contracts are, or contain, leases and the classification of existing leases to continue without
reassessment. Additionally, Southern Power expects to apply the use-of-hindsight practical expedient in determining lease terms as
of the date of adoption. Southern Power also made accounting policy elections to account for short-term leases in all asset classes
as off-balance sheet leases and combined lessee lease and non-lease components in the computations of lease obligations and right-
of-use assets for most asset classes, while lessor lease and non-lease components are accounted for separately.
Southern Power completed the implementation of a new application to track and account for its leases and updated its internal
controls and accounting policies to support the accounting for leases under ASU 2016-02. Southern Power completed its lease
inventory and determined its most significant leases as a lessee involve real estate. In the first quarter 2019, the adoption of ASU
2016-02 resulted in recording lease liabilities and right-of-use assets on Southern Power's balance sheet each totaling
approximately $0.4 billion, with no impact on Southern Power's statement of income.
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY
Overview
Southern Power's financial condition remained stable at December 31, 2018. Southern Power's cash requirements primarily consist
of funding ongoing business operations, common stock dividends, distributions to noncontrolling interests, capital expenditures,
and debt maturities. Capital expenditures and other investing activities may include investments in acquisitions or new construction
associated with Southern Power's overall growth strategy and to maintain the existing generation fleet's performance. Operating
cash flows, which may include the utilization of tax credits, will only provide a portion of Southern Power's cash needs. For the
three-year period from 2019 through 2021, Southern Power's projected common stock dividends, distributions to noncontrolling
interests, capital expenditures, and debt maturities are expected to exceed operating cash flows. Southern Power plans to finance
future cash needs in excess of its operating cash flows primarily through external securities issuances, borrowings from financial
institutions, and equity contributions from Southern Company. Southern Power intends to continue to monitor its access to short-
term and long-term capital markets as well as its bank credit agreements to meet future capital and liquidity needs. See "Sources of
Capital," "Financing Activities," and "Contractual Obligations" herein for additional information on lines of credit.
Southern Power also utilizes tax equity partnerships, as one of its financing sources, where the tax partner takes significantly all of
the federal tax benefits. These tax equity partnerships are consolidated in Southern Power's financial statements and are accounted
for using a HLBV methodology to allocate partnership gains and losses. During 2018, Southern Power obtained tax equity funding
for the Gaskell West 1 solar project, the Cactus Flats wind project, and the SP Wind portfolio and received proceeds of
approximately $26 million, $122 million, and $1.2 billion, respectively.
On May 22, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership
indirectly owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, to Global Atlantic for approximately $1.2 billion.
Accordingly, Global Atlantic will receive 33% of all cash distributions paid by SP Solar.
On December 4, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of all of its equity interests in the Florida Plants to NextEra Energy for
$203 million. On November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement with Northern States Power to sell all of its equity
interests in Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction) for an aggregate purchase price of
approximately $650 million. The completion of the disposition is subject to the expansion unit reaching commercial operation as
well as various other customary conditions to closing, and is expected to close mid-2019. The ultimate outcome of this matter
cannot be determined at this time.
Net cash provided from operating activities totaled $631 million in 2018, a decrease of $524 million compared to 2017. The
decrease was primarily due to lower income tax refunds as a result of taxable gains arising from the sales of noncontrolling
interests in SP Solar and SP Wind, as well as the sale of the Florida Plants. At December 31, 2018, Southern Power had $2.1 billion
of unutilized ITCs and PTCs which are expected to be fully utilized by 2022. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income
Tax Matters – Tax Credits" herein for additional information. Net cash provided from operating activities totaled $1.2 billion in
2017, an increase of $816 million compared to 2016 primarily due to income tax refunds received and an increase in energy sales
from new solar and wind facilities, partially offset by an increase in interest paid.
II-165
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Net cash used for investing activities totaled $227 million, $1.6 billion, and $4.8 billion in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively, and
decreased in 2018 primarily due to fewer acquisitions and completion of construction of renewable facilities during 2017 and 2018.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Acquisitions" and "Construction Projects" herein and Note 15 to the financial
statements for additional information.
Net cash used for financing activities totaled $363 million in 2018 primarily due to returns of capital to Southern Company,
payments of common stock dividends, and distributions to noncontrolling interests, partially offset by capital contributions from
noncontrolling interests. Net cash used for financing activities totaled $502 million in 2017 primarily due to payments of common
stock dividends and distributions to noncontrolling interests. Net cash provided from financing activities totaled $4.7 billion in
2016 primarily due to the issuance of additional senior notes and capital contributions from Southern Company and noncontrolling
interests.
Significant balance sheet changes include a $745 million decrease in plant in service and a $576 million increase in assets held for
sale primarily due to completed and planned plant divestitures and a $355 million increase in deferred income taxes primarily due
to $551 million related to the sales of noncontrolling interests in SP Solar and SP Wind and $129 million in additional unutilized
PTCs, partially offset by a $333 million decrease in the federal NOL carryforward.
Sources of Capital
Southern Power plans to obtain the funds required for acquisitions, construction, development, debt maturities, and other purposes
from operating cash flows, external securities issuances, borrowings from financial institutions, tax equity partnership
contributions, divestitures, and equity contributions from Southern Company. However, the amount, type, and timing of any future
financings, if needed, will depend upon prevailing market conditions, regulatory approval, and other factors. With respect to the
public offering of securities, Southern Power (excluding its subsidiaries) issues and offers debt registered on registration statements
filed with the SEC under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Southern Power's current liabilities sometimes exceed current assets due to the use of short-term debt as a funding source and
construction payables, as well as fluctuations in cash needs due to seasonality. Southern Power believes the need for working
capital can be adequately met by utilizing the commercial paper program, the Facility (as defined below), borrowings from
financial institutions, equity contributions from Southern Company, external securities issuances, and operating cash flows.
Southern Power obtains its own financing separately without any credit support from Southern Company or any other affiliate. The
Southern Company system does not maintain a centralized cash or money pool. Therefore, funds of Southern Power are not
commingled with funds of any other company in the Southern Company system. To meet liquidity and capital resource
requirements, Southern Power had cash and cash equivalents of approximately $181 million at December 31, 2018.
Southern Power's commercial paper program is used to finance acquisition and construction costs related to electric generating
facilities and for general corporate purposes, including maturing debt. Southern Power's subsidiaries are not issuers under the
commercial paper program. Short-term borrowings are included in notes payable on the consolidated balance sheets.
II-166
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Details of short-term borrowings were as follows:
 Short-term Borrowings at the
End of the Period Short-term Borrowings During the Period (*)
 Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest
RateAverage
Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest
Rate  Maximum
Amount
Outstanding
 (in millions) (in millions)  (in millions)
December 31, 2018     
Commercial paper $ — —% $ 77 2.2%  $ 304
Short-term bank debt 100 3.1% 111 2.7%  200
Total $ 100 3.1% $ 188 2.5%   
December 31, 2017     
Commercial paper $ 105 2.0% $ 215 1.4%  $ 419
Short-term bank debt — —% 17 2.1%  209
Total $ 105 2.0% $ 232 1.4%   
December 31, 2016     
Commercial paper $ — —% $ 56 0.8%  $ 310
Total $ — —% $ 56 0.8%   
(*)Average and maximum amounts are based upon daily balances during the twelve-month periods ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016.
In addition to the short-term borrowings of Southern Power included in the table above, at December 31, 2016, Southern Power
subsidiaries assumed credit agreements (Project Credit Facilities) with the acquisition of certain solar facilities, which were non-
recourse to the Southern Power parent company, the proceeds of which were used to finance project costs related to such solar
facilities. The Project Credit Facilities were fully repaid in January 2017. For the year ended December 31, 2016, the Project Credit
Facilities had a maximum amount outstanding of $828 million and an average amount outstanding of $566 million at a weighted
average interest rate of 2.1% and had total amounts outstanding of $209 million at a weighted average interest rate of 2.1% at
December 31, 2016.
Company Credit Facilities
At December 31, 2018, Southern Power had a committed credit facility (Facility) of $750 million expiring in 2022, of which $23
million has been used for letters of credit and $727 million remains unused. Southern Power's subsidiaries are not borrowers under
the Facility. Proceeds from the Facility may be used for working capital and general corporate purposes as well as liquidity support
for Southern Power's commercial paper program. A portion of the unused credit under the Facility is allocated to provide liquidity
support for Southern Power's commercial paper program. Subject to applicable market conditions, Southern Power expects to
renew or replace the Facility, as needed, prior to expiration. In connection therewith, Southern Power may extend the maturity date
and/or increase or decrease the lending commitment thereunder. See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit
Arrangements" for additional information.
The Facility, as well as Southern Power's term loan agreements, contains a covenant that limits the ratio of debt to capitalization (as
defined in the Facility) to a maximum of 65% and contains a cross-default provision that is restricted only to indebtedness of
Southern Power. For the purposes of this definition, debt would exclude any project debt incurred by certain subsidiaries of
Southern Power to the extent such debt is non-recourse to Southern Power, and capitalization would exclude the capital stock or
other equity attributable to such subsidiary. Southern Power is currently in compliance with all of these covenants.
Southern Power also has a $120 million continuing letter of credit facility for standby letters of credit. In December 2018, Southern
Power amended the letter of credit facility, which, among other things, extended the expiration date from 2019 to 2021. At
December 31, 2018, $103 million has been used for letters of credit, primarily as credit support for PPA requirements, and $17
million was unused. Southern Power's subsidiaries are not parties to this letter of credit facility.
In addition, at December 31, 2018 and 2017, Southern Power had $103 million and $113 million, respectively, of cash collateral
posted related to PPA requirements.
II-167
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Financing Activities
Senior Notes
In June 2018, Southern Power repaid $350 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2015A 1.50% Senior Notes due June 1,
2018.
In addition to any financings that may be necessary to meet capital requirements and contractual obligations, Southern Power plans
to continue, when economically feasible, a program to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with lower-cost
capital if market conditions permit.
Other Debt
In May 2018, Southern Power repaid $420 million aggregate principal amount of long-term floating rate bank loans.
Also in May 2018, Southern Power entered into two short-term floating rate bank loans, each for an aggregate principal amount of
$100 million, which bear interest based on one-month LIBOR, and proceeds being used for general corporate purposes. In
November 2018, Southern Power repaid one of these short-term loans.
Credit Rating Risk
Southern Power does not have any credit arrangements that would require material changes in payment schedules or terminations
as a result of a credit rating downgrade.
There are certain contracts that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of a credit rating change to BBB
and/or Baa2 or below. These contracts are for physical electricity purchases and sales, fuel transportation and storage, energy price
risk management, and transmission.
The maximum potential collateral requirements under these contracts at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
Credit RatingsMaximum
Potential
Collateral
Requirements
 (in millions)
At BBB and/or Baa2 $ 29
At BBB- and/or Baa3 $ 338
At BB+ and/or Ba1 (*)$ 980
(*)Any additional credit rating downgrades at or below BB- and/or Ba3 could increase collateral requirements up to an additional $38 million.
Included in these amounts are certain agreements that could require collateral in the event that either Alabama Power or Georgia
Power (affiliate companies of Southern Power) has a credit rating change to below investment grade. Generally, collateral may be
provided by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit, or cash. Additionally, a credit rating downgrade could impact the ability
of Southern Power to access capital markets and would be likely to impact the cost at which it does so.
In addition, Southern Power has a PPA that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of a downgrade of
Southern Power's credit. The PPA requires credit assurances without stating a specific credit rating. The amount of collateral
required would depend upon actual losses resulting from a credit downgrade.
On September 28, 2018, Fitch assigned a negative rating outlook to the ratings of Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries
(including Southern Power).
Market Price Risk
Southern Power is exposed to market risks, primarily commodity price risk, interest rate risk, and occasionally foreign currency
exchange rate risk. To manage the volatility attributable to these exposures, Southern Power nets its exposures, where possible, to
take advantage of natural offsets and enters into various derivative transactions for the remaining exposures pursuant to Southern
Power's policies in areas such as counterparty exposure and risk management practices. Southern Power's policy is that derivatives
are to be used primarily for hedging purposes and mandates strict adherence to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative
positions are monitored using techniques including, but not limited to, market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity
analysis. Derivative instruments are recognized at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets as either assets or liabilities and are
presented on a gross basis. In the statements of cash flows, the cash impacts of settled energy-related and interest rate derivatives
are recorded as operating activities.
II-168
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018, Southern Power had $525 million of long-term variable rate notes outstanding. If Southern Power sustained
a 100 basis point change in interest rates for its variable interest rate exposure, the change would affect annualized interest expense
by approximately $5 million at December 31, 2018. Since a significant portion of outstanding indebtedness bears interest at fixed
rates, Southern Power is not aware of any facts or circumstances that would significantly affect exposure on existing indebtedness
in the near term. However, the impact on future financing costs cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Power had foreign currency denominated debt of €1.1 billion at December 31, 2018. Southern Power has mitigated its
exposure to foreign currency exchange rate risk through the use of foreign currency swaps converting all interest and principal
payments to fixed-rate U.S. dollars.
Because energy from Southern Power's facilities is primarily sold under long-term PPAs with tolling agreements and provisions
shifting substantially all of the responsibility for fuel cost to the counterparties, Southern Power's exposure to market volatility in
commodity fuel prices and prices of electricity is generally limited. However, Southern Power has been and may continue to be
exposed to market volatility in energy-related commodity prices as a result of uncontracted generating capacity.
For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, the changes in fair value of energy-related derivative contracts associated with
both power and natural gas positions were as follows:
 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Contracts outstanding at the beginning of period, assets (liabilities), net $ (10)$ 16
Contracts realized or settled 10 (17)
Current period changes (*)(4) (9)
Contracts outstanding at the end of period, assets (liabilities), net $ (4)$ (10)
(*)Current period changes also include changes in the fair value of new contracts entered into during the period, if any.
For the years ending December 31, 2018 and 2017, the changes in contracts outstanding were attributable to both the volume and
the prices of power and natural gas as follows:
 2018 2017
Power – net sold  
MWH (in millions) 2.5 3.0
Weighted average contract cost per MWH above (below) market prices (in dollars) $ (0.23)$ (2.67)
Natural Gas – net purchased  
Commodity - mmBtu (in millions) 15.0 14.4
Commodity - weighted average contract cost per mmBtu above (below) market prices (in dollars)$ 0.22$ 0.12
Gains and losses on energy-related derivatives designated as cash flow hedges which are used by Southern Power to hedge
anticipated purchases and sales are initially deferred in OCI before being recognized in income in the same period as the hedged
transactions are reflected in earnings. Gains and losses on energy-related derivative contracts that are not designated or fail to
qualify as hedges are recognized in the consolidated statements of income as incurred.
Southern Power uses over-the-counter contracts that are not exchange traded but are fair valued using prices which are market
observable, and thus fall into Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. See Note 13 to the financial statements for further discussion of
fair value measurements. The energy-related derivative contracts outstanding at December 31, 2018 mature through 2020.
Southern Power is exposed to losses related to financial instruments in the event of counterparties' nonperformance. Southern
Power only enters into agreements and material transactions with counterparties that have investment grade credit ratings by S&P
and Moody's or with counterparties who have posted collateral to cover potential credit exposure. Southern Power has also
established risk management policies and controls to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties in order to
mitigate Southern Power's exposure to counterparty credit risk. Therefore, Southern Power does not anticipate a material adverse
effect on the financial statements as a result of counterparty nonperformance. See Note 1 to the financial statements under
"Financial Instruments" and Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations
The capital program of Southern Power is subject to periodic review and revision and is currently estimated to total $0.9 billion
over the next five years through 2023. This includes committed construction, capital improvements, and work to be performed
II-169
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
under LTSAs, totaling approximately $300 million for each of 2019 and 2020 and an average of approximately $100 million each
year from 2021 through 2023. In addition, Southern Power has a further $2.3 billion in planned expenditures for plant acquisitions
and placeholder growth, or approximately $0.5 billion per year on average for 2019 through 2023. Planned expenditures for plant
acquisitions and placeholder growth may vary materially due to market opportunities and Southern Power's ability to execute its
growth strategy. Actual construction costs may vary from these estimates because of numerous factors such as: changes in business
conditions; changes in the expected environmental compliance program; changes in environmental laws and regulations; the
outcome of any legal challenges to environmental rules; changes in FERC rules and regulations; changes in load projections;
changes in legislation; the cost and efficiency of construction labor, equipment, and materials; project scope and design changes;
and the cost of capital. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Power" for additional information.
Southern Power forecasts contributions to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans over a three-year period. Southern
Power anticipates no mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan during the next three years. See Note 11 to the financial
statements for additional information.
Funding requirements related to obligations associated with scheduled maturities of long-term debt, as well as the related interest,
leases, derivative obligations, and other purchase commitments are detailed in the contractual obligations table that follows. See
Notes 1, 8, 9, and 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
Contractual Obligations
Contractual obligations at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 20192020-
20212022-
2023  After
2023  Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt(a) —      
Principal $ 600 $1,125 $ 967 $2,339 $5,031
Interest 179 310 250 1,409 2,148
Financial derivative obligations(b)6 2 — — 8
Operating leases(c)23 48 50 874 995
Purchase commitments —      
Capital(d)252 461 144 — 857
Fuel(e)601 744 369 32 1,746
Purchased power(f)41 83 — — 124
Other(g)168 309 221 1,471 2,169
Total $1,870 $3,082 $2,001 $6,125 $13,078
(a)All amounts are reflected based on final maturity dates and include the ef fects of interest rate derivatives employed to manage interest rate risk
and ef fects of foreign currency swaps employed to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk. Included in debt principal is an $18 million
gain related to the foreign currency hedge of €1.1 billion. Southern Power plans to continue, when economically feasible, to retire higher -cost
securities and replace these obligations with lower -cost capital if market conditions permit.
(b)For additional information, see Notes 1 and 14 to the financial statements.
(c)Operating lease commitments include certain land leases for solar and wind facilities that may be subject to annual price escalation based on
indices. See Note 9 to the financial statements for additional information.
(d)Southern Power provides estimated capital expenditures for a five-year period, including capital expenditures associated with environmental
regulations. Excluded from these amounts are planned expenditures for plant acquisitions and placeholder growth of $2.3 billion. Also
excluded from these amounts are capital expenditures covered under L TSAs which are reflected in "Other ." See Note (g) below . At December
31, 2018, significant purchase commitments were outstanding in connection with the construction program. No ARO settlements are projected
during the five-year period.
(e)Primarily includes commitments to purchase, transport, and store natural gas. Amounts reflected are based on contracted cost and may contain
provisions for price escalation. Amounts reflected for natural gas purchase commitments are based on various indices at the time of delivery
and have been estimated based on the NYMEX future prices at December 31, 2018 .
(f)Purchased power commitments will be resold under a third party agreement at cost.
(g)Includes commitments related to L TSAs, operation and maintenance agreements, and transmission. L TSAs include price escalation based on
inflation indices. Transmission commitments are based on the Southern Company system's current tarif f rate for point-to-point transmission.
II-170
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
OVERVIEW
Business Activities
Southern Company Gas is an energy services holding company whose primary business is the distribution of natural gas.
Subsequent to the dispositions of Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and Florida City Gas discussed herein under "Merger,
Acquisition, and Disposition Activities," Southern Company Gas has natural gas distribution utilities in four states – Illinois,
Georgia, Virginia, and Tennessee. Southern Company Gas is also involved in several other complementary businesses.
Southern Company Gas manages its business through four reportable segments – gas distribution operations, gas pipeline
investments, wholesale gas services, which includes Sequent, a natural gas asset optimization company, and gas marketing services,
which includes SouthStar, a provider of energy-related products and services to natural gas markets – and one non-reportable
segment, all other. During the fourth quarter 2018, Southern Company Gas changed its reportable segments to further align with the
way its new Chief Operating Decision Maker reviews operating results and has reclassified prior years' data to conform to the new
reportable segment presentation. This change resulted in a new reportable segment, gas pipeline investments, which was formerly
included in gas midstream operations. Gas pipeline investments consists primarily of joint ventures in natural gas pipeline
investments including a 50% interest in SNG, two significant pipeline construction projects, and a 50% joint ownership interest in
the Dalton Pipeline. Gas distribution operations, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services continue to remain as separate
reportable segments and reflect the impact of the Southern Company Gas Dispositions. The all other non-reportable segment
includes segments below the quantitative threshold for separate disclosure, including the storage and fuels operations that were
formerly included in gas midstream operations, and other subsidiaries that fall below the quantitative threshold for separate
disclosure. See Notes 5, 7, and 16 to the financial statements for additional information.
Many factors affect the opportunities, challenges, and risks of Southern Company Gas' business. These factors include the ability to
maintain safety, to maintain constructive regulatory environments, to maintain and grow natural gas sales and number of customers,
and to effectively manage and secure timely recovery of costs. These costs include those related to projected long-term demand
growth, environmental standards, safety, reliability, resilience, natural gas, and capital expenditures, including updating and
expanding the natural gas distribution systems. The natural gas distribution utilities have various regulatory mechanisms that
address cost recovery. Effectively operating pursuant to these regulatory mechanisms and appropriately balancing required costs
and capital expenditures with customer prices will continue to challenge Southern Company Gas for the foreseeable future. Nicor
Gas filed a rate case on November 9, 2018 and Atlanta Gas Light is required to file a rate case no later than June 1, 2019. These rate
cases are both expected to conclude in 2019; however, the ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. See
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Rate Proceedings" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements
under "Southern Company Gas – Rate Proceedings" for additional information.
Merger, Acquisition, and Disposition Activities
In 2016, Southern Company Gas completed the Merger, pursuant to which Southern Company Gas became a wholly-owned
subsidiary of Southern Company. Southern Company accounted for the Merger using the acquisition method of accounting
whereby the assets acquired and liabilities assumed were recognized at fair value as of the acquisition date. Pushdown accounting
was applied to create a new cost basis for Southern Company Gas' assets, liabilities, and equity as of the acquisition date.
Accordingly, the successor financial statements reflect the new basis of accounting, and successor and predecessor period financial
results (separated by a heavy black line) are presented, but are not comparable. As a result of the application of acquisition
accounting, certain discussions herein include disclosure of the predecessor and successor periods. See Note 15 to the financial
statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
In 2016, Southern Company Gas completed its purchase of Piedmont's 15% interest in SouthStar for $160 million and paid $1.4
billion to acquire a 50% equity interest in SNG, which is the owner of a 7,000-mile pipeline system connecting natural gas supply
basins in Texas, Louisiana, Mississippi, and Alabama to markets in Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, Georgia, South
Carolina, and Tennessee. The investment in SNG is accounted for using the equity method. In March 2017, Southern Company Gas
made an additional $50 million contribution to maintain its 50% equity interest in SNG. See Note 7 to the financial statements
under "Southern Company Gas" and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Investment in SNG" for
additional information.
During 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the following sales, resulting in approximately $2.7 billion in aggregate proceeds:
•On June 4, 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the stock sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water
Enterprises LLC for a total cash purchase price of $365 million, which includes the final working capital adjustment.
II-171
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
This disposition resulted in a net loss of $67 million, which includes $34 million of income tax expense. In contemplation
of the transaction, a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million was recorded in 2018.
•On July 1, 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings, completed the sales of the assets of two of
its natural gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey Industries, Inc. for a total cash
purchase price of $1.7 billion, which includes the final working capital and other adjustments. This disposition resulted in
a pre-tax gain that was entirely offset by $205 million of income tax expense, resulting in no material net income impact.
•On July 29, 2018, Southern Company Gas and its wholly-owned direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the stock
sale of Pivotal Utility Holdings, which primarily consisted of Florida City Gas, to NextEra Energy for a total cash
purchase price of $587 million, which includes the final working capital adjustment less indebtedness assumed at closing.
This disposition resulted in a net gain of $16 million, which includes $103 million of income tax expense.
The after-tax gain and loss on these dispositions included income tax expense on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for
which a deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company
Gas" herein for additional information.
Operating Metrics
Southern Company Gas continues to focus on several operating metrics, including Heating Degree Days, customer count, and
volumes of natural gas sold.
Southern Company Gas measures weather and the effect on its business using Heating Degree Days. Generally, increased Heating
Degree Days result in higher demand for natural gas on Southern Company Gas' distribution system. With the exception of Nicor
Gas, Southern Company Gas has various regulatory mechanisms, such as weather normalization and straight-fixed-variable rate
design, which limit its exposure to weather changes within typical ranges in each of its utilities' respective service territory.
However, the operating revenues from utility customers in Illinois and gas marketing services customers primarily in Georgia and
Illinois can be impacted by warmer- or colder-than-normal weather. Southern Company Gas utilizes weather hedges to limit the
negative income impacts in the event of warmer-than-normal weather, while retaining a significant portion of the positive benefits
of colder-than-normal weather for these businesses.
The number of customers served by gas distribution operations and gas marketing services can be impacted by natural gas prices,
economic conditions, and competition from alternative fuels. Gas marketing services' customers are primarily located in Georgia
and Illinois.
Southern Company Gas' natural gas volume metrics for gas distribution operations and gas marketing services illustrate the effects
of weather and customer demand for natural gas. Wholesale gas services' physical sales volumes represent the daily average natural
gas volumes sold to its customers.
See RESULTS OF OPERATIONS herein for additional information on these operating metrics.
II-172
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Seasonality of Results
During the Heating Season, natural gas usage and operating revenues are generally higher as more customers are connected to the
gas distribution systems and natural gas usage is higher in periods of colder weather. Occasionally in the summer, wholesale gas
services' operating revenues are impacted due to peak usage by power generators in response to summer energy demands. Southern
Company Gas' base operating expenses, excluding cost of natural gas, bad debt expense, and certain incentive compensation costs,
are incurred relatively evenly throughout the year. Seasonality also affects the comparison of certain balance sheet items across
quarters, including receivables, unbilled revenues, natural gas for sale, and notes payable. However, these items are comparable
when reviewing Southern Company Gas' annual results. Thus, Southern Company Gas' operating results can vary significantly
from quarter to quarter as a result of seasonality, which is illustrated in the table below.
  Percent Generated During Heating
Season
  Operating
Revenues Net Income
Successor - 2018  68.7% 96.0%
Successor - 2017  67.3% 73.7%
Successor - July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016  67.1% 96.5%
Predecessor - January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016  70.0% 138.9%
Earnings
Net income attributable to Southern Company Gas for the successor year ended December 31, 2018 was $372 million, representing
a $129 million, or 53.1%, increase over the previous year. Excluding a $121 million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas
Dispositions, net income attributable to Southern Company Gas increased $251 million. This increase was primarily due to lower
income tax expense, increased commercial activity at wholesale gas services, increased operating revenues from infrastructure
replacement programs and base rate changes at gas distribution operations, and higher earnings from Southern Company Gas'
investment in SNG. These increases were partially offset by higher other operations and maintenance expenses primarily due to
increased compensation and benefit costs and disposition-related costs, higher depreciation on continued infrastructure investments
at gas distribution operations, additional interest expense on new debt issuances, and an increase in charitable donations.
Net income attributable to Southern Company Gas for the successor year ended December 31, 2017 was $243 million, which
included net income of $53 million from Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG and $44 million generated from Southern
Company Gas' continued investment in infrastructure replacement programs and base rate increases at Atlanta Gas Light,
Elizabethtown Gas, and Virginia Natural Gas, less the associated increases in depreciation. Net income also reflects $130 million of
additional tax expense resulting from the revaluation of deferred tax assets of $93 million related to the Tax Reform Legislation and
$37 million associated with State of Illinois income tax legislation enacted in the third quarter 2017 and new income tax
apportionment factors in several states resulting from Southern Company Gas' inclusion in the consolidated Southern Company
state tax filings. Also included in net income was $17 million of additional expense resulting from the pushdown of acquisition
accounting.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and Notes 10 and 15 to the financial statements for
additional information.
Net income attributable to Southern Company Gas for the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016 was
$114 million, which included $26 million in earnings from the SNG investment, net of related interest expense, partially offset by
$12 million of additional expense resulting from the impact of the pushdown of acquisition accounting and $27 million of Merger-
related expenses.
Net income attributable to Southern Company Gas for the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016 was $131
million, which included $41 million of Merger-related expenses and $14 million of net income attributable to the SouthStar
noncontrolling interest, which Southern Company Gas purchased in October 2016. Net income for the predecessor period reflected
higher revenues from continued investment in infrastructure programs, partially offset by warm weather, net of hedging, and low
earnings from wholesale gas services due to mark-to-market losses.
II-173
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Operating Results
A condensed income statement for Southern Company Gas follows:
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31, Year Ended
December 31,July 1, 2016
through
December 31, January 1, 2016
through
June 30,
 2018  2017 2016  2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Operating revenues $ 3,909 $ 3,920$ 1,652 $ 1,905
Cost of natural gas 1,539 1,601 613 755
Cost of other sales 12 29 10 14
Other operations and maintenance 981 945 480 452
Depreciation and amortization 500 501 238 206
Taxes other than income taxes 211 184 71 99
Goodwill impairment 42 — — —
Gain on dispositions, net (291) — — —
Merger-related expenses — — 41 56
Total operating expenses 2,994 3,260 1,453 1,582
Operating income 915 660 199 323
Earnings from equity method investments 148 106 60 2
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 228 200 81 96
Other income (expense), net 1 44 12 3
Earnings before income taxes 836 610 190 232
Income taxes 464 367 76 87
Net Income 372 243 114 145
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interest(*)— — — 14
Net Income Attributable to Southern Company Gas $ 372 $ 243$ 114 $ 131
(*)Includes Piedmont's 15% interest in SouthStar, which was acquired by Southern Company Gas in 2016. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information.
The Southern Company Gas Dispositions were completed by July 29, 2018 and represent the primary variance driver for the 2018
changes. Detailed variance explanations are provided herein. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company
Gas" for additional information on the Southern Company Gas Dispositions.
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for the successor year ended December 31, 2018 were $3.9 billion, reflecting an $11 million decrease from
2017. Operating revenues for the successor year ended December 31, 2017 and the successor period of July 1, 2016 through
December 31, 2016 were $3.9 billion and $1.7 billion, respectively. For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30,
2016, operating revenues were $1.9 billion.
II-174
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, details of operating revenues were as follows:
 (in millions)  (% change)
Operating revenues – prior year $ 3,920  
Estimated change resulting from –    
Infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes 31 0.8
Gas costs and other cost recovery 3 0.1
Weather 13 0.3
Wholesale gas services 138 3.5
Southern Company Gas Dispositions(*)(228) (5.8)
Other 32 0.8
Operating revenues – current year $ 3,909 (0.3)%
(*)Includes a $154 million decrease related to natural gas revenues, including alternative revenue programs, and a $74 million decrease related to other revenues.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Revenues from infrastructure replacement programs and base rate changes increased in 2018 primarily due to a $48 million
increase at Nicor Gas, partially offset by a $12 million decrease at Atlanta Gas Light. These amounts include gas distribution
operations' continued investments recovered through infrastructure replacement programs and base rate increases less revenue
reductions for the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas"
for additional information.
Revenues increased due to colder weather in 2018 compared to 2017. See "Heating Degree Days" herein for additional information.
Revenues from wholesale gas services increased in 2018 primarily due to increased commercial activity, partially offset by
derivative losses. See "Segment Information – Wholesale Gas Services" herein for additional information.
Other revenues increased in 2018 primarily due to a $15 million increase from the Dalton Pipeline being placed in service in
August 2017 and a $14 million increase in Nicor Gas' revenue taxes.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017, natural gas revenues included recovery of $1.6 billion in cost of natural gas and
$6 million in net revenues from wholesale gas services, net of $21 million of amortization associated with assets established in the
application of acquisition accounting. Also included in natural gas revenues for the successor year ended December 31, 2017 were
$99 million in additional revenues generated from gas distribution operations as a result of continued investment in infrastructure
replacement programs and increases in base rate revenues at Atlanta Gas Light, Elizabethtown Gas, and Virginia Natural Gas.
Natural gas revenues were partially offset by a $13 million negative impact of warmer-than-normal weather, net of hedging.
For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, natural gas revenues included recovery of $613 million in
cost of natural gas and $24 million in net revenues from wholesale gas services, net of $5 million of amortization associated with
assets established in the application of acquisition accounting. Natural gas revenues were partially offset by a $5 million negative
impact of warmer-than-normal weather, net of hedging.
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, natural gas revenues included recovery of $755 million in
cost of natural gas and $32 million in net losses from wholesale gas services. Natural gas revenues were partially offset by a $7
million negative impact of warmer-than-normal weather, net of hedging.
Natural gas distribution rates include provisions to adjust billings for fluctuations in natural gas costs. Therefore, gas costs
recovered through natural gas revenues generally equal the amount expensed in cost of natural gas and do not affect net income
from gas distribution operations. See "Cost of Natural Gas" herein for additional information. Revenue impacts from weather and
customer growth are described further below.
Heating Degree Days
During Heating Season, natural gas usage and operating revenues are generally higher. Weather typically does not have a
significant net income impact other than during the Heating Season. The following table presents the Heating Degree Days
information for Illinois and Georgia, the primary locations where Southern Company Gas' operations are impacted by weather.
II-175
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Years Ended December 31,  2018 vs. normal2018 vs. 2017 2017 vs. 2016
 Normal(*) 2018  2017 2016  colder colder  colder (warmer)
 (in thousands)    
Illinois 5,813 6,101 5,246 5,243 5.0% 16.3% 0.1 %
Georgia 2,539 2,588 1,970 2,175 1.9% 31.4% (9.4)%
(*)Normal represents the 10-year average from January 1, 2008 through December 31, 2017 for Illinois at Chicago Midway International Airport and for Georgia
at Atlanta Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport, based on information obtained from the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, National
Climatic Data Center.
Southern Company Gas hedged its exposure to warmer-than-normal weather in Illinois for gas distribution operations and in
Illinois and Georgia for gas marketing services. The remaining impacts of weather on earnings are reflected in the chart below.
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31, Year Ended
December 31,July 1, 2016
through
December 31, January 1, 2016
through
June 30,
 2018  2017 2016  2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Gas Distribution Operations:     
Pre-tax $ 2 $ (4)$ (1) $ (7)
After tax 1 (2) (1) (5)
     
Gas Marketing Services:     
Pre-tax (2) (9) (4) —
After tax (1) (5) (3) —
Customer Count
The following table provides the number of customers served by Southern Company Gas at December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016:
 2018 2017 2016
 (in thousands, except market share %)
Gas distribution operations(a)4,248 4,623 4,586
Gas marketing services  
Energy customers(b)697 774 656
Market share of energy customers in Georgia 29.0% 29.2% 29.6%
(a)Includes total customers of approximately 407,000 and 402,000 at December 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively, related to Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and
Florida City Gas, which were sold in 2018. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas"
and " – Sale of Florida City Gas" for additional information.
(b)Includes customers in Ohio contracted through an annual auction process to serve for a 12-month period beginning April 1 of each year. At December 31, 2018
and 2017, there were approximately 70,000 and 140,000 contracted customers, respectively. At December 31, 2016, there were no contracted customers.
Southern Company Gas anticipates overall customer growth trends at the remaining four natural gas distribution utilities in gas
distribution operations to continue as it expects continued improvement in the new housing market and low natural gas prices.
Southern Company Gas uses a variety of targeted marketing programs to attract new customers and to retain existing customers.
Cost of Natural Gas
Excluding Atlanta Gas Light, which does not sell natural gas to end-use customers, gas distribution operations charges its utility
customers for natural gas consumed using natural gas cost recovery mechanisms set by the applicable state regulatory agencies.
Under these mechanisms, all prudently-incurred natural gas costs are passed through to customers without markup, subject to
regulatory review. Gas distribution operations defers or accrues the difference between the actual cost of natural gas and the amount
of commodity revenue earned in a given period. The deferred or accrued amount is either billed or refunded to customers
prospectively through adjustments to the commodity rate. Deferred natural gas costs are reflected as regulatory assets and accrued
natural gas costs are reflected as regulatory liabilities. Therefore, gas costs recovered through natural gas revenues generally equal
II-176
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
the amount expensed in cost of natural gas and do not affect net income from gas distribution operations. Cost of natural gas at gas
distribution operations represented 83.2% of the total cost of natural gas for 2018.
Gas marketing services customers are charged for actual and estimated natural gas consumed. Cost of natural gas includes the cost
of fuel and associated transportation costs, lost and unaccounted for gas, adjustments to reduce the value of inventories to market
value, if applicable, and gains and losses associated with certain derivatives.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, cost of natural gas was $1.5 billion, a decrease of $62 million, or 3.9%,
compared to 2017 substantially all as a result of the Southern Company Gas Dispositions.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017, cost of natural gas was $1.6 billion, which reflected an increase in natural gas
pricing of 26.3% compared to 2016, partially offset by lower demand for natural gas.
For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016 and the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June
30, 2016, cost of natural gas was $613 million and $755 million, respectively, which reflected low demand for natural gas driven by
warm weather during those periods.
Volumes of Natural Gas Sold
The following table details the volumes of natural gas sold during all periods presented.
  Year Ended December 31,  2018 vs. 2017 2017 vs. 2016
  2018 2017  2016  % Change  % Change
Gas distribution operations (mmBtu in millions)        
Firm  721 667 670 8.1% (0.4)%
Interruptible  95 95 96 —% (1.0)%
Total  816 762 766 7.1% (0.5)%
Wholesale gas services (mmBtu in millions/day)        
Daily physical sales  6.7 6.4 7.4 4.7% (13.5)%
Gas marketing services (mmBtu in millions)        
Firm:        
Georgia  37 32 34 15.6% (5.9)%
Illinois  13 12 12 8.3% — %
Other  20 18 12 11.1% 50.0 %
Interruptible large commercial and industrial 14 14 14 —% — %
Total  84 76 72 10.5% 5.6 %
Cost of Other Sales
Cost of other sales related to Pivotal Home Solutions, which was sold on June 4, 2018. See Note 15 to the financial statements
under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional information.
Other Operations and Maintenance Expenses
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, other operations and maintenance expenses increased $36 million, or 3.8%,
compared to the prior year. Excluding a $39 million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, other operations
and maintenance expenses increased $75 million. This increase was primarily due to a $53 million increase in compensation and
benefit costs, including a $12 million one-time increase for the adoption of a new paid time off policy to align with the Southern
Company system, a $28 million increase in disposition-related costs, and an $11 million expense for a litigation settlement to
facilitate the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. These increases were partially offset by a $27 million decrease in bad debt expense
primarily at Nicor Gas, which was offset by a decrease in revenues as a result of the related regulatory recovery mechanism. See
Note 3 to the financial statements under "General Litigation Matters – Southern Company Gas" for additional information on the
litigation settlement.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017 and the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, other
operations and maintenance expenses were $945 million and $480 million, respectively, and primarily reflected compensation and
benefit costs and professional services, including pipeline compliance and maintenance and legal services.
II-177
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, other operations and maintenance expenses were $452
million and included pipeline compliance and maintenance costs and compensation and benefit costs.
Depreciation and Amortization
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, depreciation and amortization decreased $1 million, or 0.2%, compared to the
prior year. Excluding a $37 million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, depreciation and amortization
increased $36 million. This increase was primarily due to continued infrastructure investments at gas distribution operations,
partially offset by lower amortization of intangible assets as a result of fair value adjustments in acquisition accounting at gas
marketing services.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017, depreciation and amortization was $501 million and included $38 million of
additional amortization of intangible assets as a result of fair value adjustments in acquisition accounting, primarily at gas
marketing services, and $28 million in additional depreciation at gas distribution operations, primarily due to continued investment
in infrastructure programs.
For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, depreciation and amortization was $238 million and included
$23 million of additional amortization of intangible assets as a result of fair value adjustments in acquisition accounting, primarily
at gas marketing services, as well as depreciation at gas distribution operations due to continued investment in infrastructure
programs.
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, depreciation and amortization was $206 million and reflected
depreciation related to additional assets placed in service at gas distribution operations due to continued investment in infrastructure
programs.
See Notes 2 and 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital
Projects" and "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas," respectively, for additional information on infrastructure
programs and the application of acquisition accounting.
Taxes Other Than Income Taxes
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, taxes other than income taxes increased $27 million, or 14.7%, compared to the
prior year. Excluding a $4 million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, taxes other than income taxes
increased $31 million. This increase primarily reflects a $13 million increase in revenue tax expenses as a result of higher natural
gas revenues, a $12 million increase in Nicor Gas' invested capital tax that reflects a $7 million credit in 2017 to establish a related
regulatory asset, and a $4 million increase in property taxes.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017, the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, and the
predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, taxes other than income taxes were $184 million, $71 million, and
$99 million, respectively, which consisted primarily of revenue tax expenses, property taxes, and payroll taxes.
Goodwill Impairment
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million was recorded in contemplation of
the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See Notes 1 and 15 to the financial statements under "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
and Liabilities" and "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions," respectively, for additional information.
Gain on Dispositions, Net
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, gain on dispositions, net was $291 million and was associated with the Southern
Company Gas Dispositions. The income tax expense on these gains included income tax expense on goodwill not deductible for tax
purposes and for which a deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously.
Merger-Related Expenses
There were no Merger-related expenses in the successor years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017.
For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, Merger-related expenses were $41 million, including
$18 million in rate credits provided to the customers of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas as conditions of the Merger, $20 million
for additional compensation-related expenses, and $3 million for financial advisory fees, legal expenses, and other Merger-related
costs.
II-178
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, Merger-related expenses were $56 million, including
$31 million for financial advisory fees, legal expenses, and other Merger-related costs, and $25 million for additional
compensation-related expenses.
See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" for additional
information.
Earnings from Equity Method Investments
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, earnings from equity method investments increased $42 million, or 39.6%,
compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to higher earnings from Southern Company Gas' equity method
investment in SNG from new rates effective September 2018 and lower operations and maintenance expenses due to the timing of
pipeline maintenance.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017, earnings from equity method investments were $106 million, reflecting $88
million in earnings from Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG, including $33 million related to a non-cash charge recorded
by SNG to establish a regulatory liability associated with the Tax Reform Legislation, and $18 million in earnings from all other
investments.
For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, earnings from equity method investments were $60 million,
reflecting $56 million in earnings from Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG and $4 million in earnings from all other
investments.
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, earnings from equity method investments were not material.
See Notes 7 and 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments – SNG" and "Southern
Company Gas – Investment in SNG," respectively, for additional information on Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG.
Interest Expense, Net of Amounts Capitalized
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized increased $28 million, or 14.0%,
compared to the prior year. The increase was primarily due to $21 million of additional interest expense related to new debt
issuances and a $4 million reduction in capitalized interest primarily due to the Dalton Pipeline being placed in service in August
2017.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized was $200 million, which includes the
$38 million fair value adjustment on long-term debt in acquisition accounting. Interest expense also reflects debt issuances and
redemptions during the period and the recognition of previously deferred interest related to regulatory infrastructure programs.
For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized was $81 million,
which includes the $19 million fair value adjustment on long-term debt in acquisition accounting. Interest expense also reflects debt
issuances and redemptions during the period and the recognition of previously deferred interest related to regulatory infrastructure
programs.
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, interest expense, net of amounts capitalized was $96 million,
reflecting debt issuances and redemptions during the period and the recognition of previously deferred interest related to regulatory
infrastructure programs.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Regulatory Matters – Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts" herein for additional
information on the unrecognized costs related to the infrastructure programs. Also see FINANCIAL CONDITION AND
LIQUIDITY – "Financing Activities" herein and Note 8 to the financial statements for additional information on outstanding debt.
Other Income (Expense), Net
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, other income (expense), net decreased $43 million, or 97.7%, compared to the
prior year. Excluding a $3 million decrease related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, other income (expense), net
decreased $40 million. This decrease was primarily due to a $23 million increase in charitable donations and a $13 million decrease
in gains from the settlement of contractor litigation claims.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017, other income (expense), net was $44 million and primarily related to a $20
million gain from the settlement of contractor litigation claims, $8 million of AFUDC, a $6 million tax gross-up on contributions
II-179
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
in aid of construction, and $4 million of interest income. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas –
PRP Settlement" for additional information on contractor litigation claims.
For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, other income (expense), net was $12 million and primarily
related to the tax gross-up of contributions in aid of construction received from customers.
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, other income (expense), net was not material.
Income Taxes
For the successor year ended December 31, 2018, income taxes increased $97 million, or 26.4%, compared to the prior year.
Excluding a $329 million increase related to the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, including tax expense on the goodwill for
which a deferred tax liability had not been previously provided, income taxes decreased $232 million. This decrease was primarily
due to a lower federal income tax rate and the flowback of excess deferred taxes as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. In
addition, 2017 included additional tax expense of $130 million from the revaluation of deferred tax assets associated with the Tax
Reform Legislation, the enactment of the State of Illinois income tax legislation, and new income tax apportionment factors in
several states.
For the successor year ended December 31, 2017, income taxes were $367 million. The effective tax rate in 2017 reflects additional
expense from the revaluation of deferred tax assets of $93 million associated with the Tax Reform Legislation and $37 million
associated with State of Illinois income tax legislation enacted in the third quarter 2017 and new income tax apportionment factors
in several states resulting from Southern Company Gas' inclusion in the consolidated Southern Company state tax filings.
For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016 and the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June
30, 2016, income taxes were $76 million and $87 million, respectively. The effective tax rates during these periods reflect certain
nondeductible Merger-related expenses.
See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional
information.
Effects of Inflation
Southern Company Gas is subject to rate regulation that is generally based on the recovery of historical and projected costs. The
effects of inflation can create an economic loss since the recovery of costs could be in dollars that have less purchasing power. Any
adverse effect of inflation on Southern Company Gas' results of operations has not been substantial in recent years.
Performance and Non-GAAP Measures
Prior to the Merger, Southern Company Gas evaluated segment performance using EBIT, which includes operating income,
earnings from equity method investments, and other income (expense), net. EBIT excludes interest expense, net of amounts
capitalized and income taxes (benefit), which were evaluated on a consolidated basis for those periods. EBIT is used herein to
discuss the results of Southern Company Gas' segments for the predecessor period as EBIT was the primary measure of segment
profit or loss for that period. Subsequent to the Merger, Southern Company Gas changed its segment performance measure from
EBIT to net income to better align with the performance measure utilized by Southern Company. EBIT for the successor periods
presented herein is considered a non-GAAP measure. Southern Company Gas presents consolidated EBIT, which is considered a
non-GAAP measure for all periods presented. The presentation of consolidated EBIT is believed to provide useful supplemental
information regarding a consolidated measure of profit or loss. Southern Company Gas further believes the presentation of segment
EBIT for the successor periods is useful as it allows for a measure of comparability to other companies with different capital and
legal structures, which accordingly may be subject to different interest rates and effective tax rates. The applicable reconciliations
of net income to consolidated EBIT and segment EBIT are provided herein.
Adjusted operating margin is a non-GAAP measure that is calculated as operating revenues less cost of natural gas, cost of other
sales, and revenue tax expense. Adjusted operating margin excludes other operations and maintenance expenses, depreciation and
amortization, taxes other than income taxes, goodwill impairment, gain on dispositions, net, and Merger-related expenses, which
are included in the calculation of operating income as calculated in accordance with GAAP and reflected in the statements of
income. The presentation of adjusted operating margin is believed to provide useful information regarding the contribution
resulting from base rate changes, infrastructure replacement programs and capital projects, and customer growth at gas distribution
operations since the cost of natural gas and revenue tax expense can vary significantly and are generally billed directly to
customers. Southern Company Gas further believes that utilizing adjusted operating margin at gas pipeline investments, wholesale
gas services, and gas marketing services allows it to focus on a direct measure of performance before overhead costs. The
applicable reconciliation of operating income to adjusted operating margin is provided herein.
II-180
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
EBIT and adjusted operating margin should not be considered alternatives to, or more meaningful indicators of, Southern Company
Gas' operating performance than net income attributable to Southern Company Gas or operating income as determined in
accordance with GAAP. In addition, Southern Company Gas' adjusted operating margin may not be comparable to similarly titled
measures of other companies.
Detailed variance explanations of Southern Company Gas' financial performance are provided herein.
Reconciliations of operating income to adjusted operating margin and net income attributable to Southern Company Gas to EBIT
are as follows:
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31, Year Ended
December 31,July 1, 2016
through
December 31, January 1, 2016
through
June 30,
 2018  2017 2016  2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Operating Income $ 915 $ 660$ 199 $ 323
Other operating expenses(a)1,443 1,630 830 813
Revenue taxes(b)(111) (98) (31) (56)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 2,247 $ 2,192$ 998 $ 1,080
(a)Includes other operations and maintenance, depreciation and amortization, taxes other than income taxes, goodwill impairment, gain on dispositions, net, and
Merger-related expenses.
(b)Nicor Gas' revenue tax expenses, which are passed through directly to customers.
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31, Year Ended
December 31, July 1, 2016
through
December 31, January 1, 2016
through
June 30,
 2018  2017  2016  2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Net Income Attributable to Southern Company Gas $ 372 $ 243 $ 114 $ 131
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interest — — — 14
Income taxes 464 367 76 87
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized 228 200 81 96
EBIT $ 1,064 $ 810 $ 271 $ 328
II-181
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Segment Information
Adjusted operating margin, operating expenses, and Southern Company Gas' primary performance metric for each segment are
illustrated in the tables below.
 Successor
 Year ended December 31, 2018 Year ended December 31, 2017
  Adjusted
Operating
Margin(a) Operating
Expenses(a)(b)Net
Income
(Loss)(b) Adjusted
Operating
Margin(a)Operating
Expenses(a) Net
Income
(Loss)
 (in millions) (in millions)
Gas distribution operations $ 1,794 $ 890$ 334$ 1,834$ 1,189 $ 353
Gas pipeline investments 32 12 103 17 7 (22)
Wholesale gas services 134 64 38 5 56 (57)
Gas marketing services 263 244 (40) 313 200 84
All other 33 131 (63) 35 92 (115)
Intercompany eliminations (9) (9) — (12) (12) —
Consolidated $ 2,247 $ 1,332$ 372$ 2,192$ 1,532 $ 243
(a)Adjusted operating margin and operating expenses are adjusted for Nicor Gas' revenue tax expenses, which are passed through directly to customers.
(b)Operating expenses for gas distribution operations and gas marketing services include the gain on dispositions, net. Net income for gas distribution operations
and gas marketing services includes the gain on dispositions, net and the associated income tax expense. See Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
 Successor  Predecessor
 July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016 January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016
 Adjusted
Operating
Margin(*)Operating
Expenses(*) Net Income
(Loss)  Adjusted
Operating
Margin(*) Operating
Expenses(*)EBIT
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Gas distribution operations $ 817$ 592 $ 77 $ 911 $ 558 $ 353
Gas pipeline investments 3 2 29 3 — 3
Wholesale gas services 24 26 — (36) 33 (68)
Gas marketing services 139 112 19 190 81 109
All other 19 71 (11) 16 89 (69)
Intercompany eliminations (4) (4) — (4) (4) —
Consolidated $ 998$ 799 $ 114 $ 1,080 $ 757 $ 328
(*)Adjusted operating margin and operating expenses are adjusted for Nicor Gas' revenue tax expenses, which are passed through directly to customers.
Gas Distribution Operations
Gas distribution operations is the largest component of Southern Company Gas' business and is subject to regulation and oversight
by agencies in each of the states it serves. These agencies approve natural gas rates designed to provide Southern Company Gas
with the opportunity to generate revenues to recover the cost of natural gas delivered to its customers and its fixed and variable
costs, including depreciation, interest, operations and maintenance, taxes, and overhead costs, and to earn a reasonable return on its
investments.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, Southern Company Gas' second largest utility that operates in a deregulated natural gas
market and has a straight-fixed-variable rate design that minimizes the variability of its revenues based on consumption, the
earnings of the natural gas distribution utilities can be affected by customer consumption patterns that are a function of weather
conditions, price levels for natural gas, and general economic conditions that may impact customers' ability to pay for natural gas
consumed. Southern Company Gas has various weather mechanisms, such as weather normalization mechanisms and weather
derivative instruments, that limit its exposure to weather changes within typical ranges in its natural gas distribution utilities'
service territories.
II-182
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
On July 1, 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings, completed the sales of the assets of two of its
natural gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey Industries, Inc. On July 29, 2018, Southern
Company Gas and its wholly-owned direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the sale of Pivotal Utility Holdings, which
primarily consisted of Florida City Gas, to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company
Gas" for additional information.
2018 vs. 2017
Net income decreased $19 million, or 5.4%, compared to the prior year, which includes a $40 million decrease in adjusted
operating margin, a $299 million decrease in operating expenses, and a $22 million decrease in other income (expense), net
resulting in a $237 million increase in EBIT. The decrease in net income also includes a $25 million increase in interest expense,
net of amounts capitalized and a $231 million increase in income tax expense.
Excluding a $90 million decrease attributable to the utilities sold during 2018, adjusted operating margin increased $50 million,
which primarily reflects additional revenue from infrastructure investments and colder weather in 2018, partially offset by lower
rates and revenue deferrals for regulatory liabilities associated with the Tax Reform Legislation impacts. Excluding a $391 million
decrease attributable to the utilities sold during 2018 that includes the related gains on the sales, operating expenses increased $92
million. This increase reflects $40 million of additional depreciation primarily due to additional assets placed in service, $37
million of additional other operations and maintenance expenses primarily due to increased compensation and benefit costs,
partially offset by a decrease in bad debt expense, and $15 million of additional taxes other than income taxes primarily due to a
$12 million increase in Nicor Gas' invested capital tax. Excluding a $3 million decrease attributable to the utilities sold during
2018, other income (expense), net decreased $20 million, which primarily reflects a $13 million decrease in gains from the
settlement of contractor litigation claims. The increase in interest expense reflects $14 million of additional interest expense
primarily from the issuance of first mortgage bonds at Nicor Gas. Excluding a $290 million decrease attributable to the utilities sold
in 2018, income tax expense decreased $59 million, primarily due to lower pretax earnings, a lower federal income tax rate, and the
flowback of excess deferred taxes as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation.
Successor Year Ended December 31, 2017
Net income of $353 million includes $1.8 billion in adjusted operating margin, $1.2 billion in operating expenses, and $39 million
in other income (expense), net, which resulted in EBIT of $684 million. Net income also includes $153 million in interest expense,
net of amounts capitalized and $178 million in income tax expense. Adjusted operating margin reflects $99 million in additional
revenue from continued investment in infrastructure replacement programs and base rate increases at Atlanta Gas Light,
Elizabethtown Gas, and Virginia Natural Gas. Adjusted operating margin was also affected by increased customer growth, partially
offset by the negative impact of warmer-than-normal weather, net of hedging. Operating expenses reflect a $28 million increase in
depreciation associated with additional assets placed in service, as well as benefit and compensation costs, legal expenses, and
pipeline compliance and maintenance expenses. Other income (expense), net reflects a $20 million gain from the settlement of
contractor litigation claims. Interest expense reflects the impact of intercompany promissory notes executed in December 2016 and
the issuance of first mortgage bonds at Nicor Gas in August 2017 and November 2017. Income tax expense includes a $22 million
benefit as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation.
See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – PRP Settlement" for additional information on contractor
litigation claims. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Financing Activities" herein and Note 8 to the financial
statements for additional information on debt issuances. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein
and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Successor Period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016
Net income of $77 million includes $817 million in adjusted operating margin, $592 million in operating expenses, and $8 million
in other income (expense), net, resulting in EBIT of $233 million. Net income also includes $105 million in interest expense, net of
amounts capitalized and $51 million in income tax expense. Adjusted operating margin reflects revenue from continued investment
in infrastructure replacement programs, partially offset by the impact of warm weather, net of hedging. Operating expenses reflect
the depreciation associated with additional assets placed in service, the related expenses associated with pipeline compliance and
maintenance activities, and $18 million of rate credits provided to the customers of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas as
conditions of the Merger. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas"
for additional information.
II-183
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Predecessor Period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016
EBIT of $353 million includes $911 million in adjusted operating margin and $558 million in operating expense. Adjusted
operating margin reflects increased revenue from continued investment in infrastructure replacement programs and the impact of
customer usage and growth, partially offset by the impact of warm weather, net of hedging. Operating expenses reflect the
depreciation associated with additional assets placed in service.
Gas Pipeline Investments
Gas pipeline investments consists primarily of joint ventures in natural gas pipeline investments including SNG, Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, PennEast Pipeline, and Dalton Pipeline. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for
additional information.
2018 vs. 2017
Net income increased $125 million compared to the prior year, which includes a $15 million increase in adjusted operating margin
primarily due to the Dalton Pipeline being placed in service in August 2017, a $5 million increase in operating expenses primarily
due to increased depreciation and property tax expense related to the Dalton Pipeline, and a $42 million increase in earnings from
equity method investments primarily at SNG, resulting in a $52 million increase in EBIT. The increase in net income also includes
an $8 million increase in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized primarily due to a reduction in capitalized interest after the
Dalton Pipeline was placed in service and an $81 million decrease in income tax expense primarily due to a lower federal income
tax rate in 2018 and additional tax expense recorded in 2017 associated with the Tax Reform Legislation, partially offset by higher
pretax earnings.
Successor Year Ended December 31, 2017
Net loss of $22 million includes $17 million in adjusted operating margin, $7 million in operating expenses, and $103 million in
earnings from equity method investments, consisting primarily of Southern Company Gas' equity interest in SNG, including $33
million related to a non-cash charge recorded by SNG to establish a regulatory liability associated with the Tax Reform Legislation,
which resulted in EBIT of $113 million. Also included in net income are $26 million in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized
and $109 million in income tax expense. Income tax expense includes $66 million resulting from the revaluation of deferred
income tax assets associated with the Tax Reform Legislation and $7 million related to the allocation of new income tax
apportionment factors in several states resulting from Southern Company Gas' inclusion in the consolidated Southern Company
state tax filings. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements
for additional information.
Successor Period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016
Net income of $29 million includes $3 million in adjusted operating margin, $2 million in operating expenses, and $59 million in
earnings from equity method investments, consisting primarily of Southern Company Gas' 2016 acquired equity interest in SNG,
resulting in EBIT of $60 million. Also included in net income are $10 million in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized and
$21 million in income tax expense.
Predecessor Period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016
Earnings before interest and taxes for the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016 was $3 million.
Wholesale Gas Services
Wholesale gas services is involved in asset management and optimization, storage, transportation, producer and peaking services,
natural gas supply, natural gas services, and wholesale gas marketing. Southern Company Gas has positioned the business to
generate positive economic earnings on an annual basis even under low volatility market conditions that can result from a number
of factors. When market price volatility increases, wholesale gas services is well positioned to capture significant value and
generate stronger results. Operating expenses primarily reflect employee compensation and benefits.
2018 vs. 2017
Net income increased $95 million, or 166.7%, compared to the prior year, which includes a $129 million increase in adjusted
operating margin, an $8 million increase in operating expenses, a $1 million increase in interest income, and a $21 million decrease
in other income (expense), net resulting in a $101 million increase in EBIT. The increase in net income also includes a $2 million
increase in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized and a $4 million increase in income tax expense. Details of the increase in
adjusted operating margin are provided in the table below. The increase in operating expenses primarily reflects higher
II-184
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
compensation and benefit expense. The decrease in other income (expense), net primarily reflects increased charitable donations.
The increase in income tax expense reflects higher pretax earnings, partially offset by a lower federal income tax rate.
Successor Year Ended December 31, 2017
Net loss of $57 million includes $5 million in adjusted operating margin, $56 million in operating expenses, and $1 million in other
income (expense), net, which resulted in a loss before interest and taxes of $50 million. Also included are $7 million in interest
expense, net of amounts capitalized. Adjusted operating margin reflects a decrease of $21 million due to fair value adjustments to
certain assets and liabilities in the application of acquisition accounting. Also reflected in adjusted operating margin is revenue
from commercial activity partially offset by mark-to-market losses. Income tax expense includes $21 million resulting from the
revaluation of deferred income tax assets associated with the Tax Reform Legislation. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL –
"Income Tax Matters" herein and Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Successor Period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016
Net income includes $24 million in adjusted operating margin, $26 million in operating expenses, and $2 million in other income
(expense), net, resulting in no EBIT. Also included are $3 million in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized and $3 million in
income tax benefit. Adjusted operating margin reflects a decrease of $5 million due to fair value adjustments to certain assets and
liabilities in the application of acquisition accounting. Also reflected in adjusted operating margin are mark-to-market gains due to
changes in natural gas prices in the fourth quarter 2016 and losses from commercial activity due to low volatility in natural gas
prices and warm weather. Operating expenses reflect low incentive compensation expense due to low earnings.
Predecessor Period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016
Loss before interest and taxes of $68 million includes $(36) million in adjusted operating margin, $33 million in operating expense,
and $1 million in other income (expense), net. Adjusted operating margin reflects mark-to-market losses and LOCOM adjustments
as a result of changes in natural gas prices and revenues from commercial activity driven by changes in price volatility. Operating
expenses reflect lower incentive compensation expense as compared to the same period in the prior year due to lower earnings.
The following table illustrates the components of wholesale gas services' adjusted operating margin for the periods presented:
 Successor   Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,Year Ended
December 31,July 1, 2016
through
December 31,  January 1, 2016
through
June 30,
 2018 2017  2016   2016
 (in millions)   (in millions)
Commercial activity recognized $ 254$ 116$ (15)  $ 34
Gain (loss) on storage derivatives 9 23 (20)  (38)
Gain (loss) on transportation and forward
commodity derivatives (119) (113) 64  (31)
LOCOM adjustments, net of current period
recoveries (7) — —  (1)
Purchase accounting adjustments to fair value
inventory and contracts (3) (21) (5)  —
Adjusted operating margin $ 134$ 5$ 24  $ (36)
Change in Commercial Activity
The commercial activity at wholesale gas services includes recognition of storage and transportation values that were generated in
prior periods, which reflect the impact of prior period hedge gains and losses as associated physical transactions occur. The increase
in commercial activity in 2018 compared to the prior year was primarily due to natural gas price volatility that was generated by
favorable weather and a corresponding increase in power generation volumes coupled with decreased natural gas supply.
Change in Storage and Transportation Derivatives
Volatility in the natural gas market arises from a number of factors, such as weather fluctuations or changes in supply or demand
for natural gas in different regions of the U.S. The volatility of natural gas commodity prices has a significant impact on Southern
Company Gas' customer rates, long-term competitive position against other energy sources, and the ability of wholesale gas
II-185
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
services to capture value from locational and seasonal spreads. Forward storage or time spreads applicable to the locations of
wholesale gas services' specific storage positions in 2018 resulted in storage derivative gains. Transportation and forward
commodity losses in 2018 are primarily the result of widening transportation spreads due to favorable weather, which impacted
forward prices at natural gas receipt and delivery points primarily in the Northeast and Midwest regions.
The natural gas that Southern Company Gas purchases and injects into storage is accounted for at the LOCOM value utilizing gas
daily or spot prices at the end of the year. A LOCOM adjustment, net of current period recoveries of $7 million, was recorded
during 2018 and LOCOM adjustments for all other periods presented were immaterial. See Note 1 to the financial statements under
"Natural Gas for Sale" for additional information.
Withdrawal Schedule and Physical Transportation Transactions
The expected natural gas withdrawals from storage and expected offset to prior hedge losses/gains associated with the
transportation portfolio of wholesale gas services are presented in the following table, along with the net operating revenues
expected at the time of withdrawal from storage and the physical flow of natural gas between contracted transportation receipt and
delivery points. Wholesale gas services' expected net operating revenues exclude storage and transportation demand charges, as
well as other variable fuel, withdrawal, receipt, and delivery charges, and exclude estimated profit sharing under asset management
agreements. Further, the amounts that are realizable in future periods are based on the inventory withdrawal schedule, planned
physical flow of natural gas between the transportation receipt and delivery points, and forward natural gas prices at December 31,
2018. A portion of wholesale gas services' storage inventory and transportation capacity is economically hedged with futures
contracts, which results in the realization of substantially fixed net operating revenues.
 Storage Withdrawal   
 Total storage(a) Expected net operating
losses(b) Physical Transportation Transactions –
Expected Net Operating Gains(c)
 (in mmBtu in millions) (in millions)  (in millions)
2019 48 $ (8) $ 12
2020 and thereafter — — 107
Total at December 31, 2018 48 $ (8) $ 119
(a)At December 31, 2018, the WACOG of wholesale gas services' expected natural gas withdrawals from storage was $2.90 per mmBtu.
(b)Represents expected operating losses from planned storage withdrawals associated with existing inventory positions and could change as wholesale gas services
adjusts its daily injection and withdrawal plans in response to changes in future market conditions and forward NYMEX price fluctuations.
(c)Represents the periods associated with the transportation derivative net gains during which the derivatives will be settled and the physical transportation
transactions will occur that offset the derivative gains and losses that were previously recognized.
Gas Marketing Services
Gas marketing services provides energy-related products and services to natural gas markets and participants in customer choice
programs that were approved in various states to increase competition. These programs allow customers to choose their natural gas
supplier while the local distribution utility continues to provide distribution and transportation services. Gas marketing services is
weather sensitive and uses a variety of hedging strategies, such as weather derivative instruments and other risk management tools,
to partially mitigate potential weather impacts.
On June 4, 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water Enterprises LLC. See
Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional information.
2018 vs. 2017
Net income decreased $124 million, or 147.6%, compared to the prior year, which includes a $50 million decrease in adjusted
operating margin, a $44 million increase in operating expenses, and a $1 million increase in other income (expense), net resulting
in a $93 million decrease in EBIT. The decrease in net income also includes a $1 million increase in interest expense, net of
amounts capitalized and a $30 million increase in income tax expense.
Excluding a $57 million decrease attributable to Pivotal Home Solutions, adjusted operating margin increased $7 million, which
primarily reflects colder weather in 2018, customer growth, and favorable retail price spreads. Excluding a $42 million increase
attributable to Pivotal Home Solutions that includes the loss on disposition and the goodwill impairment charge, operating expense
increased $2 million. Excluding a $39 million increase attributable to Pivotal Home Solutions, income tax expense decreased $9
million driven by a lower federal income tax rate, partially offset by higher pretax earnings.
II-186
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Successor Year Ended December 31, 2017
Net income of $84 million includes $313 million in adjusted operating margin and $200 million in operating expenses, which
resulted in EBIT of $113 million. Net income also includes $5 million in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized and $24
million in income tax expense. Adjusted operating margin reflects a $9 million negative impact of warmer-than-normal weather, net
of hedging, and $4 million in unrealized hedge losses, net of recoveries. Operating expenses includes $40 million in additional
amortization of intangible assets established in the application of acquisition accounting. Income tax expense includes a $19 million
benefit as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and
Note 10 to the financial statements for additional information.
Successor Period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016
Net income of $19 million includes $139 million in adjusted operating margin and $112 million in operating expenses, resulting in
EBIT of $27 million Net income also includes $1 million in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized and $7 million in income
tax expense. Adjusted operating margin reflects a reduction of $5 million due to fair value adjustments to certain assets and
liabilities in the application of acquisition accounting. Also reflected in adjusted operating margin are unrealized hedge gains and
LOCOM adjustments. Operating expenses reflect $23 million in additional amortization of intangible assets, partially offset by a $2
million reduction in operations and maintenance expenses due to fair value adjustments to certain assets and liabilities in the
application of acquisition accounting. See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Natural Gas for Sale" for additional
information on LOCOM adjustments and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern
Company Gas" for additional information on the Merger.
Predecessor Period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016
EBIT of $109 million includes $190 million in adjusted operating margin and $81 million in operating expenses. Adjusted
operating margin reflects $9 million in unrealized hedge gains. Operating expenses reflect lower bad debt, marketing, and
depreciation and amortization, compared to the same period in the prior year. Earnings also include $14 million attributable to
noncontrolling interest.
All Other
All other includes Southern Company Gas' storage and fuels operations and its investment in Triton, AGL Services Company, and
Southern Company Gas Capital, as well as various corporate operating expenses that are not allocated to the reportable segments
and interest income (expense) associated with affiliate financing arrangements.
2018 vs. 2017
Net loss decreased $52 million, or 45.2%, compared to the prior year, which includes a $2 million decrease in adjusted operating
margin, a $39 million increase in operating expenses, a $3 million increase in interest income, and a $5 million decrease in other
income (expense), net resulting in a $43 million decrease in EBIT. The decrease in net loss also includes an $8 million decrease in
interest expense, net of amounts capitalized and an $87 million decrease in income tax expense. The increase in operating expenses
primarily reflects a $28 million increase in disposition-related costs and a $12 million increase in compensation expenses resulting
from the adoption of a new paid time off policy. The decrease in income tax expense primarily reflects the 2017 increase in income
tax expense related to the revaluation of deferred tax assets associated with the Tax Reform Legislation, the enactment of the State
of Illinois income tax legislation, new income tax apportionment factors in several states, and a lower federal income tax rate in
2018. The decrease also reflects lower pretax earnings in 2018 compared to 2017.
Successor Year Ended December 31, 2017
Net loss of $115 million includes $35 million in adjusted operating margin and $92 million in operating expenses. Operating
expenses included $26 million of integration-related costs. Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized was $9 million due to
intercompany promissory notes that were executed in December 2016. Income tax expense was $56 million and includes $46
million resulting from the revaluation of deferred tax assets associated with the Tax Reform Legislation and $30 million associated
with State of Illinois tax legislation enacted during the third quarter 2017 and new income tax apportionment factors in several
states resulting from Southern Company Gas' inclusion in the consolidated Southern Company state tax filings, partially offset by
income tax benefit on the pre-tax loss. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Financing Activities" herein for
additional financing information and FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" herein and Note 10 to the
financial statements for additional information.
II-187
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Successor Period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016
Operating expenses included Merger-related expenses of $41 million primarily comprised of compensation-related expenses,
financial advisory fees, legal expenses, and other Merger-related costs and $8 million in expenses associated with certain benefit
arrangements.
Predecessor Period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, operating expenses included Merger-related expenses of $56
million. These expenses are primarily comprised of financial advisory and legal expenses as well as additional compensation-
related expenses, including acceleration of share-based compensation expenses, and change-in-control compensation charges. See
Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Segment Reconciliations
Reconciliations of net income attributable to Southern Company Gas to EBIT for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 and
the period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, and operating income to adjusted operating margin for all periods presented,
are in the following tables. See Note 16 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional segment
information.
 Successor
 Year Ended December  31, 2018
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas ServicesGas
Marketing
ServicesAll
OtherInter company
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable
to Southern Company Gas $ 334$ 103$ 38$ (40)$(63)$ —$ 372
Income taxes (benefit) 409 28 4 54 (31) — 464
Interest expense, net of amounts
capitalized 178 34 9 6 1 — 228
EBIT $ 921$ 165$ 51$ 20$(93)$ —$ 1,064
 Successor
 Year Ended December 31, 2017
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas ServicesGas Marketing
ServicesAll
OtherIntercompany
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable
to Southern Company Gas $ 353$ (22)$ (57)$ 84$(115)$ —$ 243
Income taxes 178 109 — 24 56 — 367
Interest expense, net of amounts
capitalized 153 26 7 5 9 — 200
EBIT $ 684$ 113$ (50)$ 113$(50)$ —$ 810
II-188
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Successor
 July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas ServicesGas Marketing
ServicesAll
OtherIntercompany
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable
to Southern Company Gas $ 77$ 29$ —$ 19$(11)$ —$ 114
Income taxes (benefit) 51 21 (3) 7 — — 76
Interest expense, net of amounts
capitalized 105 10 3 1 (38) — 81
EBIT $ 233$ 60$ —$ 27$(49)$ —$ 271
 Successor
 Year Ended December 31, 2018
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas
ServicesGas
Marketing
Services All OtherInter company
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Operating Income (Loss) $ 904$ 20$ 70$ 19$ (98)$ — $ 915
Other operating expenses(a)1,001 12 64 244 131 (9) 1,443
Revenue tax expense(b)(111) — — — — — (111)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 1,794$ 32$ 134$ 263$ 33$ (9)$ 2,247
 Successor
 Year Ended December 31, 2017
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas ServicesGas
Marketing
Services All OtherIntercompany
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Operating Income (Loss) $ 645$ 10$ (51)$ 113$ (57)$ —$ 660
Other operating expenses(a)1,287 7 56 200 92 (12) 1,630
Revenue tax expense(b)(98) — — — — — (98)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 1,834$ 17$ 5$ 313$ 35$ (12)$ 2,192
 Successor
 July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas ServicesGas
Marketing
Services All OtherIntercompany
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Operating Income (Loss) $ 225$ 1$ (2)$ 27$ (52)$ — $ 199
Other operating expenses(a)623 2 26 112 71 (4) 830
Revenue tax expense(b)(31) — — — — — (31)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 817$ 3$ 24$ 139$ 19$ (4)$ 998
II-189
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Predecessor
 January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016
 Gas
Distribution
OperationsGas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas ServicesGas
Marketing
Services All OtherIntercompany
Elimination Consolidated
 (in millions)
Operating Income (Loss) $ 353$ 3$ (69)$ 109$ (73)$ — $ 323
Other operating expenses(a)614 — 33 81 89 (4) 813
Revenue tax expense(b)(56) — — — — — (56)
Adjusted Operating Margin $ 911$ 3$ (36)$ 190$ 16$ (4)$ 1,080
(a)Includes other operations and maintenance, depreciation and amortization, taxes other than income taxes, goodwill impairment, gain on dispositions, net, and
Merger-related expenses.
(b)Nicor Gas' revenue tax expenses, which are passed through directly to customers.
FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL
General
The results of operations for the past three years are not necessarily indicative of future earnings potential. The Southern Company
Gas Dispositions are expected to materially decrease future earnings and cash flows to Southern Company Gas. For the year ended
December 31, 2018, pre-tax earnings attributable to these dispositions were $297 million, which includes a $291 million gain on
dispositions, net and a $42 million goodwill impairment. For the year ended December 31, 2017, net income attributable to these
dispositions was $71 million, which included additional tax expense of $16 million associated with the Tax Reform Legislation.
Due to the seasonal nature of the natural gas business and other factors including, but not limited to, weather, regulation,
competition, customer demand, and general economic conditions, these results are not necessarily indicative of the results to be
expected for any other period. The level of Southern Company Gas' future earnings depends on numerous factors that affect the
opportunities, challenges, and risks of Southern Company Gas' primary business of natural gas distribution and its complementary
businesses in the gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services sectors. These factors include
Southern Company Gas' ability to maintain constructive regulatory environments that allow for the timely recovery of prudently-
incurred costs, the completion and subsequent operation of ongoing infrastructure and other construction projects, creditworthiness
of customers, its ability to optimize its transportation and storage positions, and its ability to re-contract storage rates at favorable
prices.
Future earnings will be driven by customer growth and are subject to a variety of other factors. These factors include weather,
competition, new energy contracts with other utilities and other wholesale customers, energy conservation practiced by customers,
the use of alternative energy sources by customers, the price of natural gas, the price elasticity of demand, and the rate of economic
growth or decline in Southern Company Gas' service territories. Demand for natural gas is primarily driven by the pace of
economic growth that may be affected by changes in regional and global economic conditions, which may impact future earnings.
Volatility of natural gas prices has a significant impact on Southern Company Gas' customer rates, its long-term competitive
position against other energy sources, and the ability of its gas marketing services and wholesale gas services segments to capture
value from locational and seasonal spreads. Additionally, changes in commodity prices subject a significant portion of Southern
Company Gas' operations to earnings variability. Over the longer term, volatility is expected to be low to moderate and locational
and/or transportation spreads are expected to decrease as new pipelines are built to reduce the existing supply constraints in the
shale areas of the Northeast U.S. To the extent these pipelines are delayed or not built, volatility could increase. See "FERC
Matters" herein for additional information on permitting challenges experienced by the Atlantic Coast Pipeline. Additional
economic factors may contribute to this environment, including a significant drop in oil and natural gas prices, which could lead to
consolidation of natural gas producers or reduced levels of natural gas production. Further, if economic conditions continue to
improve, the demand for natural gas may increase, which may cause natural gas prices to rise and drive higher volatility in the
natural gas markets on a longer-term basis.
As part of its business strategy, Southern Company Gas regularly considers and evaluates joint development arrangements as well
as acquisitions and dispositions of businesses and assets.
•On June 4, 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the stock sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water
Enterprises LLC. Southern Company Gas and American Water Enterprises LLC entered into a transition services
II-190
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
agreement whereby Southern Company Gas provided certain administrative and operational services through November 4,
2018.
•On July 1, 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings, completed the sales of the assets of two of
its natural gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey Industries, Inc. Southern Company
Gas and South Jersey Industries, Inc. entered into transition services agreements whereby Southern Company Gas will
provide certain administrative and operational services through no later than July 31, 2020.
•On July 29, 2018, Southern Company Gas and its wholly-owned direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the stock
sale of Pivotal Utility Holdings, which primarily consisted of Florida City Gas, to NextEra Energy. Southern Company
Gas and NextEra Energy entered into a transition services agreement whereby Southern Company Gas will provide certain
administrative and operational services through no later than July 29, 2020.
See OVERVIEW – "Merger, Acquisition, and Disposition Activities" herein and Note 15 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company Gas" for additional information on these dispositions. See BUSINESS – "Seasonality" in Item 1, RISK
FACTORS in Item 1A, and OVERVIEW – "Seasonality of Results" for additional information on seasonality.
Environmental Matters
Southern Company Gas' operations are regulated by state and federal environmental agencies through a variety of laws and
regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Southern Company Gas maintains a comprehensive
environmental compliance strategy to assess upcoming requirements and compliance costs associated with these environmental
laws and regulations. The costs, including capital expenditures and operations and maintenance costs, required to comply with
environmental laws and regulations may impact future results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition. A major portion of
these compliance costs are expected to be recovered through customer rates. The ultimate impact of the environmental laws and
regulations discussed herein will depend on various factors, such as state adoption and implementation of requirements and the
outcome of pending and/or future legal challenges.
New or revised environmental laws and regulations could affect many areas of Southern Company Gas' operations. The impact of
any such changes cannot be determined at this time. Environmental compliance costs could affect earnings if such costs cannot
continue to be recovered in rates on a timely basis. Further, increased costs that are recovered through regulated rates could
contribute to reduced demand for natural gas, which could negatively affect results of operations, cash flows, and/or financial
condition. Additionally, many commercial and industrial customers may also be affected by existing and future environmental
requirements, which for some may have the potential to ultimately affect their demand for natural gas.
Environmental Remediation
Southern Company Gas is subject to environmental remediation liabilities associated with 40 former MGP sites in four different
states. Southern Company Gas conducts studies to determine the extent of any required cleanup and has recognized the costs to
clean up known impacted sites in its financial statements. An accrued environmental remediation liability of $294 million was
included in the balance sheets at December 31, 2018, of which $26 million is expected to be incurred over the next 12 months. The
accrued environmental remediation liability decreased at December 31, 2018 primarily due to the disposition of $85 million that
related to Elizabethtown Gas. The natural gas distribution utilities in Illinois and Georgia have received authority from their
respective state regulators to recover approved environmental compliance costs through regulatory mechanisms, which covers
substantially all of the total accrued remediation costs. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Capital Requirements
and Contractual Obligations" herein and Note 3 to the financial statements under "Environmental Remediation" for additional
information.
Water Quality
In 2015, the EPA and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers (Corps) jointly published a final rule that revised the regulatory definition
of waters of the United States (WOTUS) for all Clean Water Act programs. The rule significantly expanded the scope of federal
jurisdiction over waterbodies (such as rivers, streams, and canals), which could impact permitting and reporting requirements
associated with the installation, expansion, and maintenance of pipeline projects. The EPA and the Corps are expected to publish a
final rule in 2019 to replace the 2015 WOTUS definition. The impact of any changes to the 2015 WOTUS rule will depend on the
content of this final rule and the outcome of any legal challenges.
Global Climate Issues
The EPA's GHG reporting rule requires annual reporting of GHG emissions expressed in terms of metric tons of CO2 equivalent
emissions for a company's operational control of facilities. Based on ownership or financial control of facilities, Southern
II-191
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Company Gas' 2017 GHG emissions were approximately 0.6 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent. The preliminary estimate of
Southern Company Gas' 2018 GHG emissions on the same basis is approximately 0.6 million metric tons of CO2 equivalent.
FERC Matters
Southern Company Gas is involved in two significant pipeline construction projects within gas pipeline investments. These
projects, along with Southern Company Gas' existing pipelines, are intended to provide diverse sources of natural gas supplies to
customers, resolve current and long-term supply planning for new capacity, enhance system reliability, and generate economic
development in the areas served. The following table provides an overview of these pipeline projects.
 Miles of Pipe Capital
Expenditures(a) Ownership
Percentage
   (in millions)   
Atlantic Coast Pipeline(b)594 $ 350-390 5%
PennEast Pipeline(c)118 $ 276 20%
(a)Represents Southern Company Gas' expected total capital expenditures, excluding AFUDC, at completion, which may change.
(b)In 2014, Southern Company Gas entered into a joint venture to construct and operate a natural gas pipeline that will run from West Virginia through Virginia and
into eastern North Carolina to meet the region's growing demand for natural gas. The proposed pipeline project is expected to transport natural gas to customers
in Virginia. In August 2017, the Atlantic Coast Pipeline received FERC approval.
(c)In 2014, Southern Company Gas entered into a joint venture to construct and operate a natural gas pipeline that will transport low-cost natural gas from the
Marcellus Shale area to customers in New Jersey. Southern Company Gas believes this will alleviate takeaway constraints in the Marcellus region and help
mitigate some of the price volatility experienced during recent winters. On January 19, 2018, the PennEast Pipeline received FERC approval.
Work continues with state and federal agencies to obtain the required permits to begin construction on the PennEast Pipeline. Any
material delays may impact forecasted capital expenditures and the expected in-service date.
The Atlantic Coast Pipeline has experienced challenges to its permits since construction began in 2018. During the third and fourth
quarters 2018, a FERC stop work order, together with delays in obtaining permits necessary for construction and construction
delays due to judicial actions, impacted the cost and schedule for the project. As a result, total project cost estimates have increased
from between $6.0 billion and $6.5 billion to between $7.0 billion and $7.8 billion, excluding financing costs. Southern Company
Gas' share of the total project costs is 5% and Southern Company Gas' investment at December 31, 2018 totaled $83 million. The
operator of the joint venture currently expects to achieve a late 2020 in-service date for at least key segments of the Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, while the remainder may extend into early 2021. Southern Company Gas has evaluated the recoverability of its
investment and determined there was no impairment as of December 31, 2018. Abnormal weather, work delays (including due to
judicial or regulatory action), and other conditions may result in additional cost or schedule modifications, which could result in an
impairment of Southern Company Gas' investment and could have a material impact on Southern Company Gas' financial
statements.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. See Notes 7 and 9 to the financial statements under
"Southern Company Gas – Equity Method Investments" and "Guarantees," respectively, for additional information on these
pipeline projects.
In August 2017, the Dalton Pipeline, which serves as an extension of the Transco pipeline system and provides additional natural
gas supply to customers in Georgia, was placed in service. Southern Company Gas has a 50% ownership interest in the Dalton
Pipeline. See Note 5 to the financial statements under "Joint Ownership Agreements" for additional information.
On November 16, 2018, SNG completed its purchase of Georgia Power's natural gas lateral pipeline serving Plant McDonough
Units 4 through 6 at net book value, as approved by the Georgia PSC on January 16, 2018. SNG expects to pay $142 million to
Georgia Power in the first quarter 2020. During the interim period, Georgia Power will receive a discounted shipping rate to reflect
the delayed consideration. Southern Company Gas' portion of the expected capital expenditures for the purchase of this pipeline
and additional construction is $122 million.
Regulatory Matters
Utility Regulation and Rate Design
The natural gas distribution utilities are subject to regulations and oversight by their respective state regulatory agencies. Rates
charged to customers vary according to customer class (residential, commercial, or industrial) and rate jurisdiction. These agencies
approve rates designed to provide the opportunity to generate revenues to recover all prudently-incurred costs, including a return on
rate base sufficient to pay interest on debt and provide a reasonable ROE. Rate base generally consists of the original
II-192
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
cost of the utility plant in service, working capital, and certain other assets, less accumulated depreciation on the utility plant in
service and net deferred income tax liabilities, and may include certain other additions or deductions.
The natural gas market for Atlanta Gas Light was deregulated in 1997. Accordingly, Marketers, rather than a traditional utility, sell
natural gas to end-use customers in Georgia and handle customer billing functions. The Marketers file their rates monthly with the
Georgia PSC. As a result of operating in a deregulated environment, Atlanta Gas Light's role includes:
•distributing natural gas for Marketers;
•constructing, operating, and maintaining the gas system infrastructure, including responding to customer service calls and
leaks;
•reading meters and maintaining underlying customer premise information for Marketers; and
•planning and contracting for capacity on interstate transportation and storage systems.
Atlanta Gas Light earns revenue by charging rates to its customers based primarily on monthly fixed charges that are set by the
Georgia PSC and adjusted periodically. The Marketers add these fixed charges when billing customers. This mechanism, called a
straight-fixed-variable rate design, minimizes the seasonality of Atlanta Gas Light's revenues since the monthly fixed charge is not
volumetric or directly weather dependent.
Georgia Rate Adjustment Mechanism (GRAM)
In February 2017, the Georgia PSC approved GRAM and a $20 million increase in annual base rate revenues for Atlanta Gas Light,
effective March 1, 2017. GRAM adjusts base rates annually, up or down, using an earnings band based on the previously approved
ROE of 10.75% and does not collect revenue through special riders and surcharges. Atlanta Gas Light adjusts rates up to the lower
end of the band of 10.55% and adjusts rates down to the higher end of the band of 10.95%. Various infrastructure programs
previously authorized by the Georgia PSC under Atlanta Gas Light's STRIDE program including the Integrated Vintage Plastic
Replacement Program (i-VPR) to replace aging plastic pipe and the Integrated System Reinforcement Program (i-SRP) to upgrade
Atlanta Gas Light's distribution system and LNG facilities in Georgia continue under GRAM and the recovery of and return on the
infrastructure program investments are included in annual base rate adjustments. The Georgia PSC reviews Atlanta Gas Light's
performance annually under GRAM. See "Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information.
Pursuant to the GRAM approval, Atlanta Gas Light and the staff of the Georgia PSC agreed to a variation of the Integrated
Customer Growth Program to extend pipeline facilities to serve customers in areas without pipeline access and create new
economic development opportunities in Georgia, which was formerly part of the STRIDE program. As a result, a new tariff was
created, effective October 10, 2017, to provide up to $15 million annually for Atlanta Gas Light to commit to strategic economic
development projects. Projects under this tariff must be approved by the Georgia PSC.
PRP
In 2015, Atlanta Gas Light began recovering incremental PRP surcharge amounts through three phased-in increases in addition to
its already existing PRP surcharge amount, which was established to address recovery of the unrecovered PRP balance of $144
million and the estimated amounts to be earned under the program through 2025. The unrecovered balance is the result of the
continued revenue requirement earned under the program offset by the existing and incremental PRP surcharges. The under
recovered balance at December 31, 2018 was $171 million, including $95 million of unrecognized equity return. The PRP
surcharge will remain in effect until the earlier of the full recovery of the under recovered amount or December 31, 2025. See "Rate
Proceedings" and "Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts" herein for additional information.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the earnings of the natural gas distribution utilities can be affected by customer
consumption patterns that are largely a function of weather conditions and price levels for natural gas. Specifically, customer
demand substantially increases during the Heating Season when natural gas is used for heating purposes. Southern Company Gas
has various mechanisms, such as weather normalization mechanisms and weather derivative instruments, that limit exposure to
weather changes within typical ranges in these utilities' respective service territories.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the natural gas distribution utilities are authorized by the relevant regulatory agencies in
the states in which they serve to use natural gas cost recovery mechanisms that adjust rates to reflect changes in the wholesale cost
of natural gas and ensure recovery of all costs prudently incurred in purchasing natural gas for customers. Since Atlanta Gas Light
does not sell natural gas directly to its end-use customers, it does not utilize a traditional natural gas cost recovery mechanism.
However, Atlanta Gas Light does maintain natural gas inventory for the Marketers in Georgia and recovers the cost through
recovery mechanisms approved by the Georgia PSC specific to Georgia's deregulated market. In addition to natural gas recovery
mechanisms, there are other cost recovery mechanisms, such as regulatory riders, which vary by utility but allow recovery of
certain costs, such as those related to infrastructure replacement programs as well as environmental remediation and
II-193
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
energy efficiency plans. In traditional rate designs, utilities recover a significant portion of the fixed customer service and pipeline
infrastructure costs based on assumed natural gas volumes used by customers. With the exception of Nicor Gas, the utilities have
decoupled regulatory mechanisms that Southern Company Gas believes encourage conservation by separating the recoverable
amount of these fixed costs from the amounts of natural gas used by customers. Natural gas cost recovery revenues are adjusted for
differences in actual recoverable natural gas costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. Changes in the billing factor will
not have a significant effect on Southern Company Gas' revenues or net income, but will affect cash flows. See Note 2 to the
financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
The following table provides regulatory information for Southern Company Gas' natural gas distribution utilities:
 Nicor GasAtlanta Gas
Light  Virginia
Natural Gas Chattanooga
Gas
Authorized ROE(a)(b)9.80% 10.75%  9.50%  9.80%
Weather normalization mechanisms(c)   ü  ü
Decoupled, including straight-fixed-variable rates(d) ü  ü  
Regulatory infrastructure program rates(e)(f)ü  ü  
Bad debt rider(g)ü   ü  ü
Energy efficiency plan(h)ü   ü  
Year of last rate decision(i)2018 2018  2018  2018
(a)Represents the authorized ROE, or the midpoint of the authorized ROE range, at December 31, 2018.
(b)The authorized ROE range for Atlanta Gas Light and Virginia Natural Gas was 10.55% - 10.95% and 9.00% - 10.00%, respectively, at December 31, 2018.
(c)Regulatory mechanisms that allow recovery of costs in the event of unseasonal weather, but are not direct offsets to the potential impacts on earnings of weather
and customer consumption. These mechanisms are designed to help stabilize operating results by increasing base rate amounts charged to customers when
weather is warmer than normal and decreasing amounts charged when weather is colder than normal.
(d)Recovery of fixed customer service costs separately from assumed natural gas volumes used by customers.
(e)Programs that update or expand distribution systems and LNG facilities.
(f)Recovery of program costs at Atlanta Gas Light was incorporated in GRAM, which the Georgia PSC approved in February 2017. See "Infrastructure
Replacement Programs and Capital Projects – Atlanta Gas Light" herein for additional information.
(g)The recovery (refund) of bad debt expense over (under) an established benchmark expense. Nicor Gas, Virginia Natural Gas, and Chattanooga Gas recover the
gas portion of bad debt expense through their purchased gas adjustment mechanisms.
(h)Recovery of costs associated with plans to achieve specified energy savings goals.
(i)See "Rate Proceedings" herein and Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Rate Proceedings" for additional information.
Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital Projects
Southern Company Gas continues to focus on capital discipline and cost control while pursuing projects and initiatives that are
expected to have current and future benefits to customers, provide an appropriate return on invested capital, and help ensure the
safety and reliability of the utility infrastructure. In addition to capital expenditures recovered through base rates by each of the
natural gas distribution utilities, Nicor Gas and Virginia Natural Gas have separate rate riders that provide timely recovery of
capital expenditures for specific infrastructure replacement programs. Total capital expenditures incurred during 2018 for gas
distribution operations were $1.4 billion, including $97 million related to Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and Florida City Gas,
which were sold in 2018.
The following table and discussions provide updates on the infrastructure replacement programs and capital projects at the natural
gas distribution utilities at December 31, 2018. These programs are risk-based and designed to update and replace cast iron, bare
steel, and mid-vintage plastic materials or expand Southern Company Gas' distribution systems to improve reliability and meet
operational flexibility and growth. The anticipated expenditures for these programs in 2019 are quantified in the discussion below.
II-194
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Utility Program  Recovery Expenditures in
2018  Expenditures
Since Project
Inception  Pipe
Installed
Since
Project
InceptionScope of
ProgramProgram
Duration Last
Year of
Program
   (in millions)  (miles) (miles) (years) 
Nicor Gas Investing in Illinois(*) Rider $ 409 $ 1,316 706 1,500 9 2023
Virginia
Natural GasSteps to Advance
Virginia's Energy (SAVE
and SAVE II)  Rider 40 196 287 496 10 2021
Total   $ 449 $ 1,512 993 1,996  
(*)Includes replacement of pipes, compressors, and transmission mains along with other improvements such as new meters. Scope of program miles is an estimate
and subject to change.
Nicor Gas
In 2013, Illinois enacted legislation that allows Nicor Gas to provide more widespread safety and reliability enhancements to its
distribution system. The legislation stipulates that rate increases to customers as a result of any infrastructure investments shall not
exceed a cumulative annual average of 4.0% or, in any given year, 5.5% of base rate revenues. In 2014, the Illinois Commission
approved the nine-year regulatory infrastructure program, Investing in Illinois, subject to annual review. Nicor Gas expects to place
into service $373 million of qualifying projects under Investing in Illinois in 2019.
In conjunction with the base rate case order issued by the Illinois Commission on January 31, 2018, Nicor Gas is recovering
program costs incurred prior to December 31, 2017 through base rates. Nicor Gas has requested that the program costs incurred
subsequent to December 31, 2017, which are currently being recovered through a separate rider, be addressed in the base rate case
filed November 9, 2018. See "Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information.
Virginia Natural Gas
In 2012, the Virginia Commission approved the SAVE program, an accelerated infrastructure replacement program, to be
completed over a five-year period. In 2016, the Virginia Commission approved an extension to the SAVE program for Virginia
Natural Gas to replace more than 200 miles of aging pipeline infrastructure and invest up to $30 million in 2016 and up to $35
million annually through 2021. Virginia Natural Gas expects to invest $35 million under this program in 2019.
The SAVE program is subject to annual review by the Virginia Commission. In conjunction with the base rate case order issued by
the Virginia Commission in December 2017, Virginia Natural Gas is recovering program costs incurred prior to September 1, 2017
through base rates. Program costs incurred subsequent to September 1, 2017 are currently recovered through a separate rider and
are subject to future base rate case proceedings.
Atlanta Gas Light
As discussed previously under "Utility Regulation and Rate Design," i-SRP and i-VPR will continue under GRAM and the
recovery of and return on current and future capital investments under the STRIDE program will be included in annual base rate
adjustments.
The orders for the STRIDE program provide for recovery of all prudent costs incurred in the performance of the program. Atlanta
Gas Light will recover from end-use customers, through billings to Marketers, the costs related to the program, net of any related
cost savings. The regulatory asset represents incurred program costs that will be collected through GRAM. The future expected
costs to be recovered through rates related to allowed, but not incurred, costs are recognized in an unrecognized ratemaking amount
that is not reflected on the balance sheets. This allowed cost is primarily the equity return on the capital investment under the
program. See "Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts" herein for additional information.
Atlanta Gas Light capitalizes and depreciates the capital expenditure costs incurred from the STRIDE programs over the life of the
assets. Operations and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred. Recoveries, which are recorded as revenue, are based on a
formula that allows Atlanta Gas Light to recover operations and maintenance costs in excess of those included in its current base
rates, depreciation, and an allowed rate of return on capital expenditures. However, Atlanta Gas Light is allowed the recovery of
carrying costs on the under recovered balance resulting from the timing difference.
II-195
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Rate Proceedings
Nicor Gas
On January 31, 2018, the Illinois Commission approved a $137 million increase in annual base rate revenues, including $93 million
related to the recovery of investments under the Investing in Illinois program, effective February 8, 2018, based on a ROE of 9.8%.
On April 19, 2018, the Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' variable income tax adjustment rider. This rider provides for
refund or recovery of changes in income tax expense that result from income tax rates that differ from those used in Nicor Gas' last
rate case. Customer refunds, via bill credits, related to the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation from January 25, 2018 through
May 4, 2018 began on July 1, 2018 and are expected to conclude in the second quarter 2019.
On May 2, 2018, the Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' rehearing request for revised base rates to incorporate the reduction
in the federal income tax rate as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. The resulting decrease of approximately $44 million in
annual base rate revenues became effective May 5, 2018. Nicor Gas' previously-authorized capital structure and ROE of 9.80%
were not addressed in the rehearing and remain unchanged.
On November 9, 2018, Nicor Gas filed a general base rate case with the Illinois Commission requesting a $230 million increase in
annual base rate revenues. The requested increase is based on a projected test year for the 12-month period ending September 30,
2020, a ROE of 10.6%, and an increase in the equity ratio from 52.0% to 54.0% to address the negative cash flow and credit metric
impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. The Illinois Commission is expected to rule on the requested increase within the 11-month
statutory time limit, after which rate adjustments will be effective. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this
time.
Atlanta Gas Light
On February 23, 2018, Atlanta Gas Light revised its annual base rate filing to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation and
requested a $16 million rate reduction in 2018. On May 15, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation for Atlanta Gas Light's
annual base rates to remain at the 2017 level for 2018 and 2019, with customer credits of $8 million in each of July 2018 and
October 2018 to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. The Georgia PSC maintained Atlanta Gas Light's previously
authorized earnings band based on a ROE between 10.55% and 10.95% and increased the allowed equity ratio by 4% to an equity
ratio of 55% to address the negative cash flow and credit metric impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. Additionally, Atlanta Gas
Light is required to file a traditional base rate case on or before June 1, 2019 for rates effective January 1, 2020.
Atlanta Gas Light's recovery of the previously unrecovered PRP revenue through 2014, as well as the mitigation costs associated
with the PRP that were not previously included in its rates, were included in GRAM. In connection with the GRAM approval, the
last monthly PRP surcharge increase became effective March 1, 2017.
Virginia Natural Gas
On December 17, 2018, the Virginia Commission approved Virginia Natural Gas' annual information form filing, which reduced
annual base rates by $14 million effective January 1, 2019 due to lower tax expense as a result of the lower corporate income tax
rate and the impact of the flowback of excess deferred income taxes. This approval also requires Virginia Natural Gas to issue
customer refunds, via bill credits, for the entire $14 million which was deferred as a regulatory liability, current, on the balance
sheet at December 31, 2018. These customer refunds are expected to be completed in the first quarter 2019.
Affiliate Asset Management Agreements
With the exception of Nicor Gas, the natural gas distribution utilities use asset management agreements with an affiliate, Sequent,
for the primary purpose of reducing utility customers' gas cost recovery rates through payments to the utilities by Sequent. For
Atlanta Gas Light, these payments are controlled by the Georgia PSC and are utilized for infrastructure improvements and to fund
heating assistance programs, rather than as a reduction to gas cost recovery rates. Under these asset management agreements,
Sequent supplies natural gas to the utility and markets available pipeline and storage capacity to improve the overall cost of
supplying gas to the utility customers. Currently, the natural gas distribution utilities primarily purchase their gas from
Sequent. The purchase agreements require Sequent to provide firm gas to the natural gas distribution utilities, but these natural gas
distribution utilities maintain the right and ability to make their own long-term supply arrangements if they believe it is in the best
interest of their customers.
Upon closing the sales of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, an affiliate of South Jersey Industries, Inc. assumed the asset
management agreements with wholesale gas services for Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas. The sale of Pivotal Utility Holdings to
NextEra Energy did not impact the asset management agreement between Sequent and Florida City Gas, which will remain in
II-196
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
effect until March 31, 2019. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas " for additional information on
these dispositions.
Each agreement provides for Sequent to make payments to the natural gas distribution utility through either an annual minimum
guarantee within a profit sharing structure, a profit sharing structure without an annual minimum guarantee, or a fixed fee. From the
inception of these agreements in 2001 through December 31, 2018, Sequent made sharing payments to the natural gas distribution
utilities under these agreements totaling $425 million.
The following table provides payments made by Sequent to the remaining natural gas distribution utilities under these agreements
during the last three years:
 Successor  Predecessor   
 Year Ended
December 31, Year Ended
December 31,July 1, 2016
through
December 31, January 1, 2016
through
June 30,    
 2018  2017 2016  2016   Expiration Date
 (in millions)  (in millions)   
Virginia Natural Gas $ 11 $ 6$ 2 $ 9  March 2019
Atlanta Gas Light 9 4 1 6  March 2020
Chattanooga Gas 1 1 — 1  March 2021
Total(*)$ 21 $ 11$ 3 $ 16  
(*)Payments made to Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and Florida City Gas, which were sold in July 2018, were $14 million and $12 million for the successor
years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively, $3 million for the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, and $13 million for the
predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information
on these dispositions.
energySMART
The Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' energySMART program, which includes energy efficiency program offerings and
therm reduction goals. Through December 31, 2017, Nicor Gas spent $107 million of the initial authorized expenditure of $113
million. A new program began on January 1, 2018, with an additional authorized expenditure of $160 million through 2021.
Through December 31, 2018, Nicor Gas had spent $29 million.
Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts
The following table illustrates Southern Company Gas' authorized ratemaking amounts that are not recognized on its balance
sheets. These amounts are primarily composed of an allowed equity rate of return on assets associated with certain regulatory
infrastructure programs. These amounts will be recognized as revenues in Southern Company Gas' financial statements in the
periods they are billable to customers, the majority of which will be recovered by 2025.
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
 (in millions)
Atlanta Gas Light $ 95$ 104
Virginia Natural Gas 11 11
Nicor Gas 4 2
Total $ 110$ 117
Income Tax Matters
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
In December 2017, the Tax Reform Legislation was signed into law and became effective on January 1, 2018. The Tax Reform
Legislation, among other things, reduced the federal corporate income tax rate to 21%, retained normalization provisions for public
utility property and existing renewable energy incentives, and repealed the corporate alternative minimum tax. In addition, under
the Tax Reform Legislation, net operating losses (NOL) generated after December 31, 2017 can no longer be carried back to
previous tax years but can be carried forward indefinitely, with utilization limited to 80% of taxable income of the subsequent tax
year. The projected reduction of Southern Company's consolidated income tax liability resulting from the tax rate reduction
II-197
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
also delays the expected utilization of existing tax credit carryforwards. See Note 10 to the financial statements for information on
Southern Company's joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement.
Following the enactment of the Tax Reform Legislation, the SEC staff issued Staff Accounting Bulletin 118 – "Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" (SAB 118), which provided for a measurement period of up to one year
from the enactment date to complete accounting under GAAP for the tax effects of the legislation. Due to the complex and
comprehensive nature of the enacted tax law changes and their application under GAAP, Southern Company Gas considered all
amounts recorded in the financial statements as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation "provisional" as discussed in SAB 118 and
subject to revision prior to filing its 2017 tax return in the fourth quarter 2018. Southern Company Gas recognized tax benefits of
$3 million and tax expense of $93 million in 2018 and 2017, respectively, for a total net tax expense of $90 million as a result of the
Tax Reform Legislation. In addition, in total, Southern Company Gas recorded a $781 million increase in regulatory liabilities as a
result of the Tax Reform Legislation and $4 million of stranded excess deferred tax balances in AOCI at December 31, 2017 were
adjusted through retained earnings in 2018. As of December 31, 2018, Southern Company Gas considered the measurement of
impacts from the Tax Reform Legislation on deferred income tax assets and liabilities, primarily due to the impact of the reduction
of the corporate income tax rate, to be complete.
However, the IRS continues to issue regulations that provide further interpretation and guidance on the law and each state's
adoption of the provisions contained in the Tax Reform Legislation remains uncertain. In addition, the regulatory treatment of
certain impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation is subject to the discretion of the FERC and the relevant state regulatory bodies. The
ultimate impact of these matters cannot be determined at this time. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas – Rate Proceedings" for additional information on the natural gas distribution utilities' rate filings to reflect the
impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. Also see FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Credit Rating Risk" herein and
Note 10 to the financial statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
Bonus Depreciation
Under the Tax Reform Legislation, projects with binding contracts prior to September 28, 2017 and placed in service after
September 27, 2017 remain eligible for bonus depreciation under the PATH Act. The PATH Act allowed for 50% bonus
depreciation for 2015 through 2017, 40% bonus depreciation for 2018, and 30% bonus depreciation for 2019 and certain long-lived
assets placed in service in 2020. Based on provisional estimates, bonus depreciation is expected to result in positive cash flows of
approximately $40 million for the 2018 tax year and approximately $20 million for the 2019 tax year. See Note 10 to the financial
statements under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
Other Matters
Southern Company Gas is involved in various other matters being litigated and regulatory matters that could affect future earnings.
In addition, Southern Company Gas is subject to certain claims and legal actions arising in the ordinary course of business.
Southern Company Gas is involved in litigation relating to an incident that occurred in one of its prior service territories that
resulted in several deaths, injuries, and property damage. Southern Company Gas has resolved all claims for personal injuries or
death, but it is continuing to defend litigation seeking to recover alleged property damages. Southern Company Gas has insurance
that provides full coverage of the expected financial exposure in excess of $11 million per incident. During the successor period
ended December 31, 2016, Southern Company Gas recorded reserves for substantially all of its potential exposure from these cases.
The ultimate outcome of this matter and such pending or potential litigation or regulatory matters cannot be predicted at this time;
however, for current proceedings not specifically reported herein or in Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements, management does
not anticipate that the ultimate liabilities, if any, arising from such current proceedings would have a material effect on Southern
Company Gas' financial statements. See Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements for a discussion of various other contingencies,
regulatory matters, and other matters being litigated which may affect future earnings potential.
Southern Company Gas owns a 50% interest in a LNG liquefaction and storage facility in Jacksonville, Florida, which was placed
in service in October 2018. The facility, outfitted with a 2.0 million gallon storage tank with the capacity to produce in excess of
120,000 gallons of LNG per day, is not expected to have a material impact on Southern Company Gas' 2019 financial statements.
A wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas owns and operates a natural gas storage facility consisting of two salt dome
caverns in Louisiana. Periodic integrity tests are required in accordance with rules of the Louisiana Department of Natural
Resources (DNR). In August 2017, in connection with an ongoing integrity project, updated seismic mapping indicated the
proximity of one of the caverns to the edge of the salt dome may be less than the required minimum and could result in Southern
II-198
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Company Gas retiring the cavern early. At December 31, 2018, the facility's property, plant, and equipment had a net book value of
$109 million, of which the cavern itself represents approximately 20%. A potential early retirement of this cavern is dependent
upon several factors including compliance with an order from the Louisiana DNR detailing the requirements to place the cavern
back in service, which includes, among other things, obtaining core samples to determine the composition of the sheath
surrounding the edge of the salt dome.
The cavern continues to maintain its pressures and overall structural integrity. Southern Company Gas intends to monitor the
cavern and comply with the Louisiana DNR order through 2020 and place the cavern back in service in 2021. These events were
considered in connection with Southern Company Gas' annual long-lived asset impairment analysis, which determined there was no
impairment as of December 31, 2018. Any changes in results of monitoring activities, rates at which expiring capacity contracts are
re-contracted, timing of placing the cavern back in service, or Louisiana DNR requirements could trigger impairment. Further, early
retirement of the cavern could trigger impairment of other long-lived assets associated with the natural gas storage facility. The
ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time, but could have a material impact on Southern Company Gas'
financial statements.
Effective January 1, 2018, Southern Company Gas conformed its paid time off policy to align with Southern Company. Under the
new policy, paid time off days are vested by the employee on the first day of each year and will continue to be recovered through
rates on an as-paid basis. As a result, Southern Company Gas accrued $21 million as of January 1, 2018, of which $9 million was
recorded as regulatory assets by the natural gas distribution utilities. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Application of Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
Southern Company Gas prepares its financial statements in accordance with GAAP. Significant accounting policies are described in
Notes 1, 5, and 6 to the financial statements. In the application of these policies, certain estimates are made that may have a
material impact on Southern Company Gas' results of operations and related disclosures. Different assumptions and measurements
could produce estimates that are significantly different from those recorded in the financial statements. Senior management has
reviewed and discussed the following critical accounting policies and estimates with the Audit Committee of Southern Company's
Board of Directors.
Utility Regulation
The natural gas distribution utilities comprised approximately 82% of Southern Company Gas' total operating revenues for 2018
and are subject to rate regulation by their respective state regulatory agencies, which set the rates utilities are permitted to charge
customers based on allowable costs, including a reasonable ROE. As a result, the natural gas distribution utilities apply accounting
standards which require the financial statements to reflect the effects of rate regulation. Through the ratemaking process, the
regulators may require the inclusion of costs or revenues in periods different than when they would be recognized by a non-
regulated company. This treatment may result in the deferral of expenses and the recording of related regulatory assets based on
anticipated future recovery through rates or the deferral of gains or creation of liabilities and the recording of related regulatory
liabilities. The application of the accounting standards has a further effect on Southern Company Gas' financial statements as a
result of the estimates of allowable costs used in the ratemaking process. These estimates may differ from those actually incurred
by the natural gas distribution utilities; therefore, the accounting estimates inherent in specific costs such as depreciation and
pension and other postretirement benefits have less of a direct impact on Southern Company Gas' results of operations and financial
condition than they would on a non-regulated company.
As reflected in Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Regulatory Assets and Liabilities," significant
regulatory assets and liabilities have been recorded. Management reviews the ultimate recoverability of these regulatory assets and
any requirement to refund these regulatory liabilities based on applicable regulatory guidelines and GAAP. However, adverse
legislative, judicial, or regulatory actions could materially impact the amounts of such regulatory assets and liabilities and could
adversely impact Southern Company Gas' financial statements.
Accounting for Income Taxes
The consolidated income tax provision and deferred income tax assets and liabilities, as well as any unrecognized tax benefits and
valuation allowances, require significant judgment and estimates. These estimates are supported by historical tax return data,
reasonable projections of taxable income, and interpretations of applicable tax laws and regulations across multiple taxing
jurisdictions. The effective tax rate reflects the statutory tax rates and calculated apportionments for the many states in which
Southern Company Gas operates.
II-199
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
On behalf of Southern Company Gas, Southern Company files a consolidated federal income tax return and various state income
tax returns, some of which are combined or unitary. Under a joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement, each Southern
Company subsidiary's current and deferred tax expense is computed on a stand-alone basis and no subsidiary is allocated more
current expense than would be paid if it filed a separate income tax return. Certain deductions and credits can be limited at the
consolidated or combined level resulting in NOL and tax credit carryforwards that would not otherwise result on a stand-alone
basis. Utilization of NOL carryforwards and the assessment of valuation allowances are based on significant judgment and
extensive analysis of Southern Company Gas', as well as Southern Company's, current financial position and result of operations,
including currently available information about future years, to estimate when future taxable income will be realized.
Current and deferred state income tax liabilities and assets are estimated based on laws of multiple states that determine the income
to be apportioned to their jurisdictions. States utilize various formulas to calculate the apportionment of taxable income, primarily
using sales, assets, or payroll within the jurisdiction compared to the consolidated totals. In addition, each state varies as to whether
a stand-alone, combined, or unitary filing methodology is required. The calculation of deferred state taxes considers apportionment
factors and filing methodologies that are expected to apply in future years. The apportionments and methodologies which are
ultimately finalized in a manner inconsistent with expectations could have a material effect on Southern Company Gas' financial
statements.
Given the significant judgment involved in estimating NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards and multi-state
apportionments, Southern Company Gas considers state deferred income tax liabilities and assets to be critical accounting
estimates.
Assessment of Assets
Goodwill
Southern Company Gas does not amortize its goodwill, but tests it annually for impairment at the reporting unit level during the
fourth quarter or more frequently if impairment indicators arise. These indicators include, but are not limited to, a significant
change in operating performance, the business climate, legal or regulatory factors, or a planned sale or disposition of a significant
portion of the business. A reporting unit is the operating segment, or a business one level below the operating segment (a
component), if discrete financial information is prepared and regularly reviewed by management. Components are aggregated if
they have similar economic characteristics.
As part of Southern Company Gas' impairment test, Southern Company Gas may perform an initial qualitative assessment to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of each reporting unit is less than its carrying amount before
applying the quantitative goodwill impairment test. If Southern Company Gas elects to perform the qualitative assessment, it
evaluates relevant events and circumstances, including but not limited to, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market
conditions, cost factors, financial performance, entity specific events, and events specific to each reporting unit. If Southern
Company Gas determines that it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying amount, or it
elects not to perform a qualitative assessment, it compares the fair value of the reporting unit to its carrying value to determine if
the fair value is greater than its carrying value. Under ASU No. 2017-04, which was adopted effective January 1, 2018, any
goodwill impairment loss will be measured as the excess of a reporting unit's carrying amount over its fair value.
For the 2018 and 2016 annual impairment tests, Southern Company Gas performed the qualitative assessment and determined that
it was more likely than not that the fair value of all of its reporting units with goodwill exceeded their carrying amounts, and
therefore no quantitative analysis was required. For the 2017 annual impairment test, Southern Company Gas performed the
quantitative assessment, which resulted in the fair value of all of its reporting units that have goodwill exceeding their carrying
value. In the first quarter 2018, Southern Company Gas recorded a $42 million impairment charge in contemplation of the sale of
Pivotal Home Solutions.
As the determination of an asset's fair value and useful life involves management making certain estimates and because these
estimates form the basis for the determination of whether or not an impairment charge should be recorded, Southern Company Gas
considers these estimates to be critical accounting estimates.
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards – Other" for information on Southern
Company Gas' adoption of ASU No. 2017-04.
Long-Lived Assets
Southern Company Gas depreciates or amortizes its long-lived and intangible assets over their estimated useful lives. Southern
Company Gas assesses its long-lived and intangible assets for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate
that an asset's carrying amount may not be recoverable. When such events or circumstances are present, Southern Company Gas
II-200
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
assesses the recoverability of long-lived assets by determining whether the carrying value will be recovered through the expected
future cash flows. Impairment is indicated if the carrying amount of a long-lived asset exceeds the sum of the undiscounted future
cash flows expected to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset. If impairment is indicated, Southern Company Gas
records an impairment loss equal to the difference between the carrying value and the fair value of the long-lived asset.
As the determination of the expected future cash flows generated from an asset, an asset's fair value, and useful life involves
management making certain estimates and because these estimates form the basis for the determination of whether or not an
impairment charge should be recorded, Southern Company Gas considers these estimates to be critical accounting estimates.
See Notes 2 and 3 to the financial statements under "FERC Matters – Southern Company Gas" and "Other Matters – Southern
Company Gas," respectively, for information on certain assets recently evaluated for impairment.
Derivatives and Hedging Activities
Determining whether a contract meets the definition of a derivative instrument, contains an embedded derivative requiring
bifurcation, or qualifies for hedge accounting treatment is complex. The treatment of a single contract may vary from period to
period depending upon accounting elections, changes in Southern Company Gas' assessment of the likelihood of future hedged
transactions, or new interpretations of accounting guidance. As a result, judgment is required in determining the appropriate
accounting treatment. In addition, the estimated fair value of derivative instruments may change significantly from period to period
depending upon market conditions, and changes in hedge effectiveness may impact the accounting treatment.
Derivative instruments (including certain derivative instruments embedded in other contracts) are recorded on the balance sheets as
either assets or liabilities measured at their fair value. If the transaction qualifies for, and is designated as, a normal purchase or
normal sale, it is exempted from fair value accounting treatment and is, instead, subject to traditional accrual accounting. Southern
Company Gas utilizes market data or assumptions that market participants would use in pricing the derivative asset or liability,
including assumptions about risk and the risks inherent in the inputs of the valuation technique.
Changes in the derivatives' fair value are recognized concurrently in earnings unless specific hedge accounting criteria are met. If
the derivatives meet those criteria, derivative gains and losses offset related results of the hedged item in the income statement in
the case of a fair value hedge, or gains and losses are recorded in OCI on the balance sheets until the hedged transaction affects
earnings in the case of a cash flow hedge. Additionally, a company is required to formally designate a derivative as a hedge as well
as document and assess the effectiveness of derivatives associated with transactions that receive hedge accounting treatment.
Nicor Gas utilizes derivative instruments to hedge the price risk for the purchase of natural gas for customers. These derivatives are
reflected at fair value and are not designated as accounting hedges. Realized gains or losses on such instruments are included in the
cost of gas delivered and are passed through directly to customers, subject to review by the applicable state regulatory agencies, and
therefore have no direct impact on earnings. Unrealized changes in the fair value of these derivative instruments are deferred as
regulatory assets or liabilities. Prior to its disposition, Elizabethtown Gas utilized the same policy.
Southern Company Gas uses derivative instruments primarily to reduce the impact to its results of operations due to the risk of
changes in the price of natural gas and to a lesser extent Southern Company Gas hedges against warmer-than-normal weather and
interest rates. The fair value of natural gas derivative instruments used to manage exposure to changing natural gas prices reflects
the estimated amounts that Southern Company Gas would receive or pay to terminate or close the contracts at the reporting date,
taking into account the current unrealized gains or losses on open contracts. For derivatives utilized at gas marketing services and
wholesale gas services that are not designated as accounting hedges, changes in fair value are reported as gains or losses in
Southern Company Gas' results of operations in the period of change. Gas marketing services records derivative gains or losses
arising from cash flow hedges in OCI and reclassifies them into earnings in the same period that the underlying hedged item is
recognized in earnings.
Southern Company Gas classifies derivative assets and liabilities based on the lowest level of input that is significant to the fair
value measurement. The assessment of the significance of a particular input to the fair value measurement requires judgment and
may affect the valuation of fair value assets and liabilities and their placement within the fair value hierarchy. The determination of
the fair value of the derivative instruments incorporates various required factors. These factors include:
•the creditworthiness of the counterparties involved and the impact of credit enhancements (such as cash deposits and
letters of credit);
•events specific to a given counterparty; and
•the impact of Southern Company Gas' nonperformance risk on its liabilities.
II-201
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
If there is a significant change in the underlying market prices or pricing assumptions Southern Company Gas uses in pricing its
derivative assets or liabilities, Southern Company Gas may experience a significant impact on its financial position, results of
operations, and cash flows. See Note 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
Given the assumptions used in pricing the derivative asset or liability, Southern Company Gas considers the valuation of derivative
assets and liabilities a critical accounting estimate. See FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Market Price Risk" herein
for more information.
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits
Southern Company Gas' calculation of pension and other postretirement benefits expense is dependent on a number of assumptions.
These assumptions include discount rates, healthcare cost trend rates, expected long-term return on plan assets, mortality rates,
expected salary and wage increases, and other factors. Components of pension and other postretirement benefits expense include
interest and service cost on the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, expected return on plan assets, and amortization of
certain unrecognized costs and obligations. Actual results that differ from the assumptions utilized are accumulated and amortized
over future periods and, therefore, generally affect recognized expense and the recorded obligation in future periods. While
Southern Company Gas believes that the assumptions used are appropriate, differences in actual experience or significant changes
in assumptions would affect its pension and other postretirement benefit costs and obligations.
Key elements in determining Southern Company Gas' pension and other postretirement benefit expense are the expected long-term
return on plan assets and the discount rate used to measure the benefit plan obligations and the periodic benefit plan expense for
future periods. The expected long-term return on pension and other postretirement benefit plan assets is based on Southern
Company's investment strategy, historical experience, and expectations for long-term rates of return that consider external actuarial
advice. Southern Company determines the long-term return on plan assets by applying the long-term rate of expected returns on
various asset classes to Southern Company's target asset allocation. For purposes of determining Southern Company Gas' liability
related to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, Southern Company discounts the future related cash flows using a
single-point discount rate developed from the weighted average of market-observed yields for high quality fixed income securities
with maturities that correspond to expected benefit payments.
A 25 basis point change in any significant assumption (discount rate, salary increases, or long-term rate of return on plan assets)
would result in a $3 million or less change in total annual benefit expense, a $30 million or less change in the projected obligation
for the pension plan, and a $6 million or less change in the projected obligation for other post retirement benefit plans.
See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information regarding pension and other postretirement benefits.
Contingent Obligations
Southern Company Gas is subject to a number of federal and state laws and regulations as well as other factors and conditions that
subject it to environmental, litigation, and other risks. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL herein and Notes 2 and 3 to the
financial statements for more information regarding certain of these contingencies. Southern Company Gas periodically evaluates
its exposure to such risks and records reserves for those matters where a non-tax-related loss is considered probable and reasonably
estimable. The adequacy of reserves can be significantly affected by external events or conditions that can be unpredictable; thus,
the ultimate outcome of such matters could materially affect Southern Company Gas' results of operations, cash flows, or financial
condition.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the financial statements under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" for additional information.
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842) (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires lessees to recognize on the
balance sheet a lease liability and a right-of-use asset for all leases. ASU 2016-02 also changes the recognition, measurement, and
presentation of expense associated with leases and provides clarification regarding the identification of certain components of
contracts that would represent a lease. The accounting required by lessors is relatively unchanged. ASU 2016-02 is effective for
fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018 and Southern Company Gas adopted the new standard effective January 1, 2019.
Southern Company Gas elected the transition methodology provided by ASU No. 2018-11, Leases (Topic 842): Targeted
Improvements, whereby the requirements of ASU 2016-02 are applied on a prospective basis as of the adoption date of January 1,
2019, without restating prior periods. Southern Company Gas elected the package of practical expedients provided by ASU 2016-
02 that allows prior determinations of whether existing contracts are, or contain, leases and the classification of existing leases to
continue without reassessment. Additionally, Southern Company Gas applied the use-of-hindsight practical expedient in
determining lease terms as of the date of adoption and elected the practical expedient that allows existing land easements not
previously accounted for as leases not to be reassessed. Southern Company Gas also made accounting policy elections to account
II-202
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
for short-term leases in all asset classes as off-balance sheet leases and combined lease and non-lease components in the
computations of lease obligations and right-of-use assets for most asset classes.
Southern Company Gas completed the implementation of a new application to track and account for its leases and updated its
internal controls and accounting policies to support the accounting for leases under ASU 2016-02. Southern Company Gas
completed its lease inventory and determined its most significant leases involve real estate and fleet vehicles. In the first quarter
2019, the adoption of ASU 2016-02 resulted in recording lease liabilities and right-of-use assets on Southern Company Gas'
balance sheet each totaling $86 million, with no impact on Southern Company Gas' statement of income.
FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY
Overview
Southern Company Gas' financial condition remained stable at December 31, 2018. Southern Company Gas' cash requirements
primarily consist of funding ongoing operations, common stock dividends, capital expenditures, investments in unconsolidated
subsidiaries, and debt maturities. Capital expenditures and other investing activities include investments to meet projected long-
term demand requirements, to maintain existing natural gas distribution systems as well as to update and expand these systems, and
to comply with environmental regulations. Operating cash flows provide a substantial portion of Southern Company Gas' cash
needs. For the three-year period from 2019 through 2021, Southern Company Gas' projected common stock dividends, capital
expenditures, and debt maturities are expected to exceed operating cash flows. Southern Company Gas plans to finance future cash
needs in excess of its operating cash flows primarily through external securities issuances, equity contributions from Southern
Company, and borrowings from financial institutions. Southern Company Gas plans to use commercial paper to manage seasonal
variations in operating cash flows and other working capital needs. Southern Company Gas intends to continue to monitor its
access to short-term and long-term capital markets as well as its bank credit arrangements to meet future capital and liquidity needs.
See "Sources of Capital," "Financing Activities," and "Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations" herein for additional
information.
By regulation, Nicor Gas is restricted, to the extent of its retained earnings balance, in the amount it can dividend or loan to
affiliates and is not permitted to make money pool loans to affiliates. At December 31, 2018, the amount of subsidiary retained
earnings restricted to dividend totaled $814 million. This restriction did not impact Southern Company Gas' ability to meet its cash
obligations, nor does management expect such restriction to materially impact Southern Company Gas' ability to meet its currently
anticipated cash obligations.
Southern Company Gas' investments in the qualified pension plan decreased in value at December 31, 2018 as compared to
December 31, 2017. There were no voluntary contributions to the qualified pension plan in 2018 and no mandatory contributions to
its qualified pension plan are anticipated during 2019. See Note 11 to the financial statements for additional information.
Net cash provided from operating activities in the successor year ended 2018 totaled $764 million, a decrease of $117 million from
2017. The decrease was primarily due to higher income tax payments as a result of net taxable gains from the Southern Company
Gas Dispositions, partially offset by increased volumes of natural gas sold during 2018 as a result of colder weather compared to
2017. Net cash provided from operating activities totaled $881 million for 2017, primarily due to earnings and the timing of cash
receipts for the sale of natural gas inventory and vendor payments. Net cash used for operating activities was $327 million for the
successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, primarily due to a $125 million voluntary pension contribution, a $35
million payment for the settlement of an interest rate swap, and less cash due to the timing of collecting receivables and disbursing
payables. Due to the seasonal nature of its business, Southern Company Gas typically reports negative cash flows from operating
activities in the second half of the year. Net cash provided from operating activities was $1.1 billion for the predecessor period of
January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, primarily due to low volumes of natural gas sales and changes in natural gas inventory as a
result of warmer weather and the timing of recovery of related gas costs and weather normalization adjustments from customers.
Net cash provided from investing activities for the successor year ended 2018 totaled $1.0 billion and was primarily due to the $2.6
billion proceeds from the Southern Company Gas Dispositions, partially offset by gross property additions primarily related to
utility capital expenditures and pre-approved rider and infrastructure investments recovered through replacement programs at gas
distribution operations as well as capital contributed to equity method pipeline investments partially offset by capital returned from
equity method pipeline investments. Net cash used for investing activities totaled $1.6 billion for the successor year ended 2017,
which reflected $1.5 billion in capital expenditures primarily due to gross property additions for infrastructure replacement
programs at gas distribution operations and $145 million in capital contributions to equity method pipeline investments, partially
offset by $80 million in capital returned from equity method pipeline investments. Net cash used for investing activities was $2.1
billion for the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, which reflected
II-203
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
$1.4 billion primarily related to Southern Company Gas' acquisition of the 50% interest in SNG, and $632 million in capital
expenditures. Net cash used for investing activities was $556 million for the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June
30, 2016 which primarily related to capital expenditures. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas"
and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas – Investment in SNG" for additional information.
Net cash used for financing activities for the successor year ended 2018 of $1.8 billion included payments of common stock
dividends to Southern Company, return of capital to Southern Company, redemptions of gas facility revenue bonds and senior
notes, and repayments of commercial paper borrowings and long-term debt, partially offset by debt issuances and capital
contributions from Southern Company. Net cash provided from financing activities totaled $741 million for 2017, primarily due to
$850 million in debt issuances, $262 million in net additional commercial paper borrowings, and $103 million in capital
contributions from Southern Company, partially offset by $443 million in common stock dividend payments to Southern Company
and $22 million in repayment of long-term debt. Net cash provided from financing activities was $2.4 billion for the successor
period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, which reflected $1.1 billion of capital contributions from Southern Company,
primarily used to fund Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG, $1.1 billion in net additional commercial paper borrowings,
partially offset by $160 million for the purchase of the 15% noncontrolling ownership interest in SouthStar, and $900 million in
proceeds from debt issuances, partially offset by $420 million in debt payments. Net cash used for financing activities was $558
million for the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, primarily due to $896 million in net repayment of
commercial paper borrowings and $125 million in repayment of long-term debt, partially offset by $600 million in debt issuances.
See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" and Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern
Company Gas – Investment in SNG" for additional information.
Significant balance sheet changes at December 31, 2018 include $2.8 billion and $403 million in total assets and liabilities sold,
respectively, associated with the Southern Company Gas Dispositions as described in Note 15 to the financial statements herein
under "Southern Company Gas." After adjusting for these changes, other significant balance sheet changes included an increase of
$1.0 billion in total property, plant, and equipment primarily due to capital expenditures for infrastructure replacement programs, a
decrease of $73 million in accumulated deferred income tax liabilities primarily due to the change in the federal corporate income
tax rate, partially offset by tax depreciation related to infrastructure assets placed in service, as well as the impacts of State of
Illinois tax legislation, and a decrease of $108 million in long-term debt (including securities due within one year), primarily due to
$200 million redemption of gas facility revenue bonds and $155 million in repayments of long-term debt, partially offset by the
issuance of $300 million of first mortgage bonds at Nicor Gas. Other significant balance sheet changes include a decrease of $868
million in notes payable primarily related to a decrease in commercial paper borrowings of $840 million at Southern Company Gas
Capital and $28 million at Nicor Gas. See FUTURE EARNINGS POTENTIAL – "Income Tax Matters" and FINANCIAL
CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Financing Activities" herein and Notes 8 and 10 to the financial statements for additional
information.
Sources of Capital
Southern Company Gas plans to obtain the funds to meet its future capital needs from sources similar to those used in the past,
which were primarily from operating cash flows, external securities issuances, borrowings from financial institutions, and equity
contributions from Southern Company. However, the amount, type, and timing of any future financings, if needed, depend upon
prevailing market conditions, regulatory approval, and other factors. With respect to the public offering of securities, Southern
Company Gas (excluding its subsidiaries) and Southern Company Gas Capital file registration statements with the SEC under the
Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The issuance of securities by Nicor Gas is generally subject to the approval of the Illinois
Commission.
Southern Company Gas obtains separate financing without credit support from any affiliate in the Southern Company system. See
Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information. The Southern Company system
does not maintain a centralized cash or money pool. Therefore, except as described below, funds of Southern Company Gas are not
commingled with funds of any other company in the Southern Company system.
Southern Company Gas maintains commercial paper programs at Southern Company Gas Capital and Nicor Gas that consist of
short-term, unsecured promissory notes. Nicor Gas' commercial paper program supports its working capital needs as Nicor Gas is
not permitted to make money pool loans to affiliates. All of Southern Company Gas' other subsidiaries benefit from Southern
Company Gas Capital's commercial paper program.
At December 31, 2018, Southern Company Gas' current liabilities exceeded current assets by $469 million, primarily as a result of
$650 million in notes payable and $357 million of securities due within one year. Southern Company Gas' current liabilities
frequently exceed current assets because of commercial paper borrowings used to fund daily operations, scheduled maturities of
long-term debt, and significant seasonal fluctuations in cash needs.
II-204
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018, Southern Company Gas had $64 million of cash and cash equivalents. Committed credit arrangements with
banks at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
Company  Expires 2022 Unused
  (millions)
Southern Company Gas Capital(a) $ 1,400$ 1,395
Nicor Gas  500 500
Total(b) $ 1,900$ 1,895
(a) Southern Company Gas guarantees the obligations of Southern Company Gas Capital.
(b) Pursuant to the credit arrangement, the allocations between Southern Company Gas Capital and Nicor Gas may be adjusted.
See Note 8 to the financial statements under "Bank Credit Arrangements" for additional information.
The multi-year credit arrangement of Southern Company Gas Capital and Nicor Gas (Facility) contains a covenant that limits the
debt levels and contains a cross-acceleration provision to other indebtedness (including guarantee obligations) of the applicable
company. Such cross-acceleration provision to other indebtedness would trigger an event of default of the applicable company if
Southern Company Gas or Nicor Gas defaulted on indebtedness, the payment of which was then accelerated. At December 31,
2018, both companies were in compliance with such covenant. The Facility does not contain a material adverse change clause at the
time of borrowings.
Subject to applicable market conditions, the applicable company expects to renew or replace the Facility as needed, prior to
expiration. In connection therewith, the applicable company may extend the maturity dates and/or increase or decrease the lending
commitments thereunder. A portion of unused credit with banks provides liquidity support to Southern Company Gas.
Southern Company Gas has substantial cash flow from operating activities and access to capital markets, including the commercial
paper programs, and financial institutions to meet liquidity needs. Southern Company Gas makes short-term borrowings primarily
through commercial paper programs that have the liquidity support of the committed bank credit arrangements described above.
Short-term borrowings are included in notes payable in the balance sheets.
II-205
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Details of short-term borrowings were as follows:
 Short-term Debt at the End of the
Period Short-term Debt During the Period(*)
 Amount
OutstandingWeighted
Average
Interest RateAverage
Amount
Outstanding Weighted
Average
Interest Rate Maximum
Amount
Outstanding
 (in millions)  (in millions)    (in millions)
Successor – December 31, 2018:       
Commercial paper:       
Southern Company Gas Capital$ 403 3.05% $ 489 2.25% $ 1,261
Nicor Gas 247 2.98% 123 2.16% 275
Short-term bank debt:       
Southern Company Gas Capital — —% 31 2.72% 276
Total $ 650 3.03% $ 643 2.25%  
Successor – December 31, 2017:       
Commercial paper:       
Southern Company Gas Capital$ 1,243 1.73% $ 723 1.40% $ 1,243
Nicor Gas 275 1.83% 176 1.12% 525
Total $ 1,518 1.75% $ 899 1.35%  
Successor – December 31, 2016:       
Commercial paper:       
Southern Company Gas Capital$ 733 1.09% $ 461 0.79% $ 770
Nicor Gas 524 0.95% 309 0.67% 587
Total $ 1,257 1.03% $ 770 0.74%  
(*)Average and maximum amounts are based upon daily balances during the 12-month periods.
Southern Company Gas believes that the need for working capital can be adequately met by utilizing commercial paper programs,
lines of credit, and operating cash flows.
Financing Activities
The long-term debt on Southern Company Gas' balance sheets includes both principal and non-principal components. At
December 31, 2018, the non-principal components totaled $456 million, including the amount attributable to long-term debt due
within one year, which consisted of the unamortized portions of the fair value adjustment recorded in purchase accounting, debt
premiums, debt discounts, and debt issuance costs.
In December 2016, Southern Company Gas executed intercompany promissory notes to further allocate interest expense to its
reportable segments that previously remained in the "all other" segment. These intercompany promissory notes allow Southern
Company Gas to calculate net income, which is its performance measure subsequent to the Merger, at the segment level that
incorporates the full impact of interest costs.
Except as otherwise described herein, Southern Company Gas and its subsidiaries used the proceeds of debt issuances for their
redemptions and maturities, to pay common stock dividends, to repay short-term indebtedness, for capital expenditures, and for
general corporate purposes, including working capital.
In January 2018, Southern Company Gas issued a floating rate promissory note to Southern Company in an aggregate principal
amount of $100 million bearing interest based on one-month LIBOR. In March 2018, Southern Company Gas repaid this
promissory note.
Prior to its sale, in the second quarter 2018, Pivotal Utility Holdings caused $200 million aggregate principal amount of gas facility
revenue bonds to be redeemed. Also in the second quarter 2018, Pivotal Utility Holdings, as borrower, and Southern Company Gas,
as guarantor, entered into a $181 million short-term delayed draw floating rate bank term loan bearing interest
II-206
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
based on one-month LIBOR, which Pivotal Utility Holdings used to repay the gas facility revenue bonds. In July 2018, Pivotal
Utility Holdings repaid this short-term loan.
In May 2018, Southern Company Gas Capital borrowed $95 million pursuant to a short-term uncommitted bank credit
arrangement, guaranteed by Southern Company Gas, bearing interest at a rate agreed upon by Southern Company Gas Capital and
the bank from time to time and payable on no less than 30 days' demand by the bank. In July 2018, Southern Company Gas Capital
repaid this loan.
Nicor Gas issued $300 million aggregate principal amount of first mortgage bonds in a private placement, of which $100 million
was issued in August 2018 and $200 million was issued in November 2018.
In October 2018, Southern Company Gas Capital repaid at maturity $155 million aggregate principal amount of 3.50% Series B
Senior Notes.
In addition to any financings that may be necessary to meet capital requirements and contractual obligations, Southern Company
Gas plans to continue, when economically feasible, a program to retire higher-cost securities and replace these obligations with
lower-cost capital if market conditions permit.
Credit Rating Risk
Southern Company Gas does not have any credit arrangements that would require material changes in payment schedules or
terminations as a result of a credit rating downgrade.
There are certain contracts that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of a credit rating change below
BBB- and/or Baa3. These contracts are for physical gas purchases and sales and energy price risk management. The maximum
potential collateral requirement under these contracts at December 31, 2018 was $30 million.
Generally, collateral may be provided by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit, or cash. Additionally, a credit rating
downgrade could impact the ability of Southern Company Gas to access capital markets and would be likely to impact the cost at
which it does so.
On September 28, 2018, Fitch assigned a negative rating outlook to the ratings of Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries
(including Southern Company Gas, Southern Company Gas Capital, and Nicor Gas).
As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, certain financial metrics, such as the funds from operations to debt percentage, used by
the credit rating agencies to assess Southern Company and its subsidiaries, including Southern Company Gas, may be negatively
impacted. Southern Company Gas and its regulated subsidiaries have taken actions to mitigate the resulting impacts, which, among
other alternatives, include adjusting capital structure. Absent actions by Southern Company and its subsidiaries that fully mitigate
the impacts, Southern Company Gas', Southern Company Gas Capital's, and Nicor Gas' credit ratings could be negatively affected.
The Georgia PSC's May 15, 2018 approval of a stipulation for Atlanta Gas Light's annual rate adjustment maintained the previously
authorized earnings band and increased the equity ratio to address the negative cash flow and credit metric impacts of the Tax
Reform Legislation. See Note 2 to the financial statements under "Southern Company Gas" for information on additional rate
proceedings for Nicor Gas and Atlanta Gas Light expected to conclude in 2019.
Market Price Risk
Southern Company Gas is exposed to market risks, primarily commodity price risk, interest rate risk, and weather risk. Due to
various cost recovery mechanisms, the natural gas distribution utilities of Southern Company Gas that sell natural gas directly to
end-use customers have limited exposure to market volatility of natural gas prices. To manage the volatility attributable to these
exposures, Southern Company Gas nets the exposures, where possible, to take advantage of natural offsets and enters into various
derivative transactions for the remaining exposures pursuant to Southern Company Gas' policies in areas such as counterparty
exposure and risk management practices. Southern Company Gas uses derivatives to buy and sell natural gas as well as for hedging
purposes and mandates strict adherence to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative positions are monitored using
techniques including, but not limited to, market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity analysis.
Certain natural gas distribution utilities of Southern Company Gas manage fuel-hedging programs implemented per the guidelines
of their respective state regulatory agencies to hedge the impact of market fluctuations in natural gas prices for customers. For the
weather risk associated with Nicor Gas, Southern Company Gas has a corporate weather hedging program that utilizes weather
derivatives to reduce the risk of lower adjusted operating margins potentially resulting from significantly warmer-than-normal
weather. In addition, certain non-regulated operations routinely utilize various types of derivative instruments to economically
hedge certain commodity price and weather risks inherent in the natural gas industry. These instruments include a variety of
exchange-traded and OTC energy contracts, such as forward contracts, futures contracts, options contracts, and swap agreements.
II-207
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Gas marketing services and wholesale gas services also actively manage storage positions through a variety of hedging transactions
for the purpose of managing exposures arising from changing natural gas prices. These hedging instruments are used to
substantially protect economic margins (as spreads between wholesale and retail natural gas prices widen between periods) and
thereby minimize exposure to declining operating margins. Some of these economic hedge activities may not qualify, or may not be
designated, for hedge accounting treatment. Southern Company Gas had no material change in market risk exposure for the year
ended December 31, 2018 when compared to the year ended December 31, 2017.
For the periods presented below, the changes in net fair value of derivative contracts were as follows:
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31,
2016  January 1, 2016
through
June 30,
2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Contracts outstanding at beginning of period, assets
(liabilities), net $ (106)$ 8$ (54) $ 75
Contracts realized or otherwise settled 66 (1) 18 (77)
Current period changes(a)(127) (113) 48 (82)
Contracts outstanding at end of period, assets
(liabilities), net (167) (106) 12 (84)
Netting of cash collateral 277 193 62 120
Cash collateral and net fair value of contracts
outstanding at end of period(b)$ 110$ 87$ 74 $ 36
(a)Current period changes also include the changes in fair value of new contracts entered into during the period, if any.
(b)Net fair value of derivative contracts outstanding excludes premium and intrinsic value associated with weather derivatives of $8 million and $11 million at
December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and includes premium and intrinsic value associated with weather derivatives of $4 million at December 31, 2016,
and $5 million at June 30, 2016.
The net hedge volume of energy-related derivative contracts for natural gas positions at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as
follows:
  2018  2017
  mmBtu Volume
  (in millions)
Commodity – Natural gas  120 300
Net Purchased / (Sold) Volume  120 300
Southern Company Gas' derivative contracts are comprised of both long and short natural gas positions. A long position is a
contract to purchase natural gas, and a short position is a contract to sell natural gas. The volume presented above represents the net
of long natural gas positions of 4.16 billion mmBtu and short natural gas positions of 4.04 billion mmBtu at December 31, 2018
and the net of long natural gas positions of 3.51 billion mmBtu and short natural gas positions of 3.21 billion mmBtu at
December 31, 2017.
Energy-related derivative contracts that are designated as regulatory hedges relate primarily to Southern Company Gas' fuel-
hedging programs. Therefore, gains and losses are initially recorded as regulatory liabilities and assets, respectively, and then are
included in cost of natural gas as the underlying gas is used in operations and ultimately recovered through the respective cost
recovery clause. Certain other gains and losses on energy-related derivatives, designated as cash flow hedges (which are mainly
used to hedge anticipated purchases and sales), are initially deferred in OCI before being recognized in income in the same period
as the hedged transaction. Gains and losses on energy-related derivative contracts that are not designated or fail to qualify as hedges
are recognized in the statements of income as incurred.
Some energy-related derivative contracts require physical delivery as opposed to financial settlement, and this type of derivative is
both common and prevalent within the natural gas industry. When an energy-related derivative contract is settled physically, any
cumulative unrealized gain or loss is reversed and the contract price is recognized in the respective line item representing the actual
price of the underlying goods being delivered.
II-208
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas uses OTC contracts that are not exchange traded but are fair valued using prices which are market
observable, and thus fall into Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. See Note 13 to the financial statements for further discussion of
fair value measurements.
The maturities of the energy-related derivative contracts at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
   Fair Value Measurements
   December 31, 2018
   Maturity
 Total
Fair Value Year 1  Years 2 & 3 Years 4 & 5
 (in millions)
Level 1(a)$ (179) $ (59) $ (86) $ (34)
Level 2(b)12 37 — (25)
Fair value of contracts outstanding at end of period(c)$ (167) $ (22) $ (86) $ (59)
(a)Valued using NYMEX futures prices.
(b)Valued using basis transactions that represent the cost to transport natural gas from a NYMEX delivery point to the contract delivery point. These transactions
are based on quotes obtained either through electronic trading platforms or directly from brokers.
(c)Excludes cash collateral of $277 million as well as premium and associated intrinsic value associated with weather derivatives of $8 million at December 31,
2018.
Value at Risk (VaR)
VaR is the maximum potential loss in portfolio value over a specified time period that is not expected to be exceeded within a given
degree of probability. Southern Company Gas' VaR may not be comparable to that of other companies due to differences in the
factors used to calculate VaR. Southern Company Gas' VaR is determined on a 95% confidence interval and a one-day holding
period, which means that 95% of the time, the risk of loss in a day from a portfolio of positions is expected to be less than or equal
to the amount of VaR calculated. The open exposure of Southern Company Gas is managed in accordance with established policies
that limit market risk and require daily reporting of potential financial exposure to senior management. Because Southern Company
Gas generally manages physical gas assets and economically protects its positions by hedging in the futures markets, Southern
Company Gas' open exposure is generally mitigated. Southern Company Gas employs daily risk testing, using both VaR and stress
testing, to evaluate the risk of its positions.
Southern Company Gas actively monitors open commodity positions and the resulting VaR and maintains a relatively small risk
exposure as total buy volume is close to sell volume, with minimal open natural gas price risk. Based on a 95% confidence interval
and employing a one-day holding period, SouthStar's portfolio of positions for all periods presented was immaterial.
For the periods presented below, wholesale gas services had the following VaRs:
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31, 2018Year Ended December
31, 2017July 1, 2016 through
December 31, 2016  January 1, 2016 through
June 30, 2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Period end(*)$ 6.4$ 4.8$ 2.3 $ 1.9
Average 3.7 2.0 2.0 2.0
High(*)11.7 4.8 2.8 2.5
Low 1.2 1.0 1.4 1.6
(*)Increases in VaR at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were driven by significant natural gas price increases in Sequent's key markets. The natural gas price increase
in 2018 was driven by an industry-wide lower-than-normal natural gas storage inventory position and colder-than-normal weather in the middle of fourth quarter
2018. The natural gas price increase in 2017 was driven by colder-than-normal weather. As weather and natural gas prices moderated subsequent to December
31, 2018 and 2017, VaR reduced to a level consistent with December 31, 2016.
II-209
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Credit Risk
Gas Distribution Operations
Concentration of credit risk occurs at Atlanta Gas Light for amounts billed for services and other costs to its customers, which
consist of 15 Marketers in Georgia. The credit risk exposure to Marketers varies seasonally, with the lowest exposure in the non-
peak summer months and the highest exposure in the peak winter months. Marketers are responsible for the retail sale of natural
gas to end-use customers in Georgia. The functions of the retail sale of gas include the purchase and sale of natural gas, customer
service, billings, and collections. The provisions of Atlanta Gas Light's tariff allow Atlanta Gas Light to obtain credit security
support in an amount equal to a minimum of two times a Marketer's highest month's estimated bill from Atlanta Gas Light. For
2018, the four largest Marketers based on customer count, which includes SouthStar, accounted for 20% of Southern Company Gas'
adjusted operating margin and 25% of gas distribution operations' adjusted operating margin.
Several factors are designed to mitigate Southern Company Gas' risks from the increased concentration of credit that has resulted
from deregulation. In addition to the security support described above, Atlanta Gas Light bills intrastate delivery service to
Marketers in advance rather than in arrears. Atlanta Gas Light accepts credit support in the form of cash deposits, letters of
credit/surety bonds from acceptable issuers, and corporate guarantees from investment-grade entities. On a monthly basis, a
management risk oversight committee reviews the adequacy of credit support coverage, credit rating profiles of credit support
providers, and payment status of each Marketer. Southern Company Gas believes that adequate policies and procedures are in place
to properly quantify, manage, and report on Atlanta Gas Light's credit risk exposure to Marketers.
Atlanta Gas Light also faces potential credit risk in connection with assignments of interstate pipeline transportation and storage
capacity to Marketers. Although Atlanta Gas Light assigns this capacity to Marketers, in the event that a Marketer fails to pay the
interstate pipelines for the capacity, the interstate pipelines would likely seek repayment from Atlanta Gas Light.
Wholesale Gas Services
Southern Company Gas has established credit policies to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties, as well as
the quality of pledged collateral. Southern Company Gas also utilizes netting agreements whenever possible to mitigate exposure to
counterparty credit risk. When Southern Company Gas is engaged in more than one outstanding derivative transaction with the
same counterparty and also has a legally enforceable netting agreement with that counterparty, the "net" mark-to-market exposure
represents the netting of the positive and negative exposures with that counterparty and a reasonable measure of Southern Company
Gas' credit risk. Southern Company Gas also uses other netting agreements with certain counterparties with whom it conducts
significant transactions. Netting agreements enable Southern Company Gas to net certain assets and liabilities by counterparty.
Southern Company Gas also nets across product lines and against cash collateral, provided the netting and cash collateral
agreements include such provisions.
Southern Company Gas may require counterparties to pledge additional collateral when deemed necessary. Southern Company Gas
conducts credit evaluations and obtains appropriate internal approvals for a counterparty's line of credit before any transaction with
the counterparty is executed. In most cases, the counterparty must have an investment grade rating, which includes a minimum
long-term debt rating of Baa3 from Moody's and BBB- from S&P. Generally, Southern Company Gas requires credit enhancements
by way of a guaranty, cash deposit, or letter of credit for transaction counterparties that do not have investment grade ratings.
Certain of Southern Company Gas' derivative instruments contain credit-risk-related or other contingent features that could increase
the payments for collateral it posts in the normal course of business when its financial instruments are in net liability positions. At
December 31, 2018, for agreements with such features, Southern Company Gas' derivative instruments with liability fair values
totaled $5 million for which Southern Company Gas had no collateral posted with derivatives counterparties to satisfy these
arrangements.
Southern Company Gas has a concentration of credit risk as measured by its 30-day receivable exposure plus forward exposure. At
December 31, 2018, wholesale gas services' top 20 counterparties represented approximately 48%, or $298 million, of its total
counterparty exposure and had a weighted average S&P equivalent credit rating of A-, all of which is consistent with the prior year.
The S&P equivalent credit rating is determined by a process of converting the lower of the S&P or Moody's ratings to an internal
rating ranging from 9 to 1, with 9 being equivalent to AAA/Aaa by S&P and Moody's, respectively, and 1 being D / Default by
S&P and Moody's, respectively. A counterparty that does not have an external rating is assigned an internal rating based on the
strength of the financial ratios of that counterparty. To arrive at the weighted average credit rating, each counterparty is assigned an
internal ratio, which is multiplied by their credit exposure and summed for all counterparties. The sum is divided by the aggregate
total counterparties' exposures, and this numeric value is then converted to a S&P equivalent.
II-210
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The following table provides credit risk information related to Southern Company Gas' third-party natural gas contracts receivable
and payable positions at December 31:
 Gross Receivables Gross Payables
 2018 2017 2018  2017
 (in millions) (in millions)
Netting agreements in place:    
Counterparty is investment grade $ 461$ 342$ 255 $ 202
Counterparty is non-investment grade 5 20 95 25
Counterparty has no external rating 314 226 505 315
No netting agreements in place:    
Counterparty is investment grade 19 19 1 4
Counterparty has no external rating 2 — — —
Amount recorded in balance sheets $ 801$ 607$ 856 $ 546
Gas Marketing Services
Southern Company Gas obtains credit scores for its firm residential and small commercial customers using a national credit
reporting agency, enrolling only those customers that meet or exceed Southern Company Gas' credit threshold. Southern Company
Gas considers potential interruptible and large commercial customers based on reviews of publicly available financial statements
and commercially available credit reports. Prior to entering into a physical transaction, Southern Company Gas also assigns
physical wholesale counterparties an internal credit rating and credit limit based on the counterparties' Moody's, S&P, and Fitch
ratings, commercially available credit reports, and audited financial statements.
Capital Requirements and Contractual Obligations
Southern Company Gas' capital investments are currently estimated to total $1.6 billion for 2019, $1.9 billion for 2020, $1.3 billion
for 2021, $1.2 billion for 2022, and $1.3 billion for 2023. The regulatory infrastructure programs and other construction programs
are subject to periodic review and revision, and actual costs may vary from these estimates because of numerous factors. These
factors include: changes in business conditions; changes in FERC rules and regulations; state regulatory agency approvals; changes
in legislation; the cost and efficiency of labor, equipment, and materials; project scope and design changes; and the cost of capital.
In addition, there can be no assurance that costs related to capital expenditures will be fully recovered.
In addition, as discussed in Note 11 to the financial statements, Southern Company Gas provides postretirement benefits to certain
eligible employees and funds trusts to the extent required by the applicable state regulatory agencies.
Funding requirements related to obligations associated with scheduled maturities of long-term debt, including the related interest;
pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply; operating leases; asset management agreements; financial derivative obligations;
pension and other postretirement benefit plans; and other purchase commitments, primarily related to environmental remediation
liabilities, are detailed in the contractual obligations table that follows. See Notes 1, 3, 8, 9, 11, and 14 to the financial statements
for additional information.
II-211
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS (continued)
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Contractual Obligations
Contractual obligations at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 20192020-
2021  2022-
2023After
2023 Total
 (in millions)
Long-term debt(a) —     
Principal $ 350$ 330 $ 446$ 4,359$5,485
Interest 244 453 422 3,242 4,361
Pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply(b)781 1,104 901 1,871 4,657
Operating leases(c)18 31 23 34 106
Asset management agreements(d)10 8 — — 18
Financial derivative obligations(e)583 217 109 — 909
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans(f)16 32 — — 48
Purchase commitments —     
Capital(g)1,591 3,231 2,496 — 7,318
Other(h)25 4 2 — 31
Total $3,618$ 5,410 $ 4,399$ 9,506$22,933
(a)Amounts are reflected based on final maturity dates. Southern Company Gas plans to continue, when economically feasible, to retire higher-cost securities and
replace these obligations with lower-cost capital if market conditions permit. Variable rate interest obligations are estimated based on rates at December 31,
2018, as reflected in the statements of capitalization.
(b)Includes charges recoverable through a natural gas cost recovery mechanism, or alternatively billed to Marketers, and demand charges associated with Sequent.
The gas supply balance includes amounts for Nicor Gas and SouthStar gas commodity purchase commitments of 47 million mmBtu at floating gas prices
calculated using forward natural gas prices at December 31, 2018 and valued at $150 million. Southern Company Gas provides guarantees to certain gas
suppliers for certain of its subsidiaries, including SouthStar, in support of payment obligations.
(c)Certain operating leases have provisions for step rent or escalation payments and certain lease concessions are accounted for by recognizing the future minimum
lease payments on a straight-line basis over the respective minimum lease terms. However, this accounting treatment does not affect the future annual operating
lease cash obligations as shown herein. In terms of rental charges and duration of contracts, Southern Company Gas' most significant operating leases relate to
real estate.
(d)Represent fixed-fee minimum payments for Sequent's affiliated asset management agreements.
(e)See Notes 1 and 14 to the financial statements for additional information.
(f)Southern Company Gas forecasts contributions to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans over a three-year period. Southern Company Gas
anticipates no mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan during the next three years. Amounts presented represent estimated benefit payments for the
nonqualified pension plans, estimated non-trust benefit payments for the other postretirement benefit plans, and estimated contributions to the other
postretirement benefit plan trusts, all of which will be made from Southern Company Gas' corporate assets. See Note 11 to the financial statements for
additional information related to the pension and other postretirement benefit plans, including estimated benefit payments. Certain benefit payments will be
made through the related benefit plans. Other benefit payments will be made from Southern Company Gas' corporate assets.
(g)Estimated capital expenditures are provided through 2023. At December 31, 2018, significant purchase commitments were outstanding in connection with
infrastructure and other construction programs.
(h)Includes contractual environmental remediation liabilities that are generally recoverable through base rates or rate rider mechanisms and LTSAs.
II-212
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 7A.QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
See MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS – FINANCIAL CONDITION AND LIQUIDITY – "Market Price Risk"
of each of the registrants in Item 7 herein and Note 1 to the financial statements under "Financial Instruments" in Item 8 herein.
Also see Notes 13 and 14 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein.
II-213
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 8.FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
INDEX TO 2018 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 Page
The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-216
Consolidated Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-217
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-218
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-219
Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-220
Consolidated Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-222
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-224
 
Alabama Power:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-225
Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-226
Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-227
Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-228
Balance Sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-229
Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-231
Statements of Common Stockholder's Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-232
 
Georgia Power:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-233
Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-234
Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-235
Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-236
Balance Sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-237
Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-239
Statements of Common Stockholder's Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-240
 
Mississippi Power:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-241
Statements of Operations for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-242
Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss) for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-243
Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-244
Balance Sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-245
Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-247
Statements of Common Stockholder's Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-248
II-214
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 Page
Southern Power  and Subsidiary Companies:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-249
Consolidated Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-250
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-251
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-252
Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-253
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-255
 
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm II-256
Consolidated Statements of Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-257
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-258
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-259
Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-260
Consolidated Statements of Capitalization at December 31, 2018 and 2017 II-262
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 II-263
 
Combined Notes to Financial Statements II-264
II-215
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets and consolidated statements of capitalization of The Southern
Company and subsidiary companies (Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements
of income, comprehensive income, stockholders' equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2018, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). We also have audited Southern
Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control -
Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Southern
Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also, in our opinion, Southern Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
Basis for Opinions
Southern Company's management is responsible for these financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control over
financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the
accompanying Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
these financial statements and an opinion on Southern Company's internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We
are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are
required to be independent with respect to Southern Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable
rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures to respond to those risks. Such procedures
included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also
included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall
presentation of the financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding
of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design
and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other
procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
We have served as Southern Company's auditor since 2002.
II-216
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:     
Retail electric revenues $ 15,222 $ 15,330$ 15,234
Wholesale electric revenues 2,516 2,426 1,926
Other electric revenues 664 681 698
Natural gas revenues 3,854 3,791 1,596
Other revenues 1,239 803 442
Total operating revenues 23,495 23,031 19,896
Operating Expenses:     
Fuel 4,637 4,400 4,361
Purchased power 971 863 750
Cost of natural gas 1,539 1,601 613
Cost of other sales 806 513 260
Other operations and maintenance 5,889 5,739 5,382
Depreciation and amortization 3,131 3,010 2,502
Taxes other than income taxes 1,315 1,250 1,113
Estimated loss on plants under construction 1,097 3,362 428
Impairment charges 210 — —
Gain on dispositions, net (291) (40) 1
Total operating expenses 19,304 20,698 15,410
Operating Income 4,191 2,333 4,486
Other Income and (Expense):     
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 138 160 202
Earnings from equity method investments 148 106 59
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (1,842) (1,694) (1,317)
Other income (expense), net 114 163 50
Total other income and (expense) (1,442) (1,265) (1,006)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 2,749 1,068 3,480
Income taxes 449 142 951
Consolidated Net Income 2,300 926 2,529
Dividends on preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries 16 38 45
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 58 46 36
Consolidated Net Income Attributable to Southern Company $ 2,226 $ 842$ 2,448
Common Stock Data:     
Earnings per share —     
Basic $ 2.18 $ 0.84$ 2.57
Diluted 2.17 0.84 2.55
Average number of shares of common stock outstanding — (in millions)     
Basic 1,020 1,000 951
Diluted 1,025 1,008 958
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
 
II-217
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Consolidated Net Income $ 2,300 $ 926 $ 2,529
Other comprehensive income (loss):    
Qualifying hedges:    
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $(16), $34, and $(84), respectively (47) 57 (136)
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $24, $(37), and $43, respectively 72 (60) 69
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans:    
Benefit plan net gain (loss), net of tax of $(2), $6, and $10,
respectively (5) 17 13
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $5, $(6), and $3, respectively 6 (23) 4
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 26 (9) (50)
Dividends on preferred and preference stock of subsidiaries 16 38 45
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests 58 46 36
Consolidated Comprehensive Income Attributable to Southern Company$ 2,252 $ 833 $ 2,398
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
 
II-218
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF  CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December  31, 2018 , 2017 , and 2016
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018  Annual Report
 2018 2017  2016
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:    
Consolidated net income $ 2,300 $ 926  $ 2,529
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income
to net cash provided from operating activities —    
Depreciation and amortization, total 3,549 3,457  2,923
Deferred income taxes 94 166  (127)
Collateral deposits 17 (4) (102)
Allowance for equity funds used during construction (138) (160) (202)
Pension and postretirement funding (4) (2) (1,029 )
Settlement of asset retirement obligations (244) (177) (171)
Stock based compensation expense 125 109  121
Hedge settlements (10) 6 (233)
Estimated loss on plants under construction 1,093 3,179  428
Impairment char ges 210 — —
Gain on dispositions, net (301) (42) (2)
Other , net (22) (112) (219)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —    
-Receivables (426) (202) (544)
-Fossil fuel for generation 123 36 178
-Natural gas for sale 49 36 (226)
-Other current assets (127) (143) (206)
-Accounts payable 291 (280) 301
-Accrued taxes 267 (142) 1,456
-Retail fuel cost over recovery 36 (212) (231)
-Other current liabilities 63 (45) 250
Net cash provided from operating activities 6,945 6,394  4,894
Investing Activities:    
Business acquisitions, net of cash acquired (65) (1,054 ) (10,680 )
Property additions (8,001 ) (7,423 ) (7,310 )
Proceeds pursuant to the Toshiba Guarantee, net of joint owner portion               — 1,682  —
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund purchases (1,117) (811) (1,160 )
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund sales 1,111 805  1,154
Proceeds from dispositions 2,956 97 15
Cost of removal, net of salvage (388) (313) (245)
Change in construction payables, net 50 259  (121)
Investment in unconsolidated subsidiaries (114) (152) (1,444 )
Payments pursuant to L TSAs (186) (227) (134)
Other investing activities (6) (53) (122)
Net cash used for investing activities (5,760 ) (7,190 ) (20,047 )
Financing Activities:    
Increase (decrease) in notes payable, net (774) (401) 1,228
Proceeds —    
Long-term debt 2,478 5,858  16,368
Common stock 1,090 793  3,758
Preferred stock — 250  —
Short-term borrowings 3,150 1,259  —
Redemptions and repurchases —    
Long-term debt (5,533 ) (2,930 ) (3,145 )
Preferred and preference stock (33) (658) —
Short-term borrowings (1,900 ) (659) (478)
Distributions to noncontrolling interests (153) (119) (72)
Capital contributions from noncontrolling interests 2,551 80 682
Payment of common stock dividends (2,425 ) (2,300 ) (2,104 )
Other financing activities (264) (222) (512)
Net cash provided from (used for) financing activities (1,813 ) 951  15,725
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash (628) 155  572
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 2,147 1,992  1,420
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 1,519 $ 2,147  $ 1,992
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:    
Cash paid (received) during the period for —    
Interest (net of $72, $89, and $128 capitalized, respectively) $ 1,794 $ 1,676  $ 1,066
Income taxes (net of refunds) 172 (410) (148)
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end 1,103 985  1,262
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-219
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Assets 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,396 $ 2,130
Receivables —   
Customer accounts receivable 1,726 1,806
Energy marketing receivable 801 607
Unbilled revenues 654 810
Under recovered fuel clause revenues 115 171
Other accounts and notes receivable 813 698
Accumulated provision for uncollectible accounts (50) (44)
Materials and supplies 1,465 1,438
Fossil fuel for generation 405 594
Natural gas for sale 524 595
Prepaid expenses 432 452
Assets from risk management activities, net of collateral 222 137
Other regulatory assets, current 525 604
Assets held for sale, current 393 12
Other current assets 162 62
Total current assets 9,583 10,072
Property, Plant, and Equipment:   
In service 103,706 103,542
Less: Accumulated depreciation 31,038 31,457
Plant in service, net of depreciation 72,668 72,085
Nuclear fuel, at amortized cost 875 883
Construction work in progress 7,254 6,904
Total property, plant, and equipment 80,797 79,872
Other Property and Investments:   
Goodwill 5,315 6,268
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries 1,580 1,513
Other intangible assets, net of amortization of $235 and $186
at December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, respectively 613 873
Nuclear decommissioning trusts, at fair value 1,721 1,832
Leveraged leases 798 775
Miscellaneous property and investments 269 249
Total other property and investments 10,296 11,510
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:   
Deferred charges related to income taxes 794 825
Unamortized loss on reacquired debt 323 206
Other regulatory assets 8,308 6,943
Assets held for sale 5,350 —
Other deferred charges and assets 1,463 1,577
Total deferred charges and other assets 16,238 9,551
Total Assets $ 116,914 $ 111,005
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-220
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:  
Securities due within one year $ 3,198$ 3,892
Notes payable 2,915 2,439
Energy marketing trade payables 856 546
Accounts payable 2,580 2,530
Customer deposits 522 542
Accrued taxes 656 636
Accrued interest 472 488
Accrued compensation 1,030 959
Asset retirement obligations, current 404 351
Other regulatory liabilities, current 376 337
Liabilities held for sale, current 425 —
Other current liabilities 852 874
Total current liabilities 14,286 13,594
Long-Term Debt (See accompanying statements) 40,736 44,462
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:  
Accumulated deferred income taxes 6,558 6,842
Deferred credits related to income taxes 6,460 7,256
Accumulated deferred ITCs 2,372 2,267
Employee benefit obligations 2,147 2,256
Asset retirement obligations 8,990 4,473
Accrued environmental remediation 268 389
Other cost of removal obligations 2,297 2,684
Other regulatory liabilities 169 239
Liabilities held for sale 2,836 —
Other deferred credits and liabilities 465 691
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 32,562 27,097
Total Liabilities 87,584 85,153
Redeemable Preferred Stock of Subsidiaries (See accompanying statements) 291 324
Total Stockholders' Equity (See accompanying statements) 29,039 25,528
Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity $ 116,914$ 111,005
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
 
II-221
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
   2018 2017 2018 2017
   (in millions)  (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:        
Long-term debt payable to affiliated trusts —        
Variable rate (5.50% at 12/31/18) due 2042   $ 206 $ 206    
Long-term senior notes and debt —        
Maturity Interest Rates       
2018 1.50% to 5.40% — 2,352    
2019 1.85% to 5.55% 2,948 3,074    
2020 2.00% to 4.75% 2,271 2,273    
2021 2.35% to 9.10% 2,638 2,643    
2022 1.00% to 8.70% 1,983 2,016    
2023 2.45% to 5.75% 2,290 2,290    
2025 through 2048 1.63% to 7.30% 19,895 19,902    
Variable rates (2.29% to 3.05% at 12/31/17) due 2018   — 1,420    
Variable rates (3.10% to 3.50% at 12/31/18) due 2020   1,875 825    
Variable rates (3.34% to 3.91% at 12/31/18) due 2021   125 25    
Total long-term senior notes and debt   34,025 36,820    
Other long-term debt —        
Pollution control revenue bonds —        
Maturity Interest Rates       
2019 4.55%  25 25    
2022 2.10% to 2.35% 90 90    
2023 1.15% to 2.60% 33 33    
2025 through 2049 1.40% to 5.15% 1,112 1,346    
Variable rates (1.77% to 2.23% at 12/31/18) due 2019   148 148    
Variable rates (1.76% to 1.87% at 12/31/18) due 2021   65 65    
Variable rates (1.76% at 12/31/18) due 2022   4 4    
Variable rates (1.70% to 1.87% at 12/31/18) due 2024 to
2053   1,417 1,585    
Plant Daniel revenue bonds (7.13%) due 2021   270 270    
Gas facility revenue bonds —        
Variable rate (1.71% at 12/31/17) due 2022   — 47    
Variable rate (1.71% at 12/31/17) due 2024 to 2033   — 154    
FFB loans —        
2.57% to 3.86% due 2020   44 44    
2.57% to 3.86% due 2021   44 44    
2.57% to 3.86% due 2022   44 44    
2.57% to 3.86% due 2023   44 44    
2.57% to 3.86% due 2024 to 2044   2,449 2,449    
First mortgage bonds —        
4.70% due 2019   50 50    
5.80% due 2023   50 50    
2.66% to 6.58% due 2026 to 2058   1,225 925    
Junior subordinated notes (5.00% to 6.25%) due 2057 to 2077  3,570 3,570    
Total other long-term debt   10,684 10,987    
Unamortized fair value adjustment of long-term debt   474 525    
Capitalized lease obligations   197 204    
Unamortized debt premium   36 44    
Unamortized debt discount   (194) (206)    
Unamortized debt issuance expense   (208) (226)    
Total long-term debt (annual interest requirement — $1.7 billion)  45,220 48,354    
Less:        
Amount due within one year   3,198 3,892    
Amount held for sale   1,286 —    
Long-term debt excluding amounts due within one year and
held for sale   40,736 44,462 58.1% 63.2%
II-222
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION (continued)
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report     
   2018 2017 2018 2017
   (in millions)  (percent of total)
Redeemable Preferred Stock of Subsidiaries:      
Cumulative preferred stock      
$100 par or stated value — 4.20% to 5.44%      
Authorized — 20 million shares      
Outstanding — 2018: 475,115 shares      
                — 2017: 809,325 shares   48 81  
$1 par value — 5.83%      
Authorized — 28 million shares      
Outstanding — 10,000,000 shares   243 243  
Total redeemable preferred stock of subsidiaries      
(annual dividend requirement — $15 million)   291 324 0.4 0.5
Common Stockholders' Equity:      
Common stock, par value $5 per share —   5,164 5,038  
Authorized — 1.5 billion shares      
Issued — 2018: 1.0 billion shares      
  — 2017: 1.0 billion shares      
Treasury — 2018: 1.0 million shares      
      — 2017: 0.9 million shares      
Paid-in capital   11,094 10,469  
Treasury, at cost   (38) (36)  
Retained earnings   8,706 8,885  
Accumulated other comprehensive loss   (203) (189)  
Total common stockholders' equity   24,723 24,167 35.3 34.4
Noncontrolling interests   4,316 1,361 6.2 1.9
Total stockholders' equity   29,039 25,528  
Total Capitalization   $70,066 $70,314 100.0% 100.0%
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements. 
II-223
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Southern Company Common Stockholders' Equity   
 Number of Common
Shares Common Stock   Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income
(Loss)Preferred
and
Preference
Stock of
Subsidiaries 
Noncontrolling
Interests(a) 
 Issued TreasuryPar
Value Paid-In
CapitalTreasury Retained
Earnings  Total
 (in thousands) (in millions)
Balance at December
31, 2015 915,073 (3,352)$4,572 $6,282 $(142) $ 10,010 $ (130)$ 609 $ 781$21,982
Consolidated net
income attributable
   to Southern Company — — — — — 2,448 — — — 2,448
Other comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — — (50) — — (50)
Stock issued 76,140 2,599 380 3,263 115 — — — — 3,758
Stock-based
compensation — — — 120 — — — — — 120
Cash dividends of
$2.2225 per share — — — — — (2,104) — — — (2,104)
Contributions from
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — 618 618
Distributions to
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — (57) (57)
Purchase of
membership interests
from noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — (129) (129)
Net income attributable
to
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — 32 32
Other — (66) — (4) (4) 2 — — — (6)
Balance at December
31, 2016 991,213 (819) 4,952 9,661 (31) 10,356 (180) 609 1,245 26,612
Consolidated net
income attributable
   to Southern Company — — — — — 842 — — — 842
Other comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — — (9) — — (9)
Stock issued 17,319 — 86 707 — — — — — 793
Stock-based
compensation — — — 105 — — — — — 105
Cash dividends of
$2.3000 per share — — — — — (2,300) — — — (2,300)
Preferred and
preference stock
redemptions — — — — — — — (609) — (609)
Contributions from
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — 79 79
Distributions to
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — (122) (122)
Net income attributable
to
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — 44 44
Reclassification from
redeemable
noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — 114 114
Other — (110) — (4) (5) (13) — — 1 (21)
Balance at December
31, 2017 1,008,532 (929) 5,038 10,469 (36) 8,885 (189) — 1,361 25,528
Consolidated net
income attributable
   to Southern Company — — — — — 2,226 — — — 2,226
Other comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — — 26 — — 26
Stock issued 26,209 — 126 964 — — — — — 1,090
Stock-based
compensation — — — 84 — — — — — 84
Cash dividends of
$2.3800 per share — — — — — (2,425) — — — (2,425)
Contributions from
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — 1,372 1,372
Distributions to
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — (164) (164)
Net income attributable
to
   noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — — — 58 58
Sale of noncontrolling
interests — — — (417) — — — — 1,690 1,273
Other — (24) — (6) (2) 20 (40) — (1) (29)
Balance at December
31, 2018 1,034,741 (953)$5,164 $11,094 $ (38) $ 8,706 $ (203)$ — $ 4,316$29,039
(a)Excludes redeemable noncontrolling interests. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Noncontrolling Interests" for additional
information.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-224
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Alabama Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets and statements of capitalization of Alabama Power Company (Alabama Power)
(a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related statements of income,
comprehensive income, common stockholder's equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31,
2018, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present
fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Alabama Power as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Alabama Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
Alabama Power's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Alabama Power in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Alabama Power is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for
the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Alabama Power's internal control over financial reporting.
Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Birmingham, Alabama
February 19, 2019
We have served as Alabama Power's auditor since 2002.
II-225
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:    
Retail revenues $ 5,367$ 5,458 $ 5,322
Wholesale revenues, non-affiliates 279 276 283
Wholesale revenues, affiliates 119 97 69
Other revenues 267 208 215
Total operating revenues 6,032 6,039 5,889
Operating Expenses:    
Fuel 1,301 1,225 1,297
Purchased power, non-affiliates 216 170 166
Purchased power, affiliates 216 158 168
Other operations and maintenance 1,669 1,709 1,557
Depreciation and amortization 764 736 703
Taxes other than income taxes 389 384 380
Total operating expenses 4,555 4,382 4,271
Operating Income 1,477 1,657 1,618
Other Income and (Expense):    
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 62 39 28
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (323) (305) (302)
Other income (expense), net 20 43 26
Total other income and (expense) (241) (223) (248)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 1,236 1,434 1,370
Income taxes 291 568 531
Net Income 945 866 839
Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock 15 18 17
Net Income After Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock $ 930$ 848 $ 822
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-226
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Net Income $ 945 $ 866$ 839
Other comprehensive income (loss):  
Qualifying hedges:  
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $-, $(1), and $(1), respectively — 1 (2)
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $2, $2, and $2, respectively 4 3 4
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 4 4 2
Comprehensive Income $ 949 $ 870$ 841
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-227
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017  2016
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:    
Net income $ 945 $ 866  $ 839
Adjustments to reconcile net income
to net cash provided from operating activities —    
Depreciation and amortization, total 917 888  844
Deferred income taxes 174 409  407
Allowance for equity funds used during construction (62) (39) (28)
Pension and postretirement funding (4) (2) (133)
Settlement of asset retirement obligations (55) (26) (25)
Other , net (1) 13 (77)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —    
-Receivables (149) (168) 94
-Prepayments (2) (2) 1
-Materials and supplies (82) (34) (38)
-Other current assets 30 20 38
-Accounts payable 24 71 73
-Accrued taxes 10 (84) 93
-Accrued compensation 8 (2) 12
-Retail fuel cost over recovery — (76) (162)
-Other current liabilities 128 3 11
Net cash provided from operating activities 1,881 1,837  1,949
Investing Activities:    
Property additions (2,158 ) (1,882 ) (1,272 )
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund purchases (279) (237) (352)
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund sales 278 237  351
Cost of removal net of salvage (130) (112) (94)
Change in construction payables 26 161  (37)
Other investing activities (26) (43) (34)
Net cash used for investing activities (2,289 ) (1,876 ) (1,438 )
Financing Activities:    
Proceeds —    
Senior notes 500 1,100  400
Preferred stock — 250  —
Pollution control revenue bonds 120 — —
Other long-term debt — — 45
Capital contributions from parent company 511 361  260
Redemptions and repurchases —    
Senior notes — (525) (200)
Preferred and preference stock — (238) —
Pollution control revenue bonds (120) (36) —
Payment of common stock dividends (801) (714) (765)
Other financing activities (33) (35) (25)
Net cash provided from (used for) financing activities 177 163  (285)
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash (231) 124  226
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 544 420  194
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 313 $ 544  $ 420
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:    
Cash paid (received) during the period for —    
Interest (net of $22, $15, and $1 1 capitalized, respectively) $ 284 $ 285  $ 277
Income taxes (net of refunds) 106 236  (108)
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end 272 245  84
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-228
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
Assets 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 313 $ 544
Receivables —   
Customer accounts receivable 403 355
Unbilled revenues 150 162
Affiliated 94 43
Other accounts and notes receivable 51 55
Accumulated provision for uncollectible accounts (10) (9)
Fossil fuel stock 141 184
Materials and supplies 546 458
Prepaid expenses 66 85
Other regulatory assets, current 137 124
Other current assets 18 5
Total current assets 1,909 2,006
Property, Plant, and Equipment:   
In service 30,402 27,326
Less: Accumulated provision for depreciation 9,988 9,563
Plant in service, net of depreciation 20,414 17,763
Nuclear fuel, at amortized cost 324 339
Construction work in progress 1,113 908
Total property, plant, and equipment 21,851 19,010
Other Property and Investments:   
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries 65 67
Nuclear decommissioning trusts, at fair value 847 903
Miscellaneous property and investments 127 124
Total other property and investments 1,039 1,094
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:   
Deferred charges related to income taxes 240 239
Deferred under recovered regulatory clause revenues 116 54
Other regulatory assets, deferred 1,386 1,272
Other deferred charges and assets 189 189
Total deferred charges and other assets 1,931 1,754
Total Assets $ 26,730 $ 23,864
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-229
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:   
Securities due within one year $ 201$ —
Accounts payable —   
Affiliated 364 327
Other 614 585
Customer deposits 96 92
Accrued taxes 44 54
Accrued interest 89 77
Accrued compensation 227 205
Asset retirement obligations, current 163 7
Other current liabilities 161 53
Total current liabilities 1,959 1,400
Long-Term Debt (See accompanying statements) 7,923 7,628
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:   
Accumulated deferred income taxes 2,962 2,760
Deferred credits related to income taxes 2,027 2,082
Accumulated deferred ITCs 106 112
Employee benefit obligations 314 304
Asset retirement obligations 3,047 1,702
Other cost of removal obligations 497 609
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred 69 84
Other deferred credits and liabilities 58 63
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 9,080 7,716
Total Liabilities 18,962 16,744
Redeemable Preferred Stock (See accompanying statements) 291 291
Common Stockholder's Equity (See accompanying statements) 7,477 6,829
Total Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity $ 26,730$ 23,864
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-230
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
 2018 2017 2018  2017
 (in millions) (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:    
Long-term debt payable to affiliated trusts —    
Variable rate (5.50% at 12/31/18) due 2042 $ 206$ 206   
Long-term notes payable —    
5.125% due 2019 200 200   
3.375% due 2020 250 250   
2.38% to 3.95% due 2021 220 220   
2.45% to 5.875% due 2022 750 750   
3.55% due 2023 300 300   
2.80% to 6.125% due 2025-2048 5,175 4,675   
Variable rates (3.70% to 3.91% at 12/31/18) due 2021 25 25   
Total long-term notes payable 6,920 6,420   
Other long-term debt —    
Pollution control revenue bonds —    
1.625% to 2.90% due 2034 207 207   
Variable rates (1.76% to 1.87% at 12/31/18) due 2021 65 65   
Variable rates (1.70% to 1.80% at 12/31/18) due 2024-2038 788 788   
Total other long-term debt 1,060 1,060   
Capitalized lease obligations 4 4   
Unamortized debt premium (discount), net (12) (11)   
Unamortized debt issuance expense (54) (51)   
Total long-term debt (annual interest requirement — $330 million) 8,124 7,628   
Less amount due within one year 201 —    
Long-term debt excluding amount due within one year 7,923 7,628 50.4% 51.7%
Redeemable Preferred Stock:    
Cumulative redeemable preferred stock    
$100 par or stated value — 4.20% to 4.92%    
Authorized — 3,850,000 shares    
Outstanding — 475,115 shares 48 48   
$1 par value — 5.00%    
Authorized — 27,500,000 shares    
Outstanding — 10,000,000 shares: $25 stated value 243 243   
Total redeemable preferred stock
(annual dividend requirement — $15 million) 291 291 1.9  2.0
Common Stockholder's Equity:    
Common stock, par value $40 per share —    
Authorized — 40,000,000 shares    
Outstanding — 30,537,500 shares 1,222 1,222   
Paid-in capital 3,508 2,986   
Retained earnings 2,775 2,647   
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (28) (26)   
Total common stockholder's equity 7,477 6,829 47.7  46.3
Total Capitalization $ 15,691$ 14,748 100.0% 100.0%
 The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-231
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMMON STOCKHOLDER'S EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 Number of
Common
Shares
IssuedCommon
StockPaid-In
Capital Retained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2015 31$ 1,222$ 2,341 $ 2,461$ (32)$5,992
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 822 — 822
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 272 — — 272
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — 2 2
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (765) — (765)
Balance at December 31, 2016 31 1,222 2,613 2,518 (30) 6,323
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 848 — 848
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 373 — — 373
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — 4 4
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (714) — (714)
Other — — — (5) — (5)
Balance at December 31, 2017 31 1,222 2,986 2,647 (26) 6,829
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 930 — 930
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 522 — — 522
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — 4 4
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (801) — (801)
Other — — — (1) (6) (7)
Balance at December 31, 2018 31$ 1,222$ 3,508 $ 2,775$ (28)$7,477
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-232
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Georgia Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets and statements of capitalization of Georgia Power Company (Georgia Power) (a
wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related statements of income,
comprehensive income, common stockholder's equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31,
2018, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present
fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Georgia Power as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Georgia Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
Georgia Power's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Georgia Power in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Georgia Power is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for
the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Georgia Power's internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly,
we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
We have served as Georgia Power's auditor since 2002.
II-233
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:    
Retail revenues $ 7,752$ 7,738 $ 7,772
Wholesale revenues, non-affiliates 163 163 175
Wholesale revenues, affiliates 24 26 42
Other revenues 481 383 394
Total operating revenues 8,420 8,310 8,383
Operating Expenses:    
Fuel 1,698 1,671 1,807
Purchased power, non-affiliates 430 416 361
Purchased power, affiliates 723 622 518
Other operations and maintenance 1,860 1,724 2,003
Depreciation and amortization 923 895 855
Taxes other than income taxes 437 409 405
Estimated loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 1,060 — —
Total operating expenses 7,131 5,737 5,949
Operating Income 1,289 2,573 2,434
Other Income and (Expense):    
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (397) (419) (388)
Other income (expense), net 115 104 81
Total other income and (expense) (282) (315) (307)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 1,007 2,258 2,127
Income taxes 214 830 780
Net Income 793 1,428 1,347
Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock — 14 17
Net Income After Dividends on Preferred and Preference Stock $ 793$ 1,414 $ 1,330
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-234
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Net Income $ 793$ 1,428 $ 1,347
Other comprehensive income (loss):   
Qualifying hedges:   
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $1, $1, and $2, respectively 3 3 2
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 3 3 2
Comprehensive Income $ 796$ 1,431 $ 1,349
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-235
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017  2016
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:   
Net income $ 793 $ 1,428  $ 1,347
Adjustments to reconcile net income
to net cash provided from operating activities —   
Depreciation and amortization, total 1,142 1,100  1,063
Deferred income taxes (260) 458  383
Pension, postretirement, and other employee benefits (75) (68) (33)
Pension and postretirement funding — — (287)
Settlement of asset retirement obligations (116) (120) (123)
Other deferred char ges — af filiated — — (111)
Estimated loss on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 1,060 — —
Other , net (21) (83) (25)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —   
-Receivables 8 (256) 60
-Fossil fuel stock 83 (16) 104
-Prepaid income taxes 152 (168) —
-Other current assets (43) (28) (38)
-Accounts payable 95 (219) (42)
-Accrued taxes 58 1 131
-Retail fuel cost over recovery — (84) (32)
-Other current liabilities (107) (33) 28
Net cash provided from operating activities 2,769 1,912  2,425
Investing Activities:   
Property additions (3,116) (2,704 ) (2,223 )
Proceeds pursuant to the Toshiba Guarantee, net of joint owner portion            — 1,682  —
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund purchases (839) (574) (808)
Nuclear decommissioning trust fund sales 833 568  803
Cost of removal, net of salvage (107) (100) (83)
Change in construction payables, net of joint owner portion 68 223  (35)
Payments pursuant to L TSAs (54) (64) (34)
Proceeds from asset dispositions 138 96 10
Other investing activities (32) (39) 23
Net cash used for investing activities (3,109 ) (912) (2,347 )
Financing Activities:   
Increase (decrease) in notes payable, net 294 (391) 234
Proceeds —   
Capital contributions from parent company 2,985 431  594
Senior notes — 1,350  650
Short-term borrowings — 700  —
Other long-term debt — 370  —
FFB loan — — 425
Pollution control revenue bonds issuances and remarketings 108 65 —
Redemptions and repurchases —   
Senior notes (1,500 ) (450) (700)
Pollution control revenue bonds (469) (65) (4)
Short-term borrowings (150) (550) —
Preferred and preference stock — (270) —
Other long-term debt (100) — —
Payment of common stock dividends (1,396 ) (1,281 ) (1,305 )
Premiums on redemption and repurchases of senior notes (152) — —
Other financing activities (20) (60) (36)
Net cash used for financing activities (400) (151) (142)
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash (740) 849  (64)
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 852 3 67
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 112 $ 852  $ 3
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:   
Cash paid during the period for —   
Interest (net of $26, $23, and $20 capitalized, respectively) $ 408 $ 386  $ 375
Income taxes (net of refunds) 300 496  170
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end 683 550  336
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-236
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
Assets 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 4 $ 852
Restricted cash 108 —
Receivables —   
Customer accounts receivable 591 544
Unbilled revenues 208 255
Under recovered fuel clause revenues 115 165
Joint owner accounts receivable 170 262
Affiliated 39 24
Other accounts and notes receivable 80 76
Accumulated provision for uncollectible accounts (2) (3)
Fossil fuel stock 231 314
Materials and supplies 519 504
Prepaid expenses 142 216
Other regulatory assets, current 199 205
Other current assets 70 14
Total current assets 2,474 3,428
Property, Plant, and Equipment:   
In service 37,675 34,861
Less: Accumulated provision for depreciation 12,096 11,704
Plant in service, net of depreciation 25,579 23,157
Nuclear fuel, at amortized cost 550 544
Construction work in progress 4,833 4,613
Total property, plant, and equipment 30,962 28,314
Other Property and Investments:   
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries 51 53
Nuclear decommissioning trusts, at fair value 873 929
Miscellaneous property and investments 72 59
Total other property and investments 996 1,041
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:   
Deferred charges related to income taxes 517 516
Other regulatory assets, deferred 4,902 2,932
Other deferred charges and assets 514 548
Total deferred charges and other assets 5,933 3,996
Total Assets $ 40,365 $ 36,779
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-237
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:   
Securities due within one year $ 617$ 857
Notes payable 294 150
Accounts payable —   
Affiliated 575 493
Other 890 834
Customer deposits 276 270
Accrued taxes 377 344
Accrued interest 105 123
Accrued compensation 221 219
Asset retirement obligations, current 202 270
Other regulatory liabilities, current 169 191
Other current liabilities 183 198
Total current liabilities 3,909 3,949
Long-Term Debt (See accompanying statements) 9,364 11,073
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:   
Accumulated deferred income taxes 3,062 3,175
Deferred credits related to income taxes 3,080 3,248
Accumulated deferred ITCs 262 248
Employee benefit obligations 599 659
Asset retirement obligations, deferred 5,627 2,368
Other deferred credits and liabilities 139 128
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 12,769 9,826
Total Liabilities 26,042 24,848
Common Stockholder's Equity (See accompanying statements) 14,323 11,931
Total Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity $ 40,365$ 36,779
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-238
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
 2018 2017 2018 2017
 (in millions)  (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:  
Long-term notes payable —  
1.95% to 5.40% due 2018 $ — $ 747 
4.25% due 2019 498 499 
2.00% due 2020 950 950 
2.40% due 2021 325 325 
2.85% due 2022 400 400 
5.75% due 2023 100 100 
3.25% to 5.95% due 2026-2043 3,325 4,075 
Variable rate (2.29% at 12/31/17) due 2018 — 100 
Total long-term notes payable 5,598 7,196 
Other long-term debt —  
Pollution control revenue bonds —  
2.35% due 2022 53 53 
1.55% to 4.00% due 2025-2049 748 940 
Variable rate (1.77% to 1.78% at 12/31/18) due 2019 108 108 
Variable rates (1.70% to 1.83% at 12/31/18) due 2026-
2052 551 720 
FFB loans —  
2.57% to 3.86% due 2020 44 44 
2.57% to 3.86% due 2021 44 44 
2.57% to 3.86% due 2022 44 44 
2.57% to 3.86% due 2023 44 44 
2.57% to 3.86% due 2024-2044 2,449 2,449 
Junior subordinated note (5.00%) due 2077 270 270 
Total other long-term debt 4,355 4,716 
Capitalized lease obligations 142 154 
Unamortized debt premium (discount), net (6) (12) 
Unamortized debt issuance expense (108) (124) 
Total long-term debt (annual interest requirement — $356
million) 9,981 11,930 
Less amount due within one year 617 857 
Long-term debt excluding amount due within one year 9,364 11,073 39.5% 48.1%
Common Stockholder's Equity:  
Common stock, without par value —  
Authorized — 20,000,000 shares  
Outstanding — 9,261,500 shares 398 398 
Paid-in capital 10,322 7,328 
Retained earnings 3,612 4,215 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (9) (10) 
Total common stockholder's equity 14,323 11,931 60.5 51.9
Total Capitalization $ 23,687$ 23,004 100.0% 100.0%
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-239
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMMON STOCKHOLDER'S EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 
 Number of
Common
Shares
Issued  Common
Stock  Paid-In
CapitalRetained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2015 9 $ 398 $6,275$ 4,061$ (15)$10,719
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 1,330 — 1,330
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 610 — — 610
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — 2 2
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (1,305) — (1,305)
Balance at December 31, 2016 9 398 6,885 4,086 (13) 11,356
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 1,414 — 1,414
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 443 — — 443
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — 3 3
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (1,281) — (1,281)
Other — — — (4) — (4)
Balance at December 31, 2017 9 398 7,328 4,215 (10) 11,931
Net income after dividends on
preferred and preference stock — — — 793 — 793
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 2,994 — — 2,994
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — 3 3
Cash dividends on common stock — — — (1,396) — (1,396)
Other — — — — (2) (2)
Balance at December 31, 2018 9 $ 398 $10,322$ 3,612$ (9)$14,323
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-240
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Mississippi Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets and statements of capitalization of Mississippi Power Company (Mississippi
Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related statements of
operations, comprehensive income (loss), common stockholder's equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period
ended December 31, 2018, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Mississippi Power as of December 31, 2018 and 2017,
and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Mississippi Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
Mississippi Power's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Mississippi Power in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Mississippi Power is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for
the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Mississippi Power's internal control over financial reporting.
Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
We have served as Mississippi Power's auditor since 2002.
II-241
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:    
Retail revenues $ 889 $ 854$ 859
Wholesale revenues, non-affiliates 263 259 261
Wholesale revenues, affiliates 91 56 26
Other revenues 22 18 17
Total operating revenues 1,265 1,187 1,163
Operating Expenses:    
Fuel 405 395 343
Purchased power 41 25 34
Other operations and maintenance 313 291 317
Depreciation and amortization 169 161 132
Taxes other than income taxes 107 104 109
Estimated loss on Kemper IGCC 37 3,362 428
Total operating expenses 1,072 4,338 1,363
Operating Income (Loss) 193 (3,151) (200)
Other Income and (Expense):    
Allowance for equity funds used during construction — 72 124
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (76) (42) (74)
Other income (expense), net 17 1 (2)
Total other income and (expense) (59) 31 48
Earnings (Loss) Before Income Taxes 134 (3,120) (152)
Income taxes (benefit) (102) (532) (104)
Net Income (Loss) 236 (2,588) (48)
Dividends on Preferred Stock 1 2 2
Net Income (Loss) After Dividends on Preferred Stock $ 235 $ (2,590)$ (50)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-242
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS)
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Net Income (Loss) $ 236$ (2,588) $ (48)
Other comprehensive income (loss):   
Qualifying hedges:   
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $(1), $(1), and $1,
respectively (1) (1) 1
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $-, $1, and $1, respectively 1 1 1
Total other comprehensive income (loss) — — 2
Comprehensive Income (Loss) $ 236$ (2,588) $ (46)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-243
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF  CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December  31, 2018 , 2017 , and 2016
Mississippi Power  Company 2018  Annual Report
 2018  2017  2016
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:      
Net income (loss) $ 236 $ (2,588) $ (48)
Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss)
to net cash provided from operating activities —      
Depreciation and amortization, total 177 198 157
Deferred income taxes 475 (727) (67)
Allowance for equity funds used during construction — (72) (124)
Pension and postretirement funding — — (47)
Settlement of asset retirement obligations (35) (23) (23)
Estimated loss on Kemper IGCC 33 3,179 428
Other, net 18 (8) (9)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —      
-Receivables (19) 540 13
-Fossil fuel stock (3) 24 4
-Prepaid income taxes (12) — 39
-Other current assets (7) (13) (12)
-Accounts payable 15 (3) (14)
-Accrued interest (1) (29) 27
-Accrued taxes (46) 80 14
-Over recovered regulatory clause revenues 14 (51) (45)
-Customer liability associated with Kemper refunds — (1) (73)
-Other current liabilities (41) (3) 9
Net cash provided from operating activities 804 503 229
Investing Activities:      
Property additions (188) (429) (798)
Construction payables 4 (47) (26)
Government grant proceeds — — 137
Payments pursuant to LTSAs (29) (10) 10
Other investing activities (19) (18) (20)
Net cash used for investing activities (232) (504) (697)
Financing Activities:      
Decrease in notes payable, net (4) (18) —
Proceeds —      
Capital contributions from parent company 15 1,002 627
Senior notes 600 — —
Long-term debt issuance to parent company — 40 200
Other long-term debt — — 1,200
Short-term borrowings 300 109 —
Redemptions —      
Preferred stock (33) — —
Pollution control revenue bonds (43) — —
Short-term borrowings (300) (109) (478)
Long-term debt to parent company — (591) (225)
Capital leases — (71) (3)
Senior notes (155) (35) (300)
Other long-term debt (900) (300) (425)
Other financing activities (7) (2) (2)
Net cash provided from (used for) financing activities (527) 25 594
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash 45 24 126
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 248 224 98
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 293 $ 248 $ 224
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:      
Cash paid (received) during the period for —      
Interest (net of $-, $29, and $49 capitalized, respectively) $ 80 $ 65 $ 50
Income taxes (net of refunds) (525) (424) (97)
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year-end 35 32 78
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements. 
II-244
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Assets 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 293$ 248
Receivables —
Customer accounts receivable 34 36
Unbilled revenues 41 41
Affiliated 21 16
Other accounts and notes receivable 31 16
Fossil fuel stock 20 17
Materials and supplies, current 53 44
Other regulatory assets, current 116 125
Prepaid income taxes 12 —
Other current assets 7 9
Total current assets 628 552
Property, Plant, and Equipment:
In service 4,900 4,773
Less: Accumulated provision for depreciation 1,429 1,325
Plant in service, net of depreciation 3,471 3,448
Construction work in progress 103 84
Total property, plant, and equipment 3,574 3,532
Other Property and Investments 24 30
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:
Deferred charges related to income taxes 33 35
Other regulatory assets, deferred 474 437
Accumulated deferred income taxes 150 247
Other deferred charges and assets 3 33
Total deferred charges and other assets 660 752
Total Assets $ 4,886$ 4,866
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-245
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:
Securities due within one year $ 40$ 989
Notes payable — 4
Accounts payable —
Affiliated 60 59
Other 90 96
Accrued taxes —
Accrued income taxes — 40
Other accrued taxes 95 101
Accrued interest 15 16
Accrued compensation 38 39
Accrued plant closure costs 29 35
Asset retirement obligations, current 34 37
Over recovered regulatory clause liabilities 14 —
Other current liabilities 40 47
Total current liabilities 455 1,463
Long-Term Debt (See accompanying statements) 1,539 1,097
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:
Accumulated deferred income taxes 378 —
Deferred credits related to income taxes 382 372
Employee benefit obligations 115 116
Asset retirement obligations, deferred 126 137
Other cost of removal obligations 185 178
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred 81 79
Other deferred credits and liabilities 16 33
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 1,283 915
Total Liabilities 3,277 3,475
Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock (See accompanying statements) — 33
Common Stockholder's Equity (See accompanying statements) 1,609 1,358
Total Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity $ 4,886$ 4,866
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-246
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017  2018  2017
 (in millions)  (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:     
Long-term notes payable —     
5.55% due 2019 $ — $ 125   
1.63% to 5.40% due 2028-2042 950 680   
Adjustable rate (3.05% at 12/31/17) due 2018 — 900   
Adjustable rate (3.47% at 12/31/18) due 2020 300 —   
Total long-term notes payable 1,250 1,705   
Other long-term debt —     
Pollution control revenue bonds —     
5.15% due 2028 — 43   
Variable rates (2.20% to 2.23% at 12/31/18) due 2019 40 40   
Plant Daniel revenue bonds (7.13%) due 2021 270 270   
Total other long-term debt 310 353   
Unamortized debt premium 29 36   
Unamortized debt discount (2) (1)   
Unamortized debt issuance expense (8) (7)   
Total long-term debt (annual interest requirement — $70 million) 1,579 2,086   
Less amount due within one year 40 989   
Long-term debt excluding amount due within one year 1,539 1,097 48.9% 44.1%
Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock:     
$100 par value — 4.40% to 5.25%     
Authorized — 1,244,139 shares     
Outstanding — 2018: no shares     
      — 2017: 334,210 shares — 33 —  1.3
Common Stockholder's Equity:     
Common stock, without par value —     
Authorized — 1,130,000 shares    
Outstanding — 1,121,000 shares 38 38   
Paid-in capital 4,546 4,529   
Accumulated deficit (2,971) (3,205)   
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (4) (4)   
Total common stockholder's equity 1,609 1,358 51.1 54.6
Total Capitalization $ 3,148$ 2,488 100.0% 100.0%
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-247
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
STATEMENTS OF COMMON STOCKHOLDER'S EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
 Number of
Common
Shares
IssuedCommon
StockPaid-In
Capital Retained
Earnings
(Accumulated
Deficit)Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2015 1$ 38$ 2,893 $ (566)$ (6) $2,359
Net loss after dividends on preferred
stock — — — (50) —  (50)
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 632 — —  632
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — 2 2
Balance at December 31, 2016 1 38 3,525 (616) (4) 2,943
Net loss after dividends on preferred
stock — — — (2,590) —  (2,590)
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 1,004 — —  1,004
Other — — — 1 —  1
Balance at December 31, 2017 1 38 4,529 (3,205) (4) 1,358
Net income after dividends on
preferred stock — — — 235 —  235
Capital contributions from parent
company — — 17 — —  17
Other — — — (1) —  (1)
Balance at December 31, 2018 1$ 38$ 4,546 $ (2,971)$ (4) $1,609
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
 
II-248
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Southern Power Company and subsidiary companies (Southern
Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated
statements of income, comprehensive income, stockholders' equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2018, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Southern Power as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and
the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Southern Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
Southern Power's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Southern Power in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Southern Power is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for
the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Southern Power's internal control over financial reporting.
Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
We have served as Southern Power's auditor since 2002.
II-249
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Operating Revenues:    
Wholesale revenues, non-affiliates $ 1,757$ 1,671 $ 1,146
Wholesale revenues, affiliates 435 392 419
Other revenues 13 12 12
Total operating revenues 2,205 2,075 1,577
Operating Expenses:    
Fuel 699 621 456
Purchased power 176 149 102
Other operations and maintenance 395 386 354
Depreciation and amortization 493 503 352
Taxes other than income taxes 46 48 23
Asset impairment 156 — —
Gain on disposition (2) — —
Total operating expenses 1,963 1,707 1,287
Operating Income 242 368 290
Other Income and (Expense):    
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (183) (191) (117)
Other income (expense), net 23 1 6
Total other income and (expense) (160) (190) (111)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 82 178 179
Income taxes (benefit) (164) (939) (195)
Net Income 246 1,117 374
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 59 46 36
Net Income Attributable to Southern Power $ 187$ 1,071 $ 338
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-250
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Net Income $ 246$ 1,117 $ 374
Other comprehensive income (loss):   
Qualifying hedges:   
Changes in fair value, net of tax of $(17), $39, and $(17), respectively (51) 63 (27)
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income,
net of tax of $19, $(46), and $36, respectively 58 (73) 58
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans:   
Benefit plan net gain (loss), net of tax of $2, $-, and $-, respectively 5 — —
Reclassification adjustment for amounts included in net income, net of
tax of $-, $-, and $-, respectively 2 — —
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 14 (10) 31
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests 59 46 36
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Southern Power $ 201$ 1,061 $ 369
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
 
II-251
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017  2016
 (in millions)
Operating Activities:   
Net income $ 246 $ 1,117 $ 374
Adjustments to reconcile net income
to net cash provided from operating activities —   
Depreciation and amortization, total 524 536  370
Deferred income taxes (239) (263) (1,063 )
Amortization of investment tax credits (58) (57) (37)
Collateral deposits 17 (4) (102)
Accrued income taxes, non-current (14) 14 (109)
Income taxes receivable, non-current 42 (61) (13)
Asset impairment 156 — —
Other , net (10) (9) 12
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —   
-Receivables (20) (60) (54)
-Prepaid income taxes 25 24 (29)
-Other current assets (26) (28) 4
-Accrued taxes 7 (55) 940
-Other current liabilities (19) 1 46
Net cash provided from operating activities 631 1,155  339
Investing Activities:   
Business acquisitions (65) (1,016 ) (2,284 )
Property additions (315) (268) (2,114)
Change in construction payables (6) (153) (57)
Proceeds from disposition 203 — —
Payments pursuant to L TSAs and for equipment not yet received (75) (203) (350)
Other investing activities 31 15 16
Net cash used for investing activities (227) (1,625 ) (4,789 )
Financing Activities:   
Increase (decrease) in notes payable, net (105) (104) 73
Proceeds —   
Short-term borrowings 200 — —
Capital contributions 2 — 1,850
Senior notes — 525  2,831
Other long-term debt — 43 65
Redemptions —   
Senior notes (350) (500) (200)
Other long-term debt (420) (18) (86)
Short-term borrowings (100) — —
Return of capital (1,650 ) — —
Distributions to noncontrolling interests (153) (119) (57)
Capital contributions from noncontrolling interests 2,551 80 682
Purchase of membership interests from noncontrolling interests — (59) (129)
Payment of common stock dividends (312) (317) (272)
Other financing activities (26) (33) (30)
Net cash provided from (used for) financing  activities (363) (502) 4,727
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash 41 (972) 277
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of Year 140 1,112 835
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year $ 181 $ 140  $ 1,112
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:   
Cash paid (received) during the period for —   
Interest (net of $17, $1 1, and $44 capitalized, respectively) $ 173 $ 189  $ 89
Income taxes (net of refunds and investment tax credits) 79 (487) 116
Noncash transactions —   
Accrued property additions at year -end 31 32 251
Accrued acquisitions at year -end — — 461
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-252
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Assets 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 181$ 129
Receivables —   
Customer accounts receivable 111 117
Affiliated 55 50
Other 116 98
Materials and supplies 220 278
Prepaid income taxes 25 50
Other current assets 37 36
Total current assets 745 758
Property, Plant, and Equipment:   
In service 13,271 13,755
Less: Accumulated provision for depreciation 2,171 1,910
Plant in service, net of depreciation 11,100 11,845
Construction work in progress 430 511
Total property, plant, and equipment 11,530 12,356
Other Property and Investments:   
Intangible assets, net of amortization of $61 and $47
at December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, respectively 345 411
Total other property and investments 345 411
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:   
Prepaid LTSAs 98 118
Accumulated deferred income taxes 1,186 925
Income taxes receivable, non-current 30 72
Assets held for sale 576 —
Other deferred charges and assets 373 566
Total deferred charges and other assets 2,263 1,681
Total Assets $ 14,883$ 15,206
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-253
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Curr ent Liabilities:   
Securities due within one year $ 599 $ 770
Notes payable 100 105
Accounts payable —   
Affiliated 92 102
Other 77 103
Accrued taxes 6 4
Liabilities held for sale, current 15 —
Other current liabilities 142 148
Total current liabilities 1,031 1,232
Long-T erm Debt:   
Senior notes —   
1.95% due 2019 — 600
2.375% due 2020 300 300
2.50% due 2021 300 300
1.00% due 2022 687 720
2.75% due 2023 290 290
1.85% to 5.25% due 2025-2046 2,348 2,374
Other long-term debt —   
Variable rate (3.34% at 12/31/18) due 2020 525 525
Unamortized debt premium (discount), net (9) (10)
Unamortized debt issuance expense (23) (28)
Total long-term debt 4,418 5,071
Deferr ed Cr edits and Other  Liabilities:   
Accumulated deferred income taxes 105 199
Accumulated deferred ITCs 1,832 1,884
Other deferred credits and liabilities 213 322
Total deferred credits and other liabilities 2,150 2,405
Total Liabilities 7,599 8,708
Common Stockholder's Equity:   
Common stock, par value $0.01 per share —   
Authorized — 1,000,000 shares   
Outstanding — 1,000 shares — —
Paid-in capital 1,600 3,662
Retained earnings 1,352 1,478
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) 16 (2)
Total common stockholder's equity 2,968 5,138
Noncontr olling Inter ests 4,316 1,360
Total Stockholders' Equity 7,284 6,498
Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity $ 14,883 $ 15,206
Commitments and Contingent Matters  (See notes)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-254
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 
 Number
of
Common
Shar es
Issued  Common
StockPaid-In
CapitalRetained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Compr ehensive
Income  Total
Common
Stockholder's
EquityNoncontr olling
Inter ests(a) Total
 (in millions)
Balance at December  31,
2015 — $ — $1,822 $ 657 $ 4 $ 2,483 $ 781  $3,264
Net income attributable
   to Southern Power — — — 338 — 338 — 338
Capital contributions from
   parent company — — 1,850 — — 1,850 — 1,850
Other comprehensive
income — — — — 31 31 — 31
Cash dividends on common
   stock — — — (272) — (272) — (272)
Capital contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 618  618
Distributions to
noncontrolling
   interests — — — — — — (57) (57)
Purchase of membership
interests
   from noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — (129) (129)
Net income attributable to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 32 32
Other — — (1) 1 — — — —
Balance at December  31,
2016 — — 3,671 724 35 4,430 1,245  5,675
Net income attributable
   to Southern Power — — — 1,071 — 1,071 — 1,071
Capital contributions to
parent
   company , net — — (2) — — (2) — (2)
Other comprehensive
income — — — — (10) (10) — (10)
Cash dividends on common
   stock — — — (317) — (317) — (317)
Other comprehensive
income
transfer from SCS (b)— — — — (27) (27) — (27)
Capital contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 79 79
Distributions to
noncontrolling
   interests — — — — — — (122) (122)
Net income attributable to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 44 44
Reclassification from
redeemable
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 114 114
Other — — (7) — — (7) — (7)
Balance at December  31,
2017 — — 3,662 1,478 (2) 5,138 1,360  6,498
Net income attributable — — — 187 — 187 — 187
   to Southern Power
Return of capital to parent — — (1,650 ) — — (1,650 ) — (1,650 )
Capital contributions from
parent
   company — — 2 — — 2 — 2
Other comprehensive
income — — — — 14 14 — 14
Cash dividends on common
   stock — — — (312) — (312) — (312)
Capital contributions from
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 1,372  1,372
Distributions to
noncontrolling
   interests — — — — — — (164) (164)
Net income attributable to
   noncontrolling interests — — — — — — 59 59
Sale of noncontrolling
interests(c)— — (417) — — (417) 1,690  1,273
Other — — 3 (1) 4 6 (1) 5
Balance at December  31,
2018 — $ — $1,600 $1,352 $ 16 $ 2,968 $ 4,316  $7,284
(a)Excludes redeemable noncontrolling interests. See Note 7 to the financial statements under "Noncontrolling Interests" for additional information.
(b)In connection with Southern Power becoming a participant to the Southern Company qualified pension plan and other postretirement benefit plan, $27
million of other comprehensive income, net of tax of $9 million, was transferred from SCS.
(c)See Note 15 under "Southern Power - Sales of Renewable Facility Interests" for additional information.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-255
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets and consolidated statements of capitalization of Southern Company
Gas and subsidiary companies (Southern Company Gas) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, stockholders' equity, and cash
flows for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 and the six month periods ended June 30, 2016 (Predecessor) and
December 31, 2016 (Successor), and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the
financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Southern Company Gas as of December 31,
2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 and the six
months ended June 30, 2016 (Predecessor) and December 31, 2016 (Successor), in conformity with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of Southern Company Gas' management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on Southern Company Gas' financial statements based on our audits. We did not audit the financial statements of Southern
Natural Gas Company, L.L.C. (SNG), Southern Company Gas' investment in which is accounted for by the use of the equity
method. The accompanying consolidated financial statements of Southern Company Gas include its equity investment in SNG of
$1,261 million and $1,262 million as of December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, respectively, and its earnings from its equity
method investment in SNG of $131 million, $88 million, and $56 million for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 and the
six months ended December 31, 2016, respectively. Those statements were audited by other auditors whose reports (which express
an unqualified opinion on SNG's financial statements and contain an emphasis of matter paragraph concerning the extent of its
operations and relationships with affiliated entities) have been furnished to us, and our opinion, insofar as it relates to the amounts
included for SNG, is based solely on the reports of the other auditors. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public
Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to Southern
Company Gas in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Southern Company Gas is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over
financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but
not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of Southern Company Gas' internal control over financial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits and the reports of the other auditors provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
We have served as Southern Company Gas' auditor since 2016.
II-256
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Successor  Predecessor
 For the year
ended
December 31, For the year
ended
December 31,July 1, 2016
through
December 31, January 1, 2016
through June 30,
 2018  2017 2016  2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Operating Revenues:    
Natural gas revenues (includes revenue taxes of
$114, $100, $32, and $57 for the periods presented,
respectively) $ 3,874 $ 3,787$ 1,591  $ 1,845
Alternative revenue programs (20) 4 5  (4)
Other revenues 55 129 56  64
Total operating revenues 3,909 3,920 1,652  1,905
Operating Expenses:     
Cost of natural gas 1,539 1,601 613  755
Cost of other sales 12 29 10  14
Other operations and maintenance 981 945 480  452
Depreciation and amortization 500 501 238  206
Taxes other than income taxes 211 184 71  99
Goodwill impairment 42 — —  —
Gain on dispositions, net (291) — —  —
Merger-related expenses — — 41  56
Total operating expenses 2,994 3,260 1,453  1,582
Operating Income 915 660 199  323
Other Income and (Expense):    
Earnings from equity method investments 148 106 60  2
Interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (228) (200) (81) (96)
Other income (expense), net 1 44 12  3
Total other income and (expense) (79) (50) (9) (91)
Earnings Before Income Taxes 836 610 190  232
Income taxes 464 367 76  87
Net Income 372 243 114  145
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interest — — —  14
Net Income Attributable to Southern Company
Gas $ 372 $ 243$ 114  $ 131
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-257
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Successor  Predecessor
 For the year
ended
December 31, For the year
ended
December 31, July 1, 2016
through
December 31, January 1, 2016
through June 30,
 2018  2017  2016  2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Net Income $ 372 $ 243 $ 114  $ 145
Other comprehensive income (loss):       
Qualifying hedges:      
Changes in fair value, net of tax of
$2, $(3), $(1), and $(23), respectively 5 (5) (1) (41)
Reclassification adjustment for amounts
included
in net income, net of tax of $(1), $-, $-, and $-,
respectively (1) 1 —  1
Pension and other postretirement benefit plans:       
Benefit plan net gain (loss), net of tax of
$-, $-, $19, and $-, respectively — (1) 27  —
Reclassification adjustment for amounts
included
in net income, net of tax of $3, $-, $-, and $4,
respectively (2) — —  5
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 2 (5) 26  (35)
Comprehensive income attributable to
noncontrolling interest — — —  14
Comprehensive Income Attributable to
Southern Company Gas $ 374 $ 238 $ 140  $ 96
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-258
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
  Successor  Predecessor
  For the year
ended
December  31,For the year
ended
December 31,  July 1, 2016
through
December 31,  January 1,
2016 through
June 30,
  2018 2017  2016  2016
  (in millions)  (in millions)
Operating Activities:      
Net income  $ 372 $ 243  $ 114  $ 145
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash
provided from (used for) operating activities —     
Depreciation and amortization, total  500 501  238  206
Deferred income taxes  (1) 236  92  8
Pension and postretirement funding  — — (125) —
Hedge settlements  — — (35) (26)
Goodwill impairment  42 — —  —
Gain on dispositions, net  (291) — —  —
Mark-to-market adjustments  (19) (24) (3) 162
Other , net  (24) (51) (51) (57)
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities —     
-Receivables  (218) (94) (490) 179
-Natural gas for sale, net of
   temporary LIFO liquidation  49 36 (226) 273
-Prepaid income taxes  (42) (39) (23) 151
-Other current assets  4 (24) (31) 37
-Accounts payable  372 (20) 194  43
-Accrued taxes  10 110 8 41
-Accrued compensation  32 15 (13) (21)
-Other current liabilities  (22) (8) 24  (30)
Net cash provided from (used for) operating activities  764 881  (327) 1,111
Investing Activities:     
Property additions  (1,388 ) (1,514 ) (614) (509)
Cost of removal, net of salvage  (96) (66) (40) (32)
Change in construction payables, net  (37) 72 22  (7)
Investment in unconsolidated subsidiaries  (110) (145) (1,444 ) (14)
Returned investment in unconsolidated subsidiaries  20 80 5 3
Proceeds from dispositions  2,609 — —  —
Other investing activities  — 5 4 3
Net cash provided from (used for) inve sting activities  998 (1,568 ) (2,067 ) (556)
Financing Activities:     
Increase (decrease) in notes payable, net  (868) 262  1,143  (896)
Proceeds —     
First mortgage bonds  300 400  —  250
Capital contributions from parent company  24 103  1,085  —
Senior notes  — 450  900  350
Redemptions and repurchases —     
Gas facility revenue bonds  (200) — —  —
Medium-term notes  — (22) —  —
First mortgage bonds  — — —  (125)
Senior notes  (155) — (420) —
Return of capital  (400) — —  —
Distribution to noncontrolling interest  — — (15) (19)
Purchase of 15% noncontrolling interest in SouthStar  — — (160) —
Payment of common stock dividends  (468) (443) (126) (128)
Other financing activities  (3) (9) (8) 10
Net cash provided from (used for) financing activities  (1,770 ) 741  2,399  (558)
Net Change in Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash  (8) 54 5 (3)
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at Beginning of
Year  78 24 19  22
Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Restricted Cash at End of Year  $ 70 $ 78 $ 24  $ 19
Supplemental Cash Flow Information:     
Cash paid (received) during the period for —     
Interest (net of $7, $1 1, $4, and $3 capitalized, respectively)  $ 249 $ 223  $ 135  $ 119
Income taxes, net  524 72 23  (100)
Noncash transactions — Accrued property additions at year -end  97 135  63  41
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-259
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Assets  2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Assets:     
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 64 $ 73
Receivables —     
Energy marketing receivable  801 607
Customer accounts receivable  370 400
Unbilled revenues  213 285
Affiliated  11 12
Other accounts and notes receivable  142 91
Accumulated provision for uncollectible accounts  (30) (28)
Natural gas for sale  524 595
Prepaid expenses  118 79
Assets from risk management activities, net of collateral  219 135
Other regulatory assets, current  73 94
Other current assets  50 52
Total current assets  2,555 2,395
Property, Plant, and Equipment:     
In service  15,177 15,833
Less: Accumulated depreciation  4,400 4,596
Plant in service, net of depreciation  10,777 11,237
Construction work in progress  580 491
Total property, plant, and equipment  11,357 11,728
Other Property and Investments:     
Goodwill  5,015 5,967
Equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries  1,538 1,477
Other intangible assets, net of amortization of $145 and $120
at December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, respectively  101 280
Miscellaneous property and investments  20 21
Total other property and investments  6,674 7,745
Deferred Charges and Other Assets:     
Other regulatory assets, deferred  669 901
Other deferred charges and assets  193 218
Total deferred charges and other assets  862 1,119
Total Assets  $ 21,448 $ 22,987
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-260
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity  2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current Liabilities:   
Securities due within one year  $ 357$ 157
Notes payable  650 1,518
Energy marketing trade payables  856 546
Accounts payable —   
Affiliated  45 21
Other  402 425
Customer deposits  133 128
Accrued taxes —   
Accrued income taxes  66 40
Other accrued taxes  75 78
Accrued interest  55 51
Accrued compensation  100 74
Liabilities from risk management activities, net of collateral  76 69
Other regulatory liabilities, current  79 135
Other current liabilities  130 159
Total current liabilities  3,024 3,401
Long-term Debt (See accompanying statements)  5,583 5,891
Deferred Credits and Other Liabilities:   
Accumulated deferred income taxes  1,016 1,089
Deferred credits related to income taxes  940 1,063
Employee benefit obligations  357 415
Other cost of removal obligations  1,585 1,646
Accrued environmental remediation  268 342
Other deferred credits and liabilities  105 118
Total deferred credits and other liabilities  4,271 4,673
Total Liabilities  12,878 13,965
Common Stockholder's Equity (See accompanying statements)  8,570 9,022
Total Liabilities and Stockholder's Equity  $ 21,448$ 22,987
Commitments and Contingent Matters (See notes)  
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
II-261
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CAPITALIZATION
At December 31, 2018 and 2017
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017 2018 2017
 (in millions) (percent of total)
Long-Term Debt:   
Long-term notes payable —   
3.50% due 2018 $ — $ 155 
5.25% due 2019 300 300 
3.50% to 9.10% due 2021 330 330 
8.55% to 8.70% due 2022 46 46 
2.45% due 2023 350 350 
3.25% to 7.30% due 2025-2047 3,134 3,134 
Total long-term notes payable 4,160 4,315 
Other long-term debt —   
First mortgage bonds —   
4.70% due 2019 50 50 
5.80% due 2023 50 50 
2.66% to 6.58% due 2026-2058 1,225 925 
Gas facility revenue bonds —   
Variable rate (1.71% at 12/31/17) due 2022 — 47 
Variable rate (1.71% at 12/31/17) due 2024-2033 — 153 
Total other long-term debt 1,325 1,225 
Unamortized fair value adjustment of long-term debt 474 525 
Unamortized debt discount (19) (17) 
Total long-term debt (annual interest requirement — $244
million) 5,940 6,048 
Less amount due within one year 357 157 
Long-term debt excluding amount due within one year 5,583 5,891 39.4% 39.5%
Common Stockholder's Equity:   
Common stock — par value $0.01 per share   
Authorized — 100 million shares   
Outstanding — 100 shares   
Paid-in capital 8,856 9,214 
Accumulated deficit (312) (212) 
Accumulated other comprehensive income 26 20 
Total common stockholder's equity 8,570 9,022 60.6 60.5
Total Capitalization $ 14,153$ 14,913 100.0% 100.0%
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these financial statements.
II-262
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 
 Southern Company Gas Common Stockholders' Equity  
 Number of Common
Shares  Common Stock   Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income
(Loss)Noncontrolling
Interests 
 Issued Treasury Par
ValuePaid-In
CapitalTreasuryRetained
Earnings
(Accumulated
Deficit)  Total
 (in thousands) (in millions)
Predecessor –
Balance at December 31, 2015120,377 217 $603 $2,099 $ (8)$ 1,421 $ (186)$ 46$3,975
Consolidated net income
   attributable to
   Southern Company Gas — — — — — 131 — — 131
Other comprehensive income
   (loss) — — — — — — (35) — (35)
Stock issued 95 — — 6 — — — — 6
Stock-based compensation 270 — 2 28 — — — — 30
Cash dividends on common
stock — — — — — (128) — — (128)
Reclassification of
   noncontrolling interest — — — — — — — (46) (46)
Predecessor –
Balance at June 30, 2016 120,742 217 605 2,133 (8) 1,424 (221) — 3,933
Successor –
Balance at July 1, 2016 — — — 8,001 — — — — 8,001
Consolidated net income
   attributable to
   Southern Company Gas — — — — — 114 — — 114
Capital contributions from
parent
company — — — 1,094 — — — — 1,094
Other comprehensive income
   (loss) — — — — — — 26 — 26
Cash dividends on common
stock — — — — — (126) — — (126)
Successor –
Balance at December 31, 2016 — — — 9,095 — (12) 26 — 9,109
Consolidated net income
   attributable to
   Southern Company Gas — — — — — 243 — — 243
Capital contributions from
   parent company, net — — — 117 — — — — 117
Other comprehensive income
   (loss) — — — — — — (5) — (5)
Cash dividends on common
stock — — — — — (443) — — (443)
Other — — — 2 — — (1) — 1
Successor –
Balance at December 31, 2017 — — — 9,214 — (212) 20 — 9,022
Consolidated net income
   attributable to
   Southern Company Gas — — — — — 372 — — 372
Return of capital to parent — — — (400) — — — — (400)
Capital contributions from
parent company — — — 42 — — — — 42
Other comprehensive income
(loss) — — — — — — 2 — 2
Cash dividends on common
stock — — — — — (468) — — (468)
Other — — — — — (4) 4 — —
Successor –
Balance at December 31, 2018 — — $— $8,856 $ — $ (312) $ 26 $ — $8,570
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements. 
II-263
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Notes to the Financial Statements
for
The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies
Alabama Power Company
Georgia Power Company
Mississippi Power Company
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies
Index to the Combined Notes to Financial Statements
Note  Page
1 Summary of Significant Accounting Policies II-265
2 Regulatory Matters II-287
3 Contingencies II-314
4 Revenue from Contracts with Customers II-319
5 Property, Plant, and Equipment II-323
6 Asset Retirement Obligations II-328
7 Consolidated Entities and Equity Method Investments II-332
8 Financing II-337
9 Commitments II-350
10 Income Taxes II-353
11 Retirement Benefits II-364
12 Stock Compensation II-394
13 Fair Value Measurements II-399
14 Derivatives II-407
15 Acquisitions and Dispositions II-419
16 Segment and Related Information II-425
17 Quarterly Financial Information (Unaudited) II-430
Index to Applicable Notes to Financial Statements by Registrant
The following notes to the financial statements are a combined presentation. The list below indicates the registrants to which each
note applies.
Registrant Applicable Notes
Southern Company 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17
Alabama Power 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 17
Georgia Power 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 17
Mississippi Power 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 17
Southern Power 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 17
Southern Company Gas 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17
II-264
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
General
Southern Company is the parent company of the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, Southern Company Gas
(as of July 1, 2016), SCS, Southern Linc, Southern Holdings, Southern Nuclear, PowerSecure (as of May 9, 2016), and other direct
and indirect subsidiaries. The traditional electric operating companies – Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power (through
December 31, 2018), and Mississippi Power – are vertically integrated utilities providing electric service in four Southeastern
states. On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy. Southern Power develops,
constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including renewable energy projects, and sells electricity at
market-based rates in the wholesale market. On May 22, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP
Solar, a limited partnership indirectly owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, and, on December 11, 2018,
Southern Power sold a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, a holding company owning a portfolio of eight operating wind
facilities. On November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement to sell all of its equity interests in Plant Mankato
(including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction). On December 4, 2018, Southern Power sold all of its equity
interests in Plant Oleander and Plant Stanton Unit A (together, the Florida Plants) to NextEra Energy. Southern Company Gas
distributes natural gas through natural gas distribution utilities and is involved in several other complementary businesses including
gas pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services. In July 2018, Southern Company Gas completed
sales of three of its natural gas distribution utilities (Elizabethtown Gas (New Jersey), Florida City Gas, and Elkton Gas
(Maryland)). The remaining natural gas distribution utilities include Nicor Gas (Illinois), Atlanta Gas Light (Georgia), Virginia
Natural Gas, and Chattanooga Gas (Tennessee). In June 2018, Southern Company Gas also completed the sale of Pivotal Home
Solutions, which provided home equipment protection products and services. SCS, the system service company, provides, at cost,
specialized services to Southern Company and its subsidiary companies. Southern Linc provides digital wireless communications
for use by Southern Company and its subsidiary companies and also markets these services to the public and provides fiber optics
services within the Southeast. Southern Holdings is an intermediate holding company subsidiary, primarily for Southern Company's
investments in leveraged leases and for other electric services. Southern Nuclear operates and provides services to the Southern
Company system's nuclear power plants, including Alabama Power's Plant Farley and Georgia Power's Plant Hatch and Plant
Vogtle Units 1 and 2, and is currently managing construction of and developing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which are co-owned by
Georgia Power. PowerSecure is a provider of energy solutions, including distributed energy infrastructure, energy efficiency
products and services, and utility infrastructure services, to customers. See Note 15 for additional information regarding disposition
activities.
The registrants' financial statements reflect investments in subsidiaries on a consolidated basis. Intercompany transactions have
been eliminated in consolidation. The equity method is used for investments in entities in which a registrant has significant
influence but does not control and for VIEs where a registrant has an equity investment but is not the primary beneficiary. Southern
Power has consolidated renewable generation projects that are partially funded by tax equity investors. The related contractual
provisions represent profit-sharing arrangements because the allocations of cash distributions and tax benefits are not based on
fixed ownership percentages. Therefore, the noncontrolling interest is accounted for under a balance sheet approach utilizing the
HLBV method. The HLBV method calculates each partner's share of income based on the change in net equity the partner can
legally claim in a HLBV at the end of the period compared to the beginning of the period. See Note 7 for additional information.
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, certain subsidiaries of Southern Company Gas, and certain other
subsidiaries are subject to regulation by the FERC, and the traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution
utilities are also subject to regulation by their respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies. As such, the
respective financial statements of the registrants reflect the effects of rate regulation in accordance with GAAP and comply with the
accounting policies and practices prescribed by relevant state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies.
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires the use of estimates, and the actual results may differ
from those estimates. Certain prior years' data presented in the financial statements have been reclassified to conform to the current
year presentation. These reclassifications had no impact on the registrants' results of operations, financial position, or cash flows. In
addition, Southern Company Gas has recast its reportable segments. See Note 16 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional
information.
At December 31, 2018, Southern Company and Southern Power each had assets and liabilities held for sale on their balance sheets.
Unless otherwise noted, the disclosures herein related to specific asset and liability balances at December 31, 2018 exclude assets
and liabilities held for sale. See Note 15 under "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information including Southern Company's and
Southern Power's major classes of assets and liabilities classified as held for sale.
II-265
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas
Pursuant to the Merger, Southern Company pushed down the application of the acquisition method of accounting to the financial
statements of Southern Company Gas such that the assets and liabilities are recorded at their respective fair values, and goodwill
was established for the excess of the purchase price over the fair value of net identifiable assets. Accordingly, the financial
statements of Southern Company Gas for periods before and after July 1, 2016 (acquisition date) reflect different bases of
accounting, and the financial positions and results of operations of those periods are not comparable. Throughout Southern
Company Gas' financial statements and the combined notes to the financial statements, periods prior to July 1, 2016 are identified
as "predecessor," while periods after the acquisition date are identified as "successor."
Certain predecessor period data presented in Southern Company Gas' financial statements has been modified or reclassified to
conform to the presentation used by Southern Company. Changes to Southern Company Gas' statements of income include
classifying operating revenues as natural gas revenues and other revenues, as well as classifying cost of goods sold as cost of
natural gas and cost of other sales and presenting interest expense and AFUDC on a gross basis. Changes to Southern Company
Gas' statements of cash flows include revised financial statement line item descriptions to align with the new balance sheet
descriptions and expanded line items within each category of cash flow activity.
Recently Adopted Accounting Standards
Revenue
In 2014, the FASB issued ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers (ASC 606), replacing the existing accounting standard
and industry-specific guidance for revenue recognition with a five-step model for recognizing and measuring revenue from
contracts with customers. The underlying principle of the standard is to recognize revenue to depict the transfer of goods or
services to customers at the amount expected to be collected. ASC 606 became effective on January 1, 2018 and the registrants
adopted it using the modified retrospective method applied to open contracts and only to the version of contracts in effect as of
January 1, 2018. In accordance with the modified retrospective method, the registrants' previously issued financial statements have
not been restated to comply with ASC 606 and the registrants did not have a cumulative-effect adjustment to retained earnings. The
adoption of ASC 606 had no significant impact on the timing of revenue recognition compared to previously reported results;
however, it requires enhanced disclosures regarding the nature, amount, timing, and uncertainty of revenue and the related cash
flows arising from contracts with customers, which are included herein and in Note 4.
ASC 606 provided additional clarity on financial statement presentation that resulted in reclassifications into other revenues and
other operations and maintenance from other income/(expense), net at Alabama Power and Georgia Power primarily related to
certain unregulated sales of products and services. In addition, contract assets related to certain fixed retail revenues at Georgia
Power and Southern Company's unregulated distributed generation business have been reclassified from unbilled revenue in
accordance with the guidance in ASC 606. These reclassifications did not affect the timing or amount of revenues recognized or
cash flows. ASC 606 also provided additional guidance on revenue recognized over time, resulting in a change in the timing of
revenue recognized from guaranteed and fixed billing arrangements at Southern Company Gas.
II-266
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The specific impacts of applying ASC 606 to revenues from contracts with customers on the financial statements of Southern
Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Southern Company Gas compared to previously recognized guidance is shown
below.
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2018
Statements of Income As ReportedBalances
Without
Adoption of
ASC 606 Effect of Change
 (in millions)
Southern Company  
Natural gas revenues $ 3,854$ 3,852$ 2
Other revenues 1,239 1,234 5
Other operations and maintenance 5,889 5,830 59
Operating Income 4,191 4,243 (52)
Other income (expense), net 114 60 54
Earnings Before Income Taxes 2,749 2,747 2
Income taxes 449 448 1
Consolidated Net Income 2,300 2,299 1
Consolidated Net Income Attributable to Southern Company 2,226 2,225 1
Alabama Power  
Other revenues $ 267$ 230$ 37
Other operations and maintenance 1,669 1,625 44
Taxes other than income taxes 389 388 1
Operating Income 1,477 1,485 (8)
Other income (expense), net 20 12 8
Georgia Power  
Other revenues $ 481$ 387$ 94
Other operations and maintenance 1,860 1,772 88
Operating Income 1,289 1,283 6
Other income (expense), net 115 121 (6)
Southern Company Gas  
Natural gas revenues $ 3,874$ 3,872$ 2
Operating Income 915 913 2
Earnings Before Income Taxes 836 834 2
Income taxes 464 463 1
Net Income 372 371 1
II-267
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2018
Statements of Cash Flows As ReportedBalances
Without
Adoption of
ASC 606 Effect of Change
 (in millions)
Southern Company
Consolidated net income $ 2,300$ 2,299$ 1
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities:
Receivables (426) (472) 46
Other current assets (127) (81) (46)
Accrued taxes 267 268 (1)
Other current liabilities 63 61 2
Georgia Power
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities:
Receivables $ 8$ 1$ 7
Other current assets (43) (36) (7)
Southern Company Gas
Net income $ 372$ 371$ 1
Changes in certain current assets and liabilities:
Accrued taxes 10 11 (1)
Other current liabilities (22) (24) 2
 At December 31, 2018
Balance Sheets As ReportedBalances
Without
Adoption of
ASC 606 Effect of Change
 (in millions)
Southern Company    
Unbilled revenues $ 654$ 728$ (74)
Other accounts and notes receivable 813 814 (1)
Other current assets 162 87 75
Accrued taxes 656 655 1
Other current liabilities 852 854 (2)
Total Stockholders' Equity 29,039 29,038 1
Georgia Power    
Unbilled revenues $ 208$ 243$ (35)
Other accounts and notes receivable 80 81 (1)
Other current assets 70 34 36
Southern Company Gas    
Accrued income taxes $ 66$ 65$ 1
Other current liabilities 130 132 (2)
Common Stockholder's Equity 8,570 8,569 1
II-268
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Other
In 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-18, Statement of Cash Flows (Topic 230): Restricted Cash (ASU 2016-18). ASU 2016-18
eliminates the need to reflect transfers between cash and restricted cash in operating, investing, and financing activities in the
statements of cash flows. In addition, the net change in cash and cash equivalents during the period includes amounts generally
described as restricted cash or restricted cash equivalents. The registrants adopted ASU 2016-18 retrospectively effective January 1,
2018. Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas have restated prior periods in the statements of cash flows
by immaterial amounts. The change in restricted cash in the statements of cash flows was previously disclosed in operating
activities for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas and in investing activities for Southern Company and Southern
Power. See "Restricted Cash" herein for additional information.
In January 2017, the FASB issued ASU No. 2017-04, Intangibles – Goodwill and Other (Topic 350): Simplifying the Test for
Goodwill Impairment (ASU 2017-04). ASU 2017-04 removes the requirement to compare the implied fair value of goodwill with
the carrying amount as part of Step 2 of the goodwill impairment test. Under the new standard, the goodwill impairment loss will
be measured as the excess of a reporting unit's carrying amount over its fair value, not exceeding the total amount of goodwill
allocated to that reporting unit, which may increase the frequency of goodwill impairment charges if a future goodwill impairment
test does not pass the Step 1 evaluation. ASU 2017-04 is effective prospectively for periods beginning on or after December 15,
2019, with early adoption permitted. The registrants adopted ASU 2017-04 effective January 1, 2018 with no impact on their
respective financial statements.
In March 2017, the FASB issued ASU No. 2017-07, Compensation – Retirement Benefits (Topic 715): Improving the Presentation
of Net Periodic Pension Cost and Net Periodic Postretirement Benefit Cost (ASU 2017-07). ASU 2017-07 requires that an
employer report the service cost component in the same line item or items as other compensation costs and requires the other
components of net periodic pension and postretirement benefit costs to be separately presented in the statements of income outside
of income from operations. Additionally, only the service cost component is eligible for capitalization, when applicable. The
registrants adopted ASU 2017-07 effective January 1, 2018 with no material impact on their respective financial statements. ASU
2017-07 has been applied retrospectively, with the service cost component of net periodic benefit costs included in operations and
maintenance expenses and all other components of net periodic benefit costs included in other income (expense), net in the
statements of income for all periods presented for Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern
Company Gas. The impacted registrants used the practical expedient provided by ASU 2017-07, which permits an employer to use
the amounts disclosed in its retirement benefits note for prior comparative periods as the estimation basis for applying the
retrospective presentation requirements to those periods. The amounts of the other components of net periodic benefit costs
reclassified for the prior periods are presented in Note 11. The presentation changes resulted in a decrease in operating income and
an increase in other income for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016 for each of the impacted registrants. Since Southern
Power did not participate in the qualified pension and postretirement benefit plans until December 2017, no retrospective
presentation of Southern Power's net periodic benefit costs is required. The requirement to limit capitalization to the service cost
component of net periodic benefit costs has been applied on a prospective basis from the date of adoption for all registrants.
In August 2017, the FASB issued ASU No. 2017-12, Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815): Targeted Improvements to Accounting
for Hedging Activities (ASU 2017-12). ASU 2017-12 makes more financial and non-financial hedging strategies eligible for hedge
accounting, amends the related presentation and disclosure requirements, and simplifies hedge effectiveness assessment
requirements. ASU 2017-12 is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018, with early adoption permitted. The
registrants adopted ASU 2017-12 effective January 1, 2018 with no material impact on their respective financial statements. See
Note 14 for disclosures required by ASU 2017-12.
On February 14, 2018, the FASB issued ASU No. 2018-02, Income Statement – Reporting Comprehensive Income (Topic 220):
Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (ASU 2018-02) to address the application
of ASC 740, Income Taxes (ASC 740) to certain provisions of the Tax Reform Legislation. ASU 2018-02 specifically addresses the
ASC 740 requirement that the effect of a change in tax laws or rates on deferred tax assets and liabilities be included in income
from continuing operations, even when the tax effects were initially recognized directly in OCI at the previous rate, which strands
the income tax rate differential in accumulated OCI. The amendments in ASU 2018-02 allow a reclassification from accumulated
OCI to retained earnings for stranded tax effects resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation. The registrants adopted ASU 2018-02
effective January 1, 2018 with no material impact on their respective financial statements.
On August 28, 2018, the FASB issued ASU No. 2018-14, Compensation – Retirement Benefits – Defined Benefit Plans – General
(Topic 715-20): Disclosure Framework – Changes to the Disclosure Requirements for Defined Benefit Plans (ASU 2018-14). ASU
2018-14 amends ASC 715 to add, remove, and clarify disclosure requirements related to defined benefit pension and other
II-269
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
postretirement plans. The registrants adopted ASU 2018-14 effective December 31, 2018 with no material impact on their
respective financial statements. See Note 11 for disclosures required by ASU 2018-14.
Affiliate Transactions
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas have agreements with SCS under which
certain of the following services are rendered to them at direct or allocated cost: general executive and advisory, general and design
engineering, operations, purchasing, accounting, finance, treasury, legal, tax, information technology, marketing, auditing,
insurance and pension administration, human resources, systems and procedures, digital wireless communications, cellular tower
space, and other services with respect to business and operations, construction management, and power pool transactions. These
costs are primarily included in other operations and maintenance expenses or capitalized to property, plant, and equipment. Costs
for these services from SCS in 2018, 2017, and 2016 were as follows:
 Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power(a)Southern
Company Gas(b)
 (in millions)
2018 $ 508$ 653$ 104$ 98$ 194
2017 479 625 140 218 63
2016 460 606 231 193 17
(a)Prior to December 2017, Southern Power had no employees but was billed for employee-related costs from SCS.
(b)Southern Company Gas' 2016 costs represent services provided subsequent to the Merger.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power also have agreements with Southern Nuclear under which Southern Nuclear renders the
following nuclear-related services at cost: general executive and advisory services; general operations, management, and technical
services; administrative services including procurement, accounting, employee relations, systems, and procedures services;
strategic planning and budgeting services; other services with respect to business and operations; and, for Georgia Power,
construction management. These costs are primarily included in other operations and maintenance expenses or capitalized to
property, plant, and equipment. Costs for these services in 2018, 2017, and 2016 amounted to $247 million, $248 million, and $249
million, respectively, for Alabama Power and $780 million, $675 million, and $666 million, respectively, for Georgia Power. See
Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information regarding Southern Nuclear's construction
management of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 for Georgia Power.
Cost allocation methodologies used by SCS and Southern Nuclear prior to the repeal of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of
1935, as amended, were approved by the SEC. Subsequently, additional cost allocation methodologies have been reported to the
FERC and management believes they are reasonable. The FERC permits services to be rendered at cost by system service
companies.
Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's total power purchased from affiliates through the power pool is included in purchased
power, affiliates on their respective statements of income. Mississippi Power's and Southern Power's total power purchased from
affiliates through the power pool is included in purchased power on their respective statements of income and was as follows:
 Mississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
2018 $ 15$ 41
2017 16 27
2016 29 21
II-270
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
SCS, as agent for Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas, has long-term interstate natural
gas transportation agreements with SNG. The interstate transportation service provided to Alabama Power, Georgia Power,
Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas by SNG pursuant to these agreements is governed by the terms and conditions of
SNG's natural gas tariff and is subject to FERC regulation. See Notes 7 and 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Equity Method
Investments – SNG" and "Southern Company Gas – Investment in SNG," respectively, for additional information. Transportation
costs under these agreements in 2018, 2017, and 2016 were as follows:
 Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
2018 $ 8$ 101$ 25$ 32
2017 9 102 25 32
2016(*)2 35 7 15
(*)Represents costs incurred for the period subsequent to Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG.
On November 16, 2018, SNG completed its purchase of Georgia Power's natural gas lateral pipeline serving Plant McDonough
Units 4 through 6 at net book value, as approved by the Georgia PSC on January 16, 2018. SNG expects to pay $142 million to
Georgia Power in the first quarter 2020. During the interim period, Georgia Power will receive a discounted shipping rate to reflect
the delayed consideration. Southern Company Gas' portion of the expected capital expenditures for the purchase of this pipeline
and additional construction is $122 million.
SCS, as agent for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power, has agreements with certain subsidiaries of
Southern Company Gas to purchase natural gas. Natural gas purchases made under these agreements were immaterial for Alabama
Power and Mississippi Power and as follows for Georgia Power and Southern Power in 2018, 2017, and 2016:
 Georgia
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
2018 $ 21$ 119
2017 22 119
2016(*)10 17
(*)Represents costs incurred for the period subsequent to Southern Company's acquisition of Southern Company Gas.
Alabama Power and Mississippi Power jointly own Plant Greene County. The companies have an agreement under which Alabama
Power operates Plant Greene County and Mississippi Power reimburses Alabama Power for its proportionate share of non-fuel
expenses, which totaled $8 million, $9 million, and $13 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. Mississippi Power also
reimburses Alabama Power for any direct fuel purchases delivered from one of Alabama Power's transfer facilities. There were no
such fuel purchases in 2018, 2017, and 2016. See Note 5 under "Joint Ownership Agreements" for additional information.
Alabama Power has an agreement with Gulf Power under which Alabama Power made transmission system upgrades to ensure firm
delivery of energy under a non-affiliate PPA from a combined cycle plant located in Autauga County, Alabama. Under a related
tariff, Alabama Power received $11 million in 2018, $11 million in 2017, and $12 million in 2016. See Note 15 under "Southern
Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
Alabama Power has agreements with PowerSecure for services related to utility infrastructure construction, distributed energy, and
energy efficiency projects. Costs for these services amounted to approximately $24 million in 2018 and $11 million in 2017 and
were immaterial in 2016.
See Note 7 under "SEGCO" for information regarding Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's equity method investment in SEGCO
and related affiliate purchased power costs, as well as Alabama Power's gas pipeline ownership agreement with SEGCO.
Georgia Power has entered into several PPAs with Southern Power for capacity and energy. Total expenses associated with these
PPAs were $216 million, $235 million, and $265 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt
– Capital Leases – Georgia Power" and Note 9 under "Fuel and Power Purchase Agreements – Affiliate" for additional information.
II-271
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Georgia Power has a joint ownership agreement with Gulf Power under which Gulf Power owns a 25% portion of Plant Scherer
Unit 3. Under this agreement, Georgia Power operates Plant Scherer Unit 3 and Gulf Power reimburses Georgia Power for its 25%
proportionate share of the related non-fuel expenses, which were $8 million, $11 million, and $8 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016,
respectively. See Note 5 under "Joint Ownership Agreements" and Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for
additional information.
Mississippi Power has an agreement with Gulf Power under which Gulf Power owns a portion of Plant Daniel. Mississippi Power
operates Plant Daniel and Gulf Power reimburses Mississippi Power for its proportionate share of all associated expenditures and
costs, which totaled $31 million, $31 million, and $26 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. See Note 5 under "Joint
Ownership Agreements" and Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for additional information.
In 2014, prior to Southern Company's 2016 acquisition of PowerSecure, Georgia Power entered into agreements with PowerSecure
to build solar power generation facilities at two U.S. Army bases, as approved by the Georgia PSC. In October 2016, the two
facilities began commercial operation. Payments of $32 million made by Georgia Power to PowerSecure under the agreements
since Southern Company's acquisition of PowerSecure are included in plant in service at December 31, 2018.
Southern Power's total revenues from all PPAs with Georgia Power, included in wholesale revenue affiliates on Southern Power's
consolidated statements of income, were $215 million, $233 million, and $258 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively.
Included within these revenues were affiliate PPAs accounted for as operating leases, which totaled $65 million, $81 million, and
$109 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively.
Southern Power has several agreements with SCS for transmission services. Transmission services purchased by Southern Power
from SCS totaled $12 million, $13 million, and $11 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively, and were charged to other
operations and maintenance in Southern Power's consolidated statements of income. All charges were billed to Southern Power
based on the Southern Company Open Access Transmission Tariff as filed with the FERC.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power may jointly enter into various types of wholesale energy, natural
gas, and certain other contracts, either directly or through SCS as agent. Each participating company may be jointly and severally
liable for the obligations incurred under these agreements. See Note 9 under "Fuel and Power Purchase Agreements" for additional
information. Southern Power and the traditional electric operating companies generally settle amounts related to the above
transactions on a monthly basis in the month following the performance of such services or the purchase or sale of electricity. See
"Revenues – Southern Power" herein for additional information.
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas provide incidental services to and
receive such services from other Southern Company subsidiaries which are generally minor in duration and amount. Except as
described herein, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas neither provided nor
received any material services to or from affiliates in 2018, 2017, or 2016.
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities are subject to accounting requirements for the
effects of rate regulation. Regulatory assets represent probable future revenues associated with certain costs that are expected to be
recovered from customers through the ratemaking process. Regulatory liabilities represent probable future reductions in revenues
associated with amounts that are expected to be credited to customers through the ratemaking process.
In the event that a portion of a traditional electric operating company's or a natural gas distribution utility's operations is no longer
subject to applicable accounting rules for rate regulation, such company would be required to write off to income or reclassify to
AOCI related regulatory assets and liabilities that are not specifically recoverable through regulated rates. In addition, the
traditional electric operating company or natural gas distribution utility would be required to determine if any impairment to other
assets, including plant, exists and write down the assets, if impaired, to their fair values. All regulatory assets and liabilities are to
be reflected in rates. See Note 2 for additional information including details of regulatory assets and liabilities reflected in the
balance sheets for Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Company Gas.
II-272
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Revenues
The registrants generate revenues from a variety of sources which are accounted for under various revenue accounting guidance,
including ASC 606, lease, derivative, and regulatory accounting. Other than the timing of recognition of guaranteed and fixed
billing arrangements at Southern Company Gas, the adoption of ASC 606 had no impact on the timing or amount of revenue
recognized under previous guidance. See "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards – Revenue" herein and Note 4 for information
regarding the registrants' adoption of ASC 606 and related disclosures.
Traditional Electric Operating Companies
The majority of the revenues of the traditional electric operating companies are generated from contracts with retail electric
customers. Retail revenues recognized under ASC 606 are consistent with prior revenue recognition policies. These revenues,
generated from the integrated service to deliver electricity when and if called upon by the customer, are recognized as a single
performance obligation satisfied over time, at a tariff rate, and as electricity is delivered to the customer during the month. Unbilled
revenues related to retail sales are accrued at the end of each fiscal period. Retail rates may include provisions to adjust billings for
fluctuations in fuel costs, fuel hedging, the energy component of purchased power costs, and certain other costs. Revenues are
adjusted for differences between these actual costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. Under or over recovered
regulatory clause revenues are recorded in the balance sheets and are recovered from or returned to customers, respectively, through
adjustments to the billing factors. See Note 2 for additional information regarding regulatory matters of the traditional electric
operating companies.
Wholesale capacity revenues from PPAs are recognized either on a levelized basis over the appropriate contract period or the
amount billable under the contract terms. Energy and other revenues are generally recognized as services are provided. The
accounting for these revenues under ASC 606 is consistent with prior revenue recognition policies. The contracts for capacity and
energy in a wholesale PPA have multiple performance obligations where the contract's total transaction price is allocated to each
performance obligation based on the standalone selling price. The standalone selling price is primarily determined by the price
charged to customers for the specific goods or services transferred with the performance obligations. Generally, the traditional
electric operating companies recognize revenue as the performance obligations are satisfied over time as electricity is delivered to
the customer or as generation capacity is available to the customer.
For both retail and wholesale revenues, the traditional electric operating companies generally have a right to consideration in an
amount that corresponds directly with the value to the customer of the entity's performance completed to date and may recognize
revenue in the amount to which the entity has a right to invoice and has elected to recognize revenue for its sales of electricity and
capacity using the invoice practical expedient. In addition, payment for goods and services rendered is typically due in the
subsequent month following satisfaction of the registrants' performance obligation.
Southern Power
Southern Power sells capacity and energy at rates specified under contractual terms in long-term PPAs. These PPAs are accounted
for as operating leases, non-derivatives, or normal sale derivatives. Capacity revenues from PPAs classified as operating leases are
recognized on a straight-line basis over the term of the agreement. Energy revenues are recognized in the period the energy is
delivered.
Southern Power's non-lease contracts commonly include capacity and energy which are considered separate performance
obligations. In these contracts, the total transaction price is allocated to each performance obligation based on the standalone selling
price. The standalone selling price is primarily determined by the price charged to customers for the specific goods or services
transferred with the performance obligations. Generally, Southern Power recognizes revenue as the performance obligations are
satisfied over time, as electricity is delivered to the customer or as generation capacity is made available to the customer. The
timing of revenue recognition was not affected by the adoption of ASC 606.
Southern Power generally has a right to consideration in an amount that corresponds directly with the value to the customer of the
entity's performance completed to date and may recognize revenue in the amount to which the entity has a right to invoice. In
addition, payment for goods and services rendered is typically due in the subsequent month following satisfaction of Southern
Power's performance obligation.
When multiple contracts exist with the same counterparty, the revenues from each contract are accounted for as separate
arrangements.
Southern Power may also enter into contracts to sell short-term capacity in the wholesale electricity markets. These sales are
generally classified as mark-to-market derivatives and net unrealized gains and losses on such contracts are recorded in wholesale
revenues. See Note 14 and "Financial Instruments" herein for additional information.
II-273
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas
Gas Distribution Operations
Southern Company Gas records revenues when goods or services are provided to customers. Those revenues are based on rates
approved by the state regulatory agencies of the natural gas distribution utilities. The natural gas market for Atlanta Gas Light was
deregulated in 1997. Accordingly, Marketers, rather than a traditional utility, sell natural gas to end-use customers in Georgia and
handle customer billing functions. As required by the Georgia PSC, Atlanta Gas Light bills Marketers in equal monthly installments
for each residential, commercial, and industrial end-use customer's distribution costs as well as for capacity costs utilizing a
seasonal rate design for the calculation of each residential end-use customer's annual straight-fixed-variable charge, which reflects
the historic volumetric usage pattern for the entire residential class.
The majority of the revenues of Southern Company Gas are generated from contracts with natural gas distribution customers.
Revenues from this integrated service to deliver gas when and if called upon by the customer is recognized as a single performance
obligation satisfied over time and is recognized at a tariff rate as gas is delivered to the customer during the month.
The standalone selling price is primarily determined by the price charged to customers for the specific goods or services transferred
with the performance obligations. Generally, Southern Company Gas recognizes revenue as the performance obligations are
satisfied over time as natural gas is delivered to the customer. The performance obligations related to wholesale gas services are
satisfied, and revenue is recognized, at a point in time when natural gas is delivered to the customer.
Southern Company Gas generally has a right to consideration in an amount that corresponds directly with the value to the customer
of the entity's performance completed to date and may recognize revenue in the amount to which the entity has a right to invoice
and has elected to recognize revenue for its sales of natural gas using the invoice practical expedient. In addition, payment for
goods and services rendered is typically due in the subsequent month following satisfaction of Southern Company Gas'
performance obligation.
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the natural gas distribution utilities have rate structures that include volumetric rate
designs that allow the opportunity to recover certain costs based on gas usage. Revenues from sales and transportation services are
recognized in the same period in which the related volumes are delivered to customers. Revenues from residential and certain
commercial and industrial customers are recognized on the basis of scheduled meter readings. Additionally, unbilled revenues are
recognized for estimated deliveries of gas not yet billed to these customers, from the last bill date to the end of the accounting
period. For other commercial and industrial customers and for all wholesale customers, revenues are based on actual deliveries
through the end of the period.
The tariffs for several of the natural gas distribution utilities include provisions which allow for the recognition of certain revenues
prior to the time such revenues are billed to customers. These provisions are referred to as alternative revenue programs and
provide for the recognition of certain revenues prior to billing, as long as the amounts recognized will be collected from customers
within 24 months of recognition. These programs are as follows:
•Weather normalization adjustments – reduce customer bills when winter weather is colder than normal and increase
customer bills when weather is warmer than normal and are included in the tariffs for Virginia Natural Gas, Chattanooga
Gas, and, prior to its sale, Elizabethtown Gas;
•Revenue normalization mechanisms – mitigate the impact of conservation and declining customer usage and are contained
in the tariffs for Virginia Natural Gas, Chattanooga Gas, and, prior to its sale, Elkton Gas; and
•Revenue true-up adjustment – included within the provisions of the Georgia Rate Adjustment Mechanism (GRAM)
program in which Atlanta Gas Light participates as a short-term alternative to formal rate case filings, the revenue true-up
feature provides for a monthly positive (or negative) adjustment to record revenue in the amount of any variance to
budgeted revenues, which are submitted and approved annually as a requirement of GRAM. Such adjustments are
reflected in customer billings in a subsequent program year.
Wholesale Gas Services
Southern Company Gas nets revenues from energy and risk management activities with the associated costs. Profits from sales
between segments are eliminated and are recognized as goods or services sold to end-use customers. Southern Company Gas
records transactions that qualify as derivatives at fair value with changes in fair value recognized in earnings in the period of
change and characterized as unrealized gains or losses. Gains and losses on derivatives held for energy trading purposes are
presented on a net basis in revenue.
II-274
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Gas Marketing Services
Southern Company Gas recognizes revenues from natural gas sales and transportation services in the same period in which the
related volumes are delivered to customers and recognizes sales revenues from residential and certain commercial and industrial
customers on the basis of scheduled meter readings. Southern Company Gas also recognizes unbilled revenues for estimated
deliveries of gas not yet billed to these customers from the most recent meter reading date to the end of the accounting period. For
other commercial and industrial customers and for all wholesale customers, revenues are based on actual deliveries during the
period.
Southern Company Gas recognizes revenues on 12-month utility-bill management contracts as the lesser of cumulative earned or
cumulative billed amounts. Prior to the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions, revenues for warranty and repair contracts were recognized
on a straight-line basis over the contract term while revenues for maintenance services were recognized at the time such services
were performed. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional information.
Concentration of Revenue
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power (with the exception of its cost-based MRA electric tariffs
described below), and Southern Company Gas each have a diversified base of customers and no single customer or industry
comprises 10% or more of each company's revenues.
Mississippi Power serves long-term contracts with rural electric cooperative associations and municipalities located in southeastern
Mississippi under cost-based MRA electric tariffs, which are subject to regulation by the FERC. The contracts with these wholesale
customers represented 17.3% of Mississippi Power's total operating revenues in 2018 and are generally subject to 10-year rolling
cancellation notices. Historically, these wholesale customers have acted as a group and any changes in contractual relationships for
one customer are likely to be followed by the other wholesale customers.
Significant portions of Southern Power's revenues have been derived from certain customers pursuant to PPAs. The following table
shows the percentage of total revenues for Southern Power's top three customers for each of the years presented:
 2018 2017 2016
Georgia Power 9.8% 11.3% 16.5%
Duke Energy Corporation 6.8% 6.7% 7.8%
Southern California Edison 6.2% N/A N/A
Morgan Stanley Capital Group N/A 4.5% N/A
San Diego Gas & Electric Company N/A N/A 5.7%
On January 29, 2019, Pacific Gas & Electric Company (PG&E) filed petitions to reorganize under Chapter 11 of the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code. Southern Power, together with its noncontrolling partners, owns four solar facilities where PG&E is the energy
off-taker for approximately 207 MWs of capacity under long-term PPAs. PG&E is also the transmission provider for these facilities
and two of Southern Power's other solar facilities. Southern Power has evaluated the recoverability of its investments in these solar
facilities under various scenarios, including selling the related energy into the competitive markets, and has concluded they are not
impaired. At December 31, 2018, Southern Power had outstanding accounts receivables due from PG&E of $1 million related to
the PPAs and $36 million related to the transmission interconnections (of which $17 million is classified in other deferred charges
and assets). Southern Power does not expect a material impact to its financial statements if, as a result of the bankruptcy
proceedings, PG&E does not perform in accordance with the PPAs or the terms of the PPAs are renegotiated; however, the ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Fuel Costs
Fuel costs for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power are expensed as the fuel is used. Fuel expense
generally includes fuel transportation costs and the cost of purchased emissions allowances as they are used. For Alabama Power
and Georgia Power, fuel expense also includes the amortization of the cost of nuclear fuel. For the traditional electric operating
companies, fuel costs also include gains and/or losses from fuel-hedging programs as approved by their respective state PSCs.
Cost of Natural Gas
Excluding Atlanta Gas Light, which does not sell natural gas to end-use customers, Southern Company Gas charges its utility
customers for natural gas consumed using natural gas cost recovery mechanisms set by the applicable state regulatory agencies.
II-275
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Under these mechanisms, all prudently-incurred natural gas costs are passed through to customers without markup, subject to
regulatory review. Southern Company Gas defers or accrues the difference between the actual cost of natural gas and the amount of
commodity revenue earned in a given period such that no operating income is recognized related to these costs. The deferred or
accrued amount is either billed or refunded to customers prospectively through adjustments to the commodity rate. Deferred and
accrued natural gas costs are included in the balance sheets as regulatory assets and regulatory liabilities, respectively.
Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services' customers are charged for actual or estimated natural gas consumed. Within cost of
natural gas, Southern Company Gas also includes costs of lost and unaccounted for gas, adjustments to reduce the value of
inventories to market value, and gains and losses associated with certain derivatives.
Income Taxes
The registrants use the liability method of accounting for deferred income taxes and provide deferred income taxes for all
significant income tax temporary differences. In accordance with regulatory requirements, deferred federal ITCs for the traditional
electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas are amortized over the average lives of the related property, with such
amortization normally applied as a credit to reduce depreciation in the statements of income.
Under current tax law, certain projects at Southern Power related to the construction of renewable facilities are eligible for federal
ITCs. Southern Power estimates eligible costs which, as they relate to acquisitions, may not be finalized until the allocation of the
purchase price to assets has been finalized. Southern Power applies the deferred method to ITCs. Under the deferred method, the
ITCs are recorded as a deferred credit and amortized to income tax expense over the life of the respective asset. Furthermore, the
tax basis of the asset is reduced by 50% of the ITCs received, resulting in a net deferred tax asset. Southern Power has elected to
recognize the tax benefit of this basis difference as a reduction to income tax expense in the year in which the plant reaches
commercial operation. State ITCs are recognized as an income tax benefit in the period in which the credits are generated. In
addition, certain projects are eligible for federal and state PTCs, which are recognized as an income tax benefit based on KWH
production.
Federal ITCs and PTCs, as well as state ITCs and other state tax credits available to reduce income taxes payable, were not fully
utilized in 2018 and will be carried forward and utilized in future years. In addition, Southern Company is expected to have various
state net operating loss (NOL) carryforwards for certain of its subsidiaries, which would result in income tax benefits in the future,
if utilized. See Note 10 under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes – Tax Credit Carryforwards" and " – Net Operating Loss
Carryforwards" for additional information.
The registrants recognize tax positions that are "more likely than not" of being sustained upon examination by the appropriate
taxing authorities. See Note 10 under "Unrecognized Tax Benefits" for additional information.
Other Taxes
Taxes imposed on and collected from customers on behalf of governmental agencies are presented net on the registrants' statements
of income and are excluded from the transaction price in determining the revenue related to contracts with a customer accounted for
under ASC 606.
Southern Company Gas is taxed on its gas revenues by various governmental authorities, but is allowed to recover these taxes from
its customers. Revenue taxes imposed on the natural gas distribution utilities are recorded at the amount charged to customers,
which may include a small administrative fee, as operating revenues, and the related taxes imposed on Southern Company Gas are
recorded as operating expenses on the statements of income. Revenue taxes included in operating expenses were $111 million and
$98 million for the successor years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively, $31 million for the successor period of July
1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, and $56 million for the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016.
Allowance for Funds Used During Construction and Interest Capitalized
The traditional electric operating companies and certain of the natural gas distribution utilities (Atlanta Gas Light, Chattanooga
Gas, and Nicor Gas) record AFUDC, which represents the estimated debt and equity costs of capital funds that are necessary to
finance the construction of new regulated facilities. While cash is not realized currently, AFUDC increases the revenue requirement
and is recovered over the service life of the asset through a higher rate base and higher depreciation. The equity component of
AFUDC is not taxable.
Interest related to the construction of new facilities at Southern Power and new facilities not included in the traditional electric
operating companies' and Southern Company Gas' regulated rates is capitalized in accordance with standard interest capitalization
requirements.
II-276
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Total AFUDC and interest capitalized for the registrants in 2018, 2017, and 2016 was as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
Power(a)Mississippi
Power(b)Southern
Power
 (in millions)
2018 $ 210$ 84$ 94$ —$ 17
2017 249 54 63 72 11
2016 327 39 68 124 44
(a)See Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for information on the inclusion of a portion of construction costs related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 in Georgia Power's rate base.
(b)Mississippi Power's decrease in 2017 resulted from the Kemper IGCC project suspension in June 2017.
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016 January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Southern Company Gas $ 14$ 19$ 6 $ 4
The average AFUDC composite rates for 2018, 2017, and 2016 for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern
Company Gas were as follows:
 Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power
2018 8.3% 7.3% 3.3%
2017 8.3% 5.6% 6.7%
2016 8.2% 6.9% 6.5%
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016  January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
Southern Company Gas:   
Atlanta Gas Light(a)7.9% 8.1% 4.1%  4.1%
Chattanooga Gas(a)7.4% 7.4% 3.7%  3.7%
Nicor Gas(b)2.1% 1.2% 1.5%  1.5%
(a)Fixed rates authorized by the Georgia PSC and Tennessee Public Utilities Commission for Atlanta Gas Light and Chattanooga Gas, respectively.
(b)Variable rate determined by the FERC method of AFUDC accounting.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets
The registrants evaluate long-lived assets and finite-lived intangible assets for impairment when events or changes in circumstances
indicate that the carrying value of such assets may not be recoverable. The determination of whether an impairment has occurred is
based on either a specific regulatory disallowance, a sales transaction price that is less than the asset group's carrying value, or an
estimate of undiscounted future cash flows attributable to the asset group, as compared with the carrying value of the assets. If an
impairment has occurred, the amount of the impairment recognized is determined by either the amount of regulatory disallowance
or by estimating the fair value of the assets and recording a loss if the carrying value is greater than the fair value. For assets
identified as held for sale, the carrying value is compared to the estimated fair value less the cost to sell in order to determine if an
impairment loss is required. Until the assets are disposed of, their estimated fair value is re-evaluated when circumstances or events
change. See Note 15 under "Southern Power" for information regarding impairment charges recorded in 2018. Also see "Revenues"
and "Leveraged Leases" herein and Note 3 under "Other Matters – Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
II-277
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets and Liabilities
Southern Power's intangible assets consist primarily of certain PPAs acquired, which are amortized over the term of the respective
PPA. Southern Company Gas' goodwill and other intangible assets and liabilities primarily relate to its 2016 acquisition by
Southern Company. In addition to these items, Southern Company's goodwill and other intangible assets also relate to its 2016
acquisition of PowerSecure. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" and "Southern
Company Acquisition of PowerSecure" for additional information.
Goodwill is not amortized, but is subject to an annual impairment test during the fourth quarter of each year, or more frequently if
impairment indicators arise. Southern Company Gas recorded a goodwill impairment charge in the first quarter 2018 related to its
disposition of Pivotal Home Solutions. Southern Company and Southern Company Gas each evaluated its goodwill in the fourth
quarter 2018 and determined no additional impairment was required. The following table presents 2018 changes in goodwill
balances for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas:
 
Southern
CompanySouthern Company Gas
 Gas Distribution
OperationsGas Marketing
Services
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 6,268 $ 4,702$ 1,265
Impairment(a)(42) — (42)
Dispositions(b)(910) (668) (242)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 5,315(c) $ 4,034$ 981
(a)On April 1 1, 2018, Southern Company Gas entered into a stock purchase agreement for the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. In contemplation
of this transaction and based on the purchase price, a goodwill impairment char ge of $42 million  was recorded in the first quarter 2018. See
Note 15 under " Southern Company Gas " for additional information.
(b)Gas distribution operations reflects goodwill allocated to Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and Florida City Gas, which were sold during the
third quarter 2018. Gas marketing services reflects goodwill associated with Pivotal Home Solutions, which was sold on June 4, 2018. See
Note 15 under " Southern Company Gas " for additional information.
(c)Total does not add due to rounding.
II-278
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, other intangible assets were as follows:
 At December 31, 2018 At December 31, 2017
 Gross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationOther
Intangible
Assets, NetGross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationOther
Intangible
Assets, Net
 (in millions) (in millions)
Southern Company    
Other intangible assets subject to
amortization:    
Customer relationships(a)$ 223$ (94)$ 129$ 288$ (83)$ 205
Trade names(a)70 (21) 49 159 (17) 142
Storage and transportation
contracts 64 (54) 10 64 (34) 30
PPA fair value adjustments(b)405 (61) 344 456 (47) 409
Other 11 (5) 6 17 (5) 12
Total other intangible assets
subject to amortization $ 773$ (235)$ 538$ 984$ (186)$ 798
Other intangible assets not
subject to amortization:    
Federal Communications
Commission licenses 75 — 75 75 — 75
Total other intangible assets $ 848$ (235)$ 613$ 1,059$ (186)$ 873
    
Southern Power    
Other intangible assets subject to
amortization:    
PPA fair value adjustments(b)$ 405$ (61)$ 344$ 456$ (47)$ 409
    
Southern Company Gas    
Other intangible assets subject to
amortization:    
Gas marketing services(a)   
Customer relationships $ 156$ (84)$ 72$ 221$ (77)$ 144
Trade names 26 (7) 19 115 (9) 106
Wholesale gas services    
Storage and transportation
contracts 64 (54) 10 64 (34) 30
Total other intangible assets
subject to amortization $ 246$ (145)$ 101$ 400$ (120)$ 280
(a)Balances as of December 31, 2018 reflect the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions"
for additional information.
(b)Balances as of December 31, 2018 exclude Plant Mankato-related intangible assets that were reclassified as assets held for sale. See Note 15 under "Southern
Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" for additional information.
Amortization associated with other intangible assets in 2018, 2017, and 2016 was as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Southern Company $ 89$ 124$ 50
Southern Power $ 25$ 25$ 10
II-279
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Successor Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
 (in millions) (in millions)
Southern Company Gas:   
Wholesale gas services(a)$ 20$ 32$ 2 $ —
Gas marketing services(b)32 54 32 8
(a)Recorded as a reduction to operating revenues.
(b)Included in depreciation and amortization.
At December 31, 2018, the estimated amortization associated with other intangible assets for the next five years is as follows:
 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023
 (in millions)
Southern Company(*)$ 61$ 50$ 43$ 39$ 38
Southern Power(*)20 20 20 20 20
Southern Company Gas 29 19 13 10 9
(*)Excludes amounts related to held for sale assets. See Note 15 under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" for additional information.
Included in other deferred credits and liabilities on the balance sheet is $91 million of intangible liabilities that were recorded
during acquisition accounting for transportation contracts at Southern Company Gas. At December 31, 2018, the accumulated
amortization of these intangible liabilities was $74 million. In 2019, the remaining $17 million of amortization associated with the
intangible liabilities will be recorded in natural gas revenues.
Acquisition Accounting
At the time of an acquisition, management will assess whether acquired assets and activities meet the definition of a business. For
acquisitions that meet the definition of a business, operating results from the date of acquisition are included in the acquiring
entity's financial statements. The purchase price, including any contingent consideration, is allocated based on the fair value of the
identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed (including any intangible assets). Assets acquired that do not meet the definition
of a business are accounted for as an asset acquisition.
The purchase price of each asset acquisition is allocated based on the relative fair value of assets acquired. Determining the fair
value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed requires management judgment and management may engage independent
valuation experts to assist in this process. Fair values are determined by using market participant assumptions and typically include
the timing and amounts of future cash flows, incurred construction costs, the nature of acquired contracts, discount rates, power
market prices, and expected asset lives. Any due diligence or transition costs incurred for potential or successful acquisitions are
expensed as incurred.
Historically, contingent consideration primarily relates to fixed amounts due to the seller once an acquired construction project is
placed in service. For contingent consideration with variable payments, management fair values the arrangement with any changes
recorded in the statements of income. See Note 13 for additional fair value information.
Development Costs
For Southern Power, development costs are capitalized once a project is probable of completion, primarily based on a review of its
economics and operational feasibility, as well as status of power off-take agreements and regulatory approvals, if applicable.
Southern Power's capitalized development costs are included in CWIP on the balance sheets. All of Southern Power's development
costs incurred prior to the determination that a project is probable of completion are expensed as incurred and included in other
operations and maintenance expense in the statements of income. If it is determined that a project is no longer probable of
completion, any of Southern Power's capitalized development costs are expensed and included in other operations and maintenance
expense in the statements of income.
Long-Term Service Agreements
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power have entered into LTSAs for the purpose of securing maintenance
support for certain of their generating facilities. The LTSAs cover all planned inspections on the covered equipment,
II-280
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
which generally includes the cost of all labor and materials. The LTSAs also obligate the counterparties to cover the costs of
unplanned maintenance on the covered equipment subject to limits and scope specified in each contract.
Payments made under the LTSAs for the performance of any planned inspections or unplanned capital maintenance are recorded in
the statements of cash flows as investing activities. Receipts of major parts into materials and supplies inventory prior to planned
inspections are treated as noncash transactions in the statements of cash flows. Any payments made prior to the work being
performed are recorded as prepayments in other current assets and noncurrent assets on the balance sheets. At the time work is
performed, an appropriate amount is accrued for future payments or transferred from the prepayment and recorded as property,
plant, and equipment or expensed.
Transmission Receivables/Prepayments
As a result of Southern Power's acquisition and construction of generating facilities, Southern Power has transmission receivables
and/or prepayments representing the portion of interconnection network and transmission upgrades that will be reimbursed to
Southern Power. Upon completion of the related project, transmission costs are generally reimbursed by the interconnection
provider within a five-year period and the receivable/prepayments are reduced as payments or services are received.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
For purposes of the financial statements, temporary cash investments are considered cash equivalents. Temporary cash investments
are securities with original maturities of 90 days or less.
Restricted Cash
The registrants adopted ASU 2016-18 as of January 1, 2018. See "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards – Other" herein for
additional information.
At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had restricted cash related to the redemption of pollution control revenue bonds, which were
redeemed subsequent to December 31, 2018. See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt – Pollution Control Revenue Bonds" for
additional information. At December 31, 2017, Southern Power had restricted cash primarily related to certain acquisitions and
construction projects. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, Southern Company Gas had restricted cash held as collateral for worker's
compensation, life insurance, and long-term disability insurance.
The following tables provide a reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash reported within the balance sheets that
total to the amounts shown in the statements of cash flows for the registrants that had restricted cash at December 31, 2018 and/or
2017:
 Southern
CompanyGeorgia
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2018   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,396$ 4$ 64
Cash and cash equivalents classified as assets held for sale 9 — —
Restricted cash:
Restricted cash — 108 —
Other accounts and notes receivable 114 — 6
Total cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash $ 1,519$ 112$ 70
II-281
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2017  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 2,130$ 129$ 73
Restricted cash:  
Other accounts and notes receivable 5 — 5
Deferred charges and other assets 12 11 —
Total cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash $ 2,147$ 140$ 78
Storm Damage Reserves
Each traditional electric operating company maintains a reserve to cover or is allowed to defer and recover the cost of damages
from major storms to its transmission and distribution lines and, for Mississippi Power, the cost of uninsured damages to its
generation facilities and other property. In accordance with their respective state PSC orders, the traditional electric operating
companies accrued the following amounts related to storm damage reserves in 2018, 2017, and 2016:
 Southern
Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power
 (in millions)
2018 $ 74$ 16$ 30$ 1
2017 41 4 30 3
2016 40 3 30 4
(*)Includes accruals at Gulf Power of $26.9 million in 2018 and $3.5 million in each of 2017 and 2016. See Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf
Power" for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
Alabama Power and Mississippi Power also have authority based on orders from their state PSCs to accrue certain additional
amounts as circumstances warrant. There were no such additional accruals for Alabama Power and Mississippi Power in any year
presented.
See Note 2 under "Alabama Power – Rate NDR," "Georgia Power – Storm Damage Recovery," and "Mississippi Power – System
Restoration Rider" for additional information regarding each company's storm damage reserve.
Leveraged Leases
A subsidiary of Southern Holdings has several leveraged lease agreements, with original terms ranging up to 45 years, which relate
to international and domestic energy generation, distribution, and transportation assets. Southern Company receives federal income
tax deductions for depreciation and amortization, as well as interest on long-term debt related to these investments. Southern
Company reviews all important lease assumptions at least annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances
indicate that a change in assumptions has occurred or may occur. These assumptions include the effective tax rate, the residual
value, the credit quality of the lessees, and the timing of expected tax cash flows.
The ability of the lessees to make required payments to the Southern Holdings subsidiary is dependent on the operational
performance of the assets. In 2017, the financial and operational performance of one of the lessees and the associated generation
assets raised significant concerns about the short-term ability of the generation assets to produce cash flows sufficient to support
ongoing operations and the lessee's contractual obligations and its ability to make the remaining semi-annual lease payments to the
Southern Holdings subsidiary beginning in June 2018. As a result of operational improvements in 2018, the 2018 lease payments
were paid in full. However, operational issues and the resulting cash liquidity challenges persist and significant concerns continue
regarding the lessee's ability to make the remaining semi-annual lease payments. These operational challenges may also impact the
expected residual value of the assets at the end of the lease term in 2047. If any future lease payment is not paid in full, the
Southern Holdings subsidiary may be unable to make its corresponding payment to the holders of the underlying non-recourse debt
related to the generation assets. Failure to make the required payment to the debtholders could represent an event of default that
would give the debtholders the right to foreclose on, and take ownership of, the generation assets from the Southern Holdings
subsidiary, in effect terminating the lease and resulting in the write-off of the related lease receivable, which would result in a
reduction in net income of approximately $86 million after tax based on the lease receivable balance at December 31, 2018.
Southern Company has evaluated the recoverability of the lease receivable and the expected residual value of
II-282
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
the generation assets at the end of the lease under various scenarios and has concluded that its investment in the leveraged lease is
not impaired at December 31, 2018. Southern Company will continue to monitor the operational performance of the underlying
assets and evaluate the ability of the lessee to continue to make the required lease payments. The ultimate outcome of this matter
cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Company's net investment in domestic and international leveraged leases consists of the following at December 31:
 2018  2017
 (in millions)
Net rentals receivable $ 1,563 $ 1,498
Unearned income (765) (723)
Investment in leveraged leases 798 775
Deferred taxes from leveraged leases (255) (252)
Net investment in leveraged leases $ 543 $ 523
A summary of the components of income from the leveraged leases follows:
 2018  2017  2016
 (in millions)
Pretax leveraged lease income $ 25 $ 25 $ 25
Net impact of Tax Reform Legislation — 48 —
Income tax expense (6) (9) (9)
Net leveraged lease income $ 19 $ 64 $ 16
Materials and Supplies
Materials and supplies for the traditional electric operating companies generally includes the average cost of transmission,
distribution, and generating plant materials. Materials and supplies for Southern Company Gas generally includes propane gas
inventory, fleet fuel, and other materials and supplies. Materials and supplies for Southern Power generally includes the average
cost of generating plant materials.
Materials are recorded to inventory when purchased and then expensed or capitalized to property, plant, and equipment, as
appropriate, at weighted average cost when installed. In addition, certain major parts are recorded as inventory when acquired and
then capitalized at cost when installed to property, plant, and equipment.
Fuel Inventory
Fuel inventory for the traditional electric operating companies includes the average cost of coal, natural gas, oil, transportation, and
emissions allowances. Fuel inventory for Southern Power, which is included in other current assets, includes the average cost of oil,
natural gas, biomass, and emissions allowances. Fuel is recorded to inventory when purchased and then expensed, at weighted
average cost, as used. Emissions allowances granted by the EPA are included in inventory at zero cost. The traditional electric
operating companies recover fuel expense through fuel cost recovery rates approved by each state PSC or, for wholesale rates, the
FERC.
Natural Gas for Sale
With the exception of Nicor Gas, the natural gas distribution utilities record natural gas inventories on a WACOG basis. In
Georgia's deregulated, competitive environment, Marketers sell natural gas to firm end-use customers at market-based prices. On a
monthly basis, Atlanta Gas Light assigns to Marketers the majority of the pipeline storage services that it has under contract, along
with a corresponding amount of inventory. Atlanta Gas Light retains and manages a portion of its pipeline storage assets and related
natural gas inventories for system balancing and to serve system demand.
Nicor Gas' natural gas inventory is carried at cost on a LIFO basis. Inventory decrements occurring during the year that are restored
prior to year end are charged to cost of natural gas at the estimated annual replacement cost. Inventory decrements that are not
restored prior to year end are charged to cost of natural gas at the actual LIFO cost of the inventory layers liquidated. The cost of
natural gas, including inventory costs, is recovered from customers under a purchased gas recovery mechanism adjusted
II-283
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
for differences between actual costs and amounts billed; therefore, LIFO liquidations have no impact on Southern Company's or
Southern Company Gas' net income. At December 31, 2018, the Nicor Gas LIFO inventory balance was $165 million. Based on the
average cost of gas purchased in December 2018, the estimated replacement cost of Nicor Gas' inventory at December 31, 2018
was $409 million. During 2018, Nicor Gas did not liquidate any LIFO-based inventory.
Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services, wholesale gas services, and all other segments record inventory at LOCOM, with
cost determined on a WACOG basis. For these segments, Southern Company Gas evaluates the weighted average cost of its natural
gas inventories against market prices to determine whether any declines in market prices below the WACOG are other than
temporary. For any declines considered to be other than temporary, Southern Company Gas recorded LOCOM adjustments to cost
of natural gas to reduce the value of its natural gas inventories to market value. LOCOM adjustments were $10 million during 2018
for wholesale gas services and immaterial for all other periods presented.
Energy Marketing Receivables and Payables
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services provides services to retail gas marketers, wholesale gas marketers, utility
companies, and industrial customers. These counterparties utilize netting agreements that enable wholesale gas services to net
receivables and payables by counterparty upon settlement. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services also nets across product
lines and against cash collateral, provided the netting and cash collateral agreements include such provisions. While the amounts
due from, or owed to, wholesale gas services' counterparties are settled net, they are recorded on a gross basis in the balance sheets
as energy marketing receivables and energy marketing payables.
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services has trade and credit contracts that contain minimum credit rating requirements.
These credit rating requirements typically give counterparties the right to suspend or terminate credit if Southern Company Gas'
credit ratings are downgraded to non-investment grade status. Under such circumstances, Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas
services would need to post collateral to continue transacting business with some of its counterparties. As of December 31, 2018
and 2017, the required collateral in the event of a credit rating downgrade was $30 million and $8 million, respectively.
Credit policies were established to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties, including requirements to post
collateral or other credit security, as well as the quality of pledged collateral. Collateral or credit security is most often in the form
of cash or letters of credit from an investment-grade financial institution, but may also include cash or U.S. government securities
held by a trustee. When Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services is engaged in more than one outstanding derivative
transaction with the same counterparty and it also has a legally enforceable netting agreement with that counterparty, the "net"
mark-to-market exposure represents the netting of the positive and negative exposures with that counterparty combined with a
reasonable measure of Southern Company Gas' credit risk. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services also uses other netting
agreements with certain counterparties with whom it conducts significant transactions.
See "Concentration of Credit Risk" herein for additional information.
Provision for Uncollectible Accounts
The customers of the traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities are billed monthly. For the
majority of receivables, a provision for uncollectible accounts is established based on historical collection experience and other
factors. For the remaining receivables, if the company is aware of a specific customer's inability to pay, a provision for
uncollectible accounts is recorded to reduce the receivable balance to the amount reasonably expected to be collected. If
circumstances change, the estimate of the recoverability of accounts receivable could change as well. Circumstances that could
affect this estimate include, but are not limited to, customer credit issues, customer deposits, and general economic conditions.
Customers' accounts are written off once they are deemed to be uncollectible. For all periods presented, uncollectible accounts
averaged less than 1% of revenues for each registrant.
Credit risk exposure at Nicor Gas is mitigated by a bad debt rider approved by the Illinois Commission. The bad debt rider provides
for the recovery from (or refund to) customers of the difference between Nicor Gas' actual bad debt experience on an annual basis
and the benchmark bad debt expense used to establish its base rates for the respective year.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services business has a concentration of credit risk for services it provides to its
counterparties. This credit risk is generally concentrated in 20 of its counterparties and is measured by 30-day receivable exposure
plus forward exposure. Counterparty credit risk is evaluated using a S&P equivalent credit rating, which is determined by a process
of converting the lower of the S&P or Moody's rating to an internal rating ranging from 9 to 1, with 9 being equivalent to AAA/Aaa
by S&P and Moody's, respectively, and 1 being equivalent to D/Default by S&P and Moody's, respectively. A counterparty that
does not have an external rating is assigned an internal rating based on the strength of its financial ratios. As of
II-284
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
December 31, 2018, the top 20 counterparties represented 48%, or $298 million, of the total counterparty exposure and had a
weighted average S&P equivalent rating of A-.
Concentration of credit risk occurs at Atlanta Gas Light for amounts billed for services and other costs to its customers, which
consist of 15 Marketers in Georgia (including SouthStar). The credit risk exposure to Marketers varies seasonally, with the lowest
exposure in the non-peak summer months and the highest exposure in the peak winter months. Marketers are responsible for the
retail sale of natural gas to end-use customers in Georgia. The functions of the retail sale of gas include the purchase and sale of
natural gas, customer service, billings, and collections. The provisions of Atlanta Gas Light's tariff allow Atlanta Gas Light to
obtain credit security support in an amount equal to a minimum of two times a Marketer's highest month's estimated bill from
Atlanta Gas Light.
Financial Instruments
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power use derivative financial instruments to limit exposure to
fluctuations in interest rates, the prices of certain fuel purchases, electricity purchases and sales, and occasionally foreign currency
exchange rates. Southern Company Gas uses derivative financial instruments to limit exposure to fluctuations in natural gas prices,
weather, interest rates, and commodity prices. All derivative financial instruments are recognized as either assets or liabilities on the
balance sheets (included in "Other" or shown separately as "Risk Management Activities") and are measured at fair value. See Note
13 for additional information regarding fair value. Substantially all of the traditional electric operating companies' and Southern
Power's bulk energy purchases and sales contracts that meet the definition of a derivative are excluded from fair value accounting
requirements because they qualify for the "normal" scope exception, and are accounted for under the accrual method. Derivative
contracts that qualify as cash flow hedges of anticipated transactions or are recoverable through the traditional electric operating
companies' and the natural gas distribution utilities' fuel-hedging programs result in the deferral of related gains and losses in AOCI
or regulatory assets and liabilities, respectively, until the hedged transactions occur. For 2017 and 2016, ineffectiveness arising from
cash flow hedges was recognized in net income. Upon the adoption of ASU 2017-12 in 2018, ineffectiveness is no longer
separately measured and recorded in earnings. See "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards" herein for additional information.
Other derivative contracts that qualify as fair value hedges are marked to market through current period income and are recorded on
a net basis in the statements of income. Cash flows from derivatives are classified on the statements of cash flows in the same
category as the hedged item. See Note 14 for additional information regarding derivatives.
The registrants offset fair value amounts recognized for multiple derivative instruments executed with the same counterparty under
netting arrangements. The registrants had no outstanding collateral repayment obligations or rights to reclaim collateral arising
from derivative instruments recognized at December 31, 2018.
The registrants are exposed to potential losses related to financial instruments in the event of counterparties' nonperformance. The
registrants have established risk management policies and controls to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties
in order to mitigate their exposure to counterparty credit risk.
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas enters into weather derivative contracts as economic hedges of natural gas revenues in the event of
warmer-than-normal weather in the Heating Season. Exchange-traded options are carried at fair value, with changes reflected in
natural gas revenues. Non-exchange-traded options are accounted for using the intrinsic value method. Changes in the intrinsic
value for non-exchange-traded contracts are also reflected in natural gas revenues in the statements of income.
Wholesale gas services purchases natural gas for storage when the current market price paid to buy and transport natural gas plus
the cost to store and finance the natural gas is less than the market price that can be received in the future, resulting in positive net
natural gas revenues. NYMEX futures and OTC contracts are used to sell natural gas at that future price to substantially protect the
natural gas revenues that will ultimately be realized when the stored natural gas is sold. Southern Company Gas enters into
transactions to secure transportation capacity between delivery points in order to serve its customers and various markets. NYMEX
futures and OTC contracts are used to capture the price differential or spread between the locations served by the capacity in order
to substantially protect the natural gas revenues that will ultimately be realized when the physical flow of natural gas between
delivery points occurs. These contracts generally meet the definition of derivatives and are carried at fair value on the balance
sheets, with changes in fair value recorded in natural gas revenues on the statements of income in the period of change. These
contracts are not designated as hedges for accounting purposes.
The purchase, transportation, storage, and sale of natural gas are accounted for on a weighted average cost or accrual basis, as
appropriate, rather than on the fair value basis utilized for the derivatives used to mitigate the natural gas price risk associated with
the storage and transportation portfolio. Monthly demand charges are incurred for the contracted storage and transportation
II-285
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
capacity and payments associated with asset management agreements, and these demand charges and payments are recognized on
the statements of income in the period they are incurred. This difference in accounting methods can result in volatility in reported
earnings, even though the economic margin is substantially unchanged from the dates the transactions were consummated.
Comprehensive Income
The objective of comprehensive income is to report a measure of all changes in common stock equity of an enterprise that result
from transactions and other economic events of the period other than transactions with owners. Comprehensive income consists of
net income attributable to the registrant, changes in the fair value of qualifying cash flow hedges, and reclassifications for amounts
included in net income. Comprehensive income also consists of certain changes in pension and other postretirement benefit plans
for Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas.
AOCI (loss) balances, net of tax effects, for Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas were as follows:
 Qualifying
Hedges  Pension and Other
Postretirement
Benefit Plans  Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
 (in millions)
Southern Company      
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ (119) $ (70) $ (189)
Adjustment to beginning balance(*)(26) (14) (40)
Current period change 24 2 26
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ (121) $ (82) $ (203)
      
Southern Power      
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 25 $ (27) $ (2)
Adjustment to beginning balance(*)4 —  4
Current period change 7 7 14
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 36 $ (20) $ 16
      
Southern Company Gas      
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ (6) $ 26 $ 20
Adjustment to beginning balance(*)(1) 5 4
Current period change 4 (2) 2
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ (3) $ 29 $ 26
(*)Reflects the reclassification related to stranded tax effects resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation as allowed by ASU 2018-02. See "Recently Adopted
Accounting Standards – Other" herein for additional information.
Variable Interest Entities
The primary beneficiary of a VIE is required to consolidate the VIE when it has both the power to direct the activities of the VIE
that most significantly impact the VIE's economic performance and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits
from the VIE that could potentially be significant to the VIE. See Note 7 for additional information regarding VIEs.
Alabama Power has established a wholly-owned trust to issue preferred securities. See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt – Other
Long-Term Debt – Alabama Power" for additional information. However, Alabama Power is not considered the primary beneficiary
of the trust. Therefore, the investment in the trust is reflected as other investments, and the related loan from the trust is reflected as
long-term debt in Alabama Power's balance sheets.
II-286
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
2. REGULATORY MATTERS
Southern Company
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the consolidated balance sheets of Southern Company at December 31, 2018 and
2017 relate to:
 2018  2017 Note
 (in millions)
Retiree benefit plans $ 3,658 $ 3,931 (a,p)
Asset retirement obligations-asset 2,933 1,133 (b,p)
Deferred income tax charges 799 814 (b,o)
Property damage reserves-asset 416 333 (c)
Under recovered regulatory clause revenues 407 317 (d)
Environmental remediation-asset 366 511 (e,p)
Loss on reacquired debt 346 223 (f)
Remaining net book value of retired assets 211 306 (g)
Vacation pay 182 183 (h,p)
Long-term debt fair value adjustment 121 138 (i)
Deferred PPA charges — 119 (j,p)
Other regulatory assets 581 625 (k)
Deferred income tax credits (6,455) (7,261) (b,o)
Other cost of removal obligations (2,297) (2,684) (b)
Customer refunds (293) (188) (n)
Property damage reserves-liability (76) (135) (l)
Over recovered regulatory clause revenues (47) (155) (d)
Other regulatory liabilities (132) (104) (m)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ 720 $ (1,894)
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) are approved by the respective PSC or regulatory
agency and are as follows:
(a)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which may range up to 15 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(b)Asset retirement and other cost of removal obligations are recorded, deferred income tax assets are recovered, and deferred income tax liabilities are amortized
over the related property lives, which may range up to 80 years. Asset retirement and removal liabilities will be settled and trued up following completion of the
related activities. Included in the deferred income tax assets is $28 million for the retiree Medicare drug subsidy, which is being recovered and amortized
through 2027.
(c)Through 2019, Georgia Power is recovering approximately $30 million annually for storm damage, which is expected to be adjusted in the Georgia Power 2019
Base Rate Case. See "Georgia Power – Storm Damage Recovery" herein for additional information.
(d)Recorded and recovered or amortized over periods generally not exceeding 10 years.
(e)Recovered through environmental cost recovery mechanisms when the remediation is performed or the work is performed.
(f)Recovered over either the remaining life of the original issue or, if refinanced, over the remaining life of the new issue, which may range up to 50 years.
(g)Amortized over periods not exceeding eight years.
(h)Recorded as earned by employees and recovered as paid, generally within one year. This includes both vacation and banked holiday pay.
(i)Recovered over the remaining life of the original debt issuances, which range up to 20 years. For additional information see Note 15 under "Southern Company
Merger with Southern Company Gas."
(j)Related to Gulf Power and reclassified as assets held for sale at December 31, 2018. See Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for
information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
(k)Comprised of numerous immaterial components including nuclear outage, fuel-hedging losses, cancelled construction projects, building and generating plant
leases, property tax, and other miscellaneous assets. These costs are recorded and recovered or amortized over periods generally not exceeding 50 years.
(l)Amortized as storm restoration and potential reliability-related expenses are incurred.
(m)Comprised of numerous components including retiree benefit plans, fuel-hedging gains, AROs, and other liabilities that are recorded and recovered or amortized
over periods not exceeding 20 years.
(n)At December 31, 2018, represents amounts accrued and outstanding for refund, including approximately $109 million as a result of Alabama Power's 2018 retail
return exceeding the allowed range, approximately $55 million pursuant to the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement, and approximately $100
million, subject to review and approval by the Georgia PSC, as a result of Georgia Power's 2018 retail ROE exceeding the allowed retail ROE range. See
"Alabama Power – Rate RSE" and "Georgia Power – Rate Plans" herein for additional information.
(o)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, these accounts include certain deferred income tax assets and liabilities not subject to normalization. The recovery
and amortization of these amounts will be determined in future rate proceedings. See "Georgia Power," "Mississippi Power," and "Southern Company Gas"
herein and Note 10 for additional information.
(p)Not earning a return as offset in rate base by a corresponding asset or liability.
II-287
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Gulf Power
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed its sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 under "Southern
Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for additional information.
In accordance with a Florida PSC-approved settlement agreement, Gulf Power's rates effective for the first billing cycle in July
2017 increased by approximately $54 million annually (2017 Gulf Power Rate Case Settlement), including a $62 million increase
in base revenues, less an $8 million purchased power capacity cost recovery clause credit. The 2017 Rate Case Settlement
Agreement also resulted in a $32.5 million write-down of Gulf Power's ownership of Plant Scherer Unit 3, which was recorded in
the first quarter 2017.
As a continuation of the 2017 Gulf Power Rate Case Settlement Agreement, on March 26, 2018, the Florida PSC approved a
stipulation and settlement agreement addressing Gulf Power's retail revenue requirement effects of the Tax Reform Legislation
(Gulf Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement). Beginning in April 1, 2018, the Gulf Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement
resulted in annual reductions of approximately $18 million to Gulf Power's base rates and approximately $16 million to Gulf
Power's environmental cost recovery rates and a one-time refund of approximately $69 million for the retail portion of unprotected
(not subject to normalization) deferred tax liabilities, which was credited to customers through Gulf Power's fuel cost recovery rates
over the remainder of 2018.
II-288
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Alabama Power
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the balance sheets of Alabama Power at December 31, 2018 and 2017 relate to:
 2018  2017  Note
 (in millions)  
Retiree benefit plans $ 947 $ 946 (a,p)
Deferred income tax charges 241 240 (b,c,d,)
Under recovered regulatory clause revenues 176 53 (e)
Asset retirement obligations 147 (33) (b)
Regulatory clauses 142 142 (f)
Vacation pay 71 70 (g,p)
Loss on reacquired debt 56 62 (h)
Nuclear outage 49 56 (i)
Remaining net book value of retired assets 43 54 (j)
Other regulatory assets 57 58 (k,l)
Deferred income tax credits (2,027) (2,082) (b,d)
Other cost of removal obligations (497) (609) (b)
Rate RSE refund (109) — (m)
Natural disaster reserve (20) (38) (n)
Other regulatory liabilities (45) (7) (l,o)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ (769) $ (1,088) 
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) have been accepted or approved by the Alabama
PSC and are as follows:
(a)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which may range up to 15 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(b)Asset retirement and removal assets and liabilities are recorded, deferred income tax assets are recovered, and deferred income tax credits are amortized over the
related property lives, which may range up to 50 years. Asset retirement and other cost of removal assets and liabilities will be settled and trued up following
completion of the related activities.
(c)Included in the deferred income tax charges are $10 million for 2018 and $13 million for 2017 for the retiree Medicare drug subsidy, which is being recovered
and amortized through 2027.
(d)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, these accounts include certain deferred income tax assets and liabilities not subject to normalization. The recovery
and amortization of these amounts will occur ratably over the related property lives, which may range up to 50 years. See Note 10 for additional information.
(e)Recorded and recovered or amortized over periods not exceeding 10 years. See "Rate CNP PPA," "Rate CNP Compliance," and" Rate ECR" herein for
additional information.
(f)Will be amortized concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study. See "Rate RSE" herein for additional information.
(g)Recorded as earned by employees and recovered as paid, generally within one year. This includes both vacation and banked holiday pay.
(h)Recovered over the remaining life of the original issue, which may range up to 50 years.
(i)Nuclear outage costs are deferred to a regulatory asset when incurred and amortized over a subsequent 18-month period.
(j)Recorded and amortized over remaining periods up to 8 years.
(k)Comprised of components including generation site selection/evaluation costs, PPA capacity (to be recovered over the next 12 months), and other miscellaneous
assets. Capitalized upon initialization of related construction projects, if applicable.
(l)Fuel-hedging assets and liabilities are recorded over the life of the underlying hedged purchase contracts, which generally do not exceed three and a half years.
Upon final settlement, actual costs incurred are recovered through the energy cost recovery clause.
(m)Refund accrued as a result of the 2018 retail return exceeding the allowed range. See "Rate RSE" herein for additional information.
(n)Amortized as storm restoration and potential reliability-related expenses are incurred.
(o)Comprised of several components, primarily $33 million deferred as a result of the Alabama PSC accounting order regarding the Tax Reform Legislation. See
"Tax Reform Accounting Order" herein for additional information.
(p)Not earning a return as offset in rate base by a corresponding asset or liability.
II-289
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Rate RSE
The Alabama PSC has adopted Rate RSE that provides for periodic annual adjustments based upon Alabama Power's projected
weighted common equity return (WCER) compared to an allowable range. Rate RSE adjustments are based on forward-looking
information for the applicable upcoming calendar year. Rate RSE adjustments for any two-year period, when averaged together,
cannot exceed 4.0% and any annual adjustment is limited to 5.0%. When the projected WCER is under the allowed range, there is
an adjusting point of 5.98% and eligibility for a performance-based adder of seven basis points, or 0.07%, to the WCER adjusting
point if Alabama Power (i) has an "A" credit rating equivalent with at least one of the recognized rating agencies or (ii) is in the top
one-third of a designated customer value benchmark survey. If Alabama Power's actual retail return is above the allowed WCER
range, the excess will be refunded to customers unless otherwise directed by the Alabama PSC; however, there is no provision for
additional customer billings should the actual retail return fall below the WCER range. Prior to January 2019, retail rates remained
unchanged when the WCER range was between 5.75% and 6.21%.
At December 31, 2016, Alabama Power's retail return exceeded the allowed WCER range which resulted in Alabama Power
establishing a $73 million Rate RSE refund liability. In accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued in February 2017, Alabama
Power applied the full amount of the refund to reduce the under recovered balance of Rate CNP PPA as discussed further below.
Effective in January 2017, Rate RSE increased 4.48%, or $245 million annually. At December 31, 2017, Alabama Power's actual
retail return was within the allowed WCER range. Retail rates under Rate RSE were unchanged for 2018.
In conjunction with Rate RSE, Alabama Power has an established retail tariff that provides for an adjustment to customer billings to
recognize the impact of a change in the statutory income tax rate. In accordance with this tariff, Alabama Power returned $267
million to retail customers through bill credits during 2018 as a result of the change in the federal income tax rate under the Tax
Reform Legislation.
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved modifications to Rate RSE and other commitments designed to position Alabama
Power to address the growing pressure on its credit quality resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation, without increasing retail
rates under Rate RSE in the near term. Alabama Power plans to reduce growth in total debt by increasing equity, with
corresponding reductions in debt issuances, thereby de-leveraging its capital structure. Alabama Power's goal is to achieve an
equity ratio of approximately 55% by the end of 2025. At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's equity ratio was approximately
47%.
The approved modifications to Rate RSE began for billings in January 2019. The modifications include reducing the top of the
allowed WCER range from 6.21% to 6.15% and modifications to the refund mechanism applicable to prior year actual results. The
modifications to the refund mechanism allow Alabama Power to retain a portion of the revenue that causes the actual WCER for a
given year to exceed the allowed range.
Generally, if Alabama Power's actual WCER is between 6.15% and 7.65%, customers will receive 25% of the amount between
6.15% and 6.65%, 40% of the amount between 6.65% and 7.15%, and 75% of the amount between 7.15% and 7.65%. Customers
will receive all amounts in excess of an actual WCER of 7.65%.
In conjunction with these modifications to Rate RSE, on May 8, 2018, Alabama Power consented to a moratorium on any upward
adjustments under Rate RSE for 2019 and 2020 and will also return $50 million to customers through bill credits in 2019.
On November 30, 2018, Alabama Power made its required annual Rate RSE submission to the Alabama PSC of projected data for
calendar year 2019. Projected earnings were within the specified range; therefore, retail rates under Rate RSE remain unchanged
for 2019.
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's retail return exceeded the allowed WCER range, which resulted in Alabama Power
establishing a regulatory liability of $109 million for Rate RSE refunds. In accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on
February 5, 2019, Alabama Power will apply $75 million to reduce the Rate ECR under recovered balance and the remaining $34
million will be refunded to customers through bill credits in July through September 2019.
Rate CNP PPA
Alabama Power's retail rates, approved by the Alabama PSC, provide for adjustments under Rate CNP to recognize the placing of
new generating facilities into retail service. Alabama Power may also recover retail costs associated with certificated PPAs under
Rate CNP PPA. No adjustments to Rate CNP PPA occurred during the period 2016 through 2018 and no adjustment is expected in
2019. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, Alabama Power had an under recovered Rate CNP PPA balance of $25 million and $12
million, respectively, which is included in deferred under recovered regulatory clause revenues in the balance sheet.
In accordance with an accounting order issued in February 2017 by the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power eliminated the under
recovered balance in Rate CNP PPA at December 31, 2016, which totaled approximately $142 million. As discussed herein under
II-290
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
"Rate RSE," Alabama Power utilized the full amount of its $73 million Rate RSE refund liability to reduce the amount of the Rate
CNP PPA under recovery and reclassified the remaining $69 million to a separate regulatory asset. The amortization of the new
regulatory asset through Rate RSE will begin concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study,
which is expected to occur no later than 2022. Alabama Power's current depreciation study became effective January 1, 2017.
Rate CNP Compliance
Rate CNP Compliance allows for the recovery of Alabama Power's retail costs associated with laws, regulations, and other such
mandates directed at the utility industry involving the environment, security, reliability, safety, sustainability, or similar
considerations impacting Alabama Power's facilities or operations. Rate CNP Compliance is based on forward-looking information
and provides for the recovery of these costs pursuant to a factor that is calculated annually. Compliance costs to be recovered
include operations and maintenance expenses, depreciation, and a return on certain invested capital. Revenues for Rate CNP
Compliance, as recorded on the financial statements, are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable costs and amounts billed in
current regulated rates. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor will have no significant effect on Southern Company's or
Alabama Power's revenues or net income, but will affect annual cash flow. Changes in Rate CNP Compliance-related operations
and maintenance expenses and depreciation generally will have no effect on Southern Company's or Alabama Power's net income.
In accordance with an accounting order issued in February 2017 by the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power reclassified $36 million of
its under recovered balance in Rate CNP Compliance to a separate regulatory asset. The amortization of the new regulatory asset
through Rate RSE will begin concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study, which is expected to
occur no later than 2022. Alabama Power's current depreciation study became effective January 1, 2017.
In December 2017, the Alabama PSC issued a consent order that Alabama Power leave in effect for 2018 the factors associated
with Alabama Power's compliance costs for the year 2017, with any under-collected amount for prior years deemed recovered
before any current year amounts.
On November 30, 2018, Alabama Power submitted calculations associated with its cost of complying with environmental
mandates, as provided under Rate CNP Compliance. The filing reflected a projected unrecovered retail revenue requirement for
environmental compliance of approximately $205 million, which is being recovered in the billing months of January 2019 through
December 2019.
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power had an under recovered Rate CNP Compliance balance of $42 million, which is included in
customer accounts receivable, and $17 million at December 31, 2017 included in deferred under recovered regulatory clause
revenues in the balance sheet.
Rate ECR
Alabama Power has established energy cost recovery rates under Alabama Power's Rate ECR as approved by the Alabama PSC.
Rates are based on an estimate of future energy costs and the current over or under recovered balance. Revenues recognized under
Rate ECR and recorded on the financial statements are adjusted for the difference in actual recoverable fuel costs and amounts
billed in current regulated rates. The difference in the recoverable fuel costs and amounts billed give rise to the over or under
recovered amounts recorded as regulatory assets or liabilities. Alabama Power, along with the Alabama PSC, continually monitors
the over or under recovered cost balance to determine whether an adjustment to billing rates is required. Changes in the Rate ECR
factor have no significant effect on Southern Company's or Alabama Power's net income, but will impact operating cash flows.
In accordance with an accounting order issued in February 2017 by the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power reclassified $36 million of
its under recovered balance in Rate ECR to a separate regulatory asset. The amortization of the new regulatory asset through Rate
RSE will begin concurrently with the effective date of Alabama Power's next depreciation study, which is expected to occur no later
than 2022. Alabama Power's current depreciation study became effective January 1, 2017.
In December 2017, the Alabama PSC issued a consent order that Alabama Power leave in effect for 2018 the energy cost recovery
rates which began in 2017.
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved an increase to Rate ECR from 2.015 cents per KWH to 2.353 cents per KWH
effective July 2018 through December 2018. On December 4, 2018, the Alabama PSC issued a consent order to leave this rate in
effect through December 31, 2019. This change is expected to increase collections by approximately $183 million in 2019. Absent
any further order from the Alabama PSC, in January 2020, the rates will return to the originally authorized 5.910 cents per KWH.
As discussed herein under "Rate RSE," in accordance with an Alabama PSC order issued on February 5, 2019, Alabama Power will
utilize $75 million of the 2018 Rate RSE refund liability to reduce the Rate ECR under recovered balance.
II-291
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018, Alabama Power's under recovered fuel costs totaled $109 million, of which $18 million is included in
customer accounts receivable and $91 million is included in deferred under recovered regulatory clause revenues on Southern
Company's and Alabama Power's balance sheets. At December 31, 2017, Alabama Power had an under recovered fuel balance of
$25 million, which was included in deferred under recovered regulatory clause revenues on Southern Company's and Alabama
Power's balance sheets. These classifications are based on estimates, which include such factors as weather, generation availability,
energy demand, and the price of energy. A change in any of these factors could have a material impact on the timing of any
recovery or return of fuel costs.
Tax Reform Accounting Order
On May 1, 2018, the Alabama PSC approved an accounting order that authorized Alabama Power to defer the benefits of federal
excess deferred income taxes associated with the Tax Reform Legislation for the year ended December 31, 2018 as a regulatory
liability and to use up to $30 million of such deferrals to offset under recovered amounts under Rate ECR. The estimated deferrals
for the year ended December 31, 2018 totaled approximately $63 million, subject to adjustment following the filing of the 2018 tax
return, of which $30 million was used to offset the Rate ECR under recovered balance and $33 million is recorded in other
regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet to be used for the benefit of customers as determined by the Alabama PSC at a
future date. See Note 10 under "Current and Deferred Income Taxes" for additional information.
Software Accounting Order
On February 5, 2019, the Alabama PSC approved an accounting order that authorizes Alabama Power to establish a regulatory asset
for operations and maintenance costs associated with software implementation projects. The regulatory asset will be amortized
ratably over the life of the related software.
Rate NDR
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC, Alabama Power maintains a reserve for operations and maintenance expenses to cover
the cost of damages from major storms to its transmission and distribution facilities. The order approves a separate monthly Rate
NDR charge to customers consisting of two components. The first component is intended to establish and maintain a reserve
balance for future storms and is an on-going part of customer billing. When the reserve balance falls below $50 million, a reserve
establishment charge will be activated (and the on-going reserve maintenance charge concurrently suspended) until the reserve
balance reaches $75 million. In December 2017, the reserve maintenance charge was suspended and the reserve establishment
charge was activated as a result of the NDR balance falling below $50 million. Alabama Power expects to collect approximately
$16 million annually until the reserve balance is restored to $75 million. The NDR balance at December 31, 2018 was $20 million
and is included in other regulatory liabilities, deferred on the balance sheet.
The second component of the Rate NDR charge is intended to allow recovery of any existing deferred storm-related operations and
maintenance costs and any future reserve deficits over a 24-month period. The Alabama PSC order gives Alabama Power authority
to record a deficit balance in the NDR when costs of storm damage exceed any established reserve balance. Absent further Alabama
PSC approval, the maximum total Rate NDR charge consisting of both components is $10 per month per non-residential customer
account and $5 per month per residential customer account. Alabama Power has the authority, based on an order from the Alabama
PSC, to accrue certain additional amounts as circumstances warrant. The order allows for reliability-related expenditures to be
charged against the additional accruals when the NDR balance exceeds $75 million. Alabama Power may designate a portion of the
NDR to reliability-related expenditures as a part of an annual budget process for the following year or during the current year for
identified unbudgeted reliability-related expenditures that are incurred. Accruals that have not been designated can be used to offset
storm charges. Additional accruals to the NDR will enhance Alabama Power's ability to deal with the financial effects of future
natural disasters, promote system reliability, and offset costs retail customers would otherwise bear. No such accruals were recorded
or designated in any period presented.
As revenue from the Rate NDR charge is recognized, an equal amount of operations and maintenance expenses related to the NDR
will also be recognized. As a result, the Rate NDR charge will not have an effect on net income but will impact operating cash
flows.
Environmental Accounting Order
Based on an order from the Alabama PSC (Environmental Accounting Order), Alabama Power is allowed to establish a regulatory
asset to record the unrecovered investment costs, including the unrecovered plant asset balance and the unrecovered costs
associated with site removal and closure associated with future unit retirements caused by environmental regulations. The
regulatory asset is being amortized and recovered over the affected unit's remaining useful life, as established prior to the decision
regarding early retirement through Rate CNP Compliance. At December 31, 2018, this regulatory asset had a balance of $42
II-292
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
million, of which $10 million is included in other regulatory assets, current and $32 million is included in other regulatory assets,
deferred on the balance sheet.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Alabama Power determined that Plant Gorgas Units 8, 9, and 10 (approximately 1,000 MWs)
will be retired by April 15, 2019 due to the expected costs of compliance with federal and state environmental regulations. In
accordance with the Environmental Accounting Order, approximately $740 million of net investment costs will be transferred to a
regulatory asset at the retirement date and recovered over the affected units' remaining useful lives, as established prior to the
decision to retire.
II-293
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Georgia Power
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the balance sheets of Georgia Power at December 31, 2018 and 2017 relate to:
 2018  2017 Note
 (in millions)
Retiree benefit plans $ 1,295 $ 1,313 (a, l)
Asset retirement obligations 2,644 945 (b, l)
Deferred income tax charges 522 521 (b, c, l)
Storm damage reserves 416 333 (d)
Remaining net book value of retired assets 127 146 (e)
Loss on reacquired debt 277 127 (f, l)
Vacation pay 91 91 (g, l)
Other cost of removal obligations 68 40 (b)
Environmental remediation 55 49 (h)
Other regulatory assets 135 106 (i)
Deferred income tax credits (3,080) (3,248) (b, c)
Customer refunds (165) (188) (j)
Other regulatory liabilities (7) (3) (k, l)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ 2,378 $ 232
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) are approved by the Georgia PSC and are as follows:
(a)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which may range up to 14 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(b)Through 2019, Georgia Power is recovering approximately $60 million annually for AROs, which is expected to be adjusted in the Georgia Power 2019 Base
Rate Case. Asset retirement and removal liabilities will be settled and trued up following completion of the related activities. See Note 6 for additional
information on AROs. Other cost of removal obligations and deferred income tax assets are recovered and deferred income tax liabilities are amortized over the
related property lives, which may range up to 65 years. Included in the deferred income tax assets is $17 million for the retiree Medicare drug subsidy, which is
being recovered and amortized through 2022.
(c)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, these balances include $145 million of deferred income tax assets related to CWIP for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 and
approximately $610 million of deferred income tax liabilities, neither of which are subject to normalization. The recovery and amortization of these amounts is
expected to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. See "Rate Plans" herein and Note 10 for additional information.
(d)Through 2019, Georgia Power is recovering approximately $30 million annually for storm damage, which is expected to be adjusted in the Georgia Power 2019
Base Rate Case. See "Storm Damage Recovery" herein and Note 1 under "Storm Damage Reserves" for additional information.
(e)The net book value of Plant Branch Units 1 through 4 at December 31, 2018 was $87 million, which is being amortized over the units' remaining useful lives
through 2024. The net book value of Plant Mitchell Unit 3 at December 31, 2018 was $9 million, which will continue to be amortized through December 31,
2019 as provided in the 2013 ARP. Amortization of the remaining approximately $4 million net book value of Plant Mitchell Unit 3 at December 31, 2019 and a
total of approximately $31 million related to obsolete inventories of certain retired units is expected to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate
Case. See "Integrated Resource Plan" herein for additional information.
(f)Recovered over either the remaining life of the original issue or, if refinanced, over the remaining life of the new issue, which currently does not exceed 34
years.
(g)Recorded as earned by employees and recovered as paid, generally within one year. This includes both vacation and banked holiday pay.
(h)Through 2019, Georgia Power is recovering approximately $2 million annually for environmental remediation, which is expected to be adjusted in the Georgia
Power 2019 Base Rate Case. See Note 3 under Environmental Remediation for additional information.
(i)Comprised of several components including future generation costs, deferred nuclear outage costs, cancelled construction projects, building lease, and fuel-
hedging losses. The timing of recovery of approximately $50 million for a future generation site is expected to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base
Rate Case. Nuclear outage costs are recorded and recovered or amortized over the outage cycles of each nuclear unit, which do not exceed 24 months.
Approximately $30 million of costs associated with construction of environmental controls that will not be completed as a result of unit retirements are being
amortized through 2022. The building lease is recorded and recovered or amortized through 2020. Fuel-hedging losses are recovered through Georgia Power's
fuel cost recovery mechanism upon final settlement. See "Integrated Resource Plan" herein for additional information on future generation costs.
(j)At December 31, 2018, approximately $55 million was accrued and outstanding for refund pursuant to the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement
and approximately $100 million was accrued for refund, subject to review and approval by the Georgia PSC, as a result of the 2018 retail ROE exceeding the
allowed retail ROE range. See "Rate Plans" herein for additional information.
(k)Comprised of Demand-Side Management (DSM) tariff over recovery and fuel-hedging gains. The amortization of DSM tariff over recovery of $3 million at
December 31, 2018 is expected to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Fuel-hedging gains are refunded through Georgia Power's fuel cost
recovery mechanism upon final settlement. See "Rate Plans" herein for additional information on customer refunds and DSM tariffs.
(l)Generally not earning a return as they are excluded from rate base or are offset in rate base by a corresponding asset or liability.
II-294
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Rate Plans
Pursuant to the terms and conditions of a settlement agreement related to Southern Company's acquisition of Southern Company
Gas approved by the Georgia PSC in 2016, the 2013 ARP will continue in effect until December 31, 2019, and Georgia Power will
be required to file its next base rate case by July 1, 2019. Furthermore, through December 31, 2019, Georgia Power will retain its
merger savings, net of transition costs, as defined in the settlement agreement; through December 31, 2022, such net merger
savings will be shared on a 60/40 basis with customers; thereafter, all merger savings will be retained by customers.
There were no changes to Georgia Power's traditional base tariff rates, Environmental Compliance Cost Recovery (ECCR) tariff,
DSM tariffs, or Municipal Franchise Fee tariff in 2017 or 2018.
Under the 2013 ARP, Georgia Power's retail ROE is set at 10.95% and earnings are evaluated against a retail ROE range of 10.00%
to 12.00%. Two-thirds of any earnings above 12.00% will be directly refunded to customers, with the remaining one-third retained
by Georgia Power. There will be no recovery of any earnings shortfall below 10.00% on an actual basis. In 2016, Georgia Power's
retail ROE exceeded 12.00%, and Georgia Power refunded to retail customers in 2018 approximately $40 million as approved by
the Georgia PSC. On February 5, 2019, the Georgia PSC approved a settlement between Georgia Power and the staff of the Georgia
PSC under which Georgia Power's retail ROE for 2017 was stipulated to exceed 12.00% and Georgia Power will reduce certain
regulatory assets by approximately $4 million in lieu of providing refunds to retail customers. In 2018, Georgia Power's retail ROE
exceeded 12.00%, and Georgia Power accrued approximately $100 million to refund to retail customers, subject to review and
approval by the Georgia PSC.
On April 3, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved the Georgia Power Tax Reform Settlement Agreement. Pursuant to the Georgia Power
Tax Reform Settlement Agreement, to reflect the federal income tax rate reduction impact of the Tax Reform Legislation, Georgia
Power will refund to customers a total of $330 million through bill credits. Georgia Power issued bill credits of approximately $130
million in 2018 and will issue bill credits of approximately $95 million in June 2019 and $105 million in February 2020. In
addition, Georgia Power is deferring as a regulatory liability (i) the revenue equivalent of the tax expense reduction resulting from
legislation lowering the Georgia state income tax rate from 6.00% to 5.75% in 2019 and (ii) the entire benefit of federal and state
excess accumulated deferred income taxes, which is expected to total approximately $700 million at December 31, 2019. At
December 31, 2018, the related regulatory liability balance totaled $610 million. The amortization of these regulatory liabilities is
expected to be addressed in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. If there is not a base rate case in 2019, customers will receive
$185 million in annual bill credits beginning in 2020, with any additional federal and state income tax savings deferred as a
regulatory liability, until Georgia Power's next base rate case.
To address some of the negative cash flow and credit quality impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation, the Georgia PSC also
approved an increase in Georgia Power's retail equity ratio to the lower of (i) Georgia Power's actual common equity weight in its
capital structure or (ii) 55%, until the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power's actual retail
common equity ratio (on a 13-month average basis) was approximately 55%. Benefits from reduced federal income tax rates in
excess of the amounts refunded to customers will be retained by Georgia Power to cover the carrying costs of the incremental
equity in 2018 and 2019.
Integrated Resource Plan
In 2016, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's triennial Integrated Resource Plan (2016 IRP) including the reclassification of
the remaining net book value of Plant Mitchell Unit 3 and costs associated with materials and supplies remaining at the unit
retirement date to a regulatory asset. Recovery of the unit's net book value will continue through December 31, 2019, as provided
in the 2013 ARP. The timing of the recovery of the remaining balance of the unit's net book value as of December 31, 2019 and
costs associated with materials and supplies remaining at the unit retirement date was deferred for consideration in the Georgia
Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
In the 2016 IRP, the Georgia PSC also approved recovery of costs up to $99 million through June 30, 2019 to preserve nuclear
generation as an option at a future generation site in Stewart County, Georgia. In March 2017, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia
Power's decision to suspend work at the site due to changing economics, including lower load forecasts and fuel costs. The timing
of recovery for costs incurred of approximately $50 million is expected to be determined by the Georgia PSC in the Georgia Power
2019 Base Rate Case.
On January 31, 2019, Georgia Power filed its triennial IRP (2019 IRP). The filing includes a request to decertify and retire Plant
Hammond Units 1 through 4 (840 MWs) and Plant McIntosh Unit 1 (142.5 MWs) upon approval of the 2019 IRP.
In the 2019 IRP, Georgia Power requested approval to reclassify the remaining net book value of Plant Hammond Units 1 through 4
(approximately $520 million at December 31, 2018) upon retirement to a regulatory asset to be amortized ratably over a period
equal to the applicable unit's remaining useful life through 2035. For Plant McIntosh Unit 1, Georgia Power requested approval to
II-295
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
reclassify the remaining net book value (approximately $40 million at December 31, 2018) upon retirement to a regulatory asset to
be amortized over a three-year period to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Georgia Power also requested
approval to reclassify any unusable material and supplies inventory balances remaining at the applicable unit's retirement date to a
regulatory asset for recovery over a period to be determined in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
The 2019 IRP also includes a request to certify approximately 25 MWs of capacity at Plant Scherer Unit 3 for the retail jurisdiction
beginning January 1, 2020, following the expiration of a wholesale PPA.
The 2019 IRP also includes details regarding ARO costs associated with ash pond and landfill closures and post-closure care.
Georgia Power requested the timing and rate of recovery of these costs be determined by the Georgia PSC in the Georgia Power
2019 Base Rate Case. See Note 6 for additional information regarding Georgia Power's AROs.
Georgia Power also requested approval to issue two capacity-based requests for proposals (RFP). If approved, the first capacity-
based RFP will seek resources that can provide capacity beginning in 2022 or 2023 and the second capacity-based RFP will seek
resources that can provide capacity beginning in 2026, 2027, or 2028. Additionally, the 2019 IRP includes a request to procure an
additional 1,000 MWs of renewable resources through a competitive bidding process. Georgia Power also proposed to invest in a
portfolio of up to 50 MWs of battery energy storage technologies.
A decision from the Georgia PSC on the 2019 IRP is expected in mid-2019.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Georgia Power has established fuel cost recovery rates approved by the Georgia PSC. In 2016, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia
Power's request to lower annual billings under an interim fuel rider by approximately $313 million effective June 1, 2016, which
expired on December 31, 2017. On August 16, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved the deferral of Georgia Power's next fuel case to
no later than March 16, 2020, with new rates, if any, to be effective June 1, 2020. Georgia Power continues to be allowed to adjust
its fuel cost recovery rates under an interim fuel rider prior to the next fuel case if the under or over recovered fuel balance exceeds
$200 million. Georgia Power's under recovered fuel balance totaled $115 million and $165 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively, and is included in under recovered fuel clause revenues on Southern Company's and Georgia Power's balance sheets.
Georgia Power's fuel cost recovery mechanism includes costs associated with a natural gas hedging program, as revised and
approved by the Georgia PSC, allowing the use of an array of derivative instruments within a 48-month time horizon.
Fuel cost recovery revenues as recorded on the financial statements are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel costs and
amounts billed in current regulated rates. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on Southern
Company's or Georgia Power's revenues or net income, but will affect operating cash flows.
Storm Damage Recovery
Georgia Power defers and recovers certain costs related to damages from major storms as mandated by the Georgia PSC. Beginning
January 1, 2014, Georgia Power is accruing $30 million annually under the 2013 ARP that is recoverable through base rates. At
December 31, 2018 and 2017, the balance in the regulatory asset related to storm damage was $416 million and $333 million,
respectively, with $30 million included in other regulatory assets, current for each year and $386 million and $303 million included
in other regulatory assets, deferred, respectively. During October 2018, Hurricane Michael caused significant damage to Georgia
Power's transmission and distribution facilities. The incremental restoration costs related to this hurricane deferred in the regulatory
asset for storm damage totaled approximately $115 million. Hurricanes Irma and Matthew also caused significant damage to
Georgia Power's transmission and distribution facilities during September 2017 and October 2016, respectively. The incremental
restoration costs related to Hurricanes Irma and Matthew deferred in the regulatory asset for storm damage totaled approximately
$250 million. The rate of storm damage cost recovery is expected to be adjusted as part of the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case
and further adjusted in future regulatory proceedings as necessary. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this
time.
Nuclear Construction
In 2009, the Georgia PSC certified construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Georgia Power holds a 45.7% ownership interest in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In 2012, the NRC issued the related combined construction and operating licenses, which allowed full
construction of the two AP1000 nuclear units (with electric generating capacity of approximately 1,100 MWs each) and related
facilities to begin. Until March 2017, construction on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 continued under the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement,
II-296
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
which was a substantially fixed price agreement. In March 2017, the EPC Contractor filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter
11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.
In connection with the EPC Contractor's bankruptcy filing, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the Vogtle Owners,
entered into the Interim Assessment Agreement with the EPC Contractor to allow construction to continue. The Interim Assessment
Agreement expired in July 2017 when Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, and the EPC
Contractor entered into the Vogtle Services Agreement. Under the Vogtle Services Agreement, Westinghouse provides facility
design and engineering services, procurement and technical support, and staff augmentation on a time and materials cost basis. The
Vogtle Services Agreement provides that it will continue until the start-up and testing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are complete
and electricity is generated and sold from both units. The Vogtle Services Agreement is terminable by the Vogtle Owners upon 30
days' written notice.
In October 2017, Georgia Power, acting for itself and as agent for the other Vogtle Owners, executed the Bechtel Agreement, a cost
reimbursable plus fee arrangement, whereby Bechtel is reimbursed for actual costs plus a base fee and an at-risk fee, which is
subject to adjustment based on Bechtel's performance against cost and schedule targets. Each Vogtle Owner is severally (not
jointly) liable for its proportionate share, based on its ownership interest, of all amounts owed to Bechtel under the Bechtel
Agreement. The Vogtle Owners may terminate the Bechtel Agreement at any time for their convenience, provided that the Vogtle
Owners will be required to pay amounts related to work performed prior to the termination (including the applicable portion of the
base fee), certain termination-related costs, and, at certain stages of the work, the applicable portion of the at-risk fee. Bechtel may
terminate the Bechtel Agreement under certain circumstances, including certain Vogtle Owner suspensions of work, certain
breaches of the Bechtel Agreement by the Vogtle Owners, Vogtle Owner insolvency, and certain other events. Pursuant to the Loan
Guarantee Agreement between Georgia Power and the DOE, Georgia Power is required to obtain the DOE's approval of the Bechtel
Agreement prior to obtaining any further advances under the Loan Guarantee Agreement.
Cost and Schedule
Georgia Power's approximate proportionate share of the remaining estimated capital cost to complete Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 by
the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, is as follows:
(in billions)
Base project capital cost forecast(a)(b)$ 8.0
Construction contingency estimate 0.4
Total project capital cost forecast(a)(b)8.4
Net investment as of December 31, 2018(b)(4.6)
Remaining estimate to complete(a)$ 3.8
(a)Excludes financing costs expected to be capitalized through AFUDC of approximately $315 million.
(b)Net of $1.7 billion received from Toshiba under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds.
Georgia Power estimates that its financing costs for construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will total approximately $3.1 billion,
of which $1.9 billion had been incurred through December 31, 2018.
As construction continues, challenges with management of contractors, subcontractors, and vendors; labor productivity, availability,
and/or cost escalation; procurement, fabrication, delivery, assembly, and/or installation and testing, including any required
engineering changes, of plant systems, structures, and components (some of which are based on new technology that only recently
began initial operation in the global nuclear industry at this scale); or other issues could arise and change the projected schedule and
estimated cost. Monthly construction production targets required to maintain the current project schedule will continue to increase
significantly throughout 2019. To meet these increasing monthly targets, existing craft construction productivity must improve and
additional craft laborers must be retained and deployed.
Georgia Power and Southern Nuclear believe it is a leading practice in connection with a construction project of this size and
complexity to periodically validate recent construction progress in comparison to the projected schedule and to verify and update
quantities of commodities remaining to install, labor productivity, and forecasted staffing needs. This verification process, led by
Southern Nuclear, was underway as of December 31, 2018 and is expected to be completed during the second quarter 2019.
Georgia Power currently does not anticipate any material changes to the total estimated project capital cost forecast for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 or the expected in-service dates of November 2021 and November 2022, respectively, resulting from this verification
process. However, the ultimate impact on cost and schedule, if any, will not be known until the verification process is completed.
Georgia Power is required to report the results and any project impacts to the Georgia PSC by May 15, 2019.
II-297
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
There have been technical and procedural challenges to the construction and licensing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 at the federal
and state level and additional challenges may arise. Processes are in place that are designed to assure compliance with the
requirements specified in the Westinghouse Design Control Document and the combined construction and operating licenses,
including inspections by Southern Nuclear and the NRC that occur throughout construction. As a result of such compliance
processes, certain license amendment requests have been filed and approved or are pending before the NRC. Various design and
other licensing-based compliance matters, including the timely resolution of ITAAC and the related approvals by the NRC, may
arise, which may result in additional license amendments or require other resolution. If any license amendment requests or other
licensing-based compliance issues are not resolved in a timely manner, there may be delays in the project schedule that could result
in increased costs.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, any extension of the project schedule is
currently estimated to result in additional base capital costs of approximately $50 million per month, based on Georgia Power's
ownership interests, and AFUDC of approximately $12 million per month. While Georgia Power is not precluded from seeking
recovery of any future capital cost forecast increase, management will ultimately determine whether or not to seek recovery. Any
further changes to the capital cost forecast that are not expected to be recoverable through regulated rates will be required to be
charged to income and such charges could be material.
Joint Owner Contracts
In November 2017, the Vogtle Owners entered into an amendment to their joint ownership agreements for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4 to provide for, among other conditions, additional Vogtle Owner approval requirements. Effective August 31, 2018, the Vogtle
Owners further amended the joint ownership agreements to clarify and provide procedures for certain provisions of the joint
ownership agreements related to adverse events that require the vote of the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 to continue construction (as amended, and together with the November 2017 amendment, the Vogtle
Joint Ownership Agreements). The Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements also confirm that the Vogtle Owners' sole recourse against
Georgia Power or Southern Nuclear for any action or inaction in connection with their performance as agent for the Vogtle Owners
is limited to removal of Georgia Power and/or Southern Nuclear as agent, except in cases of willful misconduct.
As a result of the increase in the total project capital cost forecast and Georgia Power's decision not to seek rate recovery of the
increase in the base capital costs as described below, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4 were required to vote to continue construction. On September 26, 2018, the Vogtle Owners unanimously voted to continue
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
In connection with the vote to continue construction, Georgia Power entered into (i) a binding term sheet (Vogtle Owner Term
Sheet) with the other Vogtle Owners and MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC (MEAG SPVJ), MEAG
Power SPVM, LLC (MEAG SPVM), and MEAG Power SPVP, LLC (MEAG SPVP) to take certain actions which partially
mitigate potential financial exposure for the other Vogtle Owners, including additional amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements and the purchase of PTCs from the other Vogtle Owners, and (ii) a term sheet (MEAG Term Sheet) with MEAG and
MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with respect to MEAG SPVJ's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (Project J) under
certain circumstances. On January 14, 2019, Georgia Power, MEAG, and MEAG SPVJ entered into an agreement to implement the
provisions of the MEAG Term Sheet (MEAG Funding Agreement). On February 18, 2019, Georgia Power, the other Vogtle
Owners, and MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG SPVJ, MEAG SPVM, and MEAG SPVP entered into certain
amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements to implement the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet (Global
Amendments).
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
were modified as follows: (i) each Vogtle Owner must pay its proportionate share of qualifying construction costs for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 based on its ownership percentage up to the estimated cost at completion (EAC) for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 which
formed the basis of Georgia Power's forecast of $8.4 billion in the nineteenth VCM plus $800 million; (ii) Georgia Power will be
responsible for 55.7% of actual qualifying construction costs between $800 million and $1.6 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth
VCM (resulting in $80 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners responsible for
44.3% of such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests; and (iii) Georgia Power will be responsible for
65.7% of qualifying construction costs between $1.6 billion and $2.1 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth VCM (resulting in a
further $100 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners responsible for 34.3% of
such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
If the EAC is revised and exceeds the EAC in the nineteenth VCM by more than $2.1 billion, each of the other Vogtle Owners will
have a one-time option at the time the project budget forecast is so revised to tender a portion of its ownership interest to
II-298
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Georgia Power in exchange for Georgia Power's agreement to pay 100% of such Vogtle Owner's remaining share of total
construction costs in excess of the EAC in the nineteenth VCM plus $2.1 billion. In this event, Georgia Power will have the option
of cancelling the project in lieu of purchasing a portion of the ownership interest of any other Vogtle Owner. If Georgia Power
accepts the offer to purchase a portion of another Vogtle Owner's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, the ownership
interest(s) to be conveyed from the tendering Vogtle Owner(s) to Georgia Power will be calculated based on the proportion of the
cumulative amount of construction costs paid by each such tendering Vogtle Owner(s) and by Georgia Power as of the COD of
Plant Vogtle Unit 4. For purposes of this calculation, payments made by Georgia Power on behalf of another Vogtle Owner in
accordance with the second and third items described in the paragraph above will be treated as payments made by the applicable
Vogtle Owner.
In the event the actual costs of construction at completion of a Unit are less than the EAC reflected in the nineteenth VCM report
and such Unit is placed in service in accordance with the schedule projected in the nineteenth VCM report (i.e., Plant Vogtle Unit 3
is placed in service by November 2021 or Plant Vogtle Unit 4 is placed in service by November 2022), Georgia Power will be
entitled to 60.7% of the cost savings with respect to the relevant Unit and the remaining Vogtle Owners will be entitled to 39.3% of
such savings on a pro rata basis in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
For purposes of the foregoing provisions, qualifying construction costs will not include costs (i) resulting from force majeure
events, including governmental actions or inactions (or significant delays associated with issuance of such actions) that affect the
licensing, completion, start-up, operations, or financing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, administrative proceedings or litigation
regarding ITAAC or other regulatory challenges to commencement of operation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, and changes in laws
or regulations governing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, (ii) legal fees and legal expenses incurred due to litigation with contractors or
subcontractors that are not subsidiaries or affiliates of Southern Company, and (iii) additional costs caused by requests from the
Vogtle Owners other than Georgia Power, except for the exercise of a right to vote granted under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements, that increase costs by $100,000 or more.
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the provisions of the Vogtle Joint
Ownership Agreements requiring that Vogtle Owners holding 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 vote to
continue construction following certain adverse events (Project Adverse Events) were modified. Pursuant to the Global
Amendments, the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 must vote to continue
construction if certain Project Adverse Events occur, including: (i) the bankruptcy of Toshiba; (ii) the termination or rejection in
bankruptcy of certain agreements, including the Vogtle Services Agreement, the Bechtel Agreement, or the agency agreement with
Southern Nuclear; (iii) Georgia Power publicly announces its intention not to submit for rate recovery any portion of its investment
in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 or the Georgia PSC determines that any of Georgia Power's costs relating to the construction of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will not be recovered in retail rates, excluding any additional amounts paid by Georgia Power on behalf of the
other Vogtle Owners pursuant to the Global Amendments described above and the first 6% of costs during any six-month VCM
reporting period that are disallowed by the Georgia PSC for recovery, or for which Georgia Power elects not to seek cost recovery,
through retail rates; and (iv) an incremental extension of one year or more over the most recently approved schedule. Under the
Global Amendments, Georgia Power may cancel the project at any time in its sole discretion.
In addition, pursuant to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements, the required approval of holders of ownership interests in Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is at least (i) 90% for a change of the primary construction contractor and (ii) 67% for material amendments to
the Vogtle Services Agreement or agreements with Southern Nuclear or the primary construction contractor, including the Bechtel
Agreement.
The Global Amendments provide that if the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests fail to vote in favor of continuing the
project following any future Project Adverse Event, work on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will continue for a period of 30 days if the
holders of more than 50% of the ownership interests vote in favor of continuing construction (Majority Voting Owners). In such a
case, the Vogtle Owners (i) have agreed to negotiate in good faith towards the resumption of the project, (ii) if no agreement is
reached during such 30-day period, the project will be cancelled, and (iii) in the event of such a cancellation, the Majority Voting
Owners will be obligated to reimburse any other Vogtle Owner for the incremental costs it incurred during such 30-day negotiation
period.
Purchase of PTCs During Commercial Operation
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, Georgia Power has agreed to purchase
additional PTCs from OPC, Dalton, MEAG SPVM, MEAG SPVP, and MEAG SPVJ (to the extent any MEAG SPVJ PTC rights
remain after any purchases required under the MEAG Funding Agreement as described below) at varying purchase prices
dependent upon the actual cost to complete construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 as compared to the EAC reflected in the
nineteenth VCM report. The purchases are at the option of the applicable Vogtle Owner.
II-299
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Potential Funding to MEAG Project J
Pursuant to the MEAG Funding Agreement, and consistent with the MEAG Term Sheet, if MEAG SPVJ is unable to make its
payments due under the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements solely as a result of the occurrence of one of the following situations
that materially impedes access to capital markets for MEAG for Project J: (i) the conduct of JEA or the City of Jacksonville, such
as JEA's legal challenges of its obligations under a PPA with MEAG (PPA-J), or (ii) PPA-J is declared void by a court of competent
jurisdiction or rejected by JEA under the applicable provisions of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code (each of (i) and (ii), a JEA Default), at
MEAG's request, Georgia Power will purchase from MEAG SPVJ the rights to PTCs attributable to MEAG SPVJ's share of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (approximately 206 MWs) within 30 days of such request at varying prices dependent upon the stage of
construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. The aggregate purchase price of the PTCs, together with any advances made as
described in the next paragraph, shall not exceed $300 million.
At the option of MEAG, as an alternative or supplement to Georgia Power's purchase of PTCs as described above, Georgia Power
has agreed to provide up to $250 million in funding to MEAG for Project J in the form of advances (either advances under the
Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements or the purchase of MEAG Project J bonds, at the discretion of Georgia Power), subject to any
required approvals of the Georgia PSC and the DOE.
In the event MEAG SPVJ certifies to Georgia Power that it is unable to fund its obligations under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements as a result of a JEA Default and Georgia Power becomes obligated to provide funding as described above, MEAG is
required to (i) assign to Georgia Power its right to vote on any future Project Adverse Event and (ii) diligently pursue JEA for its
breach of PPA-J. In addition, Georgia Power agreed that it will not sue MEAG for any amounts due from MEAG SPVJ under
MEAG's guarantee of MEAG SPVJ's obligations so long as MEAG SPVJ complies with the terms of the MEAG Funding
Agreement as to its payment obligations and the other non-payment provisions of the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements.
Under the terms of the MEAG Funding Agreement, Georgia Power may cancel the project in lieu of providing funding in the form
of advances or PTC purchases.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Regulatory Matters
In 2009, the Georgia PSC voted to certify construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 with a certified capital cost of $4.418 billion.
In addition, in 2009 the Georgia PSC approved inclusion of the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 related CWIP accounts in rate base, and
the State of Georgia enacted the Georgia Nuclear Energy Financing Act, which allows Georgia Power to recover financing costs for
Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. Financing costs are recovered on all applicable certified costs through annual adjustments to the NCCR
tariff up to the certified capital cost of $4.418 billion. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had recovered approximately $1.9
billion of financing costs. Financing costs related to capital costs above $4.418 billion will be recovered through AFUDC; however,
Georgia Power will not record AFUDC related to any capital costs in excess of the total deemed reasonable by the Georgia PSC
(currently $7.3 billion) and not requested for rate recovery. On December 18, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's
request to increase the NCCR tariff by $88 million annually, effective January 1, 2019.
Georgia Power is required to file semi-annual VCM reports with the Georgia PSC by February 28 and August 31 of each year. In
2013, in connection with the eighth VCM report, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation between Georgia Power and the staff of
the Georgia PSC to waive the requirement to amend the Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 certificate in accordance with the 2009
certification order until the completion of Plant Vogtle Unit 3, or earlier if deemed appropriate by the Georgia PSC and Georgia
Power.
In 2016, the Georgia PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement (Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement) resolving certain prudency
matters in connection with the fifteenth VCM report. In December 2017, the Georgia PSC voted to approve (and issued its related
order on January 11, 2018) Georgia Power's seventeenth VCM report, which included a recommendation to continue construction
with Southern Nuclear as project manager and Bechtel serving as the primary construction contractor, and modified the Vogtle Cost
Settlement Agreement. The Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement, as modified by the January 11, 2018 order, resolved the following
regulatory matters related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4: (i) none of the $3.3 billion of costs incurred through December 31, 2015
and reflected in the fourteenth VCM report should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of imprudence; (ii) the Contractor
Settlement Agreement was reasonable and prudent and none of the amounts paid pursuant to the Contractor Settlement Agreement
should be disallowed from rate base on the basis of imprudence; (iii) (a) capital costs incurred up to $5.68 billion would be
presumed to be reasonable and prudent with the burden of proof on any party challenging such costs, (b) Georgia Power would
have the burden to show that any capital costs above $5.68 billion were prudent, and (c) a revised capital cost forecast of $7.3
billion (after reflecting the impact of payments received under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and related Customer Refunds)
was found reasonable; (iv) construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 should be completed, with Southern Nuclear serving as
project manager and Bechtel as primary contractor; (v) approved and deemed reasonable Georgia
II-300
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Power's revised schedule placing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 in service in November 2021 and November 2022, respectively; (vi)
confirmed that the revised cost forecast does not represent a cost cap and that prudence decisions on cost recovery will be made at a
later date, consistent with applicable Georgia law; (vii) reduced the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff (a) from 10.95% (the
ROE rate setting point authorized by the Georgia PSC in the 2013 ARP) to 10.00% effective January 1, 2016, (b) from 10.00% to
8.30%, effective January 1, 2020, and (c) from 8.30% to 5.30%, effective January 1, 2021 (provided that the ROE in no case will be
less than Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt); (viii) reduced the ROE used for AFUDC equity for Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4 from 10.00% to Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt, effective January 1, 2018; and (ix) agreed that upon Unit 3
reaching commercial operation, retail base rates would be adjusted to include carrying costs on those capital costs deemed prudent
in the Vogtle Cost Settlement Agreement. The January 11, 2018 order also stated that if Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 are not
commercially operational by June 1, 2021 and June 1, 2022, respectively, the ROE used to calculate the NCCR tariff will be further
reduced by 10 basis points each month (but not lower than Georgia Power's average cost of long-term debt) until the respective
Unit is commercially operational. The ROE reductions negatively impacted earnings by approximately $100 million, $25 million,
and $20 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively, and are estimated to have negative earnings impacts of approximately $75
million in 2019 and an aggregate of approximately $615 million from 2020 to 2022.
In its January 11, 2018 order, the Georgia PSC also stated if other conditions change and assumptions upon which Georgia Power's
seventeenth VCM report are based do not materialize, the Georgia PSC reserved the right to reconsider the decision to continue
construction.
On February 12, 2018, Georgia Interfaith Power & Light, Inc. (GIPL) and Partnership for Southern Equity, Inc. (PSE) filed a
petition appealing the Georgia PSC's January 11, 2018 order with the Fulton County Superior Court. On March 8, 2018, Georgia
Watch filed a similar appeal to the Fulton County Superior Court for judicial review of the Georgia PSC's decision and denial of
Georgia Watch's motion for reconsideration. On December 21, 2018, the Fulton County Superior Court granted Georgia Power's
motion to dismiss the two appeals. On January 9, 2019, GIPL, PSE, and Georgia Watch filed an appeal of this decision with the
Georgia Court of Appeals. Georgia Power believes the appeal has no merit; however, an adverse outcome in the appeal combined
with subsequent adverse action by the Georgia PSC could have a material impact on Southern Company's and Georgia Power's
results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
In preparation for its nineteenth VCM filing, Georgia Power requested Southern Nuclear to perform a full cost reforecast for the
project. This reforecast, performed prior to the nineteenth VCM filing, resulted in a $0.7 billion increase to the base capital cost
forecast reported in the second quarter 2018. This base cost increase primarily resulted from changed assumptions related to the
finalization of contract scopes and management responsibilities for Bechtel and over 60 subcontractors, labor productivity rates,
and craft labor incentives, as well as the related levels of project management, oversight, and support, including field supervision
and engineering support.
Although Georgia Power believes these incremental costs are reasonable and necessary to complete the project and the Georgia
PSC's order in the seventeenth VCM proceeding specifically states that the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 is not subject
to a cost cap, Georgia Power did not seek rate recovery for these cost increases included in the current base capital cost forecast (or
any related financing costs) in the nineteenth VCM report. In connection with future VCM filings, Georgia Power may request the
Georgia PSC to evaluate costs currently included in the construction contingency estimate for rate recovery as and when they are
appropriately included in the base capital cost forecast. After considering the significant level of uncertainty that exists regarding
the future recoverability of costs included in the construction contingency estimate since the ultimate outcome of these matters is
subject to the outcome of future assessments by management, as well as Georgia PSC decisions in these future regulatory
proceedings, Georgia Power recorded a total pre-tax charge to income of $1.1 billion ($0.8 billion after tax) in the second quarter
2018, which includes the total increase in the base capital cost forecast and construction contingency estimate.
On August 31, 2018, Georgia Power filed its nineteenth VCM report with the Georgia PSC, which requested approval of $578
million of construction capital costs incurred from January 1, 2018 through June 30, 2018. On February 19, 2019, the Georgia PSC
approved the nineteenth VCM, but deferred approval of $51.6 million of expenditures related to Georgia Power's portion of an
administrative claim filed in the Westinghouse bankruptcy proceedings. Through the nineteenth VCM, the Georgia PSC has
approved total construction capital costs incurred through June 30, 2018 of $5.4 billion (before $1.7 billion of payments received
under the Guarantee Settlement Agreement and approximately $188 million in related Customer Refunds). In addition, the staff of
the Georgia PSC requested, and Georgia Power agreed, to file its twentieth VCM report concurrently with the twenty-first VCM
report by August 31, 2019.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
II-301
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
DOE Financing
At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power had borrowed $2.6 billion related to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 costs through the Loan
Guarantee Agreement and a multi-advance credit facility among Georgia Power, the DOE, and the FFB, which provides for
borrowings of up to $3.46 billion, subject to the satisfaction of certain conditions. In September 2017, the DOE issued a conditional
commitment to Georgia Power for up to approximately $1.67 billion in additional guaranteed loans under the Loan Guarantee
Agreement. In September 2018, the DOE extended the conditional commitment to March 31, 2019. Any further extension must be
approved by the DOE. Final approval and issuance of these additional loan guarantees by the DOE cannot be assured and are
subject to the negotiation of definitive agreements, completion of due diligence by the DOE, receipt of any necessary regulatory
approvals, and satisfaction of other conditions. See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" for
additional information, including applicable covenants, events of default, mandatory prepayment events (including any decision not
to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4), and conditions to borrowing.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
II-302
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Mississippi Power
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the balance sheets of Mississippi Power at December 31, 2018 and 2017 relate to:
 2018 2017 Note
 (in millions)
Retiree benefit plans – regulatory assets $ 171$ 174 (a)
Asset retirement obligations 143 95 (b)
Kemper County energy facility assets, net 69 88 (c)
Remaining net book value of retired assets 41 44 (d)
Property tax 44 43 (e)
Deferred charges related to income taxes 34 36 (b)
Plant Daniel Units 3 and 4 36 36 (f)
ECO carryforward 26 26 (g)
Other regulatory assets 28 28 (h)
Deferred credits related to income taxes (377) (377) (i)
Other cost of removal obligations (185) (178) (b)
Property damage (56) (57) (j)
Other regulatory liabilities (9) — (k)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ (35)$ (42)
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) are approved by the Mississippi PSC and are as
follows:
(a)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which may range up to 15 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(b)Asset retirement and other cost of removal obligations and deferred charges related to income taxes are generally recovered over the related property lives,
which may range up to 48 years. Asset retirement and other cost of removal obligations will be settled and trued up upon completion of removal activities over a
period to be determined by the Mississippi PSC.
(c)Includes $91 million of regulatory assets and $22 million of regulatory liabilities. The retail portion includes $75 million of regulatory assets and $22 million of
regulatory liabilities that are being recovered in rates over an eight-year period through 2025 and a six-year period through 2023, respectively. Recovery of the
wholesale portion of the regulatory assets in the amount of $16 million is expected to be determined in a settlement agreement with wholesale customers in
2019. For additional information, see "Kemper County Energy Facility – Rate Recovery – Kemper Settlement Agreement" herein.
(d)Retail portion includes approximately $26 million being recovered over a five-year period through 2021 and 2022 for Plant Watson and Plant Greene County,
respectively. Recovery of the wholesale portion of approximately $15 million is expected to be determined in a settlement agreement with wholesale customers
in 2019.
(e)Recovered through the ad valorem tax adjustment clause over a 12-month period beginning in April of the following year. See "Ad Valorem Tax Adjustment"
herein for additional information.
(f)Represents the difference between the revenue requirement under the purchase option and the revenue requirement assuming operating lease accounting
treatment for the extended term, which will be amortized over a 10-year period beginning October 2021.
(g)Generally recovered through the ECO Plan clause in the year following the deferral. See "Environmental Compliance Plan" herein.
(h)Comprised of $9 million related to vacation pay, $8 million related to loss on reacquired debt, and other miscellaneous assets. These costs are recorded and
recovered or amortized over periods which may range up to 50 years. This amount also includes fuel-hedging assets which are recorded over the life of the
underlying hedged purchase contracts, which generally do not exceed three years. Upon final settlement, actual costs incurred are recovered through the ECM.
(i)Includes excess deferred income taxes primarily associated with Tax Reform Legislation of $377 million, of which $266 million is related to protected deferred
income taxes to be recovered over the related property lives utilizing the average rate assumption method in accordance with IRS normalization principles and
$111 million related to unprotected (not subject to normalization). The unprotected portion associated with the Kemper County energy facility is $46 million, of
which $33 million is being amortized over eight years through 2025 for retail and the amortization of $15 million is expected to be determined in a settlement
agreement with wholesale customers in 2019. Mississippi Power also has $9 million of excess deferred income tax benefits associated with the System
Restoration Rider being amortized over an eight-year period through 2025. Amortization of the remaining portions of the unprotected deferred income taxes
associated with the Tax Reform Legislation are expected to be determined in Mississippi Power's next base rate proceeding, which is scheduled to be filed in the
fourth quarter 2019 (Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case). See "Kemper County Energy Facility" and "FERC Matters – Mississippi Power – Municipal and
Rural Associations Tariff" herein and Note 10 for additional information.
(j)For additional information, see "System Restoration Rider" herein.
(k)Comprised of numerous immaterial components including deferred income tax credits and other miscellaneous liabilities that are recorded and refunded or
amortized generally over periods not exceeding one year.
II-303
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Operations Review
In August 2018, the Mississippi PSC began an operations review of Mississippi Power, for which the final report is expected prior
to the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Mississippi Power expects that the review will include, but not be
limited to, a comparative analysis of its costs, its cost recovery framework, and ways in which it may streamline management
operations for the reasonable benefit of ratepayers. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Performance Evaluation Plan
Mississippi Power's retail base rates generally are set under the PEP, a rate plan approved by the Mississippi PSC. Two filings are
made for each calendar year: the PEP projected filing, which is typically filed prior to the beginning of the year based on a
projected revenue requirement, and the PEP lookback filing, which is filed after the end of the year and allows for review of the
actual revenue requirement compared to the projected filing.
In 2011, Mississippi Power submitted its annual PEP lookback filing for 2010, which recommended no surcharge or refund. Later
in 2011, the MPUS disputed certain items in the 2010 PEP lookback filing. In 2012, the Mississippi PSC issued an order canceling
Mississippi Power's PEP lookback filing for 2011. In 2013, the MPUS contested Mississippi Power's PEP lookback filing for 2012,
which indicated a refund due to customers of $5 million. In 2014 through 2018, Mississippi Power submitted its annual PEP
lookback filings for the prior years, which for each of 2013, 2014, and 2017 indicated no surcharge or refund and for each of 2015
and 2016 indicated a $5 million surcharge. Additionally, in July 2016, in November 2016, and in November 2017, Mississippi
Power submitted its annual projected PEP filings for 2016, 2017, and 2018, respectively, which for 2016 and 2017 indicated no
change in rates and for 2018 indicated a rate increase of 4%, or $38 million in annual revenues. The Mississippi PSC suspended
each of these filings to allow more time for review.
On February 7, 2018, Mississippi Power revised its annual projected PEP filing for 2018 to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform
Legislation. The revised filing requested an increase of $26 million in annual revenues, based on a performance adjusted ROE of
9.33% and an increased equity ratio of 55%. On July 27, 2018, Mississippi Power and the MPUS entered into a settlement
agreement, which was approved by the Mississippi PSC on August 7, 2018, with respect to the 2018 PEP filing and all unresolved
PEP filings for prior years (PEP Settlement Agreement). Rates under the PEP Settlement Agreement became effective with the first
billing cycle of September 2018. The PEP Settlement Agreement provides for an increase of approximately $21.6 million in annual
base retail revenues, which excludes certain compensation costs contested by the MPUS, as well as approximately $2 million
which was subsequently approved for recovery through the 2018 Energy Efficiency Cost Rider as discussed below. Under the PEP
Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power is deferring the contested compensation costs for 2018 and 2019 as a regulatory asset,
which totaled $4 million as of December 31, 2018 and is included in other regulatory assets, deferred on the balance sheet. The
Mississippi PSC is currently expected to rule on the appropriate treatment for such costs in connection with the Mississippi Power
2019 Base Rate Case. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Pursuant to the PEP Settlement Agreement, Mississippi Power's performance-adjusted allowed ROE is 9.31% and its allowed
equity ratio is capped at 51%, pending further review by the Mississippi PSC. In lieu of the requested equity ratio increase,
Mississippi Power retained $44 million of excess accumulated deferred income taxes resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation
until the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Further, Mississippi Power agreed to seek equity contributions
sufficient to restore its equity ratio to 50% by December 31, 2018. Since Mississippi Power's actual average equity ratio for 2018
was more than 1% lower than the 50% target, Mississippi Power deferred the corresponding difference in its revenue requirement
of approximately $4 million as a regulatory liability for resolution in the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. Pursuant to the
PEP Settlement Agreement, PEP proceedings are suspended until after the conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate
Case and Mississippi Power is not required to make any PEP filings for regulatory years 2018, 2019, and 2020. The PEP Settlement
Agreement also resolved all open PEP filings with no change to customer rates. As a result, in the third quarter 2018, Mississippi
Power recognized revenues of $5 million previously reserved in connection with the 2012 PEP lookback filing.
Energy Efficiency
In 2013, the Mississippi PSC approved an energy efficiency and conservation rule requiring electric and gas utilities in Mississippi
serving more than 25,000 customers to implement energy efficiency programs and standards. Quick Start Plans, which include a
portfolio of energy efficiency programs that are intended to provide benefits to a majority of customers, were extended by an order
issued by the Mississippi PSC in July 2016, until the time the Mississippi PSC approves a comprehensive portfolio plan program.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
II-304
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
On May 8, 2018, the Mississippi PSC issued an order approving Mississippi Power's revised annual projected Energy Efficiency
Cost Rider 2018 compliance filing, which increased annual retail revenues by approximately $3 million effective with the first
billing cycle for June 2018.
On February 5, 2019, the Mississippi PSC issued an order approving Mississippi Power's Energy Efficiency Cost Rider 2019
compliance filing, which included a slight decrease in annual retail revenues, effective with the first billing cycle in March 2019.
Environmental Compliance Overview Plan
In accordance with a 2011 accounting order from the Mississippi PSC, Mississippi Power has the authority to defer in a regulatory
asset for future recovery all plant retirement- or partial retirement-related costs resulting from environmental regulations. The
Mississippi PSC approved $41 million and $17 million of costs that were reclassified to regulatory assets associated with the fuel
conversion of Plant Watson and Plant Greene County, respectively, for amortization over five-year periods that began in July 2016
and July 2017, respectively. As a result, these decisions are not expected to have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial
statements.
In August 2016, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's revised ECO Plan filing for 2016, which requested the
maximum 2% annual increase in revenues, or approximately $18 million, primarily related to the Plant Daniel Units 1 and 2
scrubbers placed in service in 2015. The revised rates became effective with the first billing cycle for September 2016.
Approximately $22 million of related revenue requirements in excess of the 2% maximum was deferred for inclusion in the 2017
filing, along with related carrying costs.
In May 2017, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's ECO Plan filing for 2017, which requested the maximum 2%
annual increase in revenues, or approximately $18 million, primarily related to the carryforward from the prior year. The rates
became effective with the first billing cycle for June 2017. Approximately $26 million, plus carrying costs, of related revenue
requirements in excess of the 2% maximum was deferred for inclusion in the 2018 filing.
On February 14, 2018, Mississippi Power submitted its ECO Plan filing for 2018, including the effects of the Tax Reform
Legislation, which requested the maximum 2% annual increase in revenues, or approximately $17 million, primarily related to the
carryforward from the prior year.
On August 3, 2018, Mississippi Power and the MPUS entered into the ECO Settlement Agreement, which provides for an increase
of approximately $17 million in annual base retail revenues and was approved by the Mississippi PSC on August 7, 2018. Rates
under the ECO Settlement Agreement became effective with the first billing cycle of September 2018 and will continue in effect
until modified by the Mississippi PSC. These revenues are expected to be sufficient to recover the costs included in Mississippi
Power's request for 2018, as well as the remaining deferred amounts, totaling $26 million at December 31, 2018, along with the
related carrying costs. In accordance with the ECO Settlement Agreement, ECO Plan proceedings are suspended until after the
conclusion of the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case and Mississippi Power is not required to make any ECO Plan filings for
2018, 2019, and 2020, with any necessary adjustments to be reflected in the Mississippi Power 2019 Base Rate Case. The ECO
Settlement Agreement contains the same terms as the PEP Settlement Agreement described herein with respect to allowed ROE and
equity ratio. At December 31, 2018, Mississippi Power has recorded $2 million in other regulatory liabilities, deferred on the
balance sheet related to the actual December 31, 2018 average equity ratio differential from target applicable to the ECO Plan.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Mississippi Power establishes, annually, a retail fuel cost recovery factor that is approved by the Mississippi PSC. Mississippi
Power is required to file for an adjustment to the retail fuel cost recovery factor annually. In January 2017, the Mississippi PSC
approved the 2017 retail fuel cost recovery factor, effective February 2017 through January 2018, which resulted in an annual
revenue increase of $55 million. On January 16, 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved the 2018 retail fuel cost recovery factor,
effective February 2018 through January 2019, which resulted in an annual revenue increase of $39 million. At December 31, 2018,
the amount of over recovered retail fuel costs included in the balance sheet in other accounts payable was approximately $8 million
compared to $6 million under recovered at December 31, 2017. On January 10, 2019, the Mississippi PSC approved the 2019 retail
fuel cost recovery factor, effective February 2019, which results in a $35 million decrease in annual revenues as a result of lower
expected fuel costs.
Mississippi Power's operating revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel cost and amounts billed in accordance
with the currently approved cost recovery rate. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor should have no significant effect on
Southern Company's or Mississippi Power's revenues or net income but will affect operating cash flows.
II-305
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Ad Valorem Tax Adjustment
Mississippi Power establishes annually an ad valorem tax adjustment factor that is approved by the Mississippi PSC to collect the
ad valorem taxes paid by Mississippi Power. In 2018, 2017, and 2016, the Mississippi PSC approved Mississippi Power's annual ad
valorem tax adjustment factor filing, which included a rate increase of 0.8%, or $7 million, in 2018, a rate increase of 0.85%, or $8
million, in 2017, and a rate decrease of 0.07%, or $1 million, in 2016.
System Restoration Rider
Mississippi Power carries insurance for the cost of certain types of damage to generation plants and general property. However,
Mississippi Power is self-insured for the cost of storm, fire, and other uninsured casualty damage to its property, including
transmission and distribution facilities. As permitted by the Mississippi PSC and the FERC, Mississippi Power accrues for the cost
of such damage through an annual expense accrual credited to regulatory liability accounts for the retail and wholesale
jurisdictions. The cost of repairing actual damage resulting from such events that individually exceed $50,000 is charged to the
reserve. Every three years the Mississippi PSC, the MPUS, and Mississippi Power will agree on SRR revenue level(s) for the
ensuing period, based on historical data, expected exposure, type and amount of insurance coverage, excluding insurance cost, and
any other relevant information. The accrual amount and the reserve balance are determined based on the SRR revenue level(s). If a
significant change in circumstances occurs, then the SRR revenue level can be adjusted more frequently if Mississippi Power and
the MPUS or the Mississippi PSC deem the change appropriate. The property damage reserve accrual will be the difference
between the approved SRR revenues and the SRR revenue requirement, excluding any accrual to the reserve. In addition, SRR
allows Mississippi Power to set up a regulatory asset, pending review, if the allowable actual retail property damage costs exceed
the amount in the retail property damage reserve. Mississippi Power made retail accruals of $1 million, $3 million, and $4 million
for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. Mississippi Power also accrued $0.3 million annually in 2018, 2017, and 2016 for the
wholesale jurisdiction. As of December 31, 2018, the property damage reserve balances were $55 million and $1 million for retail
and wholesale, respectively.
Based on Mississippi Power's annual SRR rate filings, the SRR rate was zero for all years presented and Mississippi Power accrued
$2 million, $4 million, and $3 million to the property damage reserve in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. The SRR rate filings
were suspended by the Mississippi PSC for review for a period not to exceed 120 days from their respective filing dates, after
which the filings became effective.
In January 2017, a tornado caused extensive damage to Mississippi Power's transmission and distribution infrastructure. The cost of
storm damage repairs was approximately $9 million. A portion of these costs was charged to the retail property damage reserve and
addressed in the 2018 SRR rate filing.
Kemper County Energy Facility
Overview
The Kemper County energy facility was designed to utilize IGCC technology with an expected output capacity of 582 MWs and to
be fueled by locally mined lignite (an abundant, lower heating value coal) from a mine owned by Mississippi Power and situated
adjacent to the Kemper County energy facility. The mine, operated by North American Coal Corporation, started commercial
operation in 2013. In connection with the Kemper County energy facility construction, Mississippi Power constructed
approximately 61 miles of CO2 pipeline infrastructure for the transport of captured CO2 for use in enhanced oil recovery.
Schedule and Cost Estimate
In 2012, the Mississippi PSC issued an order (2012 MPSC CPCN Order), confirming the CPCN originally approved by the
Mississippi PSC in 2010 authorizing the acquisition, construction, and operation of the Kemper County energy facility. The
certificated cost estimate of the Kemper County energy facility included in the 2012 MPSC CPCN Order was $2.4 billion, net of
approximately $0.57 billion for the cost of the lignite mine and equipment, the cost of the CO2 pipeline facilities, AFUDC, and
certain general exceptions (Cost Cap Exceptions). The 2012 MPSC CPCN Order approved a construction cost cap of up to $2.88
billion, with recovery of prudently-incurred costs subject to approval by the Mississippi PSC. The Kemper County energy facility
was originally projected to be placed in service in May 2014. Mississippi Power placed the combined cycle and the associated
common facilities portion of the Kemper County energy facility in service in August 2014. The combined cycle and associated
common facilities portions of the Kemper County energy facility were dedicated as Plant Ratcliffe on April 27, 2018.
On June 21, 2017, the Mississippi PSC stated its intent to issue an order, which occurred on July 6, 2017, directing Mississippi
Power to pursue a settlement under which the Kemper County energy facility would be operated as a natural gas plant, rather than
an IGCC plant, and address all issues associated with the Kemper County energy facility. The order established a new docket for
the purpose of pursuing a global settlement of the related costs (Kemper Settlement Docket). On June 28, 2017, Mississippi
II-306
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Power notified the Mississippi PSC that it would begin a process to suspend operations and start-up activities on the gasifier
portion of the Kemper County energy facility, given the uncertainty as to its future.
At the time of project suspension in June 2017, the total cost estimate for the Kemper County energy facility was approximately
$7.38 billion, including approximately $5.95 billion of costs subject to the construction cost cap, and was net of the $137 million in
additional grants from the DOE received in April 2016. In the aggregate, Mississippi Power had recorded charges to income of
$3.07 billion ($1.89 billion after tax) as a result of changes in the cost estimate above the cost cap for the Kemper IGCC through
May 31, 2017.
Given the Mississippi PSC's stated intent regarding no further rate increase for the Kemper County energy facility and the
subsequent suspension, cost recovery of the gasifier portions became no longer probable; therefore, Mississippi Power recorded an
additional charge to income in June 2017 of $2.8 billion ($2.0 billion after tax), which included estimated costs associated with the
gasification portions of the plant and lignite mine. During the third and fourth quarters of 2017, Mississippi Power recorded charges
to income of $242 million ($206 million after tax), including $164 million for ongoing project costs, estimated mine and gasifier-
related costs, and certain termination costs during the suspension period prior to conclusion of the Kemper Settlement Docket, as
well as the charge associated with the Kemper Settlement Agreement discussed below.
In 2018, Mississippi Power recorded pre-tax charges to income of $37 million ($27 million after tax), primarily resulting from the
abandonment and related closure activities and ongoing period costs, net of sales proceeds, for the mine and gasifier-related assets
at the Kemper County energy facility. In addition, Mississippi Power recorded a credit to earnings of $95 million in the fourth
quarter 2018 primarily resulting from the reduction of a valuation allowance for a state income tax NOL carryforward associated
with the Kemper County energy facility. Additional closure costs for the mine and gasifier-related assets, currently estimated at up
to $10 million pre-tax (excluding salvage, net of dismantlement costs), may be incurred through the first half of 2020. In addition,
period costs, including, but not limited to, costs for compliance and safety, ARO accretion, and property taxes for the mine and
gasifier-related assets, are estimated to total $11 million in 2019 and $2 million to $4 million annually in 2020 through 2023.
Mississippi Power is currently evaluating its options regarding the final disposition of the CO2 pipeline, including removal of the
pipeline. This evaluation is expected to be complete later in 2019. If Mississippi Power ultimately decides to remove the CO2
pipeline, the cost of removal would have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements and could have a material
impact on Southern Company's financial statements. The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
See Note 10 for additional information.
Rate Recovery
Kemper Settlement Agreement
In 2015, the Mississippi PSC issued an order (In-Service Asset Rate Order) regarding the Kemper County energy facility assets that
were commercially operational and providing service to customers (the transmission facilities, combined cycle, natural gas
pipeline, and water pipeline) and other related costs. The In-Service Asset Rate Order provided for retail rate recovery of an annual
revenue requirement of approximately $126 million which went into effect on December 17, 2015.
On February 6, 2018, the Mississippi PSC voted to approve a settlement agreement related to cost recovery for the Kemper County
energy facility among Mississippi Power, the MPUS, and certain intervenors (Kemper Settlement Agreement), which resolved all
cost recovery issues, modified the CPCN to limit the Kemper County energy facility to natural gas combined cycle operation, and
provided for an annual revenue requirement of approximately $99.3 million for costs related to the Kemper County energy facility,
which included the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation. The revenue requirement is based on (i) a fixed ROE for 2018 of 8.6%
excluding any performance adjustment, (ii) a ROE for 2019 calculated in accordance with PEP, excluding the performance
adjustment, (iii) for future years, a performance-based ROE calculated pursuant to PEP, and (iv) amortization periods for the related
regulatory assets and liabilities of eight years and six years, respectively. The revenue requirement also reflects a disallowance
related to a portion of Mississippi Power's investment in the Kemper County energy facility requested for inclusion in rate base,
which was recorded in the fourth quarter 2017 as an additional charge to income of approximately $78 million ($85 million net of
accumulated depreciation of $7 million) pre-tax ($48 million after tax).
Under the Kemper Settlement Agreement, retail customer rates reflect a reduction of approximately $26.8 million annually,
effective with the first billing cycle of April 2018, and include no recovery for costs associated with the gasifier portion of the
Kemper County energy facility in 2018 or at any future date.
Reserve Margin Plan
On August 6, 2018, Mississippi Power filed its proposed Reserve Margin Plan (RMP), as required by the Mississippi PSC's order in
the Kemper Settlement Docket. Under the RMP, Mississippi Power proposed alternatives that would reduce its reserve margin,
II-307
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
with the most economic of the alternatives being the two-year and seven-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Watson Units 4
and 5, respectively, to the first quarter 2022 and the four-year acceleration of the retirement of Plant Greene County Units 1 and 2
to the third quarter 2021 and the third quarter 2022, respectively, in order to lower or avoid operating costs. The Plant Greene
County unit retirements would require the completion by Alabama Power of proposed transmission and system reliability
improvements, as well as agreement by Alabama Power. The RMP filing also states that, in the event the Mississippi PSC
ultimately approves an alternative that includes an accelerated retirement, Mississippi Power would require authorization to defer in
a regulatory asset for future recovery the remaining net book value of the units at the time of retirement. A decision by the
Mississippi PSC that does not include recovery of the remaining book value of any generating units retired could have a material
impact on Mississippi Power's and Southern Company's financial statements. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
Lignite Mine and CO2 Pipeline Facilities
Mississippi Power owns the lignite mine and equipment and mineral reserves located around the Kemper County energy facility
site. The mine started commercial operation in June 2013.
In 2010, Mississippi Power executed a 40-year management fee contract with Liberty Fuels Company, LLC (Liberty Fuels), a
wholly-owned subsidiary of The North American Coal Corporation, which developed, constructed, and is responsible for the
mining operations through the end of the mine reclamation. As the mining permit holder, Liberty Fuels has a legal obligation to
perform mine reclamation and Mississippi Power has a contractual obligation to fund all reclamation activities. As a result of the
abandonment of the Kemper IGCC, final mine reclamation began in 2018 and is expected to be substantially completed in 2020,
with monitoring expected to continue through 2027. See Note 6 and Note 7 under "Mississippi Power" for additional information.
In addition, Mississippi Power constructed the CO2 pipeline for the planned transport of captured CO2 for use in enhanced oil
recovery and entered into an agreement with Denbury Onshore (Denbury) to purchase the captured CO2. The agreement with
Denbury was terminated in December 2018 and did not have a material impact on Southern Company's or Mississippi Power's
results of operations. Mississippi Power is currently evaluating its options regarding the final disposition of the CO2 pipeline,
including removal of the pipeline. This evaluation is expected to be complete later in 2019. If Mississippi Power ultimately decides
to remove the CO2 pipeline, the cost of removal would have a material impact on Mississippi Power's financial statements and
could have a material impact on Southern Company's financial statements. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
Government Grants
In 2010, the DOE, through a cooperative agreement with SCS, agreed to fund $270 million of the Kemper County energy facility
through the grants awarded to the project by the DOE under the Clean Coal Power Initiative Round 2. Through December 31, 2018,
Mississippi Power received total DOE grants of $387 million, of which $382 million reduced the construction costs of the Kemper
County energy facility and $5 million reimbursed Mississippi Power for expenses associated with DOE reporting. On December
12, 2018, Mississippi Power filed with the DOE its request for property closeout certification under the contract related to the
grants received. Mississippi Power and the DOE are currently in discussions regarding the requested closeout and property
disposition, which may require payment to the DOE for a portion of certain property that is to be retained by Mississippi Power.
The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time; however, it could have a material impact on Mississippi
Power's financial statements and a significant impact on Southern Company's financial statements.
II-308
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Regulatory assets and (liabilities) reflected in the balance sheets of Southern Company Gas at December 31, 2018 and 2017 relate
to:
 2018  2017 Note
 (in millions)
Environmental remediation $ 311 $ 410 (a,b)
Retiree benefit plans 161 270 (a,c)
Long-term debt fair value adjustment 121 138 (d)
Under recovered regulatory clause revenues 90 98 (e)
Other regulatory assets 59 79 (f)
Other cost of removal obligations (1,585) (1,646) (g)
Deferred income tax credits (940) (1,063) (g,i)
Over recovered regulatory clause revenues (43) (144) (e)
Other regulatory liabilities (46) (21) (h)
Total regulatory assets (liabilities), net $ (1,872) $ (1,879)
Note: Unless otherwise noted, the recovery and amortization periods for these regulatory assets and (liabilities) have been approved or accepted by the relevant state
PSC or other regulatory body and are as follows:
(a)Not earning a return as offset in rate base by a corresponding asset or liability.
(b)Recovered through environmental cost recovery mechanisms when the remediation is performed or the work is performed.
(c)Recovered and amortized over the average remaining service period which range up to 15 years. See Note 11 for additional information.
(d)Recovered over the remaining life of the original debt issuances, which range up to 20 years.
(e)Recorded and recovered or amortized over periods generally not exceeding seven years. In addition to natural gas cost recovery mechanisms, the natural gas
distribution utilities are authorized to utilize other cost recovery mechanisms, such as regulatory riders, which vary by utility but allow recovery of certain costs,
such as those related to infrastructure replacement programs, as well as environmental remediation and energy efficiency plans.
(f)Comprised of several components including unamortized loss on reacquired debt, weather normalization, franchise gas, deferred depreciation, and financial
instrument-hedging assets, which are recovered or amortized over periods generally not exceeding 10 years, except for financial hedging-instruments. Financial
instrument-hedging assets are recorded over the life of the underlying hedged purchase contracts, which generally do not exceed two years. Upon final
settlement, actual costs incurred are recovered, and actual income earned is refunded through the energy cost recovery clause.
(g)Other cost of removal obligations are recorded and deferred income tax liabilities are amortized over the related property lives, which may range up to 80 years.
Cost of removal liabilities will be settled and trued up following completion of the related activities.
(h)Comprised of several components including amounts to be refunded to customers as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, energy efficiency programs, and
unamortized bond issuance costs and financial instrument-hedging liabilities which are recovered or amortized over periods generally not exceeding 20 years,
except for financial hedging-instruments. Financial instrument-hedging liabilities are recorded over the life of the underlying hedged purchase contracts, which
generally do not exceed two years. Upon final settlement, actual costs incurred are recovered, and actual income earned is refunded through the energy cost
recovery clause. See "Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information regarding customer refunds resulting from the Tax Reform Legislation.
(i)Includes excess deferred income tax liabilities not subject to normalization as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, the recovery and amortization of which is
expected to be determined by the applicable state regulatory agencies in future rate proceedings. See "Rate Proceedings" herein and Note 10 for additional
details.
Infrastructure Replacement Programs and Capital Projects
In addition to capital expenditures recovered through base rates by each of the natural gas distribution utilities, Nicor Gas and
Virginia Natural Gas have separate rate riders that provide timely recovery of capital expenditures for specific infrastructure
replacement programs. Descriptions of the infrastructure replacement programs and capital projects at the natural gas distribution
utilities follow:
Nicor Gas
In 2013, Illinois enacted legislation that allows Nicor Gas to provide more widespread safety and reliability enhancements to its
distribution system. The legislation stipulates that rate increases to customers as a result of any infrastructure investments shall not
exceed a cumulative annual average of 4.0% or, in any given year, 5.5% of base rate revenues. In 2014, the Illinois Commission
approved the nine-year regulatory infrastructure program, Investing in Illinois, subject to annual review. In conjunction with the
base rate case order issued by the Illinois Commission on January 31, 2018, Nicor Gas is recovering program costs incurred prior to
December 31, 2017 through base rates. Nicor Gas has requested that the program costs incurred
II-309
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
subsequent to December 31, 2017, which are currently being recovered through a separate rider, be addressed in the base rate case
filed November 9, 2018. See "Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information.
Virginia Natural Gas
In 2012, the Virginia Commission approved the Steps to Advance Virginia's Energy (SAVE) program, an accelerated infrastructure
replacement program, to be completed over a five-year period. In 2016, the Virginia Commission approved an extension to the
SAVE program for Virginia Natural Gas to replace more than 200 miles of aging pipeline infrastructure and invest up to $30
million in 2016 and up to $35 million annually through 2021.
The SAVE program is subject to annual review by the Virginia Commission. In conjunction with the base rate case order issued by
the Virginia Commission in December 2017, Virginia Natural Gas is recovering program costs incurred prior to September 1, 2017
through base rates. Program costs incurred subsequent to September 1, 2017 are currently recovered through a separate rider and
are subject to future base rate case proceedings.
Atlanta Gas Light
GRAM
In February 2017, the Georgia PSC approved GRAM and a $20 million increase in annual base rate revenues for Atlanta Gas Light,
effective March 1, 2017. GRAM adjusts base rates annually, up or down, using an earnings band based on the previously approved
ROE of 10.75% and does not collect revenue through special riders and surcharges. Atlanta Gas Light adjusts rates up to the lower
end of the band of 10.55% and adjusts rates down to the higher end of the band of 10.95%. Various infrastructure programs
previously authorized by the Georgia PSC under Atlanta Gas Light's STRIDE program including the Integrated Vintage Plastic
Replacement Program to replace aging plastic pipe and the Integrated System Reinforcement Program to upgrade Atlanta Gas
Light's distribution system and LNG facilities in Georgia continue under GRAM and the recovery of and return on the
infrastructure program investments are included in annual base rate adjustments. The Georgia PSC reviews Atlanta Gas Light's
performance annually under GRAM. See Rate Proceedings" herein for additional information.
Pursuant to the GRAM approval, Atlanta Gas Light and the staff of the Georgia PSC agreed to a variation of the Integrated
Customer Growth Program to extend pipeline facilities to serve customers in areas without pipeline access and create new
economic development opportunities in Georgia, which was formerly part of the STRIDE program. As a result, a new tariff was
created, effective October 10, 2017, to provide up to $15 million annually for Atlanta Gas Light to commit to strategic economic
development projects. Projects under this tariff must be approved by the Georgia PSC.
The orders for the STRIDE program provide for recovery of all prudent costs incurred in the performance of the program. Atlanta
Gas Light will recover from end-use customers, through billings to Marketers, the costs related to the program, net of any related
cost savings. The regulatory asset represents incurred program costs that will be collected through GRAM. The future expected
costs to be recovered through rates related to allowed, but not incurred, costs are recognized in an unrecognized ratemaking amount
that is not reflected on the balance sheets. This allowed cost is primarily the equity return on the capital investment under the
program. See "Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts" herein for additional information.
Atlanta Gas Light capitalizes and depreciates the capital expenditure costs incurred from the STRIDE programs over the life of the
assets. Operations and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred. Recoveries, which are recorded as revenue, are based on a
formula that allows Atlanta Gas Light to recover operations and maintenance costs in excess of those included in its current base
rates, depreciation, and an allowed rate of return on capital expenditures. However, Atlanta Gas Light is allowed the recovery of
carrying costs on the under recovered balance resulting from the timing difference.
PRP
In 2015, Atlanta Gas Light began recovering incremental PRP surcharge amounts through three phased-in increases in addition to
its already existing PRP surcharge amount, which was established to address recovery of the under recovered PRP balance of $144
million and the estimated amounts to be earned under the program through 2025. The unrecovered balance is the result of the
continued revenue requirement earned under the program offset by the existing and incremental PRP surcharges. The under
recovered balance at December 31, 2018 was $171 million, including $95 million of unrecognized equity return. The PRP
surcharge will remain in effect until the earlier of the full recovery of the under recovered amount or December 31, 2025. See "Rate
Proceedings" and "Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts" herein for additional information.
One of the capital projects under the PRP experienced construction issues and Atlanta Gas Light was required to complete
mitigation work prior to placing it in service. These mitigation costs were included in base rates in 2018. In 2017, Atlanta Gas Light
recovered $20 million from the settlement of contractor litigation claims and recovered an additional $7 million from the
II-310
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
final settlement of contractor litigation claims during the first quarter 2018. Mitigation costs recovered through the legal process are
retained by Atlanta Gas Light.
Natural Gas Cost Recovery
With the exception of Atlanta Gas Light, the natural gas distribution utilities are authorized by the relevant regulatory agencies in
the states in which they serve to use natural gas cost recovery mechanisms that adjust rates to reflect changes in the wholesale cost
of natural gas and ensure recovery of all costs prudently incurred in purchasing natural gas for customers. Natural gas cost recovery
revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable natural gas costs and amounts billed in current regulated rates. Changes
in the billing factor will not have a significant effect on Southern Company's or Southern Company Gas' revenues or net income,
but will affect cash flows.
Rate Proceedings
Nicor Gas
On January 31, 2018, the Illinois Commission approved a $137 million increase in annual base rate revenues, including $93 million
related to the recovery of investments under the Investing in Illinois program, effective February 8, 2018, based on a ROE of 9.8%.
On April 19, 2018, the Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' variable income tax adjustment rider. This rider provides for
refund or recovery of changes in income tax expense that result from income tax rates that differ from those used in Nicor Gas' last
rate case. Customer refunds, via bill credits, related to the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation from January 25, 2018 through
May 4, 2018 began on July 1, 2018 and are expected to conclude in the second quarter 2019.
On May 2, 2018, the Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' rehearing request for revised base rates to incorporate the reduction
in the federal income tax rate as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation. The resulting decrease of approximately $44 million in
annual base rate revenues became effective May 5, 2018. Nicor Gas' previously-authorized capital structure and ROE of 9.80%
were not addressed in the rehearing and remain unchanged.
On November 9, 2018, Nicor Gas filed a general base rate case with the Illinois Commission requesting a $230 million increase in
annual base rate revenues. The requested increase is based on a projected test year for the 12-month period ending September 30,
2020, a ROE of 10.6%, and an increase in the equity ratio from 52.0% to 54.0% to address the negative cash flow and credit metric
impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. The Illinois Commission is expected to rule on the requested increase within the 11-month
statutory time limit, after which rate adjustments will be effective. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this
time.
Atlanta Gas Light
On February 23, 2018, Atlanta Gas Light revised its annual base rate filing to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation and
requested a $16 million rate reduction in 2018. On May 15, 2018, the Georgia PSC approved a stipulation for Atlanta Gas Light's
annual base rates to remain at the 2017 level for 2018 and 2019, with customer credits of $8 million in each of July 2018 and
October 2018 to reflect the impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. The Georgia PSC maintained Atlanta Gas Light's previously
authorized earnings band based on a ROE between 10.55% and 10.95% and increased the allowed equity ratio by 4% to an equity
ratio of 55% to address the negative cash flow and credit metric impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation. Additionally, Atlanta Gas
Light is required to file a traditional base rate case on or before June 1, 2019 for rates effective January 1, 2020.
Atlanta Gas Light's recovery of the previously unrecovered PRP revenue through 2014, as well as the mitigation costs associated
with the PRP that were not previously included in its rates, were included in GRAM. In connection with the GRAM approval, the
last monthly PRP surcharge increase became effective March 1, 2017.
Virginia Natural Gas
On December 21, 2017, the Virginia Commission approved a settlement for a $34 million increase in annual base rate revenues,
effective September 1, 2017, including $13 million related to the recovery of investments under the SAVE program. See
"Regulatory Infrastructure Programs" herein for additional information. An authorized ROE range of 9.0% to 10.0% with a
midpoint of 9.5% will be used to determine the revenue requirement in any filing, other than for a change in base rates.
On December 17, 2018, the Virginia Commission approved Virginia Natural Gas' annual information form filing, which reduced
annual base rates by $14 million effective January 1, 2019 due to lower tax expense as a result of the lower corporate income tax
rate and the impact of the flowback of excess deferred income taxes. This approval also requires Virginia Natural Gas to issue
II-311
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
customer refunds, via bill credits, for the entire $14 million which was deferred as a regulatory liability, current, on the balance
sheet at December 31, 2018. These customer refunds are expected to be completed in the first quarter 2019.
energySMART
The Illinois Commission approved Nicor Gas' energySMART program, which includes energy efficiency program offerings and
therm reduction goals. Through December 31, 2017, Nicor Gas spent $107 million of the initial authorized expenditure of $113
million. A new program began on January 1, 2018, with an additional authorized expenditure of $160 million through 2021.
Through December 31, 2018, Nicor Gas had spent $29 million.
Unrecognized Ratemaking Amounts
The following table illustrates Southern Company Gas' authorized ratemaking amounts that are not recognized on its balance
sheets. These amounts are primarily composed of an allowed equity rate of return on assets associated with certain regulatory
infrastructure programs. These amounts will be recognized as revenues in Southern Company Gas' financial statements in the
periods they are billable to customers, the majority of which will be recovered by 2025.
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
 (in millions)
Atlanta Gas Light $ 95$ 104
Virginia Natural Gas 11 11
Nicor Gas 4 2
Total $ 110$ 117
FERC Matters
Open Access Transmission Tariff
On May 10, 2018, AMEA and Cooperative Energy filed with the FERC a complaint against SCS and the traditional electric
operating companies claiming that the current 11.25% base ROE used in calculating the annual transmission revenue requirements
of the traditional electric operating companies' open access transmission tariff is unjust and unreasonable as measured by the
applicable FERC standards. The complaint requested that the base ROE be set no higher than 8.65% and that the FERC order
refunds for the difference in revenue requirements that results from applying a just and reasonable ROE established in this
proceeding upon determining the current ROE is unjust and unreasonable. On June 18, 2018, SCS and the traditional electric
operating companies filed their response challenging the adequacy of the showing presented by the complainants and offering
support for the current ROE. On September 6, 2018, the FERC issued an order establishing a refund effective date of May 10, 2018
in the event a refund is due and initiating an investigation and settlement procedures regarding the current base ROE. Through
December 31, 2018, the estimated maximum potential refund is not expected to be material to Southern Company's or the
traditional electric operating companies' results of operations or cash flows. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be
determined at this time.
Mississippi Power
Municipal and Rural Associations Tariff
Mississippi Power provides wholesale electric service to Cooperative Energy, East Mississippi Electric Power Association, and the
City of Collins, all located in southeastern Mississippi, under a long-term cost-based, FERC-regulated MRA tariff.
In 2016, Mississippi Power reached a settlement agreement with its wholesale customers, which was subsequently approved by the
FERC, for an increase in wholesale base revenues under the MRA cost-based electric tariff, primarily as a result of placing
scrubbers for Plant Daniel Units 1 and 2 in service in 2015. The settlement agreement became effective for services rendered
beginning May 1, 2016, resulting in an estimated annual revenue increase of $7 million under the MRA cost-based electric tariff.
Additionally, under the settlement agreement, the tariff customers agreed to similar regulatory treatment for MRA tariff ratemaking
as the treatment approved for retail ratemaking under the In-Service Asset Rate Order. This regulatory treatment primarily included
(i) recovery of the operational Kemper County energy facility assets providing service to customers and other related costs, (ii)
amortization of the Kemper County energy facility-related regulatory assets included in rates under the settlement agreement over
the 36 months ending April 30, 2019, (iii) Kemper County energy facility-related expenses included in rates under the settlement
agreement no longer being deferred and charged to expense, and (iv) removing all of the Kemper
II-312
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
County energy facility CWIP from rate base with a corresponding increase in accrual of AFUDC, which totaled approximately $22
million through the suspension of Kemper IGCC start-up activities.
Mississippi Power expects to reach a subsequent settlement agreement with its wholesale customers and will make a filing with the
FERC during the first quarter 2019. The settlement agreement is intended to be consistent with the Kemper Settlement Agreement,
including the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
In September 2017, Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy executed a Shared Service Agreement (SSA), as part of the MRA
tariff, under which Mississippi Power and Cooperative Energy will share in providing electricity to all Cooperative Energy delivery
points, in lieu of the current arrangement under which each delivery point is specifically assigned to either entity. The SSA accepted
by the FERC in October 2017 became effective on January 1, 2018 and may be cancelled by Cooperative Energy with 10 years
notice after December 31, 2020. The SSA provides Cooperative Energy the option to decrease its use of Mississippi Power's
generation services under the MRA tariff, subject to annual and cumulative caps and a one-year notice requirement. In the event
Cooperative Energy elects to reduce these services, the related reduction in Mississippi Power's revenues is not expected to be
significant through 2020.
Fuel Cost Recovery
Mississippi Power has a wholesale MRA and a Market Based (MB) fuel cost recovery factor. Effective with the first billing cycle
for January 2018, fuel rates increased $11 million annually for wholesale MRA customers and $1 million annually for wholesale
MB customers. Effective January 1, 2019, the wholesale MRA fuel rate decreased $16 million annually and the wholesale MB fuel
rate decreased by an immaterial amount. At December 31, 2018, over recovered wholesale MRA fuel costs included in other
regulatory liabilities, current on the balance sheet were approximately $6 million compared to an immaterial amount at December
31, 2017. Under recovered wholesale MB fuel costs included in the balance sheets were immaterial at December 31, 2018 and
2017.
Mississippi Power's operating revenues are adjusted for differences in actual recoverable fuel cost and amounts billed in accordance
with the currently approved cost recovery rate. Accordingly, changes in the billing factor should have no significant effect on
Mississippi Power's revenues or net income, but will affect cash flow.
Southern Company Gas
At December 31, 2018, Southern Company Gas was involved in two gas pipeline construction projects. These projects, along with
Southern Company Gas' existing pipelines, are intended to provide diverse sources of natural gas supplies to customers, resolve
current and long-term supply planning for new capacity, enhance system reliability, and generate economic development in the
areas served.
On January 19, 2018, the PennEast Pipeline received FERC approval. Work continues with state and federal agencies to obtain the
required permits to begin construction. Any material delays may impact forecasted capital expenditures and the expected in-service
date.
In October 2017, the Atlantic Coast Pipeline received FERC approval. This joint venture has experienced challenges to its permits
since construction began in 2018. During the third and fourth quarters 2018, a FERC stop work order, together with delays in
obtaining permits necessary for construction and construction delays due to judicial actions, impacted the cost and schedule for the
project. As a result, total project cost estimates have increased from between $6.0 billion and $6.5 billion to between $7.0 billion
and $7.8 billion, excluding financing costs. Southern Company Gas' share of the total project costs is 5% and Southern Company
Gas' investment at December 31, 2018 totaled $83 million. The operator of the joint venture currently expects to achieve a late
2020 in-service date for at least key segments of the Atlantic Coast Pipeline, while the remainder may extend into early 2021.
Southern Company Gas has evaluated the recoverability of its investment and determined there was no impairment as of December
31, 2018. Abnormal weather, work delays (including due to judicial or regulatory action), and other conditions may result in
additional cost or schedule modifications, which could result in an impairment of Southern Company Gas' investment and could
have a material impact on Southern Company's and Southern Company Gas' financial statements.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. See Notes 7 and 9 under "Southern Company Gas –
Equity Method Investments" and "Guarantees," respectively, for additional information on these pipeline projects.
II-313
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
3. CONTINGENCIES
General Litigation Matters
Each registrant is subject to certain claims and legal actions arising in the ordinary course of business. In addition, the business
activities of Southern Company's subsidiaries are subject to extensive governmental regulation related to public health and the
environment, such as laws and regulations governing air, water, land, and protection of other natural resources. Litigation over
environmental issues and claims of various types, including property damage, personal injury, common law nuisance, and citizen
enforcement of environmental laws and regulations has occurred throughout the U.S. This litigation has included claims for
damages alleged to have been caused by CO2 and other emissions, CCR, and alleged exposure to hazardous materials, and/or
requests for injunctive relief in connection with such matters.
The ultimate outcome of such pending or potential litigation against each registrant and any subsidiaries cannot be predicted at this
time; however, for current proceedings not specifically reported herein, management does not anticipate that the ultimate liabilities,
if any, arising from such current proceedings would have a material effect on such registrant's financial statements.
Southern Company
In January 2017, a putative securities class action complaint was filed against Southern Company, certain of its officers, and certain
former Mississippi Power officers in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia, Atlanta Division, by Monroe
County Employees' Retirement System on behalf of all persons who purchased shares of Southern Company's common stock
between April 25, 2012 and October 29, 2013. The complaint alleges that Southern Company, certain of its officers, and certain
former Mississippi Power officers made materially false and misleading statements regarding the Kemper County energy facility in
violation of certain provisions under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. The complaint seeks, among other things,
compensatory damages and litigation costs and attorneys' fees. In June 2017, the plaintiffs filed an amended complaint that
provided additional detail about their claims, increased the purported class period by one day, and added certain other former
Mississippi Power officers as defendants. In July 2017, the defendants filed a motion to dismiss the plaintiffs' amended complaint
with prejudice, to which the plaintiffs filed an opposition in September 2017. On March 29, 2018, the U.S. District Court for the
Northern District of Georgia, Atlanta Division, issued an order granting, in part, the defendants' motion to dismiss. The court
dismissed certain claims against certain officers of Southern Company and Mississippi Power and dismissed the allegations related
to a number of the statements that plaintiffs challenged as being false or misleading. On April 26, 2018, the defendants filed a
motion for reconsideration of the court's order, seeking dismissal of the remaining claims in the lawsuit. On August 10, 2018, the
court denied the motion for reconsideration and denied a motion to certify the issue for interlocutory appeal.
In February 2017, Jean Vineyard filed a shareholder derivative lawsuit and, in May 2017, Judy Mesirov filed a shareholder
derivative lawsuit, each in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia. Each of these lawsuits names as defendants
Southern Company, certain of its directors, certain of its officers, and certain former Mississippi Power officers. In August 2017,
these two shareholder derivative lawsuits were consolidated in the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Georgia. The
complaints allege that the defendants caused Southern Company to make false or misleading statements regarding the Kemper
County energy facility cost and schedule. Further, the complaints allege that the defendants were unjustly enriched and caused the
waste of corporate assets and also allege that the individual defendants violated their fiduciary duties. Each plaintiff seeks to
recover, on behalf of Southern Company, unspecified actual damages and, on each plaintiff's own behalf, attorneys' fees and costs
in bringing the lawsuit. Each plaintiff also seeks certain changes to Southern Company's corporate governance and internal
processes. On April 25, 2018, the court entered an order staying this lawsuit until 30 days after the resolution of any dispositive
motions or any settlement, whichever is earlier, in the putative securities class action.
In May 2017, Helen E. Piper Survivor's Trust filed a shareholder derivative lawsuit in the Superior Court of Gwinnett County, State
of Georgia that names as defendants Southern Company, certain of its directors, certain of its officers, and certain former
Mississippi Power officers. The complaint alleges that the individual defendants, among other things, breached their fiduciary
duties in connection with schedule delays and cost overruns associated with the construction of the Kemper County energy facility.
The complaint further alleges that the individual defendants authorized or failed to correct false and misleading statements
regarding the Kemper County energy facility schedule and cost and failed to implement necessary internal controls to prevent harm
to Southern Company. The plaintiff seeks to recover, on behalf of Southern Company, unspecified actual damages and
disgorgement of profits and, on its behalf, attorneys' fees and costs in bringing the lawsuit. The plaintiff also seeks certain
unspecified changes to Southern Company's corporate governance and internal processes. On May 4, 2018, the court entered an
order staying this lawsuit until 30 days after the resolution of any dispositive motions or any settlement, whichever is earlier, in the
putative securities class action.
II-314
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company believes these legal challenges have no merit; however, an adverse outcome in any of these proceedings could
have an impact on Southern Company's results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity. Southern Company will vigorously
defend itself in these matters, the ultimate outcome of which cannot be determined at this time.
Alabama Power
On March 2, 2018, the Alabama Department of Environmental Management (ADEM) issued proposed administrative orders
assessing a penalty of $1.25 million to Alabama Power for unpermitted discharge of fluids and/or pollutants to groundwater at five
electric generating plants. The orders were finalized and Alabama Power paid the penalty on September 27, 2018. This matter is
now concluded.
Georgia Power
In 2011, plaintiffs filed a putative class action against Georgia Power in the Superior Court of Fulton County, Georgia alleging that
Georgia Power's collection in rates of amounts for municipal franchise fees (which fees are paid to municipalities) exceeded the
amounts allowed in orders of the Georgia PSC and alleging certain state tort law claims. In 2016, the Georgia Court of Appeals
reversed the trial court's previous dismissal of the case and remanded the case to the trial court. Georgia Power filed a petition for
writ of certiorari with the Georgia Supreme Court, which was granted in August 2017. On June 18, 2018, the Georgia Supreme
Court affirmed the judgment of the Georgia Court of Appeals and remanded the case to the trial court for further proceedings.
Following a motion by Georgia Power, on February 13, 2019, the Superior Court of Fulton County entered an order staying this
lawsuit for 60 days and ordered the parties to submit petitions to the Georgia PSC within 20 days for a declaratory ruling to address
certain terms the court previously held were ambiguous as used in the Georgia PSC's orders. The order entered by the Superior
Court of Fulton County also conditionally certified the proposed class. Georgia Power believes the plaintiffs' claims have no merit
and will continue to vigorously defend itself in this matter. The amount of any possible losses cannot be calculated at this time
because, among other factors, it is unknown whether conditional class certification will be upheld and the ultimate composition of
any class; and whether any losses would be subject to recovery from any municipalities. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot
be determined at this time.
Mississippi Power
In 2016, a complaint against Mississippi Power was filed in Harrison County Circuit Court (Circuit Court) by Biloxi Freezing &
Processing Inc., Gulfside Casino Partnership, and John Carlton Dean, which was amended and refiled to include, among other
things, Southern Company as a defendant. The individual plaintiff alleged that Mississippi Power and Southern Company violated
the Mississippi Unfair Trade Practices Act. All plaintiffs alleged that Mississippi Power and Southern Company concealed, falsely
represented, and failed to fully disclose important facts concerning the cost and schedule of the Kemper County energy facility and
that these alleged breaches unjustly enriched Mississippi Power and Southern Company. The plaintiffs sought unspecified actual
damages and punitive damages; asked the Circuit Court to appoint a receiver to oversee, operate, manage, and otherwise control all
affairs relating to the Kemper County energy facility; asked the Circuit Court to revoke any licenses or certificates authorizing
Mississippi Power or Southern Company to engage in any business related to the Kemper County energy facility in Mississippi;
and sought attorney's fees, costs, and interest. The plaintiffs also sought an injunction to prevent any Kemper County energy facility
costs from being charged to customers through electric rates. In June 2017, the Circuit Court ruled in favor of motions by Southern
Company and Mississippi Power and dismissed the case. In July 2017, the plaintiffs filed notice of an appeal. On July 13, 2018,
Mississippi Power and Southern Company reached a settlement agreement with the plaintiffs and the plaintiffs' appeal was
dismissed with prejudice. The settlement had no material impact on Southern Company's or Mississippi Power's financial
statements.
On May 18, 2018, Southern Company and Mississippi Power received a notice of dispute and arbitration demand filed by Martin
Product Sales, LLC (Martin) based on two agreements, both related to Kemper IGCC byproducts for which Mississippi Power
provided termination notices in September 2017. Martin alleges breach of contract, breach of good faith and fair dealing, fraud and
misrepresentation, and civil conspiracy and makes a claim for damages in the amount of approximately $143 million, as well as
additional unspecified damages, attorney's fees, costs, and interest. In the first quarter 2019, Mississippi Power and Southern
Company filed motions to dismiss. Southern Company and Mississippi Power believe this legal challenge has no merit; however,
an adverse outcome in this proceeding could have a material impact on Southern Company's and Mississippi Power's results of
operations, financial condition, and liquidity. Southern Company and Mississippi Power will vigorously defend themselves in this
matter, the ultimate outcome of which cannot be determined at this time.
On November 21, 2018, Ray C. Turnage and 10 other individual plaintiffs filed a putative class action complaint against
Mississippi Power and the three current members of the Mississippi PSC in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of
Mississippi. Mississippi Power received Mississippi PSC approval in 2013 to charge a mirror CWIP rate premised upon including
II-315
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
in its rate base pre-construction and construction costs for the Kemper IGCC prior to placing the Kemper IGCC into service. The
Mississippi Supreme Court reversed that approval and ordered Mississippi Power to refund the amounts paid by customers under
the previously-approved mirror CWIP rate. The plaintiffs allege that the initial approval process, and the amount approved, were
improper. They also allege that Mississippi Power underpaid customers in the refund process because it applied the wrong interest
rate to the payments. The plaintiffs seek to recover, on behalf of themselves and their putative class, actual damages, punitive
damages, pre-judgment interest, post-judgment interest, attorney's fees, and costs. Mississippi Power believes this legal challenge
has no merit; however, an adverse outcome in this proceeding could have a material impact on Mississippi Power's results of
operations, financial condition, and liquidity. Mississippi Power will vigorously defend itself in this matter, the ultimate outcome of
which cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Power
Southern Power indirectly owns a 51% membership interest in RE Roserock LLC (Roserock), the owner of the Roserock facility in
Pecos County, Texas. Prior to the facility being placed in service in November 2016, certain solar panels were damaged during
installation by the construction contractor, McCarthy Building Companies, Inc. (McCarthy), and certain solar panels were damaged
by a hail event that also occurred during construction. In connection therewith, Southern Power is withholding payments of
approximately $26 million from the construction contractor, which has placed a lien on the Roserock facility for the same amount.
In May 2017, Roserock filed a lawsuit in the state district court in Pecos County, Texas, (State Court lawsuit) against XL Insurance
America, Inc. (XL) and North American Elite Insurance Company (North American Elite) seeking recovery from an insurance
policy for damages resulting from the hail storm and McCarthy's installation practices. On June 1, 2018, the court in the State Court
lawsuit granted Roserock's motion for partial summary judgment, finding that the insurers were in breach of contract and in
violation of the Texas Insurance Code for failing to pay any monies owed for the hail claim. In addition to the State Court lawsuit,
lawsuits were filed between Roserock and McCarthy, as well as other parties, and that litigation has been consolidated in the U.S.
District Court for the Western District of Texas. Southern Power intends to vigorously pursue and defend these matters, the ultimate
outcome of which cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Company Gas
Nicor Energy Services Company, doing business as Pivotal Home Solutions, formerly a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern
Company Gas, was a defendant in a putative class action initially filed in 2017 in the state court in Indiana. The plaintiffs purported
to represent a class of the customers who purchased products from Nicor Energy Services Company and alleged that the marketing,
sale, and billing of the products violated the Indiana Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, constituting common
law fraud and resulting in unjust enrichment of these entities. In 2018, Nicor Energy Services Company was named in a second
class action filed in the state court of Ohio asserting nearly identical allegations and legal claims. The plaintiffs sought, on behalf of
the classes they purported to represent, actual and punitive damages, interest costs, attorney fees, and injunctive relief. To facilitate
the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions, Southern Company Gas retained most of the financial responsibility for these lawsuits
following the completion of the sale. On June 12, 2018, the parties settled these claims and Southern Company Gas recorded an
$11 million charge, which is included in other operations and maintenance expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Southern Company Gas is involved in litigation relating to an incident that occurred in one of its prior service territories that
resulted in several deaths, injuries, and property damage. Southern Company Gas has resolved all claims for personal injuries or
death, but it is continuing to defend litigation seeking to recover alleged property damages. Southern Company Gas has insurance
that provides full coverage of the expected financial exposure in excess of $11 million per incident. During the successor period
ended December 31, 2016, Southern Company Gas recorded reserves for substantially all of its potential exposure from these cases.
Environmental Remediation
The Southern Company system must comply with environmental laws and regulations governing the handling and disposal of
waste and releases of hazardous substances. Under these various laws and regulations, the Southern Company system could incur
substantial costs to clean up affected sites. The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities
conduct studies to determine the extent of any required cleanup and have recognized the estimated costs to clean up known
impacted sites in the financial statements. A liability for environmental remediation costs is recognized only when a loss is
determined to be probable and reasonably estimable. The traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution
utilities in Illinois and Georgia have each received authority from their respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory
agencies to recover approved environmental compliance costs through regulatory mechanisms. These regulatory mechanisms are
adjusted annually or as necessary within limits approved by the state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies. At
II-316
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
December 31, 2018 and 2017, the environmental remediation liabilities of Alabama Power and Mississippi Power were immaterial.
Georgia Power has been designated or identified as a potentially responsible party at sites governed by the Georgia Hazardous Site
Response Act and/or by the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act, and assessment and
potential cleanup of such sites is expected. In 2013, the Georgia PSC approved the 2013 ARP including the recovery of
approximately $2 million annually through the ECCR tariff. Georgia Power recognizes a liability for environmental remediation
costs only when it determines a loss is probable and reasonably estimable and reduces the reserve as expenditures are incurred. Any
difference between the liabilities accrued and costs recovered through rates is deferred as a regulatory asset or liability. The annual
recovery amount is expected to be adjusted as part of the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case and further adjusted in future
regulatory proceedings.
Southern Company Gas is subject to environmental remediation liabilities associated with 40 former MGP sites in four different
states. Southern Company Gas' accrued environmental remediation liability at December 31, 2018 and 2017 was based on the
estimated cost of environmental investigation and remediation associated with known current and former MGP operating sites.
These environmental remediation expenditures are recoverable from customers through rate mechanisms approved by the
applicable state regulatory agencies of the natural gas distribution utilities, with the exception of one site representing $2 million of
the accrued remediation costs.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the environmental remediation liability and the balance of under recovered environmental
remediation costs were reflected in the balance sheets as follows:
 Southern
CompanyGeorgia
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018:    
Environmental remediation liability:    
Other current liabilities $ 49$ 23$ 26
Accrued environmental remediation 268 — 268
Under recovered environmental remediation costs:    
Other regulatory assets, current $ 21$ 2$ 19
Other regulatory assets, deferred 345 53 292
    
December 31, 2017:    
Environmental remediation liability:    
Other current liabilities $ 73$ 22$ 46
Accrued environmental remediation(*)389 — 342
Under recovered environmental remediation costs:    
Other regulatory assets, current $ 38$ 2$ 31
Other regulatory assets, deferred 473 47 379
(*)At December 31, 2017, $85 million of Southern Company Gas' total environmental remediation liability related to Elizabethtown Gas, which was sold on July
1, 2018. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for more information regarding Southern Company Gas' sale of Elizabethtown Gas.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time; however, as a result of the regulatory treatment for
environmental remediation expenses described above, the final disposition of these matters is not expected to have a material
impact on the financial statements of Southern Company, Georgia Power, or Southern Company Gas.
Nuclear Fuel Disposal Costs
Acting through the DOE and pursuant to the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, the U.S. government entered into contracts with
Alabama Power and Georgia Power that require the DOE to dispose of spent nuclear fuel and high level radioactive waste
generated at Plants Farley, Hatch, and Vogtle Units 1 and 2 beginning no later than January 31, 1998. The DOE has yet to
commence the performance of its contractual and statutory obligation to dispose of spent nuclear fuel. Consequently, Alabama
Power and Georgia Power pursued and continue to pursue legal remedies against the U.S. government for its partial breach of
contract.
II-317
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
In 2014, Alabama Power and Georgia Power filed lawsuits against the U.S. government for the costs of continuing to store spent
nuclear fuel at Plants Farley, Hatch, and Vogtle Units 1 and 2 for the period from January 1, 2011 through December 31, 2013. The
damage period was subsequently extended to December 31, 2014. In October 2017, Alabama Power and Georgia Power filed
additional lawsuits against the U.S. government in the Court of Federal Claims for the costs of continuing to store spent nuclear
fuel at Plants Farley, Hatch, and Vogtle Units 1 and 2 for the period from January 1, 2015 through December 31, 2017. Damages
will continue to accumulate until the issue is resolved, the U.S. government disposes of Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's
spent nuclear fuel pursuant to its contractual obligations, or alternative storage is otherwise provided. No amounts have been
recognized in the financial statements as of December 31, 2018 for any potential recoveries from the pending lawsuits. The final
outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time. However, Alabama Power and Georgia Power expect to credit any
recoveries back for the benefit of customers in accordance with direction from their respective PSC and, therefore, no material
impact on Southern Company's, Alabama Power's, or Georgia Power's net income is expected.
On-site dry spent fuel storage facilities are operational at all three plants and can be expanded to accommodate spent fuel through
the expected life of each plant.
Nuclear Insurance
Under the Price-Anderson Amendments Act (Act), Alabama Power and Georgia Power maintain agreements of indemnity with the
NRC that, together with private insurance, cover third-party liability arising from any nuclear incident occurring at the companies'
nuclear power plants. The Act provides funds up to $14.1 billion for public liability claims that could arise from a single nuclear
incident. Each nuclear plant is insured against this liability to a maximum of $450 million by American Nuclear Insurers (ANI),
with the remaining coverage provided by a mandatory program of deferred premiums that could be assessed, after a nuclear
incident, against all owners of commercial nuclear reactors. A company could be assessed up to $138 million per incident for each
licensed reactor it operates but not more than an aggregate of $20 million per incident to be paid in a calendar year for each reactor.
Such maximum assessment, excluding any applicable state premium taxes, for Alabama Power and Georgia Power, based on its
ownership and buyback interests in all licensed reactors, is $275 million and $267 million, respectively, per incident, but not more
than an aggregate of $41 million and $40 million, respectively, to be paid for each incident in any one year. Both the maximum
assessment per reactor and the maximum yearly assessment are adjusted for inflation at least every five years. The next scheduled
adjustment is due no later than September 10, 2023. See Note 5 under "Joint Ownership Agreements" for additional information on
joint ownership agreements.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power are members of Nuclear Electric Insurance Limited (NEIL), a mutual insurer established to
provide property damage insurance in an amount up to $1.5 billion for members' operating nuclear generating facilities.
Additionally, both companies have NEIL policies that currently provide decontamination, excess property insurance, and premature
decommissioning coverage up to $1.25 billion for nuclear losses and policies providing coverage up to $750 million for non-
nuclear losses in excess of the $1.5 billion primary coverage.
NEIL also covers the additional costs that would be incurred in obtaining replacement power during a prolonged accidental outage
at a member's nuclear plant. Members can purchase this coverage, subject to a deductible waiting period of up to 26 weeks, with a
maximum per occurrence per unit limit of $490 million. After the deductible period, weekly indemnity payments would be received
until either the unit is operational or until the limit is exhausted. Alabama Power and Georgia Power each purchase limits based on
the projected full cost of replacement power, subject to ownership limitations, and have each elected a 12-week deductible waiting
period for each nuclear plant.
A builders' risk property insurance policy has been purchased from NEIL for the construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. This
policy provides the Vogtle Owners up to $2.75 billion for accidental property damage occurring during construction.
Under each of the NEIL policies, members are subject to assessments each year if losses exceed the accumulated funds available to
the insurer. The maximum annual assessments for Alabama Power and Georgia Power as of December 31, 2018 under the NEIL
policies would be $56 million and $85 million, respectively.
Claims resulting from terrorist acts are covered under both the ANI and NEIL policies (subject to normal policy limits). The
aggregate, however, that NEIL will pay for all claims resulting from terrorist acts in any 12-month period is $3.2 billion plus such
additional amounts NEIL can recover through reinsurance, indemnity, or other sources.
For all on-site property damage insurance policies for commercial nuclear power plants, the NRC requires that the proceeds of such
policies shall be dedicated first for the sole purpose of placing the reactor in a safe and stable condition after an accident. Any
remaining proceeds are to be applied next toward the costs of decontamination and debris removal operations ordered by the NRC,
and any further remaining proceeds are to be paid either to the applicable company or to its debt trustees as may be appropriate
under the policies and applicable trust indentures. In the event of a loss, the amount of insurance available might not be adequate to
cover property damage and other expenses incurred. Uninsured losses and other expenses, to the extent not
II-318
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
recovered from customers, would be borne by Alabama Power or Georgia Power, as applicable, and could have a material effect on
Southern Company's, Alabama Power's, and Georgia Power's financial condition and results of operations.
All retrospective assessments, whether generated for liability, property, or replacement power, may be subject to applicable state
premium taxes.
Other Matters
Mississippi Power
In 2013, Mississippi Power submitted a lost revenue claim under the Deep Horizon Economic and Property Damages Settlement
Agreement associated with the oil spill that occurred in the Gulf of Mexico in 2010. On May 14, 2018, Mississippi Power's claim
was settled. The settlement proceeds of $18 million, net of expenses and income tax, are included in Mississippi Power's earnings
for 2018. As of December 31, 2018, Mississippi Power had received half of the settlement proceeds.
Southern Company Gas
A wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern Company Gas owns and operates a natural gas storage facility consisting of two salt dome
caverns in Louisiana. Periodic integrity tests are required in accordance with rules of the Louisiana Department of Natural
Resources (DNR). In August 2017, in connection with an ongoing integrity project, updated seismic mapping indicated the
proximity of one of the caverns to the edge of the salt dome may be less than the required minimum and could result in Southern
Company Gas retiring the cavern early. At December 31, 2018, the facility's property, plant, and equipment had a net book value of
$109 million, of which the cavern itself represents approximately 20%. A potential early retirement of this cavern is dependent
upon several factors including compliance with an order from the Louisiana DNR detailing the requirements to place the cavern
back in service, which includes, among other things, obtaining core samples to determine the composition of the sheath
surrounding the edge of the salt dome.
The cavern continues to maintain its pressures and overall structural integrity. These events were considered in connection with
Southern Company Gas' annual long-lived asset impairment analysis, which determined there was no impairment as of
December 31, 2018. Any changes in results of monitoring activities, rates at which expiring capacity contracts are re-contracted,
timing of placing the cavern back in service, or Louisiana DNR requirements could trigger impairment. Further, early retirement of
the cavern could trigger impairment of other long-lived assets associated with the natural gas storage facility. The ultimate outcome
of this matter cannot be determined at this time, but could have a significant impact on Southern Company's or Southern Company
Gas' financial statements.
4. REVENUE FROM CONTRACTS WITH CUSTOMERS
The registrants generate revenues from a variety of sources, some of which are excluded from the scope of ASC 606, such as
leases, derivatives, and certain cost recovery mechanisms. See Note 1 under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards – Revenue"
for additional information on the adoption of ASC 606 for revenue from contracts with customers and under "Revenues" for
additional information on the revenue policies of the registrants.
II-319
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The following tables disaggregate revenue sources for the year ended December 31, 2018:
 2018
 (in millions)
Southern Company
Operating revenues
Retail electric revenues(a)
Residential $ 6,608
Commercial 5,266
Industrial 3,224
Other 124
Natural gas distribution revenues 3,175
Alternative revenue programs(b)(20)
Total retail electric and gas distribution revenues $ 18,377
Wholesale energy revenues(c)(d)1,896
Wholesale capacity revenues(d)620
Other natural gas revenues(e)699
Other revenues(f)1,903
Total operating revenues $ 23,495
(a)Retail electric revenues include $75 million of leases and a net increase of $60 million from certain cost recovery mechanisms that are not accounted for as
revenue under ASC 606. See Note 2 for additional information on cost recovery mechanisms.
(b)See Note 1 under "Revenues" for additional information on alternative revenue programs at the natural gas distribution utilities. Alternative revenue program
revenues are presented net of any previously recognized program amounts billed to customers during the same accounting period.
(c)Wholesale energy revenues include $299 million of revenues accounted for as derivatives, primarily related to short-term physical energy sales in the wholesale
electricity market. See Note 1 under "Revenues – Southern Power" and Note 14 for additional information on energy-related derivative contracts.
(d)Wholesale energy and wholesale capacity revenues include $384 million and $121 million, respectively, of PPA contracts accounted for as leases.
(e)Other natural gas revenues related to Southern Company Gas' energy and risk management activities are presented net of the related costs of those activities and
include gross third-party revenues of $7.0 billion of which $3.9 billion relates to contracts that are accounted for as derivatives. See Note 16 under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information on the components of wholesale gas services operating revenues.
(f)Other revenues include $322 million of revenues not accounted for under ASC 606.
II-320
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018
 Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power
 (in millions)
Operating revenues  
Retail revenues(a)(b) 
Residential $ 2,335$ 3,301$ 273
Commercial 1,578 3,023 286
Industrial 1,428 1,344 321
Other 26 84 9
Total retail electric revenues $ 5,367$ 7,752$ 889
Wholesale energy revenues(c)297 133 348
Wholesale capacity revenues 101 54 6
Other revenues(b)(d)267 481 22
Total operating revenues $ 6,032$ 8,420$ 1,265
(a)Retail revenues at Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power include a net increase or (net reduction) of $152 million, $(19) million, and $(13)
million, respectively, related to certain cost recovery mechanisms that are not accounted for as revenue under ASC 606. See Note 2 for additional information on
cost recovery mechanisms.
(b)Retail revenues and other revenues at Georgia Power include $74 million and $135 million, respectively, of revenues accounted for as leases.
(c)Wholesale energy revenues at Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power include $20 million, $29 million, and $4 million, respectively, accounted
for as derivatives primarily related to short-term physical energy sales in the wholesale electricity market. See Note 14 for additional information on energy-
related derivative contracts.
(d)Other revenues at Alabama Power and Georgia Power include $57 million and $109 million, respectively, of revenues not accounted for under ASC 606.
2018
(in millions)
Southern Power  
PPA capacity revenues(a)$ 580
PPA energy revenues(a)1,140
Non-PPA revenues(b)472
Other revenues 13
Total operating revenues $ 2,205
(a)PPA capacity revenues and PPA energy revenues include $186 million and $413 million, respectively, related to PPAs accounted for as leases. See Note 1 under
"Revenues – Southern Power" for additional information on capacity revenues accounted for as leases.
(b)Non-PPA revenues include $242 million of revenues from short-term sales related to physical energy sales in the wholesale electricity market accounted for as
derivatives. See Note 1 under "Revenues – Southern Power" and Note 14 for additional information on energy-related derivative contracts.
II-321
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
2018
(in millions)
Southern Company Gas  
Operating revenues  
Natural gas distribution revenues  
Residential $ 1,525
Commercial 436
Transportation 944
Industrial 40
Other 230
Alternative revenue programs(a)(20)
Total natural gas distribution revenues $ 3,155
Gas pipeline investments 32
Wholesale gas services(b)101
Gas marketing services(c)568
Other revenues 53
Total operating revenues $ 3,909
(a)See Note 1 under "Revenues – Southern Company Gas" for additional information on alternative revenue programs at the natural gas distribution utilities.
Alternative revenue program revenues are presented net of any previously recognized program amounts billed to customers during the same accounting period.
(b)Wholesale gas services revenues are presented net of the related costs associated with its energy trading and risk management activities. Operating revenues, as
presented, include gross third-party revenues of $7.0 billion of which $3.9 billion relates to contracts that are accounted for as derivatives. See Note 16 under
"Southern Company Gas" for additional information on the components of wholesale gas services operating revenues and Note 14 for additional information on
energy-related derivative contracts.
(c)Gas marketing services includes $3 million of revenues not accounted for under ASC 606.
Contract Balances
The following table reflects the closing balances of receivables, contract assets, and contract liabilities related to revenues from
contracts with customers at December 31, 2018:
 Receivables  Contract Assets  Contract Liabilities
 (in millions)
Southern Company $ 2,630 $ 102 $ 32
Alabama Power 520 — 12
Georgia Power 721 58 7
Mississippi Power 100 — —
Southern Power 118 — 11
Southern Company Gas 952 — 2
As of December 31, 2018, Alabama Power had contract liabilities for outstanding performance obligations primarily related to
extended service agreements. Georgia Power had contract assets primarily related to fixed retail customer bill programs where the
payment is contingent upon Georgia Power's continued performance and the customer's continued participation in the program over
the one-year contract term and to unregulated service agreements where payment is contingent upon project completion. Georgia
Power also had contract liabilities for outstanding performance obligations primarily related to unregulated service agreements.
Southern Power's contract liabilities relate to collections recognized in advance of revenue for certain levelized PPAs with Georgia
Power. Southern Company's unregulated distributed generation business had $39 million and $11 million of contract assets and
contract liabilities, respectively, at December 31, 2018 remaining for outstanding performance obligations.
II-322
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Remaining Performance Obligations
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power have long-term contracts with customers in which revenues are
recognized as performance obligations are satisfied over the contract term. These contracts primarily relate to PPAs whereby the
traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power provide electricity and generation capacity to a customer. The revenue
recognized for the delivery of electricity is variable; however, certain PPAs include a fixed payment for fixed generation capacity
over the term of the contract. Southern Company's unregulated distributed generation business also has partially satisfied
performance obligations related to certain fixed price contracts. Revenues from contracts with customers related to these
performance obligations remaining at December 31, 2018 are expected to be recognized as follows:
 2019 2020 2021 2022 20232024 and
Thereafter
 (in millions)
Southern Company(*)$ 487$ 341$ 315$ 315$ 306$ 2,103
Alabama Power 23 22 26 23 22 140
Georgia Power 41 38 40 30 31 82
Mississippi Power 3 3 1 — — —
Southern Power 323 295 270 281 275 2,028
(*)Excludes amounts related to held for sale assets. See Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for additional information.
5. PROPERTY, PLANT, AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant, and equipment is stated at original cost or fair value at acquisition, as appropriate, less any regulatory disallowances
and impairments. Original cost may include: materials; labor; minor items of property; appropriate administrative and general
costs; payroll-related costs such as taxes, pensions, and other benefits; and the interest capitalized and/or cost of equity funds used
during construction.
II-323
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The registrants' property, plant, and equipment in service consisted of the following at December 31, 2018 and 2017:
At December 31, 2018:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
(in millions)
Electric utilities:   
Generation $ 52,324$ 16,533$ 19,145$ 2,849$ 13,246$ —
Transmission 11,344 4,380 6,156 769 — —
Distribution 18,746 7,389 10,389 968 — —
General/other 4,446 2,100 1,985 314 25 —
Electric utilities' plant in service 86,860 30,402 37,675 4,900 13,271 —
Southern Company Gas:   
Natural gas distribution utilities
transportation and distribution 12,409 — — — — 12,409
Storage facilities 1,640 — — — — 1,640
Other 1,128 — — — — 1,128
Southern Company Gas plant in service 15,177 — — — — 15,177
Other plant in service 1,669 — — — — —
Total plant in service $ 103,706$ 30,402$ 37,675$ 4,900$ 13,271$ 15,177
At December 31, 2017:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Electric utilities:   
Generation $ 51,279$ 14,213$ 17,038$ 2,801$ 13,737$ —
Transmission 11,562 4,119 5,947 737 — —
Distribution 19,239 7,034 9,978 946 — —
General/other 4,402 1,960 1,898 289 18 —
Electric utilities' plant in service 86,482 27,326 34,861 4,773 13,755 —
Southern Company Gas:  
Natural gas distribution utilities
transportation and distribution 13,079 — — — — 13,079
Storage facilities 1,599 — — — — 1,599
Other 1,155 — — — — 1,155
Southern Company Gas plant in service 15,833 — — — — 15,833
Other plant in service 1,227 — — — — —
Total plant in service $ 103,542$ 27,326$ 34,861$ 4,773$ 13,755$ 15,833
The cost of replacements of property, exclusive of minor items of property, is capitalized. The cost of maintenance, repairs, and
replacement of minor items of property is charged to other operations and maintenance expenses as incurred or performed with the
exception of nuclear refueling costs and certain maintenance costs including those described below.
In accordance with orders from their respective state PSCs, Alabama Power and Georgia Power defer nuclear outage operations and
maintenance expenses to a regulatory asset when the charges are incurred. Alabama Power amortizes the costs over a subsequent
18-month period with Plant Farley's fall outage cost amortization beginning in January of the following year and spring outage cost
amortization beginning in July of the same year. Georgia Power amortizes its costs over each unit's operating cycle, or 18 months
for Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 and 24 months for Plant Hatch Units 1 and 2.
II-324
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
A portion of Mississippi Power's railway track maintenance costs is charged to fuel stock and recovered through Mississippi
Power's fuel clause.
The portion of Southern Company Gas' non-working gas used to maintain the structural integrity of natural gas storage facilities
that is considered to be non-recoverable is recorded as depreciable property, plant, and equipment, while the recoverable or retained
portion is recorded as non-depreciable property, plant, and equipment.
Capital Leases
Assets acquired under a capital lease are included in property, plant, and equipment and are further detailed in the table below for
the applicable registrants:
 Southern
CompanyGeorgia
Power
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2018:  
Office buildings $ 216$ 61
PPAs(*)— 144
Computer-related equipment 43 —
Gas pipeline 7 —
Less: Accumulated amortization (75) (84)
Balance, net of amortization $ 191$ 121
At December 31, 2017:  
Office buildings $ 216$ 61
PPAs(*)— 144
Computer-related equipment 51 —
Gas pipeline 6 —
Less: Accumulated amortization (72) (68)
Balance, net of amortization $ 201$ 137
(*)Represents Georgia Power's affiliate PPAs with Southern Power. See Note 1 under "Affiliate Transactions" and Note 9 under "Fuel and Power Purchase
Agreements – Affiliate" for additional information.
See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt – Capital Leases" for additional information.
Depreciation and Amortization
The traditional electric operating companies' and Southern Company Gas' depreciation of the original cost of utility plant in service
is provided primarily by using composite straight-line rates. The approximate rates for 2018, 2017, and 2016 are as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
 (percent)
Alabama Power 3.0% 2.9% 3.0%
Georgia Power 2.6% 2.7% 2.8%
Mississippi Power(*)4.1% 3.7% 4.2%
Southern Company Gas 2.9% 2.9% 2.8%
(*)Mississippi Power's decrease in 2017 is primarily the result of recording a loss on its lignite mine in June 2017.
Depreciation studies are conducted periodically to update the composite rates. These studies are filed with the respective state PSC
and/or other applicable state and federal regulatory agencies for the traditional electric operating companies and natural gas
distribution utilities. In 2016, Alabama Power submitted an updated depreciation study to the FERC and received authorization to
use the recommended rates beginning January 2017. The study was also provided to the Alabama PSC.
II-325
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Under the terms of the 2013 ARP, Georgia Power amortized approximately $14 million annually from 2014 through 2016 of its
remaining regulatory liability related to other cost of removal obligations.
Southern Company's 2017 depreciation includes $34 million of reductions in depreciation recognized by Gulf Power under the
terms of its 2013 rate case settlement agreement with the Florida PSC.
When property, plant, and equipment subject to composite depreciation is retired or otherwise disposed of in the normal course of
business, its original cost, together with the cost of removal, less salvage, is charged to accumulated depreciation. For other
property dispositions, the applicable cost and accumulated depreciation are removed from the balance sheet accounts, and a gain or
loss is recognized. Minor items of property included in the original cost of the asset are retired when the related property unit is
retired.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, accumulated depreciation for utility plant in service totaled $30.3 billion and $30.8 billion,
respectively, for Southern Company and $4.3 billion and $4.5 billion, respectively, for Southern Company Gas.
Depreciation of the original cost of other plant in service is provided primarily on a straight-line basis over estimated useful lives,
which for Southern Company range up to 65 years and for Southern Company Gas range from five to 15 years for transportation
equipment, 40 to 60 years for storage facilities, and up to 65 years for other assets. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, accumulated
depreciation for other plant in service totaled $766 million and $673 million, respectively, for Southern Company and $129 million
and $75 million, respectively, for Southern Company Gas.
Southern Power
Southern Power applies component depreciation, where depreciation is computed principally by the straight-line method over the
estimated useful life of the asset. Certain of Southern Power's generation assets related to natural gas-fired facilities are depreciated
on a units-of-production basis, using hours or starts, to better match outage and maintenance costs to the usage of, and revenues
from, these assets. The primary assets in Southern Power's property, plant, and equipment are generating facilities, which generally
have estimated useful lives as follows:
Southern Power Generating Facility Useful life
Natural gas Up to 45 years
Biomass Up to 40 years
Solar Up to 35 years
Wind Up to 30 years
Southern Power reviews its estimated useful lives and salvage values on an ongoing basis. The results of these reviews could result
in changes which could have a material impact on Southern Power's net income in the near term.
When Southern Power's depreciable property, plant, and equipment is retired, or otherwise disposed of in the normal course of
business, the applicable cost and accumulated depreciation is removed and a gain or loss is recognized in the statements of income.
II-326
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Joint Ownership Agreements
At December 31, 2018, the registrants' percentage ownership and investment (exclusive of nuclear fuel) in jointly-owned facilities
in commercial operation were as follows:
Facility (Type)Percent
Ownership Plant in Service Accumulated
Depreciation CWIP
  (in millions)
Alabama Power      
Greene County (natural gas) Units 1 and 2 60.0%(a) $ 274 $ 71 $ 1
Plant Miller (coal) Units 1 and 2 91.8(b) 2,056 619 138
      
Georgia Power      
Plant Hatch (nuclear) 50.1%(c) $ 1,569 $ 615 $ 54
Plant Vogtle (nuclear) Units 1 and 2 45.7(c) 3,804 2,150 84
Plant Scherer (coal) Units 1 and 2 8.4(c) 266 96 14
Plant Scherer (coal) Unit 3 75.0(c) 1,238 493 66
Plant Wansley (coal) 53.5(c) 1,179 362 160
Rocky Mountain (pumped storage) 25.4(d) 184 135 —
      
Mississippi Power      
Greene County (natural gas) Units 1 and 2 40.0%(a) $ 180 $ 93 $ 1
Plant Daniel (coal) Units 1 and 2 50.0(e) 723 201 7
      
Southern Company Gas      
Dalton Pipeline (natural gas pipeline) 50.0%(f) $ 270 $ 6 $ —
(a)Jointly owned by Alabama Power and Mississippi Power and operated and maintained by Alabama Power.
(b)Jointly owned with PowerSouth and operated and maintained by Alabama Power.
(c)Georgia Power owns undivided interests in Plants Hatch, Vogtle Units 1 and 2, Scherer, and Wansley in varying amounts jointly with one or more of the
following entities: OPC, MEAG Power, Dalton, Florida Power & Light Company, JEA, and Gulf Power. Georgia Power has been contracted to operate and
maintain the plants as agent for the co-owners and is jointly and severally liable for third party claims related to these plants.
(d)Jointly owned with OPC, which is the operator of the plant.
(e)Jointly owned by Gulf Power and Mississippi Power. In accordance with the operating agreement, Mississippi Power acts as Gulf Power's agent with respect to
the operation and maintenance of these units.
(f)Jointly owned with The Williams Companies, Inc. The Dalton Pipeline is a 115-mile natural gas pipeline that serves as an extension of the Transco natural gas
pipeline system into northwest Georgia. Southern Company Gas also entered into an agreement to lease its 50% undivided ownership in the Dalton Pipeline that
became effective when it was placed in service in August 2017. Under the lease, Southern Company Gas will receive approximately $26 million annually for an
initial term of 25 years. The lessee is responsible for maintaining the pipeline during the lease term and for providing service to transportation customers under
its FERC-regulated tariff.
Georgia Power also owns 45.7% of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, which are currently under construction and had a CWIP balance of
$4.5 billion at December 31, 2018. See Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
On December 4, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of its 65% ownership interest in Plant Stanton Unit A, which Southern
Power previously jointly-owned with OUC, the FMPA, and the KUA, to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 under "Southern Power –
Sales of Natural Gas Plants" for additional information.
In conjunction with Southern Company's sale of Gulf Power, Mississippi Power and Gulf Power have committed to seek a
restructuring of their 50% undivided ownership interests in Plant Daniel such that each of them would, after the restructuring, own
100% of a generating unit. On January 15, 2019, Gulf Power provided notice to Mississippi Power that Gulf Power will retire its
share of the generating capacity of Plant Daniel on January 15, 2024. Mississippi Power has the option to purchase Gulf Power's
ownership interest for $1 on January 15, 2024, provided that Mississippi Power exercises the option no later than 120 days prior to
that date. Mississippi Power is assessing the potential operational and economic effects of Gulf Power's notice. The ultimate
outcome of these matters remains subject to completion of Mississippi Power's evaluations and applicable regulatory
II-327
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
approvals, including the FERC and the Mississippi PSC, and cannot now be determined. See Note 15 under "Southern Company's
Sale of Gulf Power" for information regarding the sale of Gulf Power.
The registrants' proportionate share of their jointly-owned facility operating expenses is included in the corresponding operating
expenses in the statements of income and each registrant is responsible for providing its own financing.
Assets Subject to Lien
On October 2, 2018, the Mississippi PSC approved executed agreements between Mississippi Power and its largest retail customer,
Chevron Products Company (Chevron), for Mississippi Power to continue providing retail service to the Chevron refinery in
Pascagoula, Mississippi through 2038. The agreements grant Chevron a security interest in the co-generation assets, with a net
book value of approximately $101 million at December 31, 2018, located at the refinery that is exercisable upon the occurrence of
(i) certain bankruptcy events or (ii) other events of default coupled with specific reductions in steam output at the facility and a
downgrade of Mississippi Power's credit rating to below investment grade by two of the three rating agencies.
Under the terms of the PPA and the expansion PPA for Southern Power's Plant Mankato, which was acquired in 2016,
approximately $563 million of assets, primarily related to property, plant, and equipment, are subject to lien at December 31, 2018.
See Note 15 under "Southern Power – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" for additional information regarding the proposed sale of Plant
Mankato.
See Note 3 under "General Litigation Matters – Southern Power" for information regarding liens on Southern Power's Roserock
facility.
See Note 8 under "Secured Debt" for information regarding debt secured by certain assets of Georgia Power, Mississippi Power,
and Southern Company Gas.
6. ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
AROs are computed as the present value of the estimated costs for an asset's future retirement and are recorded in the period in
which the liability is incurred. The estimated costs are capitalized as part of the related long-lived asset and depreciated over the
asset's useful life. In the absence of quoted market prices, AROs are estimated using present value techniques in which estimates of
future cash outlays associated with the asset retirements are discounted using a credit-adjusted risk-free rate. Estimates of the
timing and amounts of future cash outlays are based on projections of when and how the assets will be retired and the cost of future
removal activities. Each traditional electric operating company and natural gas distribution utility has received accounting guidance
from its state PSC or applicable state regulatory agency allowing the continued accrual or recovery of other retirement costs for
long-lived assets that it does not have a legal obligation to retire. Accordingly, the accumulated removal costs for these obligations
are reflected in the balance sheets as regulatory liabilities and amounts to be recovered are reflected in the balance sheets as
regulatory assets.
The ARO liabilities for the traditional electric operating companies primarily relate to facilities that are subject to the CCR Rule,
principally ash ponds. In addition, Alabama Power and Georgia Power have retirement obligations related to the decommissioning
of nuclear facilities (Alabama Power's Plant Farley and Georgia Power's ownership interests in Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units
1 and 2). See "Nuclear Decommissioning" herein for additional information. The traditional electric operating companies also have
AROs related to various landfill sites, asbestos removal, and underground storage tanks, as well as, for Alabama Power, disposal of
polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers and sulfur hexafluoride gas in certain substation breakers, for Georgia Power,
gypsum cells, and for Mississippi Power, mine reclamation and water wells. The ARO liability for Southern Power primarily relates
to Southern Power's solar and wind facilities, which are located on long-term land leases requiring the restoration of land at the end
of the lease.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Company Gas also have identified other retirement obligations, such as
obligations related to certain electric transmission and distribution facilities, certain asbestos containing material within long-term
assets not subject to ongoing repair and maintenance activities, certain wireless communication towers, the disposal of
polychlorinated biphenyls in certain transformers, leasehold improvements, equipment on customer property, and property
associated with the Southern Company system's rail lines and natural gas pipelines. However, liabilities for the removal of these
assets have not been recorded because the settlement timing for certain retirement obligations related to these assets is
indeterminable and, therefore, the fair value of the retirement obligations cannot be reasonably estimated. A liability for these
retirement obligations will be recognized when sufficient information becomes available to support a reasonable estimation of the
ARO.
Southern Company and the traditional electric operating companies will continue to recognize in their respective statements of
income allowed removal costs in accordance with regulatory treatment. Any differences between costs recognized in accordance
II-328
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
with accounting standards related to asset retirement and environmental obligations and those reflected in rates are recognized as
either a regulatory asset or liability in the balance sheets as ordered by the various state PSCs.
Details of the AROs included in the balance sheets are as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2016 $ 4,514$ 1,533$ 2,532$ 179$ 64
Liabilities incurred 16 — 4 — 6
Liabilities settled (177) (26) (120) (23) —
Accretion 179 77 89 5 4
Cash flow revisions 292 125 133 13 4
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 4,824$ 1,709$ 2,638$ 174$ 78
Liabilities incurred 29 — 27 — 2
Liabilities settled (244) (55) (116) (35) —
Accretion 217 106 94 5 4
Cash flow revisions 4,737 1,450 3,186 16 —
Reclassification to held for sale (169) — — — —
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 9,394$ 3,210$ 5,829$ 160$ 84
In June 2018, Alabama Power recorded an increase of approximately $1.2 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule. Mississippi
Power also recorded an increase of approximately $11 million to its AROs related to an ash pond at Plant Greene County, which is
jointly-owned with Alabama Power. The revised cost estimates were based on information from feasibility studies performed on
ash ponds in use at plants operated by Alabama Power, including Plant Greene County. During the second quarter 2018, Alabama
Power's management completed its analysis of these studies which indicated that additional closure costs, primarily related to
increases in estimated ash volume, water management requirements, and design revisions, will be required to close these ash ponds
under the planned closure-in-place methodology. As the level of work becomes more defined in the next 12 months, it is likely that
these cost estimates will change and the change could be material.
In December 2018, Georgia Power recorded an increase of approximately $3.1 billion to its AROs related to the CCR Rule and the
related state rule. During the second half of 2018, Georgia Power completed a strategic assessment related to its plans to close the
ash ponds at all of its generating plants in compliance with the CCR Rule and the related state rule. This assessment included
engineering and constructability studies related to design assumptions for ash pond closures and advanced engineering methods.
The results indicated that additional closure costs will be required to close these ash ponds, primarily due to changes in closure
strategies, the estimated amount of ash to be excavated, and additional water management requirements necessary to support
closure strategies. These factors also impact the estimated timing of future cash outlays.
In June 2018, Alabama Power completed an updated decommissioning cost site study for Plant Farley. The estimated cost of
decommissioning based on the study resulted in an increase in Alabama Power's ARO liability of approximately $300 million. In
December 2018, Georgia Power completed updated decommissioning cost site studies for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and
2. The estimated cost of decommissioning based on the studies resulted in an increase in Georgia Power's ARO liability of
approximately $130 million. See "Nuclear Decommissioning" below for additional information.
The 2018 reclassification of a portion of the ARO liability to liabilities held for sale by Southern Company represents the AROs
related to Gulf Power. See Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" and "Assets Held for Sale" for additional
information.
In 2017, Alabama Power's and Georgia Power's cash flow revisions were primarily related to changes in closure strategy for ash
ponds and landfills. Georgia Power's cash flow revisions in 2017 also related to changes in closure strategy for gypsum cells.
Mississippi Power's cash flow revisions in 2017 primarily related to a revision in the closure date of its lignite mine. The liabilities
settled in 2017 for Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power were primarily related to ash pond closure activity.
The cost estimates for AROs related to the CCR Rule are based on information at December 31, 2018 using various assumptions
related to closure and post-closure costs, timing of future cash outlays, inflation and discount rates, and the potential methods for
II-329
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
complying with the CCR Rule requirements for closure. The traditional electric operating companies expect to continue to
periodically update their ARO cost estimates, which could increase further, as additional information becomes available. Absent
continued recovery of ARO costs through regulated rates, Southern Company's and the traditional electric operating companies'
results of operations, cash flows, and financial condition could be materially impacted. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot
be determined at this time.
Nuclear Decommissioning
The NRC requires licensees of commercial nuclear power reactors to establish a plan for providing reasonable assurance of funds
for future decommissioning. Alabama Power and Georgia Power have external trust funds (Funds) to comply with the NRC's
regulations. Use of the Funds is restricted to nuclear decommissioning activities. The Funds are managed and invested in
accordance with applicable requirements of various regulatory bodies, including the NRC, the FERC, and state PSCs, as well as the
IRS. While Alabama Power and Georgia Power are allowed to prescribe an overall investment policy to the Funds' managers,
neither Southern Company nor its subsidiaries or affiliates are allowed to engage in the day-to-day management of the Funds or to
mandate individual investment decisions. Day-to-day management of the investments in the Funds is delegated to unrelated third-
party managers with oversight by the management of Alabama Power and Georgia Power. The Funds' managers are authorized,
within certain investment guidelines, to actively buy and sell securities at their own discretion in order to maximize the return on
the Funds' investments. The Funds are invested in a tax-efficient manner in a diversified mix of equity and fixed income securities
and are reported as trading securities.
Alabama Power and Georgia Power record the investment securities held in the Funds at fair value, as disclosed in Note 13, as
management believes that fair value best represents the nature of the Funds. Gains and losses, whether realized or unrealized, are
recorded in the regulatory liability for AROs in the balance sheets and are not included in net income or OCI. Fair value
adjustments and realized gains and losses are determined on a specific identification basis.
The Funds at Georgia Power participate in a securities lending program through the managers of the Funds. Under this program,
Georgia Power's Funds' investment securities are loaned to institutional investors for a fee. Securities loaned are fully collateralized
by cash, letters of credit, and/or securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. government or its agencies or instrumentalities. At
December 31, 2018 and 2017, approximately $27 million and $76 million, respectively, of the fair market value of Georgia Power's
Funds' securities were on loan and pledged to creditors under the Funds' managers' securities lending program. The fair value of the
collateral received was approximately $28 million and $77 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and can only be
sold by the borrower upon the return of the loaned securities. The collateral received is treated as a non-cash item in the statements
of cash flows.
Investment securities in the Funds for December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
Power
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2018:   
Equity securities $ 919$ 594$ 325
Debt securities 726 201 525
Other securities 74 51 23
Total investment securities in the Funds $ 1,719$ 846$ 873
At December 31, 2017:   
Equity securities $ 1,059$ 644$ 415
Debt securities 725 223 502
Other securities 47 35 12
Total investment securities in the Funds $ 1,831$ 902$ 929
These amounts exclude receivables related to investment income and pending investment sales and payables related to pending
investment purchases. For Southern Company and Georgia Power, these amounts include Georgia Power's investment securities
pledged to creditors and collateral received and excludes payables related to Georgia Power's securities lending program.
II-330
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The fair value increases (decreases) of the Funds, including reinvested interest and dividends and excluding the Funds' expenses,
for 2018, 2017, and 2016 are shown in the table below. The fair value increases (decreases) included unrealized gains (losses) on
securities held in the Funds at each of December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016, which are also shown in the table below.
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
Power
 (in millions)
Fair value increases (decreases)    
2018 $ (67)$ (38)$ (29)
2017 233 125 108
2016 114 76 38
Unrealized gains (losses)    
At December 31, 2018 $ (183)$ (96)$ (87)
At December 31, 2017 181 98 83
At December 31, 2016 48 34 14
The investment securities held in the Funds continue to be managed with a long-term focus. Accordingly, all purchases and sales
within the Funds are presented separately in the statements of cash flows as investing cash flows, consistent with the nature of the
securities and purpose for which the securities were acquired.
For Alabama Power, approximately $17 million and $18 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively, previously recorded
in internal reserves is being transferred into the Funds through 2040 as approved by the Alabama PSC. The NRC's minimum
external funding requirements are based on a generic estimate of the cost to decommission only the radioactive portions of a
nuclear unit based on the size and type of reactor. Alabama Power and Georgia Power have filed plans with the NRC designed to
ensure that, over time, the deposits and earnings of the Funds will provide the minimum funding amounts prescribed by the NRC.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the accumulated provisions for the external decommissioning trust funds were as follows:
 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Alabama Power  
Plant Farley $ 846$ 902
Georgia Power  
Plant Hatch $ 547$ 583
Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 326 346
Total $ 873$ 929
II-331
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Site study cost is the estimate to decommission a specific facility as of the site study year. The decommissioning cost estimates are
based on prompt dismantlement and removal of the plant from service. The actual decommissioning costs may vary from these
estimates because of changes in the assumed date of decommissioning, changes in NRC requirements, or changes in the
assumptions used in making these estimates. The estimated costs of decommissioning at December 31, 2018 based on the most
current studies, which were each performed in 2018, were as follows:
 Plant
Farley  Plant
  Hatch(*)Plant Vogtle
 Units 1 and 2(*)
Decommissioning periods:   
Beginning year 2037 2034 2047
Completion year 2076 2075 2079
 (in millions)
Site study costs:   
Radiated structures $ 1,234 $ 734$ 601
Spent fuel management 387 172 162
Non-radiated structures 99 56 79
Total site study costs $ 1,720 $ 962$ 842
(*)Based on Georgia Power's ownership interests.
For ratemaking purposes, Alabama Power's decommissioning costs are based on the site study and Georgia Power's
decommissioning costs are based on the NRC generic estimate to decommission the radioactive portion of the facilities and the site
study estimate for spent fuel management as of 2012. Significant assumptions used to determine these costs for ratemaking were an
estimated inflation rate of 4.5% and 2.4% for Alabama Power and Georgia Power, respectively, and an estimated trust earnings rate
of 7.0% and 4.4% for Alabama Power and Georgia Power, respectively.
Amounts previously contributed to the Funds for Plant Farley are currently projected to be adequate to meet the decommissioning
obligations. Alabama Power will continue to provide site-specific estimates of the decommissioning costs and related projections of
funds in the external trust to the Alabama PSC and, if necessary, would seek the Alabama PSC's approval to address any changes in
a manner consistent with NRC and other applicable requirements.
Under the 2013 ARP, the Georgia PSC approved Georgia Power's annual decommissioning cost for ratemaking of $4 million and
$2 million for Plant Hatch and Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2, respectively. Georgia Power expects the Georgia PSC to review and
adjust, if necessary, the amounts collected in rates for nuclear decommissioning costs in the Georgia Power 2019 Base Rate Case.
7. CONSOLIDATED ENTITIES AND EQUITY METHOD INVESTMENTS
The registrants may hold ownership interests in a number of business ventures with varying ownership structures. Partnership
interests and other variable interests are evaluated to determine if each entity is a VIE. If a venture is a VIE for which a registrant is
the primary beneficiary, the assets, liabilities, and results of operations of the entity are consolidated. The registrants reassess the
conclusion as to whether an entity is a VIE upon certain occurrences, which are deemed reconsideration events.
For entities that are not determined to be VIEs, the registrants evaluate whether they have control or significant influence over the
investee to determine the appropriate consolidation and presentation. Generally, entities under the control of a registrant are
consolidated, and entities over which a registrant can exert significant influence, but which a registrant does not control, are
accounted for under the equity method of accounting. However, the registrants may also invest in partnerships and limited liability
companies that maintain separate ownership accounts. All such investments are required to be accounted for under the equity
method unless the interest is so minor that there is virtually no influence over operating and financial policies, as are all investments
in joint ventures.
Investments accounted for under the equity method are recorded within equity investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries in the
balance sheets and, for Southern Company and Southern Company Gas, the equity income is recorded within earnings from equity
method investments in the statements of income. See "SEGCO" and "Southern Company Gas" herein for additional information.
II-332
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
SEGCO
Alabama Power and Georgia Power own equally all of the outstanding capital stock of SEGCO, which owns electric generating
units with a total rated capacity of 1,020 MWs, as well as associated transmission facilities. Alabama Power and Georgia Power
account for SEGCO using the equity method; Southern Company consolidates SEGCO. SEGCO uses natural gas as the primary
fuel source for 1,000 MWs of its generating capacity. The capacity of these units is sold equally to Alabama Power and Georgia
Power. Alabama Power and Georgia Power make payments sufficient to provide for the operating expenses, taxes, interest expense,
and a ROE. The share of purchased power included in purchased power, affiliates in the statements of income totaled $102 million
in 2018, $76 million in 2017, and $55 million in 2016 for Alabama Power and $105 million in 2018, $78 million in 2017, and $57
million in 2016 for Georgia Power.
SEGCO paid $18 million of dividends in 2018 and $24 million in each of 2017 and 2016, of which one-half of each was paid to
each of Alabama Power and Georgia Power. In addition, Alabama Power and Georgia Power each recognize 50% of SEGCO's net
income.
Alabama Power, which owns and operates a generating unit adjacent to the SEGCO generating units, has a joint ownership
agreement with SEGCO for the ownership of an associated gas pipeline. Alabama Power owns 14% of the pipeline with the
remaining 86% owned by SEGCO.
See Note 9 under "Guarantees" for additional information regarding guarantees of Alabama Power and Georgia Power related to
SEGCO.
Southern Power
Variable Interest Entities
Southern Power has certain wholly-owned subsidiaries that are determined to be VIEs. Southern Power is considered the primary
beneficiary of these VIEs because it controls the most significant activities of the VIEs, including operating and maintaining the
respective assets, and has the obligation to absorb expected losses of these VIEs to the extent of its equity interests.
SP Solar
On May 22, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling 33% limited partnership interest in SP Solar to Global Atlantic Financial
Group Limited (Global Atlantic). See Note 15 under "Southern Power" for additional information. A wholly-owned subsidiary of
Southern Power is the general partner and holds a 1% ownership interest in SP Solar and another wholly-owned subsidiary of
Southern Power owns the remaining 66% ownership in SP Solar. SP Solar qualifies as a VIE since the arrangement is structured as
a limited partnership and the 33% limited partner does not have substantive kick-out rights against the general partner. Southern
Power previously consolidated SP Solar and will continue to do so as the primary beneficiary of the VIE since it controls the most
significant activities of the partnership, including operating and maintaining its assets.
At December 31, 2018, SP Solar had total assets of $6.3 billion, total liabilities of $113 million, and noncontrolling interests of $1.2
billion. Cash distributions from SP Solar are allocated 67% to Southern Power and 33% to Global Atlantic in accordance with their
partnership interest percentage. Under the terms of the limited partnership agreement, distributions without limited partner consent
are limited to available cash and SP Solar is obligated to distribute all such available cash to its partners each quarter. Available
cash includes all cash generated in the quarter subject to the maintenance of appropriate operating reserves.
Transfers and sales of the assets in the VIE are subject to limited partner consent and the liabilities do not have recourse to the
general credit of Southern Power. Liabilities consist of customary working capital items and do not include any long-term debt.
SP Wind
On December 11, 2018, Southern Power sold a noncontrolling tax-equity interest in SP Wind to three financial investors. SP Wind
owns eight operating wind farms. See Note 15 under "Southern Power" for additional information. Southern Power owns 100% of
the class B membership interests and the three financial investors own 100% of the Class A membership interests. SP Wind
qualifies as a VIE since the structure of the arrangement is similar to a limited partnership and the Class A members do not have
substantive kick-out rights against Southern Power. Southern Power previously consolidated SP Wind and will continue to do so as
the primary beneficiary of the VIE since it controls the most significant activities of the entity, including operating and maintaining
its assets.
At December 31, 2018, SP Wind had total assets of $2.5 billion, total liabilities of $51 million, and noncontrolling interests of $47
million. Under the terms of the limited liability agreement, distributions without Class A member consent are limited to available
cash and SP Wind is obligated to distribute all such available cash to its members each quarter. Available cash includes all cash
II-333
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
generated in the quarter subject to the maintenance of appropriate operating reserves. Cash distributions from SP Wind are
generally allocated 60% to Southern Power and 40% to the three financial investors in accordance with the limited liability
agreement.
Transfers and sales of the assets in the VIE are subject to Class A member consent and the liabilities do not have recourse to the
general credit of Southern Power. Liabilities consist of customary working capital items and do not include any long-term debt.
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests
In April 2017, Southern Power reclassified approximately $114 million from redeemable noncontrolling interests to non-
redeemable noncontrolling interests due to the expiration of an option allowing SunPower Corporation to require Southern Power
to purchase its redeemable noncontrolling interest at fair market value. In addition, in October 2017, Turner Renewable Energy,
LLC redeemed at fair value its 10% interest of redeemable noncontrolling interest in certain of Southern Power's solar facilities. At
December 31, 2018 and 2017, there were no outstanding redeemable noncontrolling interests.
The following table presents the changes in Southern Power's redeemable noncontrolling interests for the years ended
December 31, 2017 and 2016:
 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Beginning balance $ 164$ 43
Net income attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interests 2 4
Distributions to redeemable noncontrolling interests (2) (1)
Capital contributions from redeemable noncontrolling interests 2 118
Redemption of redeemable noncontrolling interests (59) —
Reclassification to non-redeemable noncontrolling interests (114) —
Change in fair value of redeemable noncontrolling interests 7 —
Ending balance $ — $ 164
The following table presents the attribution of net income to Southern Power and the noncontrolling interests for the years ended
December 31, 2017 and 2016:
 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Net income $ 1,117$ 374
Less: Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 44 32
Less: Net income attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interests 2 4
Net income attributable to Southern Power $ 1,071$ 338
Southern Company Gas
SouthStar, previously a joint venture owned 85% by Southern Company Gas and 15% by Piedmont, was the only VIE for which
Southern Company Gas was the primary beneficiary, prior to October 2016 when Southern Company Gas completed its purchase
of Piedmont's remaining interest in SouthStar.
In 2015, Georgia Natural Gas Company (GNG), a 100%-owned, direct subsidiary of Southern Company Gas, notified Piedmont of
its election, pursuant to a change in control of SouthStar, to purchase Piedmont's 15% interest in SouthStar at fair market value.
This purchase was contingent upon the closing of the merger between Piedmont and Duke Energy Corporation (Duke Energy). In
October 2016, after Piedmont and Duke Energy completed their merger, GNG completed its purchase of Piedmont's interest in
SouthStar and paid a purchase price of $160 million and $15 million for Piedmont's share of SouthStar's 2016 earnings through the
date of acquisition.
Southern Company Gas' cash flows used for financing activities included SouthStar's distribution to Piedmont for its portion of
SouthStar's annual earnings from the previous year. For the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, SouthStar
made a distribution of $15 million upon completion of the purchase of Piedmont's interest in SouthStar. For the predecessor period
of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, SouthStar distributed $19 million to Piedmont.
II-334
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Equity Method Investments
The carrying amounts of Southern Company Gas' equity method investments at December 31, 2018 and 2017 and related income
from those investments for the successor years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, the successor period of July 1, 2016 through
December 31, 2016, and the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016 were as follows:
Investment Balance December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
 (in millions)
SNG $ 1,261 $ 1,262
PennEast Pipeline 71 57
Atlantic Coast Pipeline 83 41
Other 123 117
Total $ 1,538 $ 1,477
 Successor  Predecessor
Earnings from Equity Method
InvestmentsYear ended
December 31, 2018Year ended
December 31, 2017 July 1, 2016 through
December 31, 2016  January 1, 2016 through
June 30, 2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
SNG $ 131$ 88 $ 56 $ —
PennEast Pipeline 5 6 —  —
Atlantic Coast Pipeline 7 6 1 —
Other 5 6 3 2
Total $ 148$ 106 $ 60 $ 2
SNG
In 2016, Southern Company Gas, through a wholly-owned, indirect subsidiary, acquired a 50% equity interest in SNG, which is
accounted for as an equity method investment. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Investment in SNG" for additional
information. Selected financial information of SNG at December 31, 2018 and 2017 and for the years ended December 31, 2018
and 2017 and for the period September 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016 is as follows:
 At December 31,
Balance Sheet Information 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current assets $ 104$ 82
Property, plant, and equipment 2,606 2,439
Deferred charges and other assets 121 121
Total Assets $ 2,831$ 2,642
   
Current liabilities $ 103$ 110
Long-term debt 1,103 1,102
Other deferred charges and other liabilities 212 76
Total Liabilities $ 1,418$ 1,288
   
Total Stockholders' Equity $ 1,413$ 1,354
Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity $ 2,831$ 2,642
II-335
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Income Statement InformationYear ended
December 31, 2018Year ended
December 31, 2017  September 1, 2016
through December 31, 2016
 (in millions)
Revenues $ 604$ 544 $ 230
Operating income 310 242 137
Net income 261 175 115
Other Investments
Pipelines
In 2014, Southern Company Gas entered into a partnership in which it holds a 20% ownership interest in the PennEast Pipeline, an
interstate pipeline company formed to develop and operate a 118-mile natural gas pipeline between New Jersey and Pennsylvania.
The initial transportation capacity of 1.0 Bcf per day, is under long-term contracts, mainly with public utilities and other market-
serving entities, such as electric generation companies, in New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and New York.
Also in 2014, Southern Company Gas entered into a project in which it holds a 5% ownership interest in the Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, an interstate pipeline company formed to develop and operate a 594-mile natural gas pipeline in North Carolina, Virginia,
and West Virginia with initial transportation capacity of 1.5 Bcf per day.
See Note 2 under "FERC Matters – Southern Company Gas" for additional information on these pipeline projects.
Pivotal JAX LNG, LLC
Southern Company Gas owns a 50% interest in a LNG liquefaction and storage facility in Jacksonville, Florida, which was placed
in service in October 2018. This facility is outfitted with a 2.0 million gallon storage tank with the capacity to produce in excess of
120,000 gallons of LNG per day.
II-336
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
8. FINANCING
Securities Due Within One Year
A summary of long-term securities due within one year at each of December 31, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 December 31, 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Senior notes $ 2,950$ 200$ 500$ —$ 600$ 300
Revenue bonds(a)173 — 108 40 — —
First mortgage bonds 50 — — — — 50
Capitalized leases 24 1 13 — — —
Other(b)1 — (4) — (1) 7
Total $ 3,198$ 201$ 617$ 40$ 599$ 357
(a)For Southern Company and Mississippi Power, includes $40 million in pollution control revenue bonds classified as short term since they are variable rate
demand obligations supported by short-term credit facilities; however, the final maturity dates range from 2020 to 2028.
(b)Represents unamortized debt related amounts, acquisition accounting fair value adjustments, and/or fair value hedges. See Note 14 for additional information
regarding fair value hedges.
 December 31, 2017
 Southern
CompanyGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Senior notes $ 2,354$ 750$ —$ 350$ 155
Long-term bank term loans 1,420 100 900 420 —
Revenue bonds(a)90 — 90 — —
Capitalized leases 31 11 — — —
Other(b)(3) (4) (1) — 2
Total $ 3,892$ 857$ 989$ 770$ 157
(a)For Southern Company and Mississippi Power, includes $50 million in revenue bonds classified as short term at December 31, 2017 that were remarketed in an
index rate mode subsequent to December 31, 2017. Also for Southern Company and Mississippi Power, includes $40 million in pollution control revenue bonds
classified as short term since they are variable rate demand obligations supported by short-term credit facilities; however, the final maturity dates range from
2020 to 2028.
(b)Represents unamortized debt related amounts, acquisition accounting fair value adjustments, and fair value hedges. See Note 14 for additional information
regarding fair value hedges.
Maturities of long-term debt for the next five years are as follows:
 Southern
Company(a)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
Power(a)Mississippi
PowerSouthern
Power(b)Southern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2019 $ 3,156$ 200$ 621$ —$ 600$ 350
2020 4,041 250 1,006 307 825 —
2021 3,186 310 375 270 300 330
2022 1,974 750 505 — 677 46
2023 2,388 300 153 — 290 400
(a)Amounts include principal amortization related to the FFB borrowings beginning in 2020; however, the final maturity date is February 20, 2044. See "Long-
term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" herein for additional information.
(b)Southern Power's 2022 maturity represents euro-denominated debt at the U.S. dollar denominated hedge settlement amount.
II-337
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Long-term Debt
Senior Notes
Total senior notes (including amounts due within one year) outstanding at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows:
 Southern
Company(a)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
 Gas(b)
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018 $ 32,725$ 6,875$ 5,600$ 1,200$ 5,050$ 4,000
December 31, 2017 35,148 6,375 7,100 755 5,459 4,157
(a)Includes $10.0 billion and $10.2 billion of senior notes at the Southern Company parent entity at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
(b)Represents senior notes issued by Southern Company Gas Capital, which are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by Southern Company Gas. See "Structural
Considerations" herein for additional information.
See Note 14 for information regarding fair value hedges of existing senior notes.
Except as otherwise described herein, Southern Company and its subsidiaries used the proceeds of 2018 senior note issuances for
long-term debt redemptions and maturities, to repay short-term indebtedness, and for general corporate purposes, including
working capital. The subsidiaries also used the proceeds for their construction programs.
In August 2018, Southern Company issued $750 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2018A Floating Rate Senior Notes
due February 14, 2020 bearing interest based on three-month LIBOR.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, through cash tender offers, Southern Company repurchased and retired approximately $522
million of the $1.0 billion aggregate principal amount outstanding of its 1.85% Senior Notes due July 1, 2019 (1.85% Notes),
approximately $180 million of the $350 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2014B 2.15% Senior Notes
due September 1, 2019 (Series 2014B Notes), and approximately $504 million of the $750 million aggregate principal amount
outstanding of its Series 2018A Floating Rate Notes due February 14, 2020 (Series 2018A Notes), for an aggregate purchase price,
excluding accrued and unpaid interest, of approximately $1.2 billion. In addition, subsequent to December 31, 2018, and following
the completion of the cash tender offers, Southern Company completed the redemption of all of the Series 2018A Notes remaining
outstanding and called for redemption all of the 1.85% Notes and Series 2014B Notes remaining outstanding.
In June 2018, Alabama Power issued $500 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2018A 4.30% Senior Notes due July 15,
2048.
In April 2018, Georgia Power redeemed all $250 million aggregate principal amount of its Series 2008B 5.40% Senior Notes due
June 1, 2018.
In May 2018, through cash tender offers, Georgia Power repurchased and retired $89 million of the $250 million aggregate
principal amount outstanding of its Series 2007A 5.65% Senior Notes due March 1, 2037, $326 million of the $500 million
aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2009A 5.95% Senior Notes due February 1, 2039, and $335 million of the
$600 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2010B 5.40% Senior Notes due June 1, 2040, for an aggregate
purchase price, excluding accrued and unpaid interest, of $902 million.
In March 2018, Mississippi Power issued $300 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2018A Floating Rate Senior Notes due
March 27, 2020 bearing interest based on three-month LIBOR and $300 million aggregate principal amount of Series 2018B 3.95%
Senior Notes due March 30, 2028.
In October 2018, Mississippi Power completed the redemption of all $30 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of its
Series G 5.40% Senior Notes due July 1, 2035 and all $125 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of its Series 2009A
5.55% Senior Notes due March 1, 2019.
II-338
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Junior Subordinated Notes
Total junior subordinated notes outstanding for Southern Company and Georgia Power at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as
follows:
 Southern
Company(*)Georgia
Power
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018 $ 3,570$ 270
December 31, 2017 3,570 270
(*)Includes $3.3 billion of junior subordinated notes at the Southern Company parent entity at both December 31, 2018 and 2017.
Pollution Control Revenue Bonds
Pollution control revenue bond obligations represent loans to the traditional electric operating companies from public authorities of
funds derived from sales by such authorities of revenue bonds issued to finance pollution control and solid waste disposal facilities.
In some cases, the pollution control revenue bond obligations represent obligations under installment sales agreements with respect
to facilities constructed with the proceeds of revenue bonds issued by public authorities. The traditional electric operating
companies are required to make payments sufficient for the authorities to meet principal and interest requirements of such bonds.
Proceeds from certain issuances are restricted until qualifying expenditures are incurred. Total tax-exempt pollution control revenue
bond obligations (including amounts due within one year) outstanding at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018 $ 2,585$ 1,060$ 1,460$ 40
December 31, 2017 3,297 1,060 1,821 83
In October 2018, Alabama Power purchased and held $120 million aggregate principal amount of The Industrial Development
Board of the City of Mobile, Alabama Pollution Control Revenue Bonds (Alabama Power Company Plant Barry Project), Series
2008. Alabama Power reoffered these bonds to the public in November 2018.
During 2018, Georgia Power purchased and held the following pollution control revenue bonds, which may be reoffered to the
public at a later date:
•approximately $105 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution
Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), First Series 2013
•$173 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Bartow County (Georgia) Pollution Control
Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Bowen Project), First Series 2009
•$55 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control Revenue
Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), Fifth Series 1994
•$65 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control Revenue
Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), Second Series 2008
•approximately $72 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Bartow County (Georgia) Pollution
Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Bowen Project), First Series 2013
In December 2018, the Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) issued approximately $108 million aggregate principal
amount of Pollution Control Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), First Series 2018 due November 1,
2052 for the benefit of Georgia Power. The proceeds were used to redeem, in January 2019, approximately $13 million, $20
million, and $75 million aggregate principal amount of Development Authority of Burke County (Georgia) Pollution Control
Revenue Bonds (Georgia Power Company Plant Vogtle Project), First Series 1992, Eighth Series 1994, and Second Series 1995,
respectively.
In July 2018, Mississippi Power purchased and held approximately $43 million aggregate principal amount of Mississippi Business
Finance Corporation Pollution Control Revenue Refunding Bonds, Series 2002. Mississippi Power may reoffer these bonds to the
public at a later date.
II-339
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Bank Term Loans
Total long-term bank term loans (including amounts due within one year) outstanding at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as
follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018 $ 145$ 45$ —$ —$ —
December 31, 2017 1,465 45 100 900 420
See "Notes Payable" herein for additional information regarding bank term loans.
In January 2018, Georgia Power repaid its outstanding $100 million floating rate bank loan due October 26, 2018.
In March 2018, Mississippi Power repaid at maturity a $900 million unsecured term loan.
In May 2018, Southern Power repaid $420 million aggregate principal amount of long-term floating rate bank loans.
In November 2018, SEGCO, as borrower, and Alabama Power, as guarantor, entered into a $100 million long-term delayed draw
floating rate bank term loan bearing interest based on three-month LIBOR, which SEGCO used to repay at maturity $100 million
aggregate principal amount of Series 2013A Senior Notes. See Note 9 under "Guarantees" for additional information.
DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings
Pursuant to the loan guarantee program established under Title XVII of the Energy Policy Act of 2005 (Title XVII Loan Guarantee
Program), Georgia Power and the DOE entered into the Loan Guarantee Agreement in 2014, under which the DOE agreed to
guarantee the obligations of Georgia Power under a note purchase agreement (FFB Note Purchase Agreement) among the DOE,
Georgia Power, and the FFB and a related promissory note (FFB Promissory Note). The FFB Note Purchase Agreement and the
FFB Promissory Note provide for a multi-advance term loan facility (FFB Credit Facility), under which Georgia Power may make
term loan borrowings through the FFB.
In July 2017, Georgia Power entered into an amendment to the Loan Guarantee Agreement (LGA Amendment) in connection with
the DOE's consent to Georgia Power's entry into the Vogtle Services Agreement and the related intellectual property licenses (IP
Licenses).
Under the terms of the Loan Guarantee Agreement, upon termination of the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement, further advances are
conditioned upon the DOE's approval of any agreements entered into in replacement of the Vogtle 3 and 4 Agreement. Under the
terms of the LGA Amendment, Georgia Power will not request any advances unless and until certain conditions are satisfied,
including (i) receipt of the DOE's approval of the Bechtel Agreement (together with the Vogtle Services Agreement and the IP
Licenses, the Replacement EPC Arrangements) and (ii) Georgia Power's entry into a further amendment to the Loan Guarantee
Agreement with the DOE to reflect the Replacement EPC Arrangements.
Proceeds of advances made under the FFB Credit Facility are used to reimburse Georgia Power for Eligible Project Costs.
Aggregate borrowings under the FFB Credit Facility may not exceed the lesser of (i) 70% of Eligible Project Costs or (ii)
approximately $3.46 billion.
In September 2017, the DOE issued a conditional commitment to Georgia Power for up to approximately $1.67 billion of
additional guaranteed loans under the Loan Guarantee Agreement. This conditional commitment expires on March 31, 2019,
subject to any further extension approved by the DOE. Final approval and issuance of these additional loan guarantees by the DOE
cannot be assured and are subject to the negotiation of definitive agreements, completion of due diligence by the DOE, receipt of
any necessary regulatory approvals, and satisfaction of other conditions.
All borrowings under the FFB Credit Facility are full recourse to Georgia Power, and Georgia Power is obligated to reimburse the
DOE for any payments the DOE is required to make to the FFB under the guarantee. Georgia Power's reimbursement obligations to
the DOE are full recourse and secured by a first priority lien on (i) Georgia Power's 45.7% undivided ownership interest in Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (primarily the units under construction, the related real property, and any nuclear fuel loaded in the reactor
core) and (ii) Georgia Power's rights and obligations under the principal contracts relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. There are
no restrictions on Georgia Power's ability to grant liens on other property.
In addition to the conditions described above, future advances are subject to satisfaction of customary conditions, as well as
certification of compliance with the requirements of the Title XVII Loan Guarantee Program, including accuracy of project-related
representations and warranties, delivery of updated project-related information, and evidence of compliance with the
II-340
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
prevailing wage requirements of the Davis-Bacon Act of 1931, as amended, and certification from the DOE's consulting engineer
that proceeds of the advances are used to reimburse Eligible Project Costs.
Upon satisfaction of all conditions described above, advances may be requested under the FFB Credit Facility on a quarterly basis
through 2020. The final maturity date for each advance under the FFB Credit Facility is February 20, 2044. Interest is payable
quarterly and principal payments will begin on February 20, 2020. Borrowings under the FFB Credit Facility will bear interest at
the applicable U.S. Treasury rate plus a spread equal to 0.375%.
At both December 31, 2018 and 2017, Georgia Power had $2.6 billion of borrowings outstanding under the FFB Credit Facility.
Under the Loan Guarantee Agreement, Georgia Power is subject to customary borrower affirmative and negative covenants and
events of default. In addition, Georgia Power is subject to project-related reporting requirements and other project-specific
covenants and events of default.
In the event certain mandatory prepayment events (including any decision not to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and
4) occur, the FFB's commitment to make further advances under the FFB Credit Facility will terminate and Georgia Power will be
required to prepay the outstanding principal amount of all borrowings under the FFB Credit Facility over a period of five years
(with level principal amortization). Among other things, these mandatory prepayment events include (i) the termination of the
Vogtle Services Agreement or rejection of the Vogtle Services Agreement in bankruptcy if Georgia Power does not maintain access
to intellectual property rights under the IP Licenses; (ii) a decision by Georgia Power not to continue construction of Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4; (iii) cancellation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 by the Georgia PSC, or by Georgia Power if authorized by the
Georgia PSC; and (iv) cost disallowances by the Georgia PSC that could have a material adverse effect on completion of Plant
Vogtle Units 3 and 4 or Georgia Power's ability to repay the outstanding borrowings under the FFB Credit Facility. Under certain
circumstances, insurance proceeds and any proceeds from an event of taking must be applied to immediately prepay outstanding
borrowings under the FFB Credit Facility. In addition, if Georgia Power discontinues construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4,
Georgia Power would be obligated to immediately repay a portion of the outstanding borrowings under the FFB Credit Facility to
the extent such outstanding borrowings exceed 70% of Eligible Project Costs, net of the proceeds received by Georgia Power under
the Guarantee Settlement Agreement. Georgia Power also may voluntarily prepay outstanding borrowings under the FFB Credit
Facility. Under the FFB Credit Facility, any prepayment (whether mandatory or optional) will be made with a make-whole
premium or discount, as applicable.
In connection with any cancellation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 that results in a mandatory prepayment event, the DOE may elect
to continue construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. In such an event, the DOE will have the right to assume Georgia Power's
rights and obligations under the principal agreements relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 and to acquire all or a portion of
Georgia Power's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
Other Long-Term Debt
Alabama Power
Alabama Power has formed a wholly-owned trust subsidiary for the purpose of issuing preferred securities. The proceeds of the
related equity investments and preferred security sales were loaned back to Alabama Power through the issuance of junior
subordinated notes totaling $206 million outstanding at December 31, 2018 and 2017, which constitute substantially all of the
assets of this trust and are reflected in the balance sheets as long-term debt payable. Alabama Power considers that the mechanisms
and obligations relating to the preferred securities issued for its benefit, taken together, constitute a full and unconditional guarantee
by it of the trust's payment obligations with respect to these securities. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, trust preferred securities of
$200 million were outstanding. See Note 1 under "Variable Interest Entities" for additional information on the accounting treatment
for this trust and the related securities.
Mississippi Power
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, Mississippi Power had $270 million aggregate principal amount outstanding of Mississippi
Business Finance Corporation Taxable Revenue Bonds, 7.13% Series 1999A due October 20, 2021. Mississippi Power assumed the
obligations in 2011 in connection with its election under its operating lease of Plant Daniel Units 3 and 4 to purchase the assets.
The bonds were recorded at fair value at the date of assumption, or $346 million, reflecting a premium of $76 million. See "Secured
Debt" herein for additional information.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, Mississippi Power had $50 million of tax-exempt revenue bond obligations outstanding
representing loans to Mississippi Power from a public authority of funds derived from the sale by such authority of revenue bonds
issued to finance a portion of the costs of constructing the Kemper County energy facility.
II-341
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, Nicor Gas had $1.3 billion and $1.0 billion, respectively, of first mortgage bonds outstanding.
These bonds have been issued with maturities ranging from 2019 to 2058. See "Secured Debt" herein for additional information.
Prior to its sale, in the second quarter 2018, Pivotal Utility Holdings caused $200 million aggregate principal amount of gas facility
revenue bonds to be redeemed.
Nicor Gas issued $300 million aggregate principal amount of first mortgage bonds in a private placement, of which $100 million
was issued in August 2018 and $200 million was issued in November 2018.
At both December 31, 2018 and 2017, Atlanta Gas Light had $159 million of medium-term notes outstanding.
Capital Leases
Assets acquired under capital leases are recorded in the balance sheets as property, plant, and equipment and the related obligations
are classified as long-term debt. See Note 5 under "Capital Leases" for additional information.
Southern Company
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, SCS had capital lease obligations of approximately $178 million and $177 million, respectively,
for an office building and certain computer equipment including desktops, laptops, servers, printers, and storage devices with
annual interest rates that range from 1.6% to 4.7%.
Georgia Power
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, Georgia Power had a capital lease obligation for its corporate headquarters building of $15
million and $22 million, respectively, with an annual interest rate of 7.9%. For ratemaking purposes, the Georgia PSC has allowed
the lease payments in cost of service with no return on the capital lease asset. The difference between the depreciation and the lease
payments allowed for ratemaking purposes is recovered as operating expenses as ordered by the Georgia PSC. The annual
operating expense incurred for this capital lease was not material for any year presented.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, Georgia Power had capital lease obligations related to two affiliate PPAs with Southern Power of
$128 million and $132 million, respectively. The annual interest rates range from 11% to 12% for these two capital lease PPAs. For
ratemaking purposes, the Georgia PSC has included the capital lease asset amortization in cost of service and the interest in Georgia
Power's cost of debt. See Note 1 under "Affiliate Transactions" and Note 9 under "Fuel and Power Purchase Agreements –
Affiliate" for additional information.
Secured Debt
Each of Southern Company's subsidiaries is organized as a legal entity, separate and apart from Southern Company and its other
subsidiaries. There are no agreements or other arrangements among the Southern Company system companies under which the
assets of one company have been pledged or otherwise made available to satisfy obligations of Southern Company or any of its
other subsidiaries.
Outstanding secured debt at December 31, 2018 and 2017 for the applicable registrants was as follows:
 Georgia
Power(a)Mississippi
 Power(b)Southern
Company
 Gas(c)
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018 $ 2,767$ 270$ 1,325
December 31, 2017 2,779 270 1,025
(a)Includes Georgia Power's FFB loans that are secured by a first priority lien on (i) Georgia Power's 45.7% undivided ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3
and 4 (primarily the units under construction, the related real property, and any nuclear fuel loaded in the reactor core) and (ii) Georgia Power's rights and
obligations under the principal contracts relating to Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. These borrowings totaled $2.6 billion at both December 31, 2018 and 2017. See
"Long-term Debt – DOE Loan Guarantee Borrowings" herein for additional information. Also includes capital lease obligations of $142 million and $154
million at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. See "Long-term Debt – Capital Leases – Georgia Power" herein for additional information.
(b)The revenue bonds assumed in conjunction with Mississippi Power's purchase of Plant Daniel Units 3 and 4 are secured by Plant Daniel Units 3 and 4 and
certain related personal property. See "Long-term Debt – Other Long-Term Debt" herein for additional information.
(c)Nicor Gas' first mortgage bonds are secured by substantially all of Nicor Gas' properties. See "Long-term Debt – Other Long-Term Debt – Southern Company
Gas" herein for additional information.
II-342
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, Gulf Power had $41 million of secured debt related to a lien on its property at Plant Daniel in
connection with the issuance of two series of its pollution control revenue bonds, which are included in liabilities held for sale on
Southern Company's balance sheet at December 31, 2018. On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed its sale of Gulf
Power to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for additional information.
Each registrant's senior notes, junior subordinated notes, pollution control and other revenue bond obligations, bank term loans,
credit facility borrowings, and notes payable are effectively subordinated to all secured debt of each respective registrant.
Bank Credit Arrangements
At December 31, 2018, committed credit arrangements with banks were as follows:
 Expires   Executable Term
Loans  Expires Within
One Year
Company 2019 2020 2022 Total Unused(d) One
Year Two
Years Term
OutNo
Term
Out
 (in millions)
Southern Company(a)$ — $ — $2,000$2,000$ 1,999 $ — $ — $ — $ —
Alabama Power 33 500 800 1,333 1,333 — — — 33
Georgia Power — — 1,750 1,750 1,736 — — — —
Mississippi Power 100 — — 100 100 — — — 100
Southern Power(b)— — 750 750 727 — — — —
Southern Company Gas(c)— — 1,900 1,900 1,895 — — — —
Other 30 — — 30 30 — — — 30
Southern Company
Consolidated(e)$163$500$7,200$7,863$ 7,820 $ — $ — $ — $163
(a)Represents the Southern Company parent entity.
(b)Southern Power's subsidiaries are not parties to its bank credit arrangement.
(c)Southern Company Gas provides a parent guarantee of the obligations of its subsidiary Southern Company Gas Capital, which is the borrower of $1.4 billion
($1.395 billion unused) of this arrangement. Southern Company Gas' committed credit arrangement also includes $500 million (all unused) for which Nicor Gas
is the borrower and which is restricted for working capital needs of Nicor Gas. Pursuant to this multi-year credit arrangement, the allocations between Southern
Company Gas Capital and Nicor Gas may be adjusted. See "Structural Considerations" herein for additional information.
(d)Amounts used are for letters of credit.
(e)Excludes $280 million of committed credit arrangements of Gulf Power, which was sold on January 1, 2019. See Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of
Gulf Power" for additional information.
Most of the bank credit arrangements require payment of commitment fees based on the unused portion of the commitments or the
maintenance of compensating balances with the banks. Commitment fees average less than 1/4 of 1% for Southern Company, the
traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, Southern Company Gas, and Nicor Gas. Compensating balances are not
legally restricted from withdrawal.
Subject to applicable market conditions, Southern Company and its subsidiaries expect to renew or replace their bank credit
arrangements as needed, prior to expiration. In connection therewith, Southern Company and its subsidiaries may extend the
maturity dates and/or increase or decrease the lending commitments thereunder.
Southern Company's, Southern Company Gas', and Nicor Gas' credit arrangements contain covenants that limit debt levels to 70%
of total capitalization, as defined in the agreements, and most of the other subsidiaries' bank credit arrangements contain covenants
that limit debt levels to 65% of total capitalization, as defined in the agreements. For purposes of these definitions, debt excludes
the long-term debt payable to affiliated trusts and, in certain arrangements, other hybrid securities. Additionally, for Southern
Company and Southern Power, for purposes of these definitions, debt would exclude any project debt incurred by certain
subsidiaries of Southern Power to the extent such debt is non-recourse to Southern Power and capitalization would exclude the
capital stock or other equity attributable to such subsidiaries. At December 31, 2018, Southern Company, the traditional electric
operating companies, Southern Power, Southern Company Gas, and Nicor Gas were each in compliance with their respective debt
limit covenants.
A portion of the unused credit with banks is allocated to provide liquidity support to the revenue bonds of the traditional electric
operating companies and the commercial paper programs of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies,
Southern Power, Southern Company Gas, and Nicor Gas. The amount of variable rate revenue bonds of the traditional electric
II-343
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
operating companies outstanding requiring liquidity support at December 31, 2018 was approximately $1.6 billion (comprised of
approximately $854 million at Alabama Power, $659 million at Georgia Power, $82 million at Gulf Power, and $40 million at
Mississippi Power). In addition, at December 31, 2018, the traditional electric operating companies had approximately $403
million (comprised of approximately $345 million at Georgia Power and $58 million at Gulf Power) of revenue bonds outstanding
that are required to be remarketed within the next 12 months. See Note 15 under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for
information regarding the sale of Gulf Power on January 1, 2019. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Georgia Power redeemed
approximately $108 million of obligations related to outstanding variable rate pollution control revenue bonds.
In addition to its credit arrangement described above, Southern Power also has a $120 million continuing letter of credit facility
expiring in 2021 for standby letters of credit. At December 31, 2018, $103 million has been used for letters of credit, primarily as
credit support for PPA requirements, and $17 million was unused. At December 31, 2017, the total amount available under this
facility was $19 million. Southern Power's subsidiaries are not parties to this letter of credit facility. Also, at December 31, 2018
and 2017, Southern Power had $103 million and $113 million, respectively, of cash collateral posted related to PPA requirements,
which is included in other deferred charges and assets in Southern Power's consolidated balance sheets.
Notes Payable
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Southern Power, Southern Company Gas, Nicor Gas, and SEGCO make
short-term borrowings primarily through commercial paper programs that have the liquidity support of the committed bank credit
arrangements described above under "Bank Credit Arrangements." Southern Power's subsidiaries are not parties to its commercial
paper program. Southern Company Gas maintains commercial paper programs at Southern Company Gas Capital and at Nicor Gas.
Nicor Gas' commercial paper program supports working capital needs at Nicor Gas as Nicor Gas is not permitted to make money
pool loans to affiliates. All of Southern Company Gas' other subsidiaries benefit from Southern Company Gas Capital's commercial
paper program. See "Structural Considerations" herein for additional information.
In addition, Southern Company and certain of its subsidiaries have entered into various bank term loan agreements. Unless
otherwise stated, the proceeds of these loans were used to repay existing indebtedness and for general corporate purposes, including
working capital and, for the subsidiaries, their continuous construction programs.
II-344
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Commercial paper and short-term bank term loans are included in notes payable in the balance sheets. Details of short-term
borrowings were as follows:
 Notes Payable at December 31, 2018 Notes Payable at December 31, 2017
 Amount
Outstanding  Weighted Average
Interest RateAmount
Outstanding  Weighted Average
Interest Rate
 (in millions)  (in millions)  
Southern Company     
Commercial paper $ 1,064 3.0% $ 1,832 1.8%
Short-term bank debt 1,851 3.1% 607 2.3%
Total $ 2,915 3.1% $ 2,439 1.9%
     
Alabama Power     
Short-term bank debt $ — —% $ 3 3.7%
     
Georgia Power     
Commercial paper $ 294 3.1% $ — —%
Short-term bank debt — —% 150 2.2%
Total $ 294 3.1% $ 150 2.2%
     
Mississippi Power     
Short-term bank debt $ — —% $ 4 3.8%
     
Southern Power     
Commercial paper $ — —% $ 105 2.0%
Short-term bank debt 100 3.1% — —%
Total $ 100 3.1% $ 105 2.0%
     
Southern Company Gas     
Commercial paper:     
Southern Company Gas Capital$ 403 3.1% $ 1,243 1.7%
Nicor Gas 247 3.0% 275 1.8%
Total $ 650 3.0% $ 1,518 1.8%
The outstanding bank term loans at December 31, 2018 have covenants that limit debt levels to a percentage of total capitalization.
The percentage is 70% for Southern Company and 65% for Alabama Power and Southern Power, as defined in the agreements. For
purposes of these definitions, debt excludes any long-term debt payable to affiliated trusts and other hybrid securities. Additionally,
for Southern Company and Southern Power, for purposes of these definitions, debt excludes any project debt incurred by certain
subsidiaries of Southern Power to the extent such debt is non-recourse to Southern Power and capitalization excludes the capital
stock or other equity attributable to such subsidiary. At December 31, 2018, each of Southern Company, Alabama Power, and
Southern Power was in compliance with its debt limits.
Except as otherwise described herein, Southern Company and its subsidiaries used the proceeds of bank loans for long-term debt
redemptions and maturities, to repay short-term indebtedness, and for general corporate purposes, including working capital.
In March 2018, Southern Company entered into a $900 million short-term floating rate bank loan bearing interest based on one-
month LIBOR, which was repaid in August 2018.
In April 2018, Southern Company borrowed $250 million pursuant to a short-term uncommitted bank credit arrangement, bearing
interest at a rate agreed upon by Southern Company and the bank from time to time and payable on no less than 30 days' demand
by the bank. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Southern Company repaid this loan.
In June 2018, Southern Company repaid at maturity two $100 million short-term floating rate bank term loans.
II-345
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
In August 2018, Southern Company entered into a $1.5 billion short-term floating rate bank loan bearing interest based on one-
month LIBOR, and repaid $250 million borrowed in August 2017 pursuant to a short-term uncommitted bank credit arrangement.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, Southern Company repaid this loan.
In January 2018, Georgia Power repaid its outstanding $150 million floating rate bank loan due May 31, 2018.
In March 2018, Mississippi Power entered into a $300 million short-term floating rate bank loan bearing interest based on one-
month LIBOR, of which $200 million was repaid in the second quarter 2018 and $100 million was repaid in the third quarter 2018.
In May 2018, Southern Power entered into two short-term floating rate bank loans, each for an aggregate principal amount of $100
million, which bear interest based on one-month LIBOR. In November 2018, Southern Power repaid one of these short-term loans.
In January 2018, Southern Company Gas issued a floating rate promissory note to Southern Company in an aggregate principal
amount of $100 million bearing interest based on one-month LIBOR. In March 2018, Southern Company Gas repaid this
promissory note.
In April 2018, Pivotal Utility Holdings, as borrower, and Southern Company Gas, as guarantor, entered into a $181 million short-
term delayed draw floating rate bank term loan bearing interest based on one-month LIBOR. In July 2018, Pivotal Utility Holdings
repaid this short-term loan.
In May 2018, Southern Company Gas Capital borrowed $95 million pursuant to a short-term uncommitted bank credit
arrangement, guaranteed by Southern Company Gas, bearing interest at a rate agreed upon by Southern Company Gas Capital and
the bank from time to time and payable on no less than 30 days' demand by the bank. In July 2018, Southern Company Gas Capital
repaid this loan.
Outstanding Classes of Capital Stock
Southern Company
Common Stock
Stock Issued
During 2018, Southern Company issued approximately 11.6 million shares of common stock primarily through employee equity
compensation plans and received proceeds of approximately $442 million.
In addition, during the third and fourth quarters 2018, Southern Company issued a total of approximately 12.1 million and 2.5
million shares, respectively, of common stock through at-the-market issuances pursuant to sales agency agreements related to
Southern Company's continuous equity offering program and received cash proceeds of approximately $540 million and $108
million, respectively, net of $5 million and $1 million in commissions, respectively.
Shares Reserved
At December 31, 2018, a total of 92 million shares were reserved for issuance pursuant to the Southern Investment Plan, employee
savings plans, the Outside Directors Stock Plan, the Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan (which includes stock options and
performance share units as discussed in Note 12), and an at-the-market program. Of the total 92 million shares reserved, there were
10 million shares of common stock remaining available for awards under the Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan at
December 31, 2018.
II-346
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Diluted Earnings Per Share
For Southern Company, the only difference in computing basic and diluted earnings per share (EPS) is attributable to awards
outstanding under the stock option and performance share plans. The effect of both stock options and performance share award
units was determined using the treasury stock method. Shares used to compute diluted EPS were as follows:
 Average Common Stock Shares
 2018  2017 2016
 (in millions)
As reported shares 1,020 1,000 951
Effect of options and performance share award units 5 8 7
Diluted shares 1,025 1,008 958
Stock options and performance share award units that were not included in the diluted EPS calculation because they were anti-
dilutive were immaterial in all years presented.
Redeemable Preferred Stock of Subsidiaries
Prior to 2017, each of the traditional electric operating companies had outstanding preferred and/or preference stock. During 2017,
Alabama Power and Gulf Power redeemed all of their outstanding preference stock and Georgia Power redeemed all of its
outstanding preferred and preference stock. During 2018, Mississippi Power redeemed all of its outstanding preferred stock. The
remaining preferred stock of Alabama Power contains a feature that allows the holders to elect a majority of such subsidiary's board
of directors if preferred dividends are not paid for four consecutive quarters. Because such a potential redemption-triggering event
is not solely within the control of Alabama Power, this preferred stock is presented as "Redeemable Preferred Stock of
Subsidiaries" on Southern Company's balance sheets and statements of capitalization in a manner consistent with temporary equity
under applicable accounting standards.
The following table presents changes during the year in redeemable preferred stock of subsidiaries for Southern Company:
 Redeemable Preferred
Stock of Subsidiaries
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2015 and 2016: $ 118
Issued(a)250
Redeemed(a)(38)
Issuance costs(a)(6)
Balance at December 31, 2017: 324
Redeemed(b)(33)
Balance at December 31, 2018: $ 291
(a)See "Alabama Power" herein for additional information.
(b)See "Mississippi Power" herein for additional information.
Alabama Power
Alabama Power has preferred stock, Class A preferred stock, and common stock outstanding. Alabama Power also has authorized
preference stock, none of which is outstanding. Alabama Power's preferred stock and Class A preferred stock, without preference
between classes, rank senior to Alabama Power's common stock with respect to payment of dividends and voluntary and
involuntary dissolution. The preferred stock and Class A preferred stock of Alabama Power contain a feature that allows the holders
to elect a majority of Alabama Power's board of directors if preferred dividends are not paid for four consecutive quarters. Because
such a potential redemption-triggering event is not solely within the control of Alabama Power, the preferred stock and Class A
preferred stock is presented as "Redeemable Preferred Stock" on Alabama Power's balance sheets and statements of capitalization
in a manner consistent with temporary equity under applicable accounting standards.
Alabama Power's preferred stock is subject to redemption at a price equal to the par value plus a premium. Alabama Power's Class
A preferred stock is subject to redemption at a price equal to the stated capital. All series of Alabama Power's preferred stock
currently are subject to redemption at the option of Alabama Power. The Class A preferred stock is subject to redemption on or
II-347
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
after October 1, 2022, or following the occurrence of a rating agency event. Information for each outstanding series is in the table
below:
Preferred StockPar Value/Stated
Capital Per Share Shares Outstanding Redemption
Price Per Share
4.92% Preferred Stock $100  80,000 $103.23
4.72% Preferred Stock $100  50,000 $102.18
4.64% Preferred Stock $100  60,000 $103.14
4.60% Preferred Stock $100  100,000 $104.20
4.52% Preferred Stock $100  50,000 $102.93
4.20% Preferred Stock $100  135,115 $105.00
5.00% Class A Preferred Stock $25  10,000,000 Stated Capital(*)
(*)Prior to October 1, 2022: $25.50; on or after October 1, 2022: Stated Capital
In September 2017, Alabama Power issued 10 million shares ($250 million aggregate stated capital) of 5.00% Class A Preferred
Stock, Cumulative, Par Value $1 Per Share (Stated Capital $25 Per Share). The proceeds were used in October 2017 to redeem all 2
million shares ($50 million aggregate stated capital) of 6.50% Series Preference Stock, 6 million shares ($150 million aggregate
stated capital) of 6.45% Series Preference Stock, and 1.52 million shares ($38 million aggregate stated capital) of 5.83% Class A
Preferred Stock and for other general corporate purposes, including Alabama Power's continuous construction program.
There were no changes for the year ended December 31, 2018 in redeemable preferred stock of Alabama Power.
Georgia Power
Georgia Power has preferred stock, Class A preferred stock, preference stock, and common stock authorized, but only common
stock outstanding as of December 31, 2018 and 2017. In October 2017, Georgia Power redeemed all 1.8 million shares ($45 million
aggregate liquidation amount) of its 6.125% Series Class A Preferred Stock and 2.25 million shares ($225 million aggregate
liquidation amount) of its 6.50% Series 2007A Preference Stock.
Mississippi Power
Mississippi Power has preferred stock and common stock authorized, but only common stock outstanding as of December 31,
2018. Mississippi Power previously had preferred stock that contained a feature allowing the holders to elect a majority of
Mississippi Power's board of directors if preferred dividends were not paid for four consecutive quarters. Because such a potential
redemption-triggering event was not solely within the control of Mississippi Power, this preferred stock was presented as
"Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock" on Mississippi Power's balance sheets and statements of capitalization in a manner
consistent with temporary equity under applicable accounting standards.
On October 23, 2018, Mississippi Power completed the redemption of all 8,867 outstanding shares ($886,700 aggregate par value)
of its 4.40% Series Preferred Stock, all 8,643 outstanding shares ($864,300 aggregate par value) of its 4.60% Series Preferred
Stock, all 16,700 outstanding shares ($1.67 million aggregate par value) of its 4.72% Series Preferred Stock, and all 1,200,000
outstanding depositary shares ($30 million aggregate stated value), each representing a 1/4th interest in a share of its 5.25% Series
Preferred Stock.
Dividend Restrictions
The income of Southern Company is derived primarily from equity in earnings of its subsidiaries. At December 31, 2018,
consolidated retained earnings included $4.9 billion of undistributed retained earnings of the subsidiaries.
The traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power can only pay dividends to Southern Company out of retained
earnings or paid-in-capital.
See Note 7 under "Southern Power" for information regarding the distribution requirements for certain Southern Power
subsidiaries.
The authority of the natural gas distribution utilities to pay dividends to Southern Company Gas is subject to regulation. By
regulation, Nicor Gas is restricted, to the extent of its retained earnings balance, in the amount it can dividend or loan to affiliates
and is not permitted to make money pool loans to affiliates. At December 31, 2018, the amount of Southern Company Gas'
subsidiary retained earnings restricted for dividend payment totaled $814 million.
II-348
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Structural Considerations
Since Southern Company and Southern Company Gas are holding companies, the right of Southern Company and Southern
Company Gas and, hence, the right of creditors of Southern Company or Southern Company Gas to participate in any distribution
of the assets of any respective subsidiary of Southern Company or Southern Company Gas, whether upon liquidation,
reorganization or otherwise, is subject to prior claims of creditors and preferred stockholders of such subsidiary.
Southern Company Gas' 100%-owned subsidiary, Southern Company Gas Capital, was established to provide for certain of
Southern Company Gas' ongoing financing needs through a commercial paper program, the issuance of various debt, hybrid
securities, and other financing arrangements. Southern Company Gas fully and unconditionally guarantees all debt issued by
Southern Company Gas Capital. Nicor Gas is not permitted by regulation to make loans to affiliates or utilize Southern Company
Gas Capital for its financing needs.
Southern Power Company's senior notes, bank term loans, commercial paper, and bank credit arrangement are unsecured senior
indebtedness, which rank equally with all other unsecured and unsubordinated debt of Southern Power Company. Southern Power's
subsidiaries are not issuers, borrowers, or obligors, as applicable, under the senior notes, borrowings from financial institutions,
commercial paper, or the bank credit arrangement. The senior notes, borrowings from financial institutions, commercial paper, and
the bank credit arrangement are effectively subordinated to any future secured debt of Southern Power Company and any potential
claims of creditors of Southern Power's subsidiaries.
II-349
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
9. COMMITMENTS
Fuel and Power Purchase Agreements
Non-Affiliate
To supply a portion of the fuel requirements of the Southern Company system's electric generating plants, the Southern Company
system has entered into various long-term commitments not recognized on the balance sheets for the procurement and delivery of
fossil fuel and, for Alabama Power and Georgia Power, nuclear fuel. Fuel expense in 2018, 2017, and 2016 for the Southern
Company system is shown below, the majority of which was purchased under long-term commitments.
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
2018 $ 4,637$ 1,301$ 1,698$ 405$ 699
2017 4,400 1,225 1,671 395 621
2016 4,361 1,297 1,807 343 456
Each registrant expects that a substantial amount of its future fuel needs will continue to be purchased under long-term
commitments.
The traditional electric operating companies have entered into various non-affiliate long-term PPAs, some of which are accounted
for as leases. For Alabama Power and Georgia Power, most long-term PPAs include capacity and energy components. Mississippi
Power's long-term PPAs are associated with solar facilities and only include an energy component. For the traditional electric
operating companies, the energy-related costs associated with PPAs are recoverable through fuel cost recovery provisions.
Total capacity expense under these non-affiliate PPAs accounted for as operating leases in 2018, 2017, and 2016 was as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
Power
 (in millions)
2018 $ 231$ 44$ 113
2017 235 41 118
2016 232 42 113
In addition, Georgia Power's non-affiliate energy-only solar PPAs accounted for as leases contained contingent rent expense of $43
million, $44 million, and $18 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. Mississippi Power's energy-only solar PPAs
accounted for as operating leases contained contingent rent expense of $10 million, $5 million, and an immaterial amount for 2018,
2017, and 2016, respectively. Contingent rents are recognized as services are performed.
Estimated total obligations under non-affiliate PPAs accounted for as operating leases at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 Southern
Company Alabama PowerGeorgia
Power
 (in millions)
2019 $ 161$ 41$ 120
2020 164 42 122
2021 168 44 124
2022 171 46 125
2023 127 — 127
2024 and thereafter 642 — 642
Total $ 1,433$ 173$ 1,260
In addition, Georgia Power has commitments regarding a portion of a 5% interest in the original cost of Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2
owned by MEAG Power that are in effect until the latter of the retirement of the plant or the latest stated maturity date of MEAG
Power's bonds issued to finance such ownership interest. The payments for capacity are required whether or not any capacity is
II-350
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
available. The energy cost is a function of each unit's variable operating costs. Portions of the capacity payments relate to costs in
excess of MEAG Power's Plant Vogtle Units 1 and 2 allowed investment for ratemaking purposes. The present value of these
portions at the time of the disallowance was written off. Generally, the cost of such capacity and energy is included in purchased
power in Southern Company's statements of income and in purchased power, non-affiliates in Georgia Power's statements of
income. Georgia Power's capacity payments related to this commitment totaled $8 million, $9 million, and $11 million in 2018,
2017, and 2016, respectively. At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power's estimated long-term obligations related to this commitment
totaled $59 million, consisting of $6 million for 2019, $5 million for 2020, $5 million for 2021, $4 million for 2022, $3 million for
2023, and $36 million for 2024 and thereafter.
SCS may enter into various types of wholesale energy and natural gas contracts acting as an agent for the traditional electric
operating companies and Southern Power. Under these agreements, each of the traditional electric operating companies and
Southern Power may be jointly and severally liable. Accordingly, Southern Company has entered into keep-well agreements with
each of the traditional electric operating companies to ensure they will not subsidize or be responsible for any costs, losses,
liabilities, or damages resulting from the inclusion of Southern Power as a contracting party under these agreements.
Affiliate
Georgia Power has also entered into affiliate long-term PPAs with Southern Power, some of which Georgia Power accounts for as
leases. Georgia Power's total capacity expense under these affiliate PPAs accounted for as leases was $93 million, $107 million, and
$133 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. In addition, Georgia Power's energy-only solar PPAs with Southern Power
accounted for as leases contained contingent rent expense of $29 million, $29 million, and $21 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016,
respectively.
Georgia Power's estimated total obligations under affiliate PPAs accounted for as leases at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 Georgia Power
 Affiliate Capital
Lease PPAs  Affiliate Operating
Lease PPAs
 (in millions)
2019 $ 23 $ 64
2020 23 65
2021 24 66
2022 24 68
2023 25 69
2024 and thereafter 158 349
Total $ 277 $ 681
Less: amounts representing executory costs(a) 42 
Net minimum lease payments 235 
Less: amounts representing interest(b) 105 
Present value of net minimum lease payments $ 130 
(a)Executory costs such as taxes, maintenance, and insurance (including the estimated profit thereon) are estimated and included in total minimum lease payments.
(b)Calculated using an adjusted incremental borrowing rate to reduce the present value of the net minimum lease payments to fair value.
See Note 8 under "Long-term Debt – Capital Leases – Georgia Power" for additional information.
Pipeline Charges, Storage Capacity, and Gas Supply
Southern Company Gas has commitments for pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply, which include charges recoverable
through natural gas cost recovery mechanisms, or alternatively, billed to marketers selling retail natural gas, as well as demand
charges associated with Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas services. Gas supply commitments include amounts for gas
commodity purchases associated with Southern Company Gas' gas marketing services of 47 million mmBtu at floating gas prices
calculated using forward natural gas prices at December 31, 2018 and valued at $150 million. Southern Company Gas provides
guarantees to certain gas suppliers for certain of its subsidiaries in support of payment obligations.
II-351
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas' expected future contractual obligations for pipeline charges, storage capacity, and gas supply that are not
recognized on the balance sheets at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 Pipeline Charges, Storage
Capacity, and Gas Supply
 (in millions)
2019 $ 781
2020 584
2021 520
2022 489
2023 412
2024 and thereafter 1,871
Total $ 4,657
Operating Leases
In addition to the operating lease PPAs discussed previously, the Southern Company system has operating lease agreements with
various terms and expiration dates. The traditional electric operating companies' operating leases primarily relate to facilities, coal
railcars, vehicles, cellular tower space, and other equipment. Southern Power's operating leases primarily relate to land for solar
and wind facilities and are recognized on a straight-line basis over the minimum lease term, plus any renewal periods necessary to
cover the expected life of the respective facility. Southern Company Gas' operating leases primarily relate to facilities and vehicles.
Total rent expense for 2018, 2017, and 2016 was as follows:
 Southern
Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power(*)
 (in millions)
2018 $ 192$ 23$ 34$ 4$ 31
2017 176 25 31 3 29
2016 169 18 28 3 22
(*)Includes contingent rent expense related to Southern Power's land leases based on wind production and escalation in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers.
 Southern Company Gas
 (in millions)
2018 $ 15
2017 15
Successor – July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016 8
Predecessor – January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016 6
II-352
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The registrants exclude contingent rent but include any step rents, fixed escalations, lease concessions, and lease extensions to
cover the expected life of the facility in the computation of minimum lease payments. At December 31, 2018, estimated minimum
lease payments under operating leases were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
2019 $ 156$ 12$ 23$ 3$ 23$ 18
2020 134 10 18 2 24 16
2021 110 7 9 1 24 15
2022 98 6 6 1 24 13
2023 79 3 5 1 26 10
2024 and thereafter 1,040 1 13 2 874 34
Total $ 1,617$ 39$ 74$ 10$ 995$ 106
For the traditional electric operating companies, a majority of the railcar and barge lease expenses are recoverable through fuel cost
recovery provisions.
In addition to the above rental commitments, Alabama Power and Georgia Power have potential obligations upon expiration of
certain railcar leases with respect to the residual value of the leased property. These leases have terms expiring in 2023 for Alabama
Power and in 2024 for Georgia Power with maximum obligations under these leases of $12 million for Alabama Power and $9
million for Georgia Power. At the termination of the leases, Alabama Power and Georgia Power may renew the leases, exercise
their purchase options, or the property can be sold to a third party. Alabama Power and Georgia Power expect that the fair market
value of the leased property would substantially reduce or, for Alabama Power, potentially eliminate the loss under the residual
value obligations.
Guarantees
Alabama Power has guaranteed unconditionally the obligation of SEGCO under an installment sale agreement for the purchase of
certain pollution control facilities at SEGCO's generating units, pursuant to which $25 million principal amount of pollution control
revenue bonds are outstanding and mature in June 2019. Alabama Power also guaranteed a $100 million principal amount long-
term bank loan entered into by SEGCO on November 28, 2018. Georgia Power has agreed to reimburse Alabama Power for the
portion of such obligations corresponding to Georgia Power's proportionate ownership of SEGCO's stock if Alabama Power is
called upon to make such payment under its guarantee. At December 31, 2018, the capitalization of SEGCO consisted of $90
million of equity and $125 million of long-term debt, on which the annual interest requirement is $4 million. In addition, SEGCO
had short-term debt outstanding of $5 million. See Note 7 under "SEGCO" for additional information.
In 2013, Georgia Power entered into an agreement that requires Georgia Power to guarantee certain payments of a gas supplier for
Plant McIntosh for a period up to 15 years. The agreement was subsequently amended on May 31, 2018. The guarantee is expected
to be terminated if certain events occur by October 2019. In the event the gas supplier defaults on payments, the maximum
potential exposure under the guarantee and amendment is approximately $30 million.
In October 2017, Atlantic Coast Pipeline executed a $3.4 billion revolving credit facility with a stated maturity date of October
2021. Southern Company Gas entered into a guarantee agreement to support its share of the revolving credit facility. Southern
Company Gas' maximum exposure to loss under the terms of the guarantee is limited to 5% of the outstanding borrowings under
the credit facility, and totaled $72 million as of December 31, 2018. See Note 2 under "FERC Matters – Southern Company Gas"
for additional information regarding the Atlantic Coast Pipeline.
As discussed above under "Operating Leases," Alabama Power and Georgia Power have entered into certain residual value
guarantees related to railcar leases.
10. INCOME TAXES
Southern Company files a consolidated federal income tax return and the registrants file various state income tax returns, some of
which are combined or unitary. Under a joint consolidated income tax allocation agreement, each Southern Company subsidiary's
current and deferred tax expense is computed on a stand-alone basis and no subsidiary is allocated more current expense than
would be paid if it filed a separate income tax return. PowerSecure and Southern Company Gas became participants in the income
II-353
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
tax allocation agreement as of May 9, 2016 and July 1, 2016, respectively. See Note 15 for additional information on these
acquisitions, as well as disposition activity during 2018. In accordance with IRS regulations, each company is jointly and severally
liable for the federal tax liability. Prior to the Merger, Southern Company Gas filed a U.S. federal consolidated income tax return
and various state income tax returns.
Federal Tax Reform Legislation
Following the enactment of the Tax Reform Legislation, the SEC staff issued Staff Accounting Bulletin 118 – "Income Tax
Accounting Implications of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act" (SAB 118), which provided for a measurement period of up to one year
from the enactment date to complete accounting under GAAP for the tax effects of the legislation. Due to the complex and
comprehensive nature of the enacted tax law changes and their application under GAAP, the registrants considered all amounts
recorded in the financial statements as a result of the Tax Reform Legislation "provisional" as discussed in SAB 118 and subject to
revision prior to filing the 2017 tax return in the fourth quarter 2018. As of December 31, 2018, each of the registrants considered
the measurement of impacts from the Tax Reform Legislation on deferred income tax assets and liabilities, primarily due to the
impact of the reduction of the corporate income tax rate, to be complete.
However, the IRS continues to issue regulations that provide further interpretation and guidance on the law and each respective
state's adoption of the provisions contained in the Tax Reform Legislation remains uncertain. In addition, the regulatory treatment
of certain impacts of the Tax Reform Legislation is subject to the discretion of the FERC and each state regulatory commission.
The ultimate impact of these matters cannot be determined at this time. See Note 2 for additional information.
Current and Deferred Income Taxes
Details of income tax provisions are as follows:
 2018
  
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
Federal —  
Current $ 167$ 91$ 393$ (567)$ 85
Deferred 231 123 (249) 575 (154)
 398 214 144 8 (69)
State —  
Current 188 26 81 (10) (9)
Deferred (137) 51 (11) (100) (86)
 51 77 70 (110) (95)
Total $ 449$ 291$ 214$ (102)$ (164)
II-354
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2017
  
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
Federal —  
Current $ (62)$ 136$ 256$ 194$ (566)
Deferred (6) 336 504 (753) (312)
 (68) 472 760 (559) (878)
State —  
Current 37 23 116 — (110)
Deferred 173 73 (46) 27 49
 210 96 70 27 (61)
Total $ 142$ 568$ 830$ (532)$ (939)
 2016
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
Federal —  
Current $ 1,184$ 103$ 391$ (31)$ 928
Deferred (342) 339 319 (60) (1,098)
 842 442 710 (91) (170)
State —  
Current (108) 20 6 (6) (60)
Deferred 217 69 64 (7) 35
 109 89 70 (13) (25)
Total $ 951$ 531$ 780$ (104)$ (195)
 Southern Company Gas
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016 January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Federal —     
Current $ 334$ 103$ — $ 67
Deferred 33 170 65 8
 367 273 65 75
State —     
Current 131 27 (16) 12
Deferred (34) 67 27 —
 97 94 11 12
Total $ 464$ 367$ 76 $ 87
Southern Company's and Southern Power's ITCs and PTCs generated in the current tax year and carried forward from prior tax
years that cannot be utilized in the current tax year are reclassified from current to deferred taxes in federal income tax expense in
the tables above. Southern Power's ITCs and PTCs reclassified in this manner include $128 million for 2018, $316 million for
II-355
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
2017, and $1.13 billion for 2016. These ITCs and PTCs for Southern Company and Southern Power are included in "Deferred Tax
Assets and Liabilities" herein.
In accordance with regulatory requirements, federal ITCs for the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas
distribution utilities, as well as certain state ITCs for Nicor Gas, are deferred, and, upon utilization, amortized over the average life
of the related property with such amortization normally applied as a credit to reduce depreciation in the statements of income.
Southern Power's deferred federal ITCs are amortized to income tax expense over the life of the respective asset. ITCs amortized in
2018, 2017, and 2016 were immaterial for Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, and Southern Company Gas and
were as follows for Southern Company and Southern Power:
 Southern Company Southern Power
 (in millions)
2018 $ 87$ 58
2017 79 57
2016 59 37
Southern Power received $5 million of cash related to federal ITCs under renewable energy initiatives in 2018. No cash was
received in 2017 or 2016. Southern Power recognized tax credits and reduced the tax basis of the asset by 50% of the ITCs
received, resulting in a net deferred tax asset. Southern Power has elected to recognize the tax benefit of this basis difference as a
reduction to income tax expense in the year in which the plant reaches commercial operation. The tax benefit of the related basis
differences reduced income tax expense by $1 million in 2018, $18 million in 2017, and $173 million in 2016. See "Unrecognized
Tax Benefits" herein for further information.
State ITCs and other state credits, which are recognized in the period in which the credits are generated, reduced Georgia Power's
income tax expense by $21 million in 2018, $37 million in 2017, and $31 million in 2016 and reduced Southern Power's income
tax expense by $32 million in 2017 and $7 million in 2016.
Southern Power's federal and state PTCs, which are recognized in the period in which the credits are generated, reduced Southern
Power's income tax expense by $141 million in 2018, $139 million in 2017, and $50 million in 2016.
Legal Entity Reorganizations
In April 2018, Southern Power completed the final stage of a legal entity reorganization of various direct and indirect subsidiaries
that own and operate substantially all of its solar facilities, including certain subsidiaries owned in partnership with various third
parties. In September 2018, Southern Power also completed a legal entity reorganization of eight operating wind facilities under a
new holding company, SP Wind. The reorganizations resulted in net state tax benefits related to certain changes in apportionment
rates totaling approximately $65 million, which were recorded in 2018.
Effective Tax Rate
Southern Company's effective tax rate is typically lower than the statutory rate due to employee stock plans' dividend deduction,
non-taxable AFUDC equity at the traditional electric operating companies, flowback of excess deferred income taxes at the
regulated utilities, and federal income tax benefits from ITCs and PTCs primarily at Southern Power. Each registrant's effective tax
rate for 2018 varied significantly as compared to 2017 due to the 14% lower 2018 federal tax rate resulting from the Tax Reform
Legislation.
II-356
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
A reconciliation of the federal statutory income tax rate to the effective income tax rate is as follows:
 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
Federal statutory rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 %
State income tax, net of federal deduction 1.8 5.0 5.5 (65.1) (90.8)
Employee stock plans' dividend deduction (1.0) — — — —
Non-deductible book depreciation 0.8 0.6 1.2 0.7 —
Flowback of excess deferred income taxes (4.0) (1.8) — (4.1) —
AFUDC-Equity (1.0) (1.0) (1.4) — —
ITC basis difference (0.6) — — — (0.2)
Federal PTCs (4.7) — — — (156.6)
Amortization of ITC (2.0) (0.1) (0.2) (0.2) (55.4)
Tax impact from sale of subsidiaries 8.6 — — — —
Tax Reform Legislation (1.4) — (4.9) (26.3) 96.1
Noncontrolling interests (0.4) — — — (14.9)
Other (0.8) (0.1) 0.1 (1.4) 2.0
Effective income tax (benefit) rate 16.3 % 23.6 % 21.3 % (75.4)% (198.8)%
 2017
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power(*)Southern
Power
Federal statutory rate 35.0 % 35.0 % 35.0 % (35.0)% 35.0 %
State income tax, net of federal deduction 12.5 4.5 2.0 0.6 (22.2)
Employee stock plans' dividend deduction (4.0) — — — —
Non-deductible book depreciation 3.1 0.9 0.7 0.1 —
Flowback of excess deferred income taxes (0.3) — (0.1) — —
AFUDC-Equity (2.6) (1.0) (0.6) — —
AFUDC-Equity portion of Kemper IGCC charge 15.7 — — 5.3 —
ITC basis difference (1.7) — — — (10.0)
Federal PTCs (12.1) — — — (72.5)
Amortization of ITC (4.2) (0.2) (0.1) — (20.6)
Tax Reform Legislation (25.6) 0.3 (0.4) 11.9 (416.1)
Noncontrolling interests (1.4) — — — (8.6)
Other (1.1) 0.1 0.2 — (10.7)
Effective income tax (benefit) rate 13.3 % 39.6 % 36.7 % (17.1)% (525.7)%
(*)Represents effective income tax benefit rate for Mississippi Power due to a loss before income taxes in 2017.
II-357
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2016
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power(*)Southern
Power
Federal statutory rate 35.0 % 35.0 % 35.0 % (35.0)% 35.0 %
State income tax, net of federal deduction 2.0 4.2 2.1 (5.7) (9.1)
Employee stock plans' dividend deduction (1.2) — — — —
Non-deductible book depreciation 0.9 1.0 0.8 0.7 —
Flowback of excess deferred income taxes (0.1) — (0.1) (0.3) —
AFUDC-Equity (2.0) (0.7) (0.8) (28.5) —
ITC basis difference (5.0) — — — (96.3)
Federal PTCs (1.2) — — — (23.3)
Amortization of ITC (0.9) (0.2) (0.2) (0.1) (13.4)
Noncontrolling interests (0.3) — — — (6.2)
Other 0.1 (0.5) (0.1) 0.4 4.7
Effective income tax (benefit) rate 27.3 % 38.8 % 36.7 % (68.5)% (108.6)%
(*)Represents effective income tax benefit rate for Mississippi Power due to a loss before income taxes in 2016.
 Southern Company Gas
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31,
2016  January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
Federal statutory rate 21.0% 35.0% 35.0%  35.0%
State income tax, net of federal deduction 9.2 10.0 3.6  3.5
Flowback of excess deferred income taxes (3.0) (0.2) —  —
Amortization of ITC (0.1) (0.2) (0.4)  —
Tax impact on sale of subsidiaries 28.5 — —  —
Tax Reform Legislation (0.4) 15.0 —  —
Other 0.3 0.6 1.8  (0.9)
Effective income tax rate 55.5% 60.2% 40.0%  37.6%
II-358
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities
The tax effects of temporary differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities in the financial statements of the
registrants and their respective tax bases, which give rise to deferred tax assets and liabilities, are as follows:
 December 31, 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Deferred tax liabilities —    
Accelerated depreciation $ 8,461 $ 2,236 $ 3,005 $ 335 $ 1,483 $ 1,176
Property basis dif ferences 1,807 865 633 162 — 134
Federal ef fect of net state deferred tax assets — — — 36 — —
Leveraged lease basis dif ferences 253 — — — — —
Employee benefit obligations 477 149 290 25 6 6
Premium on reacquired debt 88 14 74 — — —
Regulatory assets –     
Storm damage reserves 111 — 111 — — —
Employee benefit obligations 975 260 344 45 — 45
AROs 1,232 276 925 31 — —
AROs 1,210 607 575 — — —
Other 593 177 141 68 34 132
Total deferred income tax liabilities 15,207 4,584 6,098 702 1,523 1,493
Deferred tax assets —     
Federal ef fect of net state deferred tax liabilities 260 155 71 — 22 46
Employee benefit obligations 1,273 286 444 62 7 150
Other property basis dif ferences 251 — 61 — 172 —
ITC and PTC carryforward 2,730 11 430 — 2,128 —
Alternative minimum tax carryforward 62 — — 32 21 —
Other partnership basis dif ference 162 — — — 162 —
Other comprehensive losses 82 10 3 — — —
AROs 2,442 883 1,500 31 — —
Estimated loss on plants under construction 346 — 283 63 — —
Other deferred state tax attributes 415 — 19 251 72 —
Regulatory liability associated with the Tax Reform
Legislation (not subject to normalization) 294 130 127 29 — 8
Other 731 147 140 47 47 285
Total deferred income tax assets 9,048 1,622 3,078 515 2,631 489
Valuation allowance (123) — (42) (41) (27) (12)
Net deferred income tax assets 8,925 1,622 3,036 474 2,604 477
Net deferred income taxes (assets)/liabilities $ 6,282 $ 2,962 $ 3,062 $ 228 $ (1,081 )$ 1,016
    
Recognized in the balance sheets:    
Accumulated deferred income
taxes – assets $ (276)$ —$ —$ (150)$ (1,186 )$ —
Accumulated deferred income
taxes – liabilities $ 6,558 $ 2,962 $ 3,062 $ 378 $ 105 $ 1,016
II-359
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 December 31, 2017
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Deferred tax liabilities —   
Accelerated depreciation $ 9,059 $ 2,135 $ 2,889 $ 303 $ 1,922 $ 1,150
Property basis dif ferences 1,853 725 606 207 2 204
Federal ef fect of net state deferred tax assets — — — 9 — —
Leveraged lease basis dif ferences 251 — — — — —
Employee benefit obligations 527 162 287 28 7 4
Premium on reacquired debt 54 16 34 — — —
Regulatory assets –   
Storm damage reserves 89 — 89 — — —
Employee benefit obligations 1,044 260 349 46 — 75
AROs 821 249 501 33 — —
AROs 370 220 130 — — —
Other 689 147 140 73 30 208
Total deferred income tax liabilities 14,757 3,914 5,025 699 1,961 1,641
Deferred tax assets —   
Federal ef fect of net state deferred tax liabilities 330 143 85 — 42 54
Employee benefit obligations 1,339 286 448 62 8 185
Other property basis dif ferences 343 — 59 — 184 —
ITC and PTC carryforward 2,414 9 403 — 2,002 —
Federal NOL  carryforward 518 — — 40 333 92
Alternative minimum tax carryforward 69 — — 32 21 —
Other partnership basis dif ference 23 — — — 23 —
Other comprehensive losses 84 10 4 — 1 —
AROs 1,191 469 631 33 — —
Estimated loss on plants under construction 722 — — 722 — —
Other deferred state tax attributes 330 — 6 133 77 —
Regulatory liability associated with the Tax Reform
Legislation (not subject to normalization) 304 126 123 27 — 9
Other 538 111 91 54 9 223
Total deferred income tax assets 8,205 1,154 1,850 1,103 2,700 563
Valuation allowance (184) — — (157) (13) (11)
Net deferred income tax assets 8,021 1,154 1,850 946 2,687 552
Net deferred income taxes (assets)/liabilities $ 6,736 $ 2,760 $ 3,175 $ (247)$ (726)$ 1,089
   
Recognized in the balance sheets:   
Accumulated deferred income
taxes – assets $ (106)$ —$ —$ (247)$ (925)$ —
Accumulated deferred income
taxes – liabilities $ 6,842 $ 2,760 $ 3,175 $ — $ 199 $ 1,089
The implementation of the Tax Reform Legislation significantly reduced accumulated deferred income taxes in 2017, partially
offset by bonus depreciation provisions in the PATH Act.
The traditional electric operating companies and natural gas distribution utilities have tax-related regulatory assets (deferred income
tax charges) and regulatory liabilities (deferred income tax credits). The regulatory assets are primarily attributable to tax benefits
flowed through to customers in prior years, deferred taxes previously recognized at rates lower than the current enacted
II-360
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
tax law, and taxes applicable to capitalized interest. The regulatory liabilities are primarily attributable to deferred taxes previously
recognized at rates higher than the current enacted tax law and to unamortized ITCs. See Note 2 for each registrant's related
balances at December 31, 2018 and 2017.
Tax Credit Carryforwards
Federal ITC/PTC carryforwards at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerSouthern
Power
(in millions)
Federal ITC/PTC carryforwards $ 2,410$ 11$ 108$ 2,128
Year in which federal ITC/PTC carryforwards
begin expiring 2032 2033 2032 2034
Year by which federal ITC/PTC carryforwards are
expected to be utilized 2022 2021 2021 2022
The estimated tax credit utilization reflects the 2018 abandonment loss related to certain Kemper County energy facility
expenditures as well as the projected taxable gains on the various sale transactions described in Note 15 and "Legal Entity
Reorganizations" herein. The expected utilization of tax credit carryforwards could be further delayed by numerous factors,
including the acquisition of additional renewable projects, the purchase of rights to additional PTCs of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4
pursuant to the MEAG Funding Agreement or the Global Amendments, and changes in taxable income projections. See Note 2
under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4.
At December 31, 2018, Georgia Power also had approximately $341 million in state investment and other state tax credit
carryforwards for the State of Georgia that will expire between 2020 and 2028 and are not expected to be fully utilized. Georgia
Power has a net state valuation allowance of $33 million associated with these carryforwards.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
II-361
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Net Operating Loss Carryforwards
In the 2018 tax year, Southern Company expects to fully utilize the carryforward from federal NOLs generated in 2016 and 2017.
At December 31, 2018, the state and local NOL carryforwards for Southern Company's subsidiaries were as follows:
Company/JurisdictionApproximate NOL
CarryforwardsApproximate Net State
Income Tax BenefitTax Year NOL
Begins Expiring
(in millions)
Mississippi Power  
Mississippi $ 5,062$ 200 2031
 
Southern Power  
Oklahoma 846 40 2035
Florida 264 11 2033
South Carolina 62 2 2034
Other states 42 3 2029
Southern Power Total $ 1,214$ 56
 
Other(*) 
Georgia 358 16 2019
New York 223 11 2036
New York City 208 15 2036
Other states 278 14 Various
Southern Company Total $ 7,343$ 312
(*)Represents other Southern Company subsidiaries. Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Southern Company Gas did not have state NOL carryforwards at
December 31, 2018.
State NOLs for Mississippi, Oklahoma, and Florida are not expected to be fully utilized prior to expiration. At December 31, 2018,
Mississippi Power had a net state valuation allowance of $32 million for the Mississippi NOL and Southern Power had a net state
valuation allowance of $9 million for the Oklahoma NOL and $11 million for the Florida NOL.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
II-362
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Unrecognized Tax Benefits
Unrecognized tax benefits changes in 2018, 2017, and 2016 for Southern Company, Mississippi Power, and Southern Power are
provided below. The remaining registrants did not have any material unrecognized tax benefits for the periods presented.
Southern
CompanyMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
(in millions)
Unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2015 $ 433$ 421$ 8
Tax positions changes –  
Increase from current periods 45 26 17
Increase from prior periods 21 18 —
Decrease from prior periods (15) — (8)
Unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2016 484 465 17
Tax positions changes –  
Increase from current periods 10 — —
Increase from prior periods 10 2 —
Decrease from prior periods (196) (177) (17)
Reductions due to settlements (290) (290) —
Unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2017 18 — —
Tax positions changes –  
Decrease from prior periods (18) — —
Unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2018 $ —$ —$ —
Mississippi Power's tax positions increase from current and prior periods for 2017 and 2016 relate to state tax benefits, deductions
for R&E expenditures, and charitable contribution carryforwards that were impacted as a result of the settlement of R&E
expenditures associated with the Kemper County energy facility, as well as federal income tax benefits from deferred ITCs.
Mississippi Power's tax positions decrease from prior periods and the reductions due to settlements for 2017 relate primarily to the
settlement of R&E expenditures associated with the Kemper County energy facility. See Note 2 under "Mississippi Power –
Kemper County Energy Facility" and "Section 174 Research and Experimental Deduction" herein for more information.
Southern Power's increase in unrecognized tax benefits from current periods for 2016, and the decrease from prior periods for 2017
and 2016, primarily relate to federal income tax benefits from deferred ITCs.
There were no unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2018. The impact on the effective tax rate of Southern Company,
Mississippi Power, and Southern Power, if recognized, was as follows for 2017 and 2016:
Southern
CompanyMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
(in millions)
2017
Tax positions impacting the effective tax rate $ 18$ —$ —
Tax positions not impacting the effective tax rate — — —
Balance of unrecognized tax benefits $ 18$ —$ —
2016
Tax positions impacting the effective tax rate $ 20$ 1$ 17
Tax positions not impacting the effective tax rate 464 464 —
Balance of unrecognized tax benefits $ 484$ 465$ 17
Mississippi Power's tax positions not impacting the effective tax rate for 2016 relate to deductions for R&E expenditures associated
with the Kemper County energy facility. See "Section 174 Research and Experimental Deduction" herein for more information.
These amounts are presented on a gross basis without considering the related federal or state income tax impact.
II-363
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Power's impact on the effective tax rate was determined based on the amount of ITCs, which were uncertain.
All of the registrants classify interest on tax uncertainties as interest expense. Accrued interest for all tax positions other than the
Section 174 R&E deductions was immaterial for all years presented. None of the registrants accrued any penalties on uncertain tax
positions.
It is reasonably possible that the amount of the unrecognized tax benefits could change within 12 months. New audit findings or
settlements associated with ongoing audits could result in significant unrecognized tax benefits. At this time, a range of reasonably
possible outcomes cannot be determined.
The IRS has finalized its audits of Southern Company's consolidated federal income tax returns through 2017, as well as the pre-
Merger Southern Company Gas tax returns. Southern Company is a participant in the Compliance Assurance Process of the IRS.
The audits for the registrants' state income tax returns have either been concluded, or the statute of limitations has expired, for years
prior to 2012.
Section 174 Research and Experimental Deduction
Southern Company, on behalf of Mississippi Power, has reflected deductions for R&E expenditures related to the Kemper County
energy facility in its federal income tax calculations since 2013 and filed amended federal income tax returns for 2008 through
2013 to also include such deductions. In September 2017, the U.S. Congress Joint Committee on Taxation approved a settlement
between Southern Company and the IRS, resolving a methodology for these deductions. As a result of this approval, Mississippi
Power recognized $176 million in 2017 of previously unrecognized tax benefits and reversed $36 million of associated accrued
interest.
11. RETIREMENT BENEFITS
The Southern Company system has a qualified defined benefit, trusteed, pension plan covering substantially all employees, with the
exception of employees at PowerSecure. The qualified defined benefit pension plan is funded in accordance with requirements of
the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA). No contributions to the qualified pension plan were
made for the year ended December 31, 2018 and no mandatory contributions to the qualified pension plan are anticipated for the
year ending December 31, 2019. The Southern Company system also provides certain non-qualified defined benefits for a select
group of management and highly compensated employees, which are funded on a cash basis. In addition, the Southern Company
system provides certain medical care and life insurance benefits for retired employees through other postretirement benefit plans.
The traditional electric operating companies fund other postretirement trusts to the extent required by their respective regulatory
commissions. Southern Company Gas has a separate unfunded supplemental retirement health care plan that provides medical care
and life insurance benefits to employees of discontinued businesses. For the year ending December 31, 2019, no other
postretirement trust contributions are expected.
On January 1, 2018, the qualified defined benefit pension plan of Southern Company Gas was merged into the Southern Company
system's qualified defined benefit pension plan and the pension plan was reopened to all non-union employees of Southern
Company Gas. Prior to January 1, 2018, Southern Company Gas had a separate qualified defined benefit, trusteed, pension plan
covering certain eligible employees, which was closed in 2012 to new employees. Also on January 1, 2018, Southern Company
Gas' non-qualified retirement plans were merged into the Southern Company system's non-qualified retirement plan (defined
benefit and defined contribution).
Effective in December 2017, 538 employees transferred from SCS to Southern Power. Accordingly, Southern Power assumed
various compensation and benefit plans including participation in the Southern Company system's qualified defined benefit,
trusteed, pension plan covering substantially all employees. With the transfer of employees, Southern Power assumed the related
benefit obligations from SCS of $139 million for the qualified pension plan (along with trust assets of $138 million) and $11
million for other postretirement benefit plans, together with $36 million in prior service costs and net gains/losses in OCI. In 2018,
Southern Power also began providing certain defined benefits under the non-qualified pension plan for a select group of
management and highly compensated employees. No obligation related to these benefits was assumed in the employee transfer;
however, obligations for services rendered by employees following the transfer are being recognized by Southern Power and are
funded on a cash basis. In addition, Southern Power provides certain medical care and life insurance benefits for retired employees
through other postretirement benefit plans that are funded on a cash basis. Prior to the transfer of employees in December 2017,
substantially all expenses charged by SCS, including pension and other postretirement benefit costs, were recorded in Southern
Power's other operations and maintenance expense. The disclosures included herein exclude Southern Power for periods prior to the
transfer of employees in December 2017.
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy. See Note 15 under "Southern
Company's Sale of Gulf Power" for additional information. The portion of the Southern Company system's pension and other
II-364
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
postretirement benefit plans attributable to Gulf Power that is reflected in Southern Company's consolidated balance sheet as held
for sale at December 31, 2018 consists of:
Pension
PlansOther Postretirement
Benefit Plans
(in millions)
Projected benefit obligation $ 526$ 69
Plan assets 492 17
Accrued liability $ (34)$ (52)
All amounts presented in the remainder of this note reflect the benefit plan obligations and related plan assets for the Southern
Company system's pension and other postretirement benefit plans, including the amounts attributable to Gulf Power.
Actuarial Assumptions
The weighted average rates assumed in the actuarial calculations used to determine both the net periodic costs for the pension and
other postretirement benefit plans for the following year and the benefit obligations as of the measurement date are presented
below.
 2018
Assumptions used to determine net
periodic costs:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
Pension plans   
Discount rate – benefit obligations 3.80% 3.81% 3.79% 3.80% 3.94%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.45 3.45 3.42 3.46 3.69
Discount rate – service costs 3.98 4.00 3.99 3.99 4.01
Expected long-term return on plan assets 7.95 7.95 7.95 7.95 7.95
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46
Other postretirement benefit plans   
Discount rate – benefit obligations 3.68% 3.71% 3.68% 3.68% 3.81%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.29 3.31 3.29 3.29 3.47
Discount rate – service costs 3.91 3.93 3.91 3.91 3.93
Expected long-term return on plan assets 6.83 6.83 6.80 6.99 —
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46
II-365
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2017
Assumptions used to determine net
periodic costs:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power
Pension plans   
Discount rate – benefit obligations 4.40% 4.44% 4.40% 4.44%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.77 3.76 3.72 3.81
Discount rate – service costs 4.81 4.85 4.83 4.83
Expected long-term return on plan assets 7.92 7.95 7.95 7.95
Annual salary increase 4.37 4.46 4.46 4.46
Other postretirement benefit plans   
Discount rate – benefit obligations 4.23% 4.27% 4.23% 4.22%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.54 3.58 3.55 3.55
Discount rate – service costs 4.64 4.70 4.63 4.65
Expected long-term return on plan assets 6.84 6.83 6.79 6.88
Annual salary increase 4.37 4.46 4.46 4.46
 2016
Assumptions used to determine net periodic costs:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power
Pension plans   
Discount rate – benefit obligations 4.58% 4.67% 4.65% 4.69%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.88 3.90 3.86 3.97
Discount rate – service costs 4.98 5.07 5.03 5.04
Expected long-term return on plan assets 8.16 8.20 8.20 8.20
Annual salary increase 4.37 4.46 4.46 4.46
Other postretirement benefit plans   
Discount rate – benefit obligations 4.38% 4.51% 4.49% 4.47%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.66 3.69 3.67 3.66
Discount rate – service costs 4.85 4.96 4.88 4.88
Expected long-term return on plan assets 6.66 6.83 6.27 7.07
Annual salary increase 4.37 4.46 4.46 4.46
II-366
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Southern Company Gas
 Successor  Predecessor
Assumptions used to determine net periodic
costs:Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016 January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
Pension plans    
Discount rate – benefit obligations 3.74% 4.39% 3.85%  4.60%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.41 3.76 3.21  4.00
Discount rate – service costs 3.84 4.64 4.07  4.80
Expected long-term return on plan assets 7.95 7.60 7.75  7.80
Annual salary increase 3.07 3.50 3.50  3.70
Pension band increase(*)N/A N/A 2.00  2.00
Other postretirement benefit plans    
Discount rate - benefit obligations 3.62% 4.15% 3.61%  4.40%
Discount rate – interest costs 3.21 3.40 2.84  3.60
Discount rate – service costs 3.82 4.55 3.96  4.70
Expected long-term return on plan assets 5.89 6.03 5.93  6.60
Annual salary increase 3.07 3.50 3.50  3.70
(*)Only applicable to Nicor Gas union employees. The pension bands for the former Nicor Gas plan reflect the negotiated rates in accordance with the union
agreements.
 2018
Assumptions used to determine
benefit obligations:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Pension plans      
Discount rate 4.49% 4.51% 4.48% 4.49% 4.65% 4.47%
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.07
Other postretirement benefit plans     
Discount rate 4.37% 4.40% 4.36% 4.35% 4.50% 4.32%
Annual salary increase 4.34 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 3.07
 2017
Assumptions used to determine benefit
obligations:Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
Pension plans    
Discount rate 3.80% 3.81% 3.79% 3.80% 3.94% 3.74%
Annual salary increase 4.32 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 2.88
Other postretirement benefit plans    
Discount rate 3.68% 3.71% 3.68% 3.68% 3.81% 3.62%
Annual salary increase 4.32 4.46 4.46 4.46 4.46 2.56
The registrants estimate the expected rate of return on pension plan and other postretirement benefit plan assets using a financial
model to project the expected return on each current investment portfolio. The analysis projects an expected rate of return on each
of the different asset classes in order to arrive at the expected return on the entire portfolio relying on each trust's target asset
allocation and reasonable capital market assumptions. The financial model is based on four key inputs: anticipated returns by asset
class (based in part on historical returns), each trust's target asset allocation, an anticipated inflation rate, and the projected impact
of a periodic rebalancing of each trust's portfolio.
II-367
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
An additional assumption used in measuring the accumulated other postretirement benefit obligations (APBO) was a weighted
average medical care cost trend rate. The weighted average medical care cost trend rates used in measuring the APBO for the
registrants at December 31, 2018 were as follows:
 Initial Cost
Trend RateUltimate Cost
Trend Rate  Year That
Ultimate Rate is
Reached
Pre-65 6.50% 4.50% 2028
Post-65 medical 5.00 4.50 2028
Post-65 prescription 8.00 4.50 2028
Pension Plans
The total accumulated benefit obligation for the pension plans at December 31, 2018 and 2017 was as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018 $ 11,683$ 2,550$ 3,613$ 513$ 101$ 842
December 31, 2017 12,577 2,696 3,847 541 111 1,139
The actuarial gain of $1.1 billion recorded in the remeasurement of the Southern Company system pension plans at December 31,
2018 was primarily due to a 69 basis point increase in the overall discount rate used to calculate the benefit obligation as a result of
higher market interest rates. The actuarial loss of $1.3 billion recorded in the remeasurement of the Southern Company system
pension plans at December 31, 2017 was primarily due to a 60 basis point decrease in the overall discount rate used to calculate the
benefit obligation as a result of lower market interest rates.
Changes in the projected benefit obligations and the fair value of plan assets during the plan years ended December 31, 2018 and
2017 were as follows:
 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Change in benefit obligation     
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 13,808$ 2,998$ 4,188$ 602$ 139$ 1,184
Dispositions (107) — — — (3) (104)
Service cost 359 78 87 17 9 34
Interest cost 464 101 139 20 5 39
Benefits paid (618) (124) (191) (24) (3) (98)
Actuarial (gain) loss (1,143) (237) (318) (58) (24) (148)
Balance at end of year 12,763 2,816 3,905 557 123 907
Change in plan assets     
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of
year 12,992 2,836 4,058 563 138 1,068
Dispositions (107) — — — (3) (104)
Actual return (loss) on plan assets (711) (150) (218) (37) (9) (70)
Employer contributions 55 13 14 3 — 2
Benefits paid (618) (124) (191) (24) (3) (98)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 11,611 2,575 3,663 505 123 798
Accrued liability $ (1,152)$ (241)$ (242)$ (52)$ —$ (109)
II-368
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2017
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Change in benefit obligation     
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 12,385$ 2,663$ 3,800$ 534$ —$ 1,133
Service cost 293 63 74 15 — 23
Interest cost 455 98 138 20 — 42
Benefits paid (596) (120) (187) (22) — (91)
Plan amendments (26) — — — — (26)
Actuarial (gain) loss 1,297 294 363 55 — 103
Obligations assumed from employee
transfer — — — — 139 —
Balance at end of year 13,808 2,998 4,188 602 139 1,184
Change in plan assets     
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of
year 11,583 2,517 3,621 499 — 983
Actual return (loss) on plan assets 1,953 427 610 84 — 175
Employer contributions 52 12 14 2 — 1
Benefits paid (596) (120) (187) (22) — (91)
Assets assumed from employee transfer — — — — 138 —
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 12,992 2,836 4,058 563 138 1,068
Accrued liability $ (816)$ (162)$ (130)$ (39)$ (1)$ (116)
The projected benefit obligations for the qualified and non-qualified pension plans at December 31, 2018 are shown in the
following table. All pension plan assets are related to the qualified pension plan.
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Projected benefit obligations:  
Qualified pension plan $ 12,135$ 2,692$ 3,757$ 527$ 122$ 866
Non-qualified pension plan 629 124 148 30 1 41
II-369
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Amounts recognized in the balance sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 related to the registrants' pension plans consist of the
following:
 Southern
  Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018:    
Prepaid pension costs $ —$ —$ —$ — $ 1$ —
Other regulatory assets, deferred 3,566 955 1,230 167 — 160
Other deferred charges and assets — — — — — 74
Other current liabilities (55) (12) (15) (3) — (3)
Employee benefit obligations (1,097) (229) (227) (49) (1) (179)
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred (108) — — — — —
AOCI 97 — — — 26 (44)
December 31, 2017:    
Prepaid pension costs $ —$ —$ 23$ — $ —$ —
Other regulatory assets, deferred 3,273 890 1,105 158 — 217
Other deferred charges and assets — — — — — 85
Other current liabilities (53) (12) (15) (3) — (3)
Employee benefit obligations (763) (150) (138) (36) (1) (198)
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred (118) — — — — —
AOCI 107 — — — 33 (42)
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $268 million associated with unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' pension plans prior
to its acquisition by Southern Company on July 1, 2016.
Presented below are the amounts included in regulatory assets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 related to the portion of the defined
benefit pension plan attributable to Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Company Gas
that had not yet been recognized in net periodic pension cost.
 Southern
Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2018    
Regulatory assets:    
Prior service cost $ 17$ 6$ 12$ 2$ (17)
Net (gain) loss 3,441 949 1,218 165 83
Regulatory amortization(*)— — — — 94
Total regulatory assets (liabilities) $ 3,458$ 955$ 1,230$ 167$ 160
Balance at December 31, 2017    
Regulatory assets:    
Prior service cost $ 14$ 8$ 14$ 3$ (20)
Net (gain) loss 3,140 882 1,091 155 197
Regulatory amortization(*)— — — — 40
Total regulatory assets $ 3,154$ 890$ 1,105$ 158$ 217
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $268 million associated with unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' pension plans prior
to its acquisition by Southern Company on July 1, 2016.
II-370
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The changes in the balance of regulatory assets related to the portion of the defined benefit pension plan attributable to Southern
Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Company Gas for the years ended December 31, 2018 and
2017 are presented in the following table:
 Southern
Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Regulatory assets (liabilities):     
Balance at December 31, 2016 $ 3,120$ 870$ 1,129$ 154$ 267
Net (gain) loss 227 64 36 12 (31)
Change in prior service costs (26) — — — —
Reclassification adjustments:     
Amortization of prior service costs (11) (2) (3) (1) —
Amortization of net gain (loss) (155) (42) (57) (7) (18)
Amortization of regulatory assets(*)— — — — (1)
Total reclassification adjustments (166) (44) (60) (8) (19)
Total change 35 20 (24) 4 (50)
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 3,155$ 890$ 1,105$ 158$ 217
Net (gain) loss 498 120 196 19 20
Change in prior service costs 1 — — — (18)
Dispositions 12 — — — (34)
Reclassification adjustments:     
Amortization of prior service costs (4) (1) (2) — 2
Amortization of net gain (loss) (204) (54) (69) (10) (12)
Amortization of regulatory assets — — — — (15)
Total reclassification adjustments (208) (55) (71) (10) (25)
Total change 303 65 125 9 (57)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 3,458$ 955$ 1,230$ 167$ 160
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $268 million associated with unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' pension plans prior
to its acquisition by Southern Company on July 1, 2016.
II-371
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Presented below are the amounts included in AOCI at December 31, 2018 and 2017 related to the portion of the defined benefit
pension plan attributable to Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas that had not yet been recognized in
net periodic pension cost.
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2018  
AOCI:  
Prior service cost $ (3)$ —$ (6)
Net (gain) loss 100 26 (38)
Total AOCI $ 97$ 26$ (44)
Balance at December 31, 2017  
AOCI:  
Prior service cost $ 3$ 1$ —
Net (gain) loss 104 32 (42)
Total AOCI $ 107$ 33$ (42)
The components of OCI related to the portion of the defined benefit pension plan attributable to Southern Company, Southern
Power, and Southern Company Gas for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 are presented in the following table:
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
AOCI:
Balance at December 31, 2016 $ 100$ —$ (43)
Net (gain) loss 15 — 1
Change from employee transfer — 33 —
Reclassification adjustments:
Amortization of prior service costs (1) — —
Amortization of net gain (loss) (7) — —
Total reclassification adjustments (8) — —
Total change 7 33 1
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 107$ 33$ (42)
Net (gain) loss 7 (5) 6
Dispositions (8) — (8)
Reclassification adjustments:
Amortization of net gain (loss) (9) (2) —
Total reclassification adjustments (9) (2) —
Total change (10) (7) (2)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 97$ 26$ (44)
II-372
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Components of net periodic pension cost for Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Power
were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
2018:    
Service cost $ 359$ 78$ 87$ 17$ 9
Interest cost 464 101 139 20 5
Expected return on plan assets (943) (207) (296) (41) (10)
Recognized net (gain) loss 213 54 69 10 1
Net amortization 4 1 2 — —
Net periodic pension cost $ 97$ 27$ 1$ 6$ 5
2017:    
Service cost $ 293$ 63$ 74$ 15 
Interest cost 455 98 138 20 
Expected return on plan assets (897) (196) (283) (40) 
Recognized net (gain) loss 162 42 57 7 
Net amortization 12 2 3 1 
Net periodic pension cost $ 25$ 9$ (11)$ 3 
2016:    
Service cost $ 262$ 57$ 70$ 13 
Interest cost 422 95 136 19 
Expected return on plan assets (782) (184) (258) (35) 
Recognized net (gain) loss 150 40 55 7 
Net amortization 14 3 5 1 
Net periodic pension cost $ 66$ 11$ 8$ 5 
Components of net periodic pension cost for Southern Company Gas were as follows:
 Southern Company Gas
 Successor Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
 (in millions) (in millions)
Service cost $ 34$ 23$ 15 $ 13
Interest cost 39 42 20 21
Expected return on plan assets (75) (70) (35) (33)
Recognized net (gain) loss 12 18 14 13
Net amortization of regulatory asset 15 1 — —
Prior service cost (2) — (1) (1)
Net periodic pension cost $ 23$ 14$ 13 $ 13
Net periodic pension cost is the sum of service cost, interest cost, and other costs netted against the expected return on plan assets.
The expected return on plan assets is determined by multiplying the expected rate of return on plan assets and the market-related
value of plan assets. In determining the market-related value of plan assets, the registrants have elected to amortize changes in the
II-373
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
market value of all plan assets over five years rather than recognize the changes immediately. As a result, the accounting value of
plan assets that is used to calculate the expected return on plan assets differs from the current fair value of the plan assets.
Future benefit payments reflect expected future service and are estimated based on assumptions used to measure the projected
benefit obligation for the pension plans. At December 31, 2018, estimated benefit payments were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Benefit Payments:      
2019 $ 623$ 132$ 201$ 28$ 3$ 59
2020 645 136 206 28 3 61
2021 664 141 209 29 4 62
2022 687 147 215 29 4 62
2023 711 152 221 30 5 62
2024 to 2028 3,869 832 1,183 166 27 313
Other Postretirement Benefits
Changes in the APBO and the fair value of the registrants' plan assets during the plan years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017
were as follows:
 2018
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Change in benefit obligation    
Benefit obligation at beginning of year$ 2,339$ 517$ 863$ 97$ 11$ 310
Dispositions (18) — — — — (18)
Service cost 24 6 6 1 1 2
Interest cost 75 17 28 3 — 10
Benefits paid (129) (28) (47) (5) (1) (17)
Actuarial (gain) loss (432) (111) (178) (15) (2) (43)
Retiree drug subsidy 6 2 3 — — —
Balance at end of year 1,865 403 675 81 9 244
Change in plan assets    
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of
year 1,053 406 386 25 — 125
Dispositions (18) — — — — (18)
Actual return (loss) on plan assets (57) (25) (20) (1) — (5)
Employer contributions 73 5 22 4 1 13
Benefits paid (123) (26) (44) (5) (1) (17)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 928 360 344 23 — 98
Accrued liability $ (937)$ (43)$ (331)$ (58)$ (9)$ (146)
II-374
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2017
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Change in benefit obligation  
Benefit obligation at beginning of year$ 2,297$ 501$ 847$ 97$ —$ 308
Service cost 24 6 7 1 — 2
Interest cost 79 17 29 3 — 10
Benefits paid (136) (29) (51) (6) — (19)
Actuarial (gain) loss 65 20 28 1 — 3
Plan amendments 3 — — — — 3
Retiree drug subsidy 7 2 3 1 — —
Obligations assumed from employee
transfer — — — — 11 —
Employee contributions — — — — — 3
Balance at end of year 2,339 517 863 97 11 310
Change in plan assets  
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of
year 944 367 354 23 — 105
Actual return (loss) on plan assets 154 60 54 3 — 20
Employer contributions 84 6 26 4 — 17
Employee contributions — — — — — 3
Benefits paid (129) (27) (48) (5) — (20)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 1,053 406 386 25 — 125
Accrued liability $ (1,286)$ (111)$ (477)$ (72)$ (11)$ (185)
Amounts recognized in the balance sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 related to the registrants' other postretirement benefit
plans consist of the following:
 Southern
Company(a)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
  PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
December 31, 2018:     
Other regulatory assets,
deferred(a)$ 99$ —$ 60$ 6$ —$ (4)
Other current liabilities (6) — — — — —
Employee benefit obligations(b)(931) (43) (331) (58) (9) 146
Other regulatory liabilities,
deferred (77) (8) — (2) — —
AOCI (4) — — — 1 (4)
December 31, 2017:     
Other regulatory assets,
deferred(a)$ 382$ 63$ 202$ 18$ —$ 46
Other current liabilities (5) — — — — —
Employee benefit obligations(b)(1,281) (111) (477) (72) (11) (185)
Other regulatory liabilities,
deferred (41) (7) — (1) — —
AOCI 4 — — — 3 (3)
(a)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $57 million associated with unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' other postretirement
benefit plans prior to its acquisition by Southern Company on July 1, 2016.
(b)Included in other deferred credits and liabilities on Southern Power's consolidated balance sheets.
II-375
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Presented below are the amounts included in net regulatory assets (liabilities) at December 31, 2018 and 2017 related to the other
postretirement benefit plans of Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, and Southern Company Gas that
had not yet been recognized in net periodic other postretirement benefit cost.
 Southern
Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2018
Regulatory assets:
Prior service cost $ 14$ 8$ 4$ —$ 2
Net (gain) loss 8 (16) 56 4 (43)
Regulatory amortization(*)— — — — 37
Total regulatory assets (liabilities) $ 22$ (8)$ 60$ 4$ (4)
Balance at December 31, 2017
Regulatory assets:
Prior service cost $ 21$ 11$ 5$ —$ (7)
Net (gain) loss 320 45 197 17 47
Regulatory amortization(*)— — — — 6
Total regulatory assets $ 341$ 56$ 202$ 17$ 46
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $57 million associated with unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' other postretirement
benefit plans prior to its acquisition by Southern Company on July 1, 2016.
II-376
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The changes in the balance of net regulatory assets (liabilities) related to the other postretirement benefit plans for the plan years
ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 are presented in the following table:
 Southern
Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Net regulatory assets (liabilities):    
Balance at December 31, 2016 $ 378$ 76$ 213$ 19$ 52
Net (gain) loss (21) (15) (2) (1) (5)
Change in prior service costs 3 — — — —
Reclassification adjustments:    
Amortization of prior service costs (6) (4) (1) — 3
Amortization of net gain (loss) (13) (1) (8) (1) (4)
Total reclassification adjustments (19) (5) (9) (1) (1)
Total change (37) (20) (11) (2) (6)
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 341$ 56$ 202$ 17$ 46
Net (gain) loss (298) (60) (132) (12) (42)
Change in prior service costs — — — — (2)
Reclassification adjustments:    
Amortization of prior service costs (7) (4) (1) — —
Amortization of net gain (loss) (14) (1) (9) (1) —
Amortization of regulatory assets — — — — (6)
Total reclassification adjustments (21) (5) (10) (1) (6)
Total change (319) (65) (142) (13) (50)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 22$ (9)$ 60$ 4$ (4)
(*)Amounts for Southern Company exclude regulatory assets of $57 million associated with unamortized amounts in Southern Company Gas' other postretirement
benefit plans prior to its acquisition by Southern Company on July 1, 2016.
Presented below are the amounts included in AOCI at December 31, 2018 and 2017 related to the other postretirement benefit plans
of Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas that had not yet been recognized in net periodic other
postretirement benefit cost.
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2018
AOCI:
Prior service cost $ 1$ —$ 1
Net (gain) loss (5) 1 (5)
Total AOCI $ (4)$ 1$ (4)
Balance at December 31, 2017
AOCI:
Prior service cost $ —$ —$ —
Net (gain) loss 4 3 (3)
Total AOCI $ 4$ 3$ (3)
II-377
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The components of OCI related to the other postretirement benefit plans for the plan years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 are
presented in the following table:
 Southern
CompanySouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
AOCI:
Balance at December 31, 2016 $ 7$ —$ (3)
Net (gain) loss (3) — (1)
Change from employee transfer — 3 1
Total change (3) 3 —
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 4$ 3$ (3)
Net (gain) loss (8) (2) (2)
Amortization of prior service costs — — 1
Total change (8) (2) (1)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ (4)$ 1$ (4)
Components of the other postretirement benefit plans' net periodic cost for Southern Company, the traditional electric operating
companies, and Southern Power were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
2018:     
Service cost $ 24$ 6$ 6$ 1$ 1
Interest cost 75 17 28 3 —
Expected return on plan assets (69) (26) (25) (2) —
Net amortization 21 5 10 1 —
Net periodic postretirement benefit cost $ 51$ 2$ 19$ 3$ 1
2017:     
Service cost $ 24$ 6$ 7$ 1 
Interest cost 79 17 29 3 
Expected return on plan assets (66) (25) (25) (1) 
Net amortization 20 5 9 1 
Net periodic postretirement benefit cost $ 57$ 3$ 20$ 4 
2016:     
Service cost $ 22$ 5$ 6$ 1 
Interest cost 76 18 30 3 
Expected return on plan assets (60) (25) (22) (1) 
Net amortization 21 6 10 1 
Net periodic postretirement benefit cost $ 59$ 4$ 24$ 4 
II-378
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Components of the other postretirement benefit plans' net periodic cost for Southern Company Gas were as follows:
 Successor  Predecessor
 Year Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016 January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Service cost $ 2$ 2$ 1  $ 1
Interest cost 10 10 5  5
Expected return on plan assets (7) (7) (3) (3)
Amortization:  
Regulatory assets 6 — 2  —
Prior service costs — (3) —  (1)
Net (gain)/loss — 4 —  2
Net periodic postretirement benefit cost $ 11$ 6$ 5  $ 4
The registrants' future benefit payments, including prescription drug benefits, reflect expected future service and are estimated
based on assumptions used to measure the APBO for the other postretirement benefit plans. The registrants' estimated benefit
payments are reduced by drug subsidy receipts expected as a result of the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and
Modernization Act of 2003 as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Benefit payments:  
2019 $ 136$ 28$ 51$ 6$ —$ 18
2020 136 28 50 6 — 18
2021 136 29 50 6 — 19
2022 137 29 50 6 1 19
2023 137 29 49 7 1 19
2024 to 2028 669 146 243 30 3 90
Subsidy receipts:  
2019 $ (7)$ (2)$ (3)$ — $ —$ —
2020 (7) (2) (3) — — —
2021 (8) (2) (3) — — —
2022 (8) (2) (3) (1) — —
2023 (8) (3) (4) (1) — —
2024 to 2028 (41) (13) (18) (2) — —
Total:  
2019 $ 129$ 26$ 48$ 6$ —$ 18
2020 129 26 47 6 — 18
2021 128 27 47 6 — 19
2022 129 27 47 5 1 19
2023 129 26 45 6 1 19
2024 to 2028 628 133 225 28 3 90
II-379
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Benefit Plan Assets
Pension plan and other postretirement benefit plan assets are managed and invested in accordance with all applicable requirements,
including ERISA and the Internal Revenue Code. The registrants' investment policies for both the pension plans and the other
postretirement benefit plans cover a diversified mix of assets as described below. Derivative instruments may be used to gain
efficient exposure to the various asset classes and as hedging tools. Additionally, the registrants minimize the risk of large losses
primarily through diversification but also monitor and manage other aspects of risk.
The investment strategy for plan assets related to the Southern Company system's qualified pension plan is to be broadly diversified
across major asset classes. The asset allocation is established after consideration of various factors that affect the assets and
liabilities of the pension plan including, but not limited to, historical and expected returns and interest rates, volatility, correlations
of asset classes, the current level of assets and liabilities, and the assumed growth in assets and liabilities. Because a significant
portion of the liability of the pension plans is long-term in nature, the assets are invested consistent with long-term investment
expectations for return and risk. To manage the actual asset class exposures relative to the target asset allocation, the Southern
Company system employs a formal rebalancing program. As additional risk management, external investment managers and
service providers are subject to written guidelines to ensure appropriate and prudent investment practices. Management believes the
portfolio is well-diversified with no significant concentrations of risk.
Investment Strategies and Benefit Plan Asset Fair Values
A description of the major asset classes that the pension and other postretirement benefit plans are comprised of, along with the
valuation methods used for fair value measurement, is provided below:
Description Valuation Methodology
Domestic equity: A mix of large and small capitalization stocks
with generally an equal distribution of value and growth
attributes, managed both actively and through passive index
approaches.
International equity: A mix of growth stocks and value stocks
with both developed and emerging market exposure, managed
both actively and through passive index approaches.Domestic and international equities such as common stocks,
American depositary receipts, and real estate investment trusts
that trade on public exchanges are classified as Level 1
investments and are valued at the closing price in the active
market. Equity funds with unpublished prices are valued as
Level 2 when the underlying holdings are comprised of Level 1
or Level 2 equity securities.
Fixed income: A mix of domestic and international bonds.Investments in fixed income securities are generally classified as
Level 2 investments and are valued based on prices reported in
the market place. Additionally, the value of fixed income
securities takes into consideration certain items such as broker
quotes, spreads, yield curves, interest rates, and discount rates
that apply to the term of a specific instrument.
Trust-owned life insurance (TOLI): Investments of taxable
trusts aimed at minimizing the impact of taxes on the portfolio.Investments in TOLI policies are classified as Level 2
investments and are valued based on the underlying investments
held in the policy's separate accounts. The underlying assets are
equity and fixed income pooled funds that are comprised of
Level 1 and Level 2 securities.
Special situations: Investments in opportunistic strategies with
the objective of diversifying and enhancing returns and
exploiting short-term inefficiencies, as well as investments in
promising new strategies of a longer-term nature.
Real estate: Investments in traditional private market, equity-
oriented investments in real properties (indirectly through
pooled funds or partnerships) and in publicly traded real estate
securities.
Private equity: Investments in private partnerships that invest
in private or public securities typically through privately-
negotiated and/or structured transactions, including leveraged
buyouts, venture capital, and distressed debt.Investments in real estate, private equity, and special situations
are generally classified as Net Asset Value as a Practical
Expedient, since the underlying assets typically do not have
publicly available observable inputs. The fund manager values
the assets using various inputs and techniques depending on the
nature of the underlying investments. Techniques may include
purchase multiples for comparable transactions, comparable
public company trading multiples, discounted cash flow
analysis, prevailing market capitalization rates, recent sales of
comparable investments, and independent third-party appraisals.
The fair value of partnerships is determined by aggregating the
value of the underlying assets less liabilities.
II-380
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The fair values, and actual allocations relative to the target allocations, of the Southern Company system's pension plans at
December 31, 2018 and 2017 are presented below. The fair values presented are prepared in accordance with GAAP. For purposes
of determining the fair value of the pension plan and other postretirement benefit plan assets and the appropriate level designation,
management relies on information provided by the plan's trustee. This information is reviewed and evaluated by management with
changes made to the trustee information as appropriate. The registrants did not have any investments classified as Level 3 at
December 31, 2018 or 2017.
These fair values exclude cash, receivables related to investment income and pending investment sales, and payables related to
pending investment purchases.
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient Target
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company     
Assets:     
Domestic equity(*)$ 2,102$ 1,030$ —$3,132 26% 28%
International equity(*)1,344 1,325 — 2,669 25 25
Fixed income:     23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 930 — 930
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 7 — 7
Corporate bonds — 1,195 — 1,195
Pooled funds — 654 — 654
Cash equivalents and other 270 2 — 272
Real estate investments 419 — 1,361 1,780 14 15
Special situations — — 171 171 3 1
Private equity — — 821 821 9 7
Total $ 4,135$ 5,143$ 2,353$11,631 100% 100%
Alabama Power     
Assets:     
Domestic equity(*)$ 466$ 228$ —$ 694 26% 28%
International equity(*)298 293 — 591 25 25
Fixed income:     23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 206 — 206
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 2 — 2
Corporate bonds — 265 — 265
Pooled funds — 145 — 145
Cash equivalents and other 60 1 — 61
Real estate investments 93 — 302 395 14 15
Special situations — — 38 38 3 1
Private equity — — 182 182 9 7
Total $ 917$ 1,140$ 522$2,579 100% 100%
II-381
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Georgia Power    
Assets:    
Domestic equity(*)$ 663$ 325$ —$ 988 26% 28%
International equity(*)424 418 — 842 25 25
Fixed income:    23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 294 — 294
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 2 — 2
Corporate bonds — 377 — 377
Pooled funds — 206 — 206
Cash equivalents and other 85 1 — 86
Real estate investments 132 — 429 561 14 15
Special situations — — 54 54 3 1
Private equity — — 259 259 9 7
Total $ 1,304$ 1,623$ 742$3,669 100% 100%
Mississippi Power    
Assets:    
Domestic equity(*)$ 91$ 45$ —$ 136 26% 28%
International equity(*)59 59 — 118 25 25
Fixed income:    23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 40 — 40
Corporate bonds — 52 — 52
Pooled funds — 28 — 28
Cash equivalents and other 12 — — 12
Real estate investments 18 — 59 77 14 15
Special situations — — 7 7 3 1
Private equity — — 36 36 9 7
Total $ 180$ 224$ 102$ 506 100% 100%
II-382
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient Target
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Southern Power  
Assets:  
Domestic equity(*)$ 22$ 11$ —$ 33 26% 28%
International equity(*)14 14 — 28 25 25
Fixed income:  23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 10 — 10
Corporate bonds — 13 — 13
Pooled funds — 7 — 7
Cash equivalents and other 3 — — 3
Real estate investments 4 — 15 19 14 15
Special situations — — 2 2 3 1
Private equity — — 9 9 9 7
Total $ 43$ 55$ 26$ 124 100% 100%
Southern Company Gas  
Assets:  
Domestic equity(*)$ 145$ 71$ —$ 216 26% 28%
International equity(*)92 91 — 183 25 25
Fixed income:  23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 64 — 64
Corporate bonds — 82 — 82
Pooled funds — 45 — 45
Cash equivalents and other 19 — — 19
Real estate investments 29 — 94 123 14 15
Special situations — — 12 12 3 1
Private equity — — 56 56 9 7
Total $ 285$ 353$ 162$ 800 100% 100%
(*)Level 1 securities consist of actively traded stocks while Level 2 securities consist of pooled funds.
II-383
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using   
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient Target
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)  
Southern Company(a)   
Assets:    
Domestic equity(b)$ 2,559$ 1,482$ —$4,041 26% 31%
International equity(b)1,555 1,569 — 3,124 25 25
Fixed income:   23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 926 — 926
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 8 — 8
Corporate bonds — 1,241 — 1,241
Pooled funds — 650 — 650
Cash equivalents and other 301 36 48 385
Real estate investments 472 — 1,204 1,676 14 13
Special situations — — 180 180 3 1
Private equity — — 670 670 9 6
Total $ 4,887$ 5,912$ 2,102$12,901 100% 100%
Alabama Power    
Assets:    
Domestic equity(b)$ 572$ 276$ —$ 848 26% 31%
International equity(b)370 333 — 703 25 25
Fixed income:   23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 200 — 200  
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 2 — 2  
Corporate bonds — 286 — 286  
Pooled funds — 155 — 155  
Cash equivalents and other 51 3 — 54  
Real estate investments 111 — 283 394 14 13
Special situations — — 43 43 3 1
Private equity — — 159 159 9 6
Total $ 1,104$ 1,255$ 485$2,844 100% 100%
II-384
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)  
Georgia Power   
Assets:   
Domestic equity(b)$ 819$ 394$ —$1,213 26% 31%
International equity(b)529 477 — 1,006 25 25
Fixed income:  23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 286 — 286  
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities — 3 — 3  
Corporate bonds — 409 — 409  
Pooled funds — 221 — 221  
Cash equivalents and other 74 4 — 78  
Real estate investments 160 — 404 564 14 13
Special situations — — 61 61 3 1
Private equity — — 228 228 9 6
Total $ 1,582$ 1,794$ 693$4,069 100% 100%
Mississippi Power   
Assets:   
Domestic equity(b)$ 113$ 55$ —$ 168 26% 31%
International equity(b)73 66 — 139 25 25
Fixed income:  23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 40 — 40  
Corporate bonds — 56 — 56  
Pooled funds — 31 — 31  
Cash equivalents and other 10 1 — 11  
Real estate investments 22 — 56 78 14 13
Special situations — — 9 9 3 1
Private equity — — 32 32 9 6
Total $ 218$ 249$ 97$ 564 100% 100%
II-385
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)  
Southern Power   
Assets:   
Domestic equity(b)$ 28$ 13$ —$ 41 26% 31%
International equity(b)18 16 — 34 25 25
Fixed income:  23 24
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 10 — 10 
Corporate bonds — 14 — 14 
Pooled funds — 8 — 8 
Cash equivalents and other 2 — — 2 
Real estate investments 5 — 14 19 14 13
Special situations — — 2 2 3 1
Private equity — — 8 8 9 6
Total $ 53$ 61$ 24$ 138 100% 100%
(a)Target and actual allocations reflect the asset allocations for only the Southern Company system pension plan prior to its merger with the Southern Company
Gas pension plan on January 1, 2018.
(b)Level 1 securities consist of actively traded stocks while Level 2 securities consist of pooled funds.
II-386
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The fair values of Southern Company Gas' pension plan assets for the period ended December 31, 2017 are presented below. The
fair value measurements exclude cash, receivables related to investment income, pending investment sales, and payables related to
pending investment purchases. Special situations (absolute return and hedge funds) investment assets are presented in the tables
below based on the nature of the investment.
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices in
Active Markets
for Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient
At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company Gas  
Assets:  
Domestic equity(*)$ 155$ 323$ —$ 478
International equity(*)— 166 — 166
Fixed income:
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency bonds — 85 — 85
Corporate bonds — 39 — 39
Cash equivalents and other 84 25 48 157
Real estate investments 3 — 16 19
Private equity — — 1 1
Total $ 242$ 638$ 65$ 945
(*)Level 1 securities consist of actively traded stocks while Level 2 securities consist of pooled funds.
The composition of Southern Company Gas' pension plan assets at December 31, 2017, along with the targets, is presented below:
  Target 2017
Pension plan assets:   
Equity  53% 65%
Fixed Income  15 19
Cash  2 6
Other  30 10
Balance at end of period  100% 100%
II-387
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The fair values of the applicable registrants' other postretirement benefit plan assets at December 31, 2018 and 2017 are presented
below. The registrants did not have any investments classified as Level 3 at December 31, 2018 or 2017. These fair value
measurements exclude cash, receivables related to investment income, pending investment sales, and payables related to pending
investment purchases.
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient
TotalTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV)
 (in millions)
Southern Company  
Assets:  
Domestic equity(*)$ 100$ 76$ —$ 176 39% 40%
International equity(*)45 75 — 120 23 22
Fixed income:  29 30
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 34 — 34
Corporate bonds — 35 — 35
Pooled funds — 81 — 81
Cash equivalents and other 13 — — 13
Trust-owned life insurance — 386 — 386
Real estate investments 13 — 40 53 5 5
Special situations — — 4 4 1 —
Private equity — — 24 24 3 3
Total $ 171$ 687$ 68$ 926 100% 100%
Alabama Power  
Assets:  
Domestic equity(*)$ 35$ 10$ —$ 45 43% 45%
International equity(*)12 12 — 24 21 21
Fixed income:  28 28
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 10 — 10
Corporate bonds — 11 — 11
Pooled funds — 6 — 6
Cash equivalents and other 3 — — 3
Trust-owned life insurance — 233 — 233
Real estate investments 4 — 13 17 4 4
Special situations — — 2 2 1 —
Private equity — — 8 8 3 2
Total $ 54$ 282$ 23$ 359 100% 100%
II-388
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient
TotalTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV)
 (in millions)
Georgia Power
Assets:
Domestic equity(*)$ 41$ 9$ —$ 50 36% 35%
International equity(*)17 32 — 49 24 24
Fixed income: 33 35
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 7 — 7
Corporate bonds — 10 — 10
Pooled funds — 44 — 44
Cash equivalents and other 5 — — 5
Trust-owned life insurance — 153 — 153
Real estate investments 4 — 11 15 4 4
Special situations — — 2 2 1 —
Private equity — — 7 7 2 2
Total $ 67$ 255$ 20$ 342 100% 100%
Mississippi Power
Assets:
Domestic equity(*)$ 3$ 2$ —$ 5 21% 22%
International equity(*)2 2 — 4 20 20
Fixed income: 38 39
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 6 — 6
Corporate bonds — 2 — 2
Pooled funds — 1 — 1
Cash equivalents and other 1 — — 1
Real estate investments 1 — 2 3 11 12
Special situations — — — — 3 1
Private equity — — 1 1 7 6
Total $ 7$ 13$ 3$ 23 100% 100%
II-389
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using    
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient
TotalTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV)
 (in millions)   
Southern Company Gas     
Assets:     
Domestic equity(*)$ 2$ 47$ —$ 49 51% 51%
International equity(*)1 17 — 18 20 18
Fixed income:   25 28
U.S. Treasury, government, and agency
bonds — 1 — 1
Corporate bonds — 1 — 1
Pooled funds — 24 — 24
Cash equivalents and other 1 — — 1
Real estate investments — — 1 1 2 2
Special situations — — — — 1 —
Private equity — — 1 1 1 1
Total $ 4$ 90$ 2$ 96 100% 100%
(*)Level 1 securities consist of actively traded stocks while Level 2 securities consist of pooled funds.
II-390
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient Target
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company(a)   
Assets:    
Domestic equity(b)$ 135$ 104$ —$ 239 37% 40%
International equity(b)47 98 — 145 23 23
Fixed income:    30 29
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 32 — 32
Corporate bonds — 37 — 37
Pooled funds — 79 — 79
Cash equivalents and other 12 — 1 13
Trust-owned life insurance — 426 — 426
Real estate investments 16 — 36 52 5 5
Special situations — — 5 5 1 1
Private equity — — 20 20 4 2
Total $ 210$ 776$ 62$ 1,048 100% 100%
Alabama Power    
Assets:    
Domestic equity(b)$ 52$ 12$ —$ 64 42% 44%
International equity(b)16 14 — 30 22 22
Fixed income:    28 28
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 11 — 11
Corporate bonds — 12 — 12
Pooled funds — 7 — 7
Cash equivalents and other 2 — — 2
Trust-owned life insurance — 253 — 253
Real estate investments 5 — 12 17 4 4
Special situations — — 2 2 1 —
Private equity — — 7 7 3 2
Total $ 75$ 309$ 21$ 405 100% 100%
II-391
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
ExpedientTarget
AllocationActual
Allocation At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV) Total
 (in millions)  
Georgia Power    
Assets:    
Domestic equity(b)$ 53$ 11$ —$ 64 36% 38%
International equity(b)14 46 — 60 24 24
Fixed income:   33 31
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 6 — 6 
Corporate bonds — 11 — 11 
Pooled funds — 41 — 41 
Cash equivalents and other 4 — — 4 
Trust-owned life insurance — 173 — 173 
Real estate investments 6 — 11 17 4 4
Special situations — — 2 2 1 1
Private equity — — 6 6 2 2
Total $ 77$ 288$ 19$ 384 100% 100%
Mississippi Power    
Assets:    
Domestic equity(b)$ 4$ 2$ —$ 6 21% 25%
International equity(b)3 2 — 5 21 20
Fixed income:   37 38
U.S. Treasury, government, and
agency bonds — 5 — 5 
Corporate bonds — 2 — 2 
Pooled funds — 1 — 1 
Cash equivalents and other 1 — — 1 
Real estate investments 1 — 2 3 12 11
Special situations — — — — 2 1
Private equity — — 1 1 7 5
Total $ 9$ 12$ 3$ 24 100% 100%
(a)Target and actual allocations reflect the asset allocations for only the Southern Company other postretirement benefit plans prior to the merger of the plans with
the Southern Company Gas other postretirement benefit plans on January 1, 2018.
(b)Level 1 securities consist of actively traded stocks while Level 2 securities consist of pooled funds.
II-392
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The fair values of Southern Company Gas' other postretirement benefit plan assets for the period ended December 31, 2017 are
presented below. These fair value measurements exclude cash, receivables related to investment income, pending investment sales,
and payables related to pending investment purchases. Special situations (absolute return and hedge funds) investment assets are
presented in the tables below based on the nature of the investment.
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsNet Asset Value
as a Practical
Expedient
Total At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (NAV)
 (in millions)
Southern Company Gas   
Assets:   
Domestic equity(*)$ 3$ 69$ —$ 72
International equity(*)— 22 — 22
Fixed income:   
Pooled funds — 24 — 24
Cash equivalents and other 2 — 1 3
Total $ 5$ 115$ 1$ 121
(*)Level 1 securities consist of actively traded stocks while Level 2 securities consist of pooled funds.
The composition of Southern Company Gas' other postretirement benefit plan assets at December 31, 2017, along with the targets,
is presented below:
 Target  2017
Other postretirement benefit plan assets:    
Equity 72% 76%
Fixed Income 24 20
Cash 1 2
Other 3 2
Total 100% 100%
Employee Savings Plan
Southern Company and its subsidiaries also sponsor 401(k) defined contribution plans covering substantially all employees and
provide matching contributions up to specified percentages of an employee's eligible pay. Total matching contributions made to the
plans for 2018, 2017, and 2016 were as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Power
 (in millions)
2018 $ 119$ 24$ 26$ 5$ 3
2017 118 23 26 5 N/A
2016 105 23 27 5 N/A
II-393
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Southern Company Gas
 (in millions)
Successor – 2018 $ 18
Successor – 2017 19
Successor – July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016 8
Predecessor – January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016 12
12. STOCK COMPENSATION
Stock-Based Compensation
Stock-based compensation primarily in the form of Southern Company performance share units (PSU) and restricted stock units
(RSU) may be granted through the Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan to a large segment of Southern Company system
employees ranging from line management to executives. Southern Company Gas and Southern Power had no employee participants
in the stock-based compensation plans until 2017 and 2018, respectively. In conjunction with the Merger, stock-based
compensation in the form of Southern Company RSUs and PSUs was granted to certain executives of Southern Company Gas
through the Southern Company Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan.
At December 31, 2018, the number of current and former employees participating in stock-based compensation programs for the
registrants was as follows:
 Southern
CompanyAlabama
Power Georgia PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
Number of employees 4,716 745 822 164 95 285
Employees become immediately vested in PSUs and RSUs upon retirement. As a result, compensation expense for employees that
are retirement eligible at the grant date is recognized immediately, while compensation expense for employees that become
retirement eligible during the vesting period is recognized over the period from grant date to the date of retirement eligibility. In
addition, the registrants recognize forfeitures as they occur.
All unvested PSUs and RSUs vest immediately upon a change in control where Southern Company is not the surviving
corporation.
Performance Share Units
PSUs granted to employees vest at the end of a three-year performance period. Shares of Southern Company common stock are
delivered to employees at the end of the performance period with the number of shares issued ranging from 0% to 200% of the
target number of PSUs granted, based on achievement of the performance goals established by the Compensation Committee of the
Southern Company Board of Directors.
Southern Company has issued three types of PSUs, each with a unique performance goal. These types of PSUs include total
shareholder return (TSR) awards based on the TSR for Southern Company common stock during the three-year performance period
as compared to a group of industry peers; ROE awards based on Southern Company's equity-weighted return over the performance
period; and EPS awards based on Southern Company's cumulative EPS over the performance period. EPS awards were not granted
in 2018.
II-394
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The fair value of TSR awards is determined as of the grant date using a Monte Carlo simulation model to estimate the TSR of
Southern Company's common stock among industry peers over the performance period. In determining the fair value of the TSR
awards issued to employees, the expected volatility is based on the historical volatility of Southern Company's stock over a period
equal to the performance period. The risk-free rate is based on the U.S. Treasury yield curve in effect at the time of grant that
covers the performance period of the awards. The following table shows the assumptions used in the pricing model and the
weighted average grant-date fair value of TSR awards granted:
Year Ended December 31 2018  2017 2016
Expected volatility 14.9%  15.6% 15.0%
Expected term (in years) 3  3 3
Interest rate 2.4%  1.4% 0.8%
Weighted average grant-date fair value $43.75  $49.08 $45.06
The registrants recognize TSR award compensation expense on a straight-line basis over the three-year performance period without
remeasurement.
The fair values of EPS awards and ROE awards are based on the closing stock price of Southern Company common stock on the
date of the grant. The weighted average grant-date fair value of the awards granted during 2018, 2017, and 2016 was $43.49,
$49.21, and $48.87, respectively. Compensation expense for EPS and ROE awards is generally recognized ratably over the three-
year performance period adjusted for expected changes in EPS and ROE performance. Total compensation cost recognized for
vested EPS awards and ROE awards reflects final performance metrics.
Southern Company's total unvested PSUs outstanding at December 31, 2017 was 2.9 million. In February 2018, 1.5 million PSUs
vested for the three-year performance period ended December 31, 2017 were converted into 1.9 million shares outstanding at a
share price of $44.68.
During 2018, Southern Company granted 1.3 million PSUs and 1.9 million PSUs were vested or forfeited, resulting in 2.5 million
unvested PSUs outstanding at December 31, 2018. In February 2019, the PSUs that vested for the three-year performance period
ended December 31, 2018 were converted into 1.7 million shares outstanding at a share price of $49.24.
II-395
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Total PSU compensation cost, and the related tax benefit recognized in income, for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and
2016 are as follows:
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Southern Company    
Compensation cost recognized in income $ 91$ 74$ 96
Tax benefit of compensation cost recognized in income 24 29 37
Alabama Power    
Compensation cost recognized in income $ 11$ 9$ 15
Tax benefit of compensation cost recognized in income 3 4 6
Georgia Power    
Compensation cost recognized in income $ 11$ 10$ 15
Tax benefit of compensation cost recognized in income 3 4 6
Mississippi Power    
Compensation cost recognized in income $ 3$ 2$ 4
Tax benefit of compensation cost recognized in income 1 1 1
Southern Power    
Compensation cost recognized in income $ 4 N/A N/A
Tax benefit of compensation cost recognized in income 1 N/A N/A
Southern Company Gas    
Compensation cost recognized in income $ 11$ 8 N/A
Tax benefit of compensation cost recognized in income 3 3 N/A
The compensation cost related to the grant of Southern Company PSUs to the employees of the traditional electric operating
companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas is recognized in each respective registrant's financial statements with a
corresponding credit to equity representing a capital contribution from Southern Company.
At December 31, 2018, Southern Company's total unrecognized compensation cost related to PSUs was $30 million and is
expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of approximately 16 months. The total unrecognized compensation cost
related to PSUs as of December 31, 2018 was immaterial for all other registrants.
Restricted Stock Units
Beginning in 2017, employees are granted RSUs in addition to PSUs. One-third of the RSUs granted to employees vest each year
throughout a three-year service period. Shares of Southern Company common stock are delivered to employees at the end of each
vesting period.
The fair value of RSUs is based on the closing stock price of Southern Company common stock on the date of the grant. The
weighted average grant-date fair values of RSUs granted during 2018 and 2017 were $43.81 and $49.25, respectively. Since one-
third of the RSUs vest each year throughout a three-year service period, compensation cost for RSUs is generally recognized over
the corresponding one-, two-, or three-year vesting period.
Southern Company had 0.7 million RSUs outstanding at December 31, 2017. During 2018, Southern Company granted 0.7 million
RSUs and 0.3 million RSUs were vested or forfeited, resulting in 1.1 million unvested RSUs outstanding at December 31, 2018,
including RSUs related to employee retention agreements.
For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, Southern Company's total compensation cost for RSUs recognized in income
was $27 million and $25 million, respectively. The related tax benefit also recognized in income was $7 million and $10 million for
the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Total unrecognized compensation cost related to RSUs as of
December 31, 2018 for Southern Company of $13 million will be recognized over a weighted-average period of approximately 16
months.
II-396
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Total RSUs outstanding and total compensation cost and related tax benefit for the RSUs recognized in income for the years ended
December 31, 2018 and 2017, as well as the total unrecognized compensation cost as of December 31, 2018, were immaterial for
all other registrants.
Stock Options
In 2015, Southern Company discontinued granting stock options. Stock options expire no later than 10 years after the grant date
and the latest possible exercise will occur no later than November 2024. As of December 31, 2018, the weighted average remaining
contractual term for the options outstanding and exercisable was approximately 4 years.
As of December 31, 2017, all stock option awards are vested and compensation cost fully recognized. Total compensation cost for
stock option awards and the related tax benefits recognized in income for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016 were
immaterial for Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power.
Southern Company's activity in the stock option program for 2018 is summarized below:
 Shares Subject to
Option  Weighted Average
Exercise Price
 (in millions)  
Outstanding at December 31, 2017 18.6 $ 41.68
Exercised 1.1 37.82
Outstanding and Exercisable at December 31, 2018 17.5 $ 41.92
Southern Company's cash receipts from issuances related to stock options exercised under the share-based payment arrangements
for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 were $41 million, $239 million, and $448 million, respectively.
At December 31, 2018, the aggregate intrinsic value for the options outstanding and exercisable was as follows:
Southern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power
(in millions)
Total intrinsic value for outstanding and exercisable options $ 39$ 5$ 13$ 1
Total intrinsic value of options exercised, and the related tax benefit, for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 are
presented below:
Year Ended December 31 2018 2017 2016
(in millions)
Southern Company    
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 9$ 64$ 120
Tax benefit of options exercised 2 25 46
Alabama Power    
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 2$ 12$ 21
Tax benefit of options exercised — 5 8
Georgia Power    
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 2$ 13$ 18
Tax benefit of options exercised — 5 7
Mississippi Power    
Intrinsic value of options exercised $ 1$ 2$ 4
Tax benefit of options exercised — 1 2
II-397
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Merger Stock Compensation
At the effective time of the Merger, each share of Southern Company Gas common stock, other than certain excluded shares, was
converted into the right to receive $66 in cash, without interest. Also, at the effective time of the Merger:
•Southern Company Gas' outstanding RSUs, restricted stock awards, and non-employee director stock awards were deemed
fully vested and were canceled and converted into the right to receive an amount in cash equal to the product of (i) the
total number of shares of Southern Company Gas' common stock subject to such award and (ii) the Merger consideration
of $66 per share;
•Southern Company Gas' outstanding stock options, all of which were fully vested, were canceled and converted into the
right to receive an amount in cash equal to the product of (i) the total number of shares of Southern Company Gas'
common stock subject to such options and (ii) the excess of the Merger consideration of $66 per share over the applicable
exercise price per share of such options; and
•each outstanding award of a Southern Company Gas PSU was converted into an award of Southern Company RSUs. The
conversion ratio was the product of (i) the greater of (a) 125% of the number of units underlying such award based on
target level achievement of all relevant performance goals and (b) the number of units underlying such award based on the
actual level of achievement of all relevant performance goals against target and (ii) an exchange ratio based on the Merger
consideration of $66 per share as compared to the volume-weighted average price per share of Southern Company
common stock.
Southern Company Restricted Stock Awards
At the effective time of the Merger, each outstanding award of existing Southern Company Gas PSUs was converted into an award
of Southern Company RSUs. Under the terms of the restricted stock awards, the employees received Southern Company stock
when they satisfy the requisite service period by being continuously employed through the original three-year vesting schedule of
the award being replaced. Southern Company issued 0.7 million RSUs with a grant-date fair value of $53.83, based on the closing
stock price of Southern Company common stock on the date of the grant. As a portion of the fair value of the award related to pre-
combination service, the grant date fair value was allocated to pre- or post-combination service and accounted for as Merger
consideration or compensation cost, respectively. Approximately $13 million of the grant date fair value was allocated to Merger
consideration. Southern Company Gas recognized the remaining fair value as compensation expense on a straight-line basis over
the remaining vesting period. As of December 31, 2018, all RSUs are vested and compensation cost is fully recognized.
For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016, total compensation cost for RSUs recognized in income was $2 million,
$8 million, and $13 million, respectively, with the related tax benefit of $1 million, $4 million, and $4 million, respectively, also
recognized in income. The compensation cost related to the grant of RSUs to Southern Company Gas employees is recognized in
Southern Company Gas' financial statements with a corresponding credit to equity, representing a capital contribution from
Southern Company.
Southern Company Gas Change in Control Awards
Southern Company awarded PSUs to certain Southern Company Gas employees who continued their employment with the
Southern Company in lieu of certain change in control benefits the employee was entitled to receive following the Merger (change
in control awards). Shares of Southern Company common stock and/or cash equal to the dollar value of the change in control
benefit will vest and be issued one-third each year as long as the employee remains in service with Southern Company or its
subsidiaries at each vest date. In addition to the change in control benefit, Southern Company common stock could be issued to the
employees at the end of a performance period based on achievement of certain Southern Company common stock price metrics, as
well performance goals established by the Compensation Committee of the Southern Company Board of Directors (achievement
shares).
The change in control benefits are accounted for as a liability award with the fair value equal to the guaranteed dollar value of the
change in control benefit. The compensation cost of the change in control benefit is recognized in Southern Company Gas' financial
statements with a corresponding credit to a liability. The grant-date fair value of the achievement portion of the award was
determined using a Monte Carlo simulation model to estimate the number of achievement shares expected to vest based on the
Southern Company common stock price. The compensation cost of the achievement shares is recognized in Southern Company
Gas' financial statements with a corresponding credit to equity, representing a capital contribution from Southern Company. The
expected payout is reevaluated annually with expense recognized to date increased or decreased proportionately based on the
expected performance. The compensation cost ultimately recognized for the achievement shares will be based on the actual
performance.
II-398
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016, total compensation cost for the change in control awards recognized in
income was $5 million, $12 million, and $4 million, respectively, with the related tax benefit of $2 million, $6 million, and less
than $1 million, respectively, also recognized in income. As of December 31, 2018, $2 million of total unrecognized compensation
cost related to change in control awards will be recognized over a weighted-average period of approximately six months.
Predecessor
For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, the employees of Southern Company Gas and subsidiaries
participated in the AGL Resources Inc. Omnibus Performance Incentive Plan, as amended and restated.
The AGL Resources Inc. Omnibus Performance Incentive Plan, as amended and restated, and the Long-Term Incentive Plan (1999)
provided for the grant of incentive and nonqualified stock options, stock appreciation rights, shares of restricted stock, RSUs,
performance cash awards, and other stock-based awards to officers and key employees. Effective July 1, 2016, all Southern
Company Gas shares of stock were canceled and/or converted as a result of the Merger. No further grants will be made from the
Long-Term Incentive Plan (1999) or the AGL Resources Inc. Omnibus Performance Incentive Plan, as amended and restated.
For the predecessor period, Southern Company Gas recognized stock-based compensation cost for its stock-based awards over the
requisite service period based on the estimated fair value at the date of grant for its stock-based awards using the modified
prospective method.
Performance-based stock awards and performance units contained market and performance conditions. Stock options, restricted
stock awards, and performance units also contained a service condition. Southern Company Gas estimated forfeitures over the
requisite service period when recognizing compensation cost. These estimates were adjusted to the extent that actual forfeitures
differ, or were expected to materially differ, from such estimates. The difference between the proceeds from the exercise of
Southern Company Gas' stock-based awards and the par value of the stock was recorded within additional paid-in capital.
Southern Company Gas granted stock awards with a grant price that was equal to the fair market value on the date of the grant. Fair
market value was defined under the terms of the applicable plans as the closing price per share of Southern Company Gas' common
stock on the grant date. For the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016, total compensation cost for cash and
stock-based awards recognized in income was $24 million with related tax benefits of an immaterial amount also recognized in
income.
13. FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
Fair value measurements are based on inputs of observable and unobservable market data that a market participant would use in
pricing the asset or liability. The use of observable inputs is maximized where available and the use of unobservable inputs is
minimized for fair value measurement and reflects a three-tier fair value hierarchy that prioritizes inputs to valuation techniques
used for fair value measurement.
•Level 1 consists of observable market data in an active market for identical assets or liabilities.
•Level 2 consists of observable market data, other than that included in Level 1, that is either directly or indirectly observable.
•Level 3 consists of unobservable market data. The input may reflect the assumptions of each registrant of what a market
participant would use in pricing an asset or liability. If there is little available market data, then each registrant's own
assumptions are the best available information.
In the case of multiple inputs being used in a fair value measurement, the lowest level input that is significant to the fair value
measurement represents the level in the fair value hierarchy in which the fair value measurement is reported.
II-399
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018, assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis during the period, together with their
associated level of the fair value hierarchy, were as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements Using   
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets  Significant
Other
Observable
InputsSignificant
Unobservable
Inputs  Net Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient  
At December 31, 2018: (Level 1)  (Level 2) (Level 3)  (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company       
Assets:       
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 469 $ 292$ — $ — $ 761
Foreign currency derivatives — 75 — — 75
Investments in trusts:(c)(d)      
Domestic equity 601 107 — — 708
Foreign equity 53 173 — — 226
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 261 — — 261
Municipal bonds — 83 — — 83
Pooled funds – fixed income — 14 — — 14
Corporate bonds 24 290 — — 314
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 68 — — 68
Private equity — — — 45 45
Cash and cash equivalents 16 — — — 16
Other 34 4 — — 38
Cash equivalents 765 1 — — 766
Other investments — 12 — — 12
Total $ 1,962 $ 1,380$ — $ 45 $ 3,387
Liabilities:       
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 648 $ 316$ — $ — $ 964
Interest rate derivatives — 49 — — 49
Foreign currency derivatives — 23 — — 23
Contingent consideration — — 21 — 21
Total $ 648 $ 388$ 21 $ — $ 1,057
II-400
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets  Significant
Other
Observable
InputsSignificant
Unobservable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient 
At December 31, 2018: (Level 1)  (Level 2) (Level 3) (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Alabama Power    
Assets:    
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 6$ — $ — $ 6
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(c)   
Domestic equity 396 95 — — 491
Foreign equity 53 50 — — 103
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 18 — — 18
Municipal bonds — 1 — — 1
Corporate bonds 24 135 — — 159
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 23 — — 23
Private equity — — — 45 45
Other 6 — — — 6
Cash equivalents 116 1 — — 117
Other investments — 12 — — 12
Total $ 595 $ 341$ — $ 45 $ 981
Liabilities:    
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 10$ — $ — $ 10
    
Georgia Power    
Assets:    
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 6$ — $ — $ 6
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(c)(d)   
Domestic equity 205 1 — — 206
Foreign equity — 119 — — 119
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 243 — — 243
Municipal bonds — 82 — — 82
Corporate bonds — 155 — — 155
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 45 — — 45
Other 19 4 — — 23
Total $ 224 $ 655$ — $ — $ 879
Liabilities:   
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 21$ — $ — $ 21
Interest rate derivatives — 2 — — 2
Total $ — $ 23$ — $ — $ 23
II-401
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs  Significant
Unobservable
InputsNet Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient 
At December 31, 2018: (Level 1) (Level 2)  (Level 3) (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Mississippi Power     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 3 $ — $ — $ 3
Cash equivalents 255 — — — 255
Total $ 255$ 3 $ — $ — $ 258
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 9 $ — $ — $ 9
Southern Power     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 4 $ — $ — $ 4
Foreign currency derivatives — 75 — — 75
Cash equivalents 46 — — — 46
Total $ 46$ 79 $ — $ — $ 125
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 8 $ — $ — $ 8
Foreign currency derivatives — 23 — — 23
Contingent consideration — — 21 — 21
Total $ — $ 31 $ 21$ — $ 52
Southern Company Gas     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 469$ 272 $ — $ — $ 741
Non-qualified deferred compensation trusts:     
Domestic equity — 11 — — 11
Foreign equity — 4 — — 4
Pooled funds - fixed income — 14 — — 14
Cash equivalents 4 — — — 4
Cash equivalents 40 — — — 40
Total $ 513$ 301 $ — $ — $ 814
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 648$ 261 $ — $ — $ 909
(a)Energy-related derivatives exclude $8 million associated with premiums and certain weather derivatives accounted for based on intrinsic value rather than fair
value.
(b)Energy-related derivatives exclude cash collateral of $277 million.
(c)Excludes receivables related to investment income, pending investment sales, payables related to pending investment purchases, and currencies. See Note 6
under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
(d)Includes investment securities pledged to creditors and collateral received and excludes payables related to the securities lending program. See Note 6 under
"Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
II-402
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2017, assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis during the period, together with their
associated level of the fair value hierarchy, were as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsSignificant
Unobservable
Inputs  Net Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient 
At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3)  (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Southern Company     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 331$ 239$ — $ — $ 570
Interest rate derivatives — 1 — — 1
Foreign currency derivatives — 129 — — 129
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(c)    
Domestic equity 690 82 — — 772
Foreign equity 62 224 — — 286
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 251 — — 251
Municipal bonds — 68 — — 68
Corporate bonds 21 315 — — 336
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 57 — — 57
Private equity — — — 29 29
Other 19 12 — — 31
Cash equivalents 1,455 — — — 1,455
Other investments 9 — 1 — 10
Total $ 2,587$ 1,378$ 1 $ 29 $ 3,995
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 480$ 253$ — $ — $ 733
Interest rate derivatives — 38 — — 38
Foreign currency derivatives — 23 — — 23
Contingent consideration — — 22 — 22
Total $ 480$ 314$ 22 $ — $ 816
II-403
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets  Significant
Other
Observable
InputsSignificant
Unobservable
Inputs  Net Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient 
At December 31, 2017: (Level 1)  (Level 2) (Level 3)  (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Alabama Power     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 4$ — $ — $ 4
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(d)   
Domestic equity 442 81 — — 523
Foreign equity 62 59 — — 121
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 24 — — 24
Corporate bonds 21 160 — — 181
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 18 — — 18
Private equity — — — 29 29
Other 6 — — — 6
Cash equivalents 349 — — — 349
Total $ 880 $ 346$ — $ 29 $ 1,255
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 10$ — $ — $ 10
     
Georgia Power     
Assets:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 6$ — $ — $ 6
Nuclear decommissioning trusts:(d)(e)    
Domestic equity 248 1 — — 249
Foreign equity — 166 — — 166
U.S. Treasury and government agency
securities — 227 — — 227
Municipal bonds — 68 — — 68
Corporate bonds — 155 — — 155
Mortgage and asset backed securities — 40 — — 40
Other 12 12 — — 24
Cash equivalents 690 — — — 690
Total $ 950 $ 675$ — $ — $ 1,625
Liabilities:     
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 19$ — $ — $ 19
Interest rate derivatives — 5 — — 5
Total $ — $ 24$ — $ — $ 24
II-404
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Fair Value Measurements Using  
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
AssetsSignificant
Other
Observable
InputsSignificant
Unobservable
Inputs  Net Asset
Value as a
Practical
Expedient 
At December 31, 2017: (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3)  (NAV)  Total
 (in millions)
Mississippi Power      
Assets:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 2$ — $ — $ 2
Interest rate derivatives — 1 — — 1
Cash equivalents 224 — — — 224
Total $ 224$ 3$ — $ — $ 227
Liabilities:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 9$ — $ — $ 9
      
Southern Power      
Assets:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 3$ — $ — $ 3
Foreign currency derivatives — 129 — — 129
Cash equivalents 21 — — — 21
Total $ 21$ 132$ — $ — $ 153
Liabilities:      
Energy-related derivatives $ — $ 13$ — $ — $ 13
Foreign currency derivatives — 23 — — 23
Contingent consideration — — 22 — 22
Total $ — $ 36$ 22 $ — $ 58
      
Southern Company Gas      
Assets:      
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 331$ 223$ — $ — $ 554
Liabilities:      
Energy-related derivatives(a)(b)$ 479$ 181$ — $ — 660
(a)Energy-related derivatives exclude $11 million associated with premiums and certain weather derivatives accounted for based on intrinsic value rather than fair
value.
(b)Energy-related derivatives exclude cash collateral of $193 million.
(c)For additional detail, see the nuclear decommissioning trusts sections for Alabama Power and Georgia Power in this table.
(d)Excludes receivables related to investment income, pending investment sales, payables related to pending investment purchases, and currencies. See Note 6
under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
(e)Includes investment securities pledged to creditors and collateral received and excludes payables related to the securities lending program. See Note 6 under
"Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
Valuation Methodologies
The energy-related derivatives primarily consist of exchange-traded and over-the-counter financial products for natural gas and
physical power products, including, from time to time, basis swaps. These are standard products used within the energy industry
and are valued using the market approach. The inputs used are mainly from observable market sources, such as forward natural gas
prices, power prices, implied volatility, and overnight index swap interest rates. Interest rate derivatives are also standard over-the-
counter products that are valued using observable market data and assumptions commonly used by market participants. The fair
value of interest rate derivatives reflects the net present value of expected payments and receipts under the swap
II-405
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
agreement based on the market's expectation of future interest rates. Additional inputs to the net present value calculation may
include the contract terms, counterparty credit risk, and occasionally, implied volatility of interest rate options. The fair value of
cross-currency swaps reflects the net present value of expected payments and receipts under the swap agreement based on the
market's expectation of future foreign currency exchange rates. Additional inputs to the net present value calculation may include
the contract terms, counterparty credit risk, and discount rates. The interest rate derivatives and cross-currency swaps are
categorized as Level 2 under Fair Value Measurements as these inputs are based on observable data and valuations of similar
instruments. See Note 14 for additional information on how these derivatives are used.
For fair value measurements of the investments within the nuclear decommissioning trusts and the non-qualified deferred
compensation trusts, external pricing vendors are designated for each asset class with each security specifically assigned a primary
pricing source. For investments held within commingled funds, fair value is determined at the end of each business day through the
net asset value, which is established by obtaining the underlying securities' individual prices from the primary pricing source. A
market price secured from the primary source vendor is then evaluated by management in its valuation of the assets within the
trusts. As a general approach, fixed income market pricing vendors gather market data (including indices and market research
reports) and integrate relative credit information, observed market movements, and sector news into proprietary pricing models,
pricing systems, and mathematical tools. Dealer quotes and other market information, including live trading levels and pricing
analysts' judgments, are also obtained when available.
The NRC requires licensees of commissioned nuclear power reactors to establish a plan for providing reasonable assurance of
funds for future decommissioning. See Note 6 under "Nuclear Decommissioning" for additional information.
Southern Power has contingent payment obligations related to certain acquisitions whereby Southern Power is primarily obligated
to make generation-based payments to the seller, which commenced at the commercial operation of the respective facility and
continue through 2026. The obligation is categorized as Level 3 under Fair Value Measurements as the fair value is determined
using significant unobservable inputs for the forecasted facility generation in MW-hours, as well as other inputs such as a fixed
dollar amount per MW-hour, and a discount rate. The fair value of contingent consideration reflects the net present value of
expected payments and any periodic change arising from forecasted generation is expected to be immaterial.
"Other investments" include investments categorized as Level 3 under Fair Value Measurements that are not traded in the open
market. The fair value of these investments has been determined based on market factors including comparable multiples and the
expectations regarding cash flows and business plan executions.
The fair value measurements of private equity investments held in Alabama Power's nuclear decommissioning trusts that are
calculated at net asset value per share (or its equivalent) as a practical expedient totaled $45 million and $29 million at
December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Unfunded commitments related to the private equity investments totaled $50 million
and $21 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Private equity funds include funds-of-funds that invest in high-
quality private equity funds across several market sectors, funds that invest in real estate assets, and a fund that acquires companies
to create resale value. Private equity funds do not have redemption rights. Distributions from these funds will be received as the
underlying investments in the funds are liquidated.
II-406
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, other financial instruments for which the carrying amount did not equal fair value were as
follows:
 Southern
  Company(a)(b)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas(b)
 (in millions)
At December 31, 2018:    
Long-term debt, including securities
due within one year:    
Carrying amount $ 45,023$ 8,120$ 9,838$ 1,579$ 5,017$ 5,940
Fair value 44,824 8,370 9,800 1,546 4,980 5,965
At December 31, 2017:    
Long-term debt, including securities
due within one year:    
Carrying amount $ 48,151$ 7,625$ 11,777$ 2,086$ 5,841$ 6,048
Fair value 51,348 8,305 12,531 2,076 6,079 6,471
(a)Includes long-term debt of Gulf Power, which is classified as liabilities held for sale on Southern Company's balance sheet at December 31, 2018. See Note 15
under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power" and "Assets Held for Sale" for additional information.
(b)The long-term debt of Southern Company Gas is recorded at amortized cost, including the fair value adjustments at the effective date of the Merger. Southern
Company Gas amortizes the fair value adjustments over the lives of the respective bonds.
The fair values are determined using Level 2 measurements and are based on quoted market prices for the same or similar issues or
on the current rates available to the registrants.
14. DERIVATIVES
Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas are exposed to
market risks, including commodity price risk, interest rate risk, weather risk, and occasionally foreign currency exchange rate risk.
To manage the volatility attributable to these exposures, each company nets its exposures, where possible, to take advantage of
natural offsets and enters into various derivative transactions for the remaining exposures pursuant to each company's policies in
areas such as counterparty exposure and risk management practices. Southern Company Gas' wholesale gas operations use various
contracts in its commercial activities that generally meet the definition of derivatives. For the traditional electric operating
companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas' other businesses, each company's policy is that derivatives are to be used
primarily for hedging purposes and mandates strict adherence to all applicable risk management policies. Derivative positions are
monitored using techniques including, but not limited to, market valuation, value at risk, stress testing, and sensitivity analysis.
Derivative instruments are recognized at fair value in the balance sheets as either assets or liabilities and are presented on a net
basis. See Note 13 for additional fair value information. In the statements of cash flows, any cash impacts of settled energy-related
and interest rate derivatives are recorded as operating activities. Any cash impacts of settled foreign currency derivatives are
classified as operating or financing activities to correspond with classification of the hedged interest or principal, respectively. See
Note 1 under "Financial Instruments" for additional information.
The registrants adopted ASU 2017-12 as of January 1, 2018. See Note 1 under "Recently Adopted Accounting Standards – Other"
for additional information.
Energy-Related Derivatives
The traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas enter into energy-related derivatives to
hedge exposures to electricity, natural gas, and other fuel price changes. However, due to cost-based rate regulations and other
various cost recovery mechanisms, the traditional electric operating companies and the natural gas distribution utilities have limited
exposure to market volatility in energy-related commodity prices. Each of the traditional electric operating companies and certain
of the natural gas distribution utilities of Southern Company Gas manage fuel-hedging programs, implemented per the guidelines of
their respective state PSCs or other applicable state regulatory agencies, through the use of financial derivative contracts, which are
expected to continue to mitigate price volatility. The traditional electric operating companies (with respect to wholesale generating
capacity) and Southern Power have limited exposure to market volatility in energy-related commodity prices because their long-
term sales contracts shift substantially all fuel cost responsibility to the purchaser. However, the traditional electric operating
companies and Southern Power may be exposed to market volatility in energy-related commodity
II-407
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
prices to the extent any uncontracted capacity is used to sell electricity. Southern Company Gas retains exposure to price changes
that can, in a volatile energy market, be material and can adversely affect its results of operations.
Southern Company Gas also enters into weather derivative contracts as economic hedges of operating margins in the event of
warmer-than-normal weather. Exchange-traded options are carried at fair value, with changes reflected in operating revenues. Non-
exchange-traded options are accounted for using the intrinsic value method. Changes in the intrinsic value for non-exchange-traded
contracts are reflected in operating revenues.
Energy-related derivative contracts are accounted for under one of three methods:
•Regulatory Hedges – Energy-related derivative contracts designated as regulatory hedges relate primarily to the traditional
electric operating companies' and the natural gas distribution utilities' fuel-hedging programs, where gains and losses are
initially recorded as regulatory liabilities and assets, respectively, and then are included in fuel expense as the underlying fuel
is used in operations and ultimately recovered through the respective fuel cost recovery clauses.
•Cash Flow Hedges – Gains and losses on energy-related derivatives designated as cash flow hedges (which are mainly used to
hedge anticipated purchases and sales) are initially deferred in AOCI before being recognized in the statements of income in
the same period and in the same income statement line item as the earnings effect of the hedged transactions.
•Not Designated – Gains and losses on energy-related derivative contracts that are not designated or fail to qualify as hedges are
recognized in the statements of income as incurred.
Some energy-related derivative contracts require physical delivery as opposed to financial settlement, and this type of derivative is
both common and prevalent within the electric and natural gas industries. When an energy-related derivative contract is settled
physically, any cumulative unrealized gain or loss is reversed and the contract price is recognized in the respective line item
representing the actual price of the underlying goods being delivered.
At December 31, 2018, the net volume of energy-related derivative contracts for natural gas positions, together with the longest
hedge date over which the respective entity is hedging its exposure to the variability in future cash flows for forecasted transactions
and the longest non-hedge date for derivatives not designated as hedges, were as follows:
 Net
Purchased
mmBtu  Longest
Hedge
DateLongest
Non-Hedge
Date
 (in millions)   
Southern Company(*)431  2022 2029
Alabama Power 74  2022 —
Georgia Power 153  2022 —
Mississippi Power 63  2022 —
Southern Power 15  2020 —
Southern Company Gas(*)120  2021 2029
(*)Southern Company Gas' derivative instruments include both long and short natural gas positions. A long position is a contract to purchase natural gas and a short
position is a contract to sell natural gas. Southern Company Gas' volume represents the net of long natural gas positions of 4,159 million mmBtu and short
natural gas positions of 4,039 million mmBtu at December 31, 2018, which is also included in Southern Company's total volume.
At December 31, 2018, the net volume of Southern Power's energy-related derivative contracts for power to be sold was 2 million
MWHs, all of which expire by 2020.
In addition to the volumes discussed above, the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power enter into physical
natural gas supply contracts that provide the option to sell back excess natural gas due to operational constraints. The maximum
expected volume of natural gas subject to such a feature is 23 million mmBtu for Southern Company, which includes 4 million
mmBtu for Alabama Power, 7 million mmBtu for Georgia Power, 3 million mmBtu for Mississippi Power, and 7 million mmBtu
for Southern Power.
For cash flow hedges of energy-related derivatives, the estimated pre-tax gains (losses) expected to be reclassified from AOCI to
earnings for the year ending December 31, 2019 are immaterial for all registrants.
Interest Rate Derivatives
Southern Company and certain subsidiaries may enter into interest rate derivatives to hedge exposure to changes in interest rates.
The derivatives employed as hedging instruments are structured to minimize ineffectiveness. Derivatives related to existing
II-408
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
variable rate securities or forecasted transactions are accounted for as cash flow hedges where the derivatives' fair value gains or
losses are recorded in OCI and are reclassified into earnings at the same time and presented on the same income statement line item
as the earnings effect of the hedged transactions. Derivatives related to existing fixed rate securities are accounted for as fair value
hedges, where the derivatives' fair value gains or losses and hedged items' fair value gains or losses are both recorded directly to
earnings on the same income statement line item. Fair value gains or losses on derivatives that are not designated or fail to qualify
as hedges are recognized in the statements of income as incurred.
At December 31, 2018, the following interest rate derivatives were outstanding:
Notional
AmountInterest
Rate
ReceivedWeighted
Average
Interest
Rate PaidHedge
Maturity
DateFair Value
Gain (Loss)
December 31,
2018
(in millions) (in millions)
Fair Value Hedges of Existing Debt
Southern Company(*)$ 300 2.75%  3-month
LIBOR +
0.92% June 2020  $ (4)
Southern Company(*)1,500 2.35%  1-month
LIBOR +
0.87% July 2021  (43)
Georgia Power 200 4.25%  3-month
LIBOR +
2.46% December 2019 (2)
Southern Company Consolidated $ 2,000    $ (49)
(*)Represents the Southern Company parent entity .
The estimated pre-tax gains (losses) related to interest rate derivatives expected to be reclassified from AOCI to interest expense for
the year ending December 31, 2019 are $(19) million for Southern Company and immaterial for all other registrants. Deferred gains
and losses related to interest rate derivatives are expected to be amortized into earnings through 2046 for the Southern Company
parent entity, 2035 for Alabama Power, 2037 for Georgia Power, 2028 for Mississippi Power, and 2046 for Southern Company Gas.
Foreign Currency Derivatives
Southern Company and certain subsidiaries, including Southern Power, may enter into foreign currency derivatives to hedge
exposure to changes in foreign currency exchange rates, such as that arising from the issuance of debt denominated in a currency
other than U.S. dollars. Derivatives related to forecasted transactions are accounted for as cash flow hedges where the derivatives'
fair value gains or losses are recorded in OCI and are reclassified into earnings at the same time and on the same income statement
line as the earnings effect of the hedged transactions, including foreign currency gains or losses arising from changes in the U.S.
currency exchange rates. The derivatives employed as hedging instruments are structured to minimize ineffectiveness.
At December 31, 2018, the following foreign currency derivatives were outstanding:
 Pay NotionalPay RateReceive
NotionalReceive RateHedge
Maturity DateFair Value
Gain (Loss) at
December 31,
2018
 (in millions) (in millions)  (in millions)
Cash Flow Hedges of Existing Debt   
Southern Power $ 677 2.95% € 600 1.00% June 2022 $ 25
Southern Power 564 3.78% 500 1.85% June 2026 27
Total $ 1,241 € 1,100 $ 52
The estimated pre-tax gains (losses) related to Southern Power's foreign currency derivatives that will be reclassified from AOCI to
earnings for the year ending December 31, 2019 are $(23) million.
II-409
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Derivative Financial Statement Presentation and Amounts
Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas enter into derivative
contracts that may contain certain provisions that permit intra-contract netting of derivative receivables and payables for routine
billing and offsets related to events of default and settlements. Southern Company and certain subsidiaries also utilize master
netting agreements to mitigate exposure to counterparty credit risk. These agreements may contain provisions that permit netting
across product lines and against cash collateral. The fair value amounts of derivative assets and liabilities on the balance sheets are
presented net to the extent that there are netting arrangements or similar agreements with the counterparties.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the fair value of energy-related derivatives, interest rate derivatives, and foreign currency
derivatives was reflected in the balance sheets as follows:
 2018 2017
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet Location Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities
 (in millions)
Southern Company   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 8$ 23$ 10$ 43
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 9 26 7 24
Assets held for sale, current/Liabilities held for sale, current — 6 — —
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 17$ 55$ 17$ 67
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash flow
and fair value hedges   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 3$ 7$ 3$ 14
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 1 2 — —
Interest rate derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities — 19 1 4
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities — 30 — 34
Foreign currency derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities — 23 — 23
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 75 — 129 —
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash
flow and fair value hedges $ 79$ 81$ 133$ 75
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 561$ 575$ 380$ 437
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 180 325 170 215
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 741$ 900$ 550$ 652
Gross amounts recognized $ 837$ 1,036$ 700$ 794
Gross amounts offset(a)$ (524)$ (801)$ (405)$ (598)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets(b)$ 313$ 235$ 295$ 196
II-410
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet Location Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities
 (in millions)
Alabama Power   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 3$ 4$ 2$ 6
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 3 6 2 4
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 6$ 10$ 4$ 10
Gross amounts recognized $ 6$ 10$ 4$ 10
Gross amounts offset $ (4)$ (4)$ (4)$ (4)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets $ 2$ 6$ —$ 6
Georgia Power   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 2$ 8$ 2$ 9
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 4 13 4 10
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 6$ 21$ 6$ 19
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash flow
and fair value hedges  
Interest rate derivatives:  
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ —$ 2$ —$ 4
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities — — — 1
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash
flow and fair value hedges $ —$ 2$ —$ 5
Gross amounts recognized $ 6$ 23$ 6$ 24
Gross amounts offset $ (6)$ (6)$ (6)$ (6)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets $ —$ 17$ —$ 18
II-411
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet Location Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities
 (in millions)
Mississippi Power   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 1$ 3$ 1$ 6
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 2 6 1 3
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 3$ 9$ 2$ 9
Gross amounts recognized $ 3$ 9$ 3$ 9
Gross amounts offset $ (2)$ (2)$ (2)$ (2)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets $ 1$ 7$ 1$ 7
Southern Power   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash flow
and fair value hedges   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ 3$ 6$ 3$ 11
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 1 2 — —
Foreign currency derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities — 23 — 23
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 75 — 129 —
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash
flow and fair value hedges $ 79$ 31$ 132$ 34
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other current assets/Other current liabilities $ —$ —$ —$ 2
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ —$ —$ —$ 2
Gross amounts recognized $ 79$ 31$ 132$ 36
Gross amounts offset $ (3)$ (3)$ (3)$ (3)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets $ 76$ 28$ 129$ 33
II-412
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 2018 2017
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet Location Assets Liabilities Assets Liabilities
 (in millions)
Southern Company Gas   
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments for regulatory
purposes   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Assets from risk management activities/Liabilities from risk
management activities-current $ 2$ 8$ 5$ 8
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities — 1 — —
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments for
regulatory purposes $ 2$ 9$ 5$ 8
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash flow
and fair value hedges   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Assets from risk management activities/Liabilities from risk
management activities-current $ —$ 1$ —$ 3
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments in cash
flow and fair value hedges $ —$ 1$ —$ 3
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments   
Energy-related derivatives:   
Assets from risk management activities/Liabilities from risk
management activities-current $ 559$ 574$ 379$ 434
Other deferred charges and assets/Other deferred credits and
liabilities 180 325 170 215
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 739$ 899$ 549$ 649
Gross amounts recognized $ 741$ 909$ 554$ 660
Gross amounts offset(a)$ (508)$ (785)$ (390)$ (583)
Net amounts recognized in the Balance Sheets (b)$ 233$ 124$ 164$ 77
(a)Gross amounts offset include cash collateral held on deposit in broker margin accounts of $277 million and $193 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
(b)Net amounts of derivative instruments outstanding exclude premium and intrinsic value associated with weather derivatives of $8 million and $11 million at
December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Energy-related derivatives not designated as hedging instruments were immaterial for Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi
Power, and Southern Power at December 31, 2018 and 2017.
II-413
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the pre-tax effects of unrealized derivative gains (losses) arising from energy-related derivative
instruments designated as regulatory hedging instruments and deferred were as follows:
Regulatory Hedge Unrealized Gain (Loss) Recognized in the Balance Sheet at December 31, 2018
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet
LocationSouthern
CompanyAlabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company Gas
 (in millions)
Energy-related derivatives:   
Other regulatory assets, current $ (19)$ (3)$ (6)$ (2)$ (8)
Other regulatory assets, deferred (16) (3) (9) (4) —
Assets held for sale, current (6) — — — —
Other regulatory liabilities, current 1 — — — 1
Total energy-related derivative gains
(losses) $ (40)$ (6)$ (15)$ (6)$ (7)
Regulatory Hedge Unrealized Gain (Loss) Recognized in the Balance Sheet at December 31, 2017
Derivative Category and Balance Sheet
LocationSouthern
Company(*)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
PowerSouthern
Company
Gas(*)
 (in millions)
Energy-related derivatives:    
Other regulatory assets, current $ (34)$ (4)$ (7)$ (5)$ (4)
Other regulatory assets, deferred (18) (3) (6) (2) —
Other regulatory liabilities, current 7 1 — — 7
Other regulatory liabilities, deferred 1 — — — —
Total energy-related derivative gains (losses)$ (44)$ (6)$ (13)$ (7)$ 3
(*)Fair value gains and losses recorded in regulatory assets and liabilities include cash collateral held on deposit in broker margin accounts of $6 million at
December 31, 2017.
For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016, the pre-tax effects of cash flow hedge accounting on AOCI for the
applicable registrants were as follows:
Gain (Loss) Recognized in OCI on Derivative 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Southern Company   
Energy-related derivatives $ 17$ (47)$ 18
Interest rate derivatives (1) (2) (180)
Foreign currency derivatives (78) 140 (58)
Total $ (62)$ 91$ (220)
Southern Power   
Energy-related derivatives $ 10$ (38)$ 14
Foreign currency derivatives (78) 140 (58)
Total $ (68)$ 102$ (44)
II-414
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Successor  Predecessor
Gain (Loss) Recognized in OCI on DerivativeYear Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016 January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Southern Company Gas    
Energy-related derivatives $ 7$ (9)$ 2  $ —
Interest rate derivatives — — (5) (64)
Total $ 7$ (9)$ (3) $ (64)
For all years presented, the pre-tax effects of energy-related derivatives and interest rate derivatives designated as cash flow
hedging instruments on AOCI were immaterial for the other registrants. In addition, for the years ended December 31, 2017 and
2016, there was no material ineffectiveness recorded in earnings for any registrant. Upon the adoption of ASU 2017-12, beginning
in 2018, ineffectiveness was no longer separately measured and recorded in earnings. See Note 1 for additional information.
II-415
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The pre-tax effects of cash flow and fair value hedge accounting on income for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and
2016 were as follows:
Location and Amount of Gain (Loss) Recognized in Income on Cash
Flow and Fair Value Hedging Relationships 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Southern Company  
Total cost of natural gas $ 1,539$ 1,601$ 613
Gain (loss) on energy-related cash flow hedges(a)2 (2) (1)
Total depreciation and amortization 3,131 3,010 2,502
Gain (loss) on energy-related cash flow hedges(a)7 (16) 2
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (1,842) (1,694) (1,317)
Gain (loss) on interest rate cash flow hedges(a)(21) (21) (18)
Gain (loss) on foreign currency cash flow hedges(a)(24) (23) (13)
Gain (loss) on interest rate fair value hedges(b)(12) (22) (21)
Total other income (expense), net 114 163 50
Gain (loss) on foreign currency cash flow hedges(a)(c)(60) 160 (82)
Alabama Power  
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized $ (323)$ (305)$ (302)
Gain (loss) on interest rate cash flow hedges(a)(6) (6) (6)
Georgia Power  
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized $ (397)$ (419)$ (388)
Gain (loss) on interest rate cash flow hedges(a)(4) (4) (4)
Gain (loss) on interest rate fair value hedges(b)2 (3) (1)
Mississippi Power  
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized $ (76)$ (42)$ (74)
Gain (loss) on interest rate cash flow hedges(a)(2) (2) 3
Southern Power  
Total depreciation and amortization $ 493$ 503$ 352
Gain (loss) on energy-related cash flow hedges(a)7 (17) 2
Total interest expense, net of amounts capitalized (183) (191) (117)
Gain (loss) on foreign currency cash flow hedges(a)(24) (23) (13)
Total other income (expense), net 23 1 6
Gain (loss) on foreign currency cash flow hedges(a)(c)(60) 159 (82)
(a)Reclassified from AOCI into earnings.
(b)For fair value hedges, changes in the fair value of the derivative contracts are generally equal to changes in the fair value of the underlying debt and have no
material impact on income.
(c)The reclassification from AOCI into other income (expense), net completely offsets currency gains and losses arising from changes in the U.S. currency
exchange rates used to record the euro-denominated notes.
II-416
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Successor  Predecessor
Location and Amount of Gain (Loss)
Recognized in Income on Cash Flow and Fair
Value Hedging RelationshipsYear Ended
December 31,
2018Year Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016 January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
(in millions)  (in millions)
Southern Company Gas  
Total cost of natural gas $ 1,539$ 1,601$ 613 $ 755
Gain (loss) on energy-related cash flow hedges(*)2 (2) (1) (1)
(*)Amounts reflect gains or losses on cash flow hedges that were reclassified from AOCI into earnings.
The pre-tax effects of cash flow hedge accounting on income for interest rate derivatives were immaterial for all other registrants
for all years presented.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the following amounts were recorded on the balance sheets related to cumulative basis
adjustments for fair value hedges:
 Carrying Amount of the Hedged
ItemCumulative Amount of Fair Value
Hedging Adjustment included in Carrying
Amount of the Hedged Item
Balance Sheet Location of Hedged ItemsAt December 31,
2018At December 31,
2017At December 31,
2018At December 31,
2017
 (in millions) (in millions)
Southern Company    
Securities due within one year $ (498)$ (746)$ 2$ 3
Long-term debt (2,052) (2,553) 41 35
Georgia Power    
Securities due within one year $ (498)$ (746)$ 2$ 3
Long-term debt — (498) — 1
The pre-tax effects of energy-related derivatives not designated as hedging instruments on the statements of income for the years
ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 for the applicable registrants were as follows:
Gain (Loss)
Derivatives in Non-Designated
Hedging RelationshipsStatements of Income
Location 2018 2017 2016
(in millions)
Southern Company    
Energy-related derivatives Natural gas revenues(*)$ (122) $ (80)$ 33
 Cost of natural gas (6) (2) 3
 Wholesale electric revenues 2 (4) 2
Total derivatives in non-designated hedging relationships $ (126)$ (86)$ 38
(*)Excludes the impact of weather derivatives recorded in natural gas revenues of $5 million, $23 million, and $6 million for the years ended December 31, 2018,
2017, and 2016, respectively, as they are accounted for based on intrinsic value rather than fair value.
II-417
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Gain (Loss)
 Successor  Predecessor
Derivatives in Non-
Designated Hedging
RelationshipsStatements of
Income LocationFor the Year
Ended
December 31,
2018For the Year
Ended
December 31,
2017July 1, 2016
through
December 31, 2016  January 1, 2016
through
June 30, 2016
  (in millions)  (in millions)
Southern Company Gas      
Energy-related
derivativesNatural gas
revenues(*)$ (122)$ (80)$ 33 $ (1)
Cost of natural gas (6) (2) 3 (62)
Total derivatives in non-designated hedging
relationships $ (128)$ (82)$ 36 $ (63)
(*)Excludes the impact of weather derivatives recorded in natural gas revenues of $5 million and $23 million for the successor years ended December 31, 2018 and
2017, respectively, $6 million for the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, and $3 million for the predecessor period of January 1, 2016
through June 30, 2016, as they are accounted for based on intrinsic value rather than fair value.
The pre-tax effects of energy-related derivatives and interest rate derivatives not designated as hedging instruments were
immaterial for all other registrants for all years presented.
Contingent Features
Southern Company, the traditional electric operating companies, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas do not have any
credit arrangements that would require material changes in payment schedules or terminations as a result of a credit rating
downgrade. There are certain derivatives that could require collateral, but not accelerated payment, in the event of various credit
rating changes of certain Southern Company subsidiaries. At December 31, 2018, the registrants had no collateral posted with
derivative counterparties to satisfy these arrangements.
For the registrants with interest rate derivatives at December 31, 2018, the fair value of interest rate derivative liabilities with
contingent features and the maximum potential collateral requirements arising from the credit-risk-related contingent features, at a
rating below BBB- and/or Baa3, was immaterial. At December 31, 2018, the fair value of energy-related derivative liabilities with
contingent features and the maximum potential collateral requirements arising from the credit-risk-related contingent features, at a
rating below BBB- and/or Baa3, were immaterial for all registrants. The maximum potential collateral requirements arising from
the credit-risk-related contingent features for the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power include certain
agreements that could require collateral in the event that one or more Southern Company power pool participants has a credit rating
change to below investment grade. Following the sale of Gulf Power to NextEra Energy, Gulf Power is continuing to participate in
the Southern Company power pool for a defined transition period that, subject to certain potential adjustments, is scheduled to end
on January 1, 2024.
Generally, collateral may be provided by a Southern Company guaranty, letter of credit, or cash. If collateral is required, fair value
amounts recognized for the right to reclaim cash collateral or the obligation to return cash collateral are not offset against fair value
amounts recognized for derivatives executed with the same counterparty.
Alabama Power and Southern Power maintain accounts with certain regional transmission organizations to facilitate financial
derivative transactions. Based on the value of the positions in these accounts and the associated margin requirements, Alabama
Power and Southern Power may be required to post collateral. At December 31, 2018, cash collateral posted in these accounts was
immaterial. Southern Company Gas maintains accounts with brokers or the clearing houses of certain exchanges to facilitate
financial derivative transactions. Based on the value of the positions in these accounts and the associated margin requirements,
Southern Company Gas may be required to deposit cash into these accounts. At December 31, 2018, cash collateral held on deposit
in broker margin accounts was $277 million.
The registrants are exposed to losses related to financial instruments in the event of counterparties' nonperformance. The registrants
only enter into agreements and material transactions with counterparties that have investment grade credit ratings by Moody's and
S&P or with counterparties who have posted collateral to cover potential credit exposure. The registrants have also established risk
management policies and controls to determine and monitor the creditworthiness of counterparties in order to mitigate their
exposure to counterparty credit risk. Prior to entering into a physical transaction, Southern Company Gas assigns physical
wholesale counterparties an internal credit rating and credit limit based on the counterparties' Moody's, S&P, and Fitch ratings,
commercially available credit reports, and audited financial statements. Southern Company Gas may require counterparties to
pledge additional collateral when deemed necessary.
II-418
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
In addition, Southern Company Gas conducts credit evaluations and obtains appropriate internal approvals for the counterparty's
line of credit before any transaction with the counterparty is executed. In most cases, the counterparty must have an investment
grade rating, which includes a minimum long-term debt rating of Baa3 from Moody's and BBB- from S&P. Generally, Southern
Company Gas requires credit enhancements by way of a guaranty, cash deposit, or letter of credit for transaction counterparties that
do not have investment grade ratings.
Southern Company Gas also utilizes master netting agreements whenever possible to mitigate exposure to counterparty credit risk.
When Southern Company Gas is engaged in more than one outstanding derivative transaction with the same counterparty and it
also has a legally enforceable netting agreement with that counterparty, the "net" mark-to-market exposure represents the netting of
the positive and negative exposures with that counterparty and a reasonable measure of Southern Company Gas' credit risk.
Southern Company Gas also uses other netting agreements with certain counterparties with whom it conducts significant
transactions. Master netting agreements enable Southern Company Gas to net certain assets and liabilities by counterparty.
Southern Company Gas also nets across product lines and against cash collateral provided the master netting and cash collateral
agreements include such provisions. Southern Company Gas may require counterparties to pledge additional collateral when
deemed necessary.
The registrants do not anticipate a material adverse effect on their respective financial statements as a result of counterparty
nonperformance.
15. ACQUISITIONS AND DISPOSITIONS
Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas
On July 1, 2016, Southern Company completed the Merger for a total purchase price of approximately $8.0 billion and Southern
Company Gas became a wholly-owned, direct subsidiary of Southern Company. At the effective time of the Merger, each share of
Southern Company Gas common stock, other than certain excluded shares, was converted into the right to receive $66 in cash,
without interest. Also at the effective time of the Merger, all of the outstanding Southern Company Gas RSUs, restricted stock
awards, non-employee director stock awards, stock options, and PSUs were either redeemed or converted into Southern Company
RSUs. See Note 12 for additional information.
The application of the acquisition method of accounting was pushed down to Southern Company Gas. The excess of the purchase
price over the fair values of Southern Company Gas' assets and liabilities was recorded as goodwill, which represents a different
basis of accounting from Southern Company Gas' historical basis prior to the Merger. The following table presents the final
purchase price allocation:
 Southern
Company Gas
Successor  Southern
Company Gas
Predecessor  
Southern Company Gas Purchase Price New Basis  Old Basis  Change in Basis
 (in millions)  (in millions)
Current assets $ 1,557 $ 1,474 $ 83
Property, plant, and equipment 10,108 10,148 (40)
Goodwill 5,967 1,813 4,154
Other intangible assets 400 101 299
Regulatory assets 1,118 679 439
Other assets 229 273 (44)
Current liabilities (2,201) (2,205) 4
Other liabilities (4,742) (4,600) (142)
Long-term debt (4,261) (3,709) (552)
Contingently redeemable noncontrolling interest (174) (41) (133)
Total purchase price $ 8,001 $ 3,933 $ 4,068
II-419
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company Gas' Results of Operations and Pro Forma Financial Information
The results of operations for Southern Company Gas have been included in Southern Company's consolidated financial statements
from the date of acquisition and consisted of operating revenues of $1.7 billion and net income of $114 million in 2016.
The following summarized unaudited pro forma consolidated statement of earnings information assumes that the acquisition of
Southern Company Gas was completed on January 1, 2015. The summarized unaudited pro forma consolidated statement of
earnings information includes adjustments for (i) intercompany sales, (ii) amortization of intangible assets, (iii) adjustments to
interest expense to reflect current interest rates on Southern Company Gas debt and additional interest expense associated with
borrowings by Southern Company to fund the Merger, and (iv) the elimination of nonrecurring expenses associated with the
Merger.
 2016
Operating revenues (in millions) $ 21,791
Net income attributable to Southern Company (in millions) $ 2,591
Basic EPS $ 2.70
Diluted EPS $ 2.68
These unaudited pro forma results are for comparative purposes only and may not be indicative of the results that would have
occurred had this acquisition been completed on January 1, 2015 or the results that would be attained in the future.
Southern Company Acquisition of PowerSecure
In May 2016, Southern Company acquired all of the outstanding stock of PowerSecure for $18.75 per common share in cash,
resulting in an aggregate purchase price of $429 million. As a result, PowerSecure became a wholly-owned subsidiary of Southern
Company.
The acquisition of PowerSecure was accounted for using the acquisition method of accounting with the assets acquired and
liabilities assumed recognized at fair value as of the acquisition date. The following table presents the final purchase price
allocation:
PowerSecure Purchase Price  
 (in millions)
Current assets $ 172
Property, plant, and equipment 46
Intangible assets 106
Goodwill 284
Other assets 4
Current liabilities (121)
Long-term debt, including current portion (48)
Deferred credits and other liabilities (14)
Total purchase price $ 429
The results of operations for PowerSecure have been included in Southern Company's consolidated financial statements from the
date of acquisition and are immaterial to the consolidated financial results of Southern Company. Pro forma results of operations
have not been presented for the acquisition because the effects of the acquisition were immaterial to Southern Company's
consolidated financial results for all periods presented.
Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power
On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed the sale of all of the capital stock of Gulf Power to 700 Universe, LLC, a
wholly-owned subsidiary of NextEra Energy, for an aggregate cash purchase price of approximately $5.8 billion (less $1.3 billion
of indebtedness assumed), subject to customary working capital adjustments.
II-420
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The assets and liabilities of Gulf Power are classified as assets held for sale and liabilities held for sale on Southern Company's
balance sheet as of December 31, 2018. See "Assets Held for Sale" herein for additional information.
Southern Power
During 2018 and 2017, Southern Power or one of its wholly-owned subsidiaries acquired or completed construction of the facilities
discussed below. Acquisition-related costs were expensed as incurred and were not material for any of the years presented.
Acquisitions During the Year Ended December 31, 2018
During 2018, Southern Power acquired and completed the project below and acquired the Wild Horse Mountain and Reading wind
facilities discussed under "Construction Projects Completed and/or in Progress" below.
Project Facility Resour ceSeller , Acquisition DateAppr oximate
Nameplate
Capacity
(MW) LocationOwnership
PercentageActual
CODPPA Contract
Period
Gaskell West 1 Solar Recurrent Ener gy
Development Holdings,
LLC,
January 26, 201820 Kern County , CA 100% of
Class B(*) March
201820 years
(*)Southern Power owns 100% of the class B membership interests under a tax equity partnership.
The Gaskell West 1 facility did not have operating revenues or activities prior to being placed in service during March 2018.
Acquisitions During the Year Ended December 31, 2017
The following table presents Southern Power's acquisition activity for the year ended December 31, 2017.
Project Facility Resour ceSeller , Acquisition DateAppr oximate
Nameplate
Capacity
(MW) LocationOwnership
PercentageActual
CODPPA Contract
Period
Bethel Wind Invener gy Wind Global
LLC,
January 6, 2017276 Castro County , TX 100%
 January
201712 years
Cactus Flats(*)WindRES America
Developments, Inc.,
July 31, 2017148 Concho County , TX 100%
 July 2018 12 years and
15 years
(*)On July 31, 2017, Southern Power purchased 100% of the Cactus Flats facility. In August 2018, Southern Power closed on a tax equity partnership and owns
100% of the class B membership interests.
Southern Power's aggregate purchase price for acquisitions during the year ended December 31, 2017 was $539 million. The fair
values of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed were finalized in 2017 and recorded as follows:
 2017
 (in millions)
Restricted cash $ 16
CWIP 534
Other assets 5
Accounts payable (16)
Total purchase price $ 539
In 2017, total revenues of $15 million and net income of $17 million, primarily as a result of PTCs, were recognized in the
consolidated statements of income by Southern Power related to the 2017 acquisitions. The Bethel facility did not have operating
revenues or activities prior to completion of construction and being placed in service, and the Cactus Flats facility was still under
construction. Therefore, supplemental pro forma information as though the acquisitions occurred as of the beginning of 2017 is not
meaningful and has been omitted.
II-421
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Construction Projects Completed and/or in Progress
During 2018, in accordance with its growth strategy, Southern Power started, continued, or completed construction of the projects
set forth in the table below. Total aggregate construction costs, excluding the acquisition costs, are expected to be between $575
million and $640 million for the Plant Mankato expansion, Wild Horse Mountain, and Reading facilities. At December 31, 2018,
construction costs included in CWIP related to these projects totaled $289 million, except for the Plant Mankato expansion which is
classified as assets held for sale in the financial statements. The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this
time.
Project
Facility ResourceApproximate
Nameplate
Capacity (MW) LocationActual/Expected
COD PPA CounterpartiesPPA Contract
Period
Construction Pr ojects Completed During the Year Ended December  31, 2018
Cactus Flats(a)Wind 148 Concho County , TX July 2018 General Motors, LLC
and
General Mills Operations,
LLC12 years
and
15 years
Projects Under  Construction at December  31, 2018
Mankato
expansion(b)Natural Gas 385 Mankato, MN Second quarter
2019Northern States Power
Company20 years
Wild Horse
Mountain(c)Wind 100 Pushmataha County ,
OKFourth quarter
2019Arkansas Electric
Cooperative20 years
Reading(d)Wind 200 Osage and L yon
Counties, KSSecond quarter
2020Royal Caribbean Cruises
LTD12 years
(a)In July 2017, Southern Power purchased 100% of the Cactus Flats facility. In August 2018, Southern Power closed on a tax equity partnership and now owns
100% of the class B membership interests.
(b)In November 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement to sell all of its equity interests in Plant Mankato, including this expansion currently under
construction. See "Sales of Natural Gas Plants" below.
(c)In May 2018, Southern Power purchased 100% of the Wild Horse Mountain facility. Southern Power may enter into a tax equity partnership, in which case it
would then own 100% of the class B membership interests. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
(d)In August 2018, Southern Power purchased 100% of the membership interests of the Reading facility from the joint development arrangement with Renewable
Energy Systems Americas, Inc. described below. Southern Power may enter into a tax equity partnership, in which case it would then own 100% of the class B
membership interests. The ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Development Projects
During 2017, Southern Power purchased wind turbine equipment to be used for various development and construction projects.
Any wind projects using this equipment and reaching commercial operation by the end of 2021 are expected to qualify for 80%
PTCs.
During 2016, Southern Power entered into a joint development agreement with Renewable Energy Systems Americas, Inc. (RES)
to develop and construct wind projects. Concurrent with the agreement, Southern Power purchased wind turbine equipment from
Siemens Wind Power, Inc. and Vestas-American Wind Technology, Inc. to be used for construction of these projects. Several wind
projects using this equipment, as well as other purchased equipment, have successfully originated, directly or indirectly, from the
partnership with RES and are expected to reach commercial operation before the end of 2020, thus qualifying for 100% PTCs.
Southern Power continues to evaluate and refine the deployment of the wind turbine equipment to potential joint development and
construction projects as well as the amount of MW capacity to be constructed. During the third quarter 2018, as a result of a review
of various options for probable dispositions of wind turbine equipment not deployed to development or construction projects,
Southern Power recorded a $36 million asset impairment charge on the equipment.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018 and as part of management's continuous review of disposition options, approximately $53
million of this equipment is being marketed for sale and will be classified as held for sale.
The ultimate outcome of these matters cannot be determined at this time.
Sales of Renewable Facility Interests
On May 22, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling 33% equity interest in SP Solar, a limited partnership
indirectly owning substantially all of Southern Power's solar facilities, to Global Atlantic for approximately $1.2 billion. Since
Southern Power retains control of the limited partnership through its wholly-owned general partner, the sale was recorded as an
II-422
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
equity transaction and Southern Power will continue to consolidate SP Solar in its financial statements. On the date of the
transaction, the noncontrolling interest was increased by $511 million to reflect 33% of the carrying value of the partnership. This
difference, partially offset by the tax impact and other related transaction charges, also resulted in a $410 million decrease to
Southern Power's common stockholder's equity.
On December 11, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of a noncontrolling tax equity interest in SP Wind, which owns a
portfolio of eight operating wind facilities, to three financial investors for approximately $1.2 billion. Since Southern Power retains
control of SP Wind, it will continue to consolidate SP Wind in its financial statements. The tax equity investors together will
generally receive 40% of the cash distributions from available cash and will receive a 99% allocation of tax attributes, including
future PTCs.
Sales of Natural Gas Plants
On December 4, 2018, Southern Power completed the sale of all of its equity interests in the Florida Plants to NextEra Energy for
$203 million. In contemplation of this sale transaction, Southern Power recorded an asset impairment charge of approximately $119
million ($89 million after tax) in May 2018.
On November 5, 2018, Southern Power entered into an agreement with Northern States Power to sell all of its equity interests in
Plant Mankato (including the 385-MW expansion currently under construction) for an aggregate purchase price of approximately
$650 million. The completion of the disposition is subject to the expansion unit reaching commercial operation as well as various
other customary conditions to closing, including working capital and timing adjustments. The ultimate purchase price will decrease
$66,667 per day for each day after June 1, 2019 that the expansion has not achieved commercial operation, not to exceed $15
million. This transaction is subject to FERC and state commission approvals and is expected to close in mid-2019. The assets and
liabilities of Plant Mankato are classified as assets held for sale and liabilities held for sale on Southern Company's and Southern
Power's balance sheet as of December 31, 2018. See "Assets Held for Sale" herein for additional information. The ultimate
outcome of this matter cannot be determined at this time.
Southern Company Gas
See "Southern Company Merger with Southern Company Gas" herein for information regarding the Merger.
Investment in SNG
In 2016, Southern Company Gas, through a wholly-owned, indirect subsidiary, acquired a 50% equity interest in SNG from Kinder
Morgan, Inc. for $1.4 billion. SNG owns a 7,000-mile pipeline system connecting natural gas supply basins in Texas, Louisiana,
Mississippi, and Alabama to markets in Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, Georgia, South Carolina, and Tennessee. The
purchase price exceeded the underlying ownership interest in the net assets of SNG by approximately $700 million. This basis
difference was attributable to goodwill and deferred tax assets. While the deferred tax assets will be amortized through deferred tax
expense, the goodwill will not be amortized and is not required to be tested for impairment on an annual basis.
In March 2017, Southern Company Gas made an additional $50 million contribution to maintain its 50% equity interest in SNG.
See Note 7 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information on this investment.
Southern Company Gas' investment in SNG decreased by $104 million at December 31, 2017 related to the impact of the Tax
Reform Legislation and new income tax apportionment factors in several states resulting from Southern Company Gas' inclusion in
the consolidated Southern Company state tax filings.
Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions
On June 4, 2018, Southern Company Gas completed the stock sale of Pivotal Home Solutions to American Water Enterprises LLC
for a total cash purchase price of $365 million, which includes the final working capital adjustment. This disposition resulted in a
net loss of $67 million, which includes $34 million of income tax expense. In contemplation of the transaction, a goodwill
impairment charge of $42 million was recorded during the first quarter 2018. The income tax expense included tax on goodwill not
deductible for tax purposes and for which a deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. Southern Company Gas and
American Water Enterprises LLC entered into a transition services agreement whereby Southern Company Gas provided certain
administrative and operational services through November 4, 2018.
Sale of Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas
On July 1, 2018, a Southern Company Gas subsidiary, Pivotal Utility Holdings, completed the sales of the assets of two of its
natural gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas and Elkton Gas, to South Jersey Industries, Inc. for a total cash purchase price
II-423
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
of $1.7 billion, which includes the final working capital and other adjustments. This disposition resulted in a pre-tax gain that was
entirely offset by $205 million of income tax expense, resulting in no material net income impact. The income tax expense included
tax on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for which a deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. Southern
Company Gas and South Jersey Industries, Inc. entered into transition services agreements whereby Southern Company Gas will
provide certain administrative and operational services through no later than July 31, 2020.
Sale of Florida City Gas
On July 29, 2018, Southern Company Gas and its wholly-owned direct subsidiary, NUI Corporation, completed the stock sale of
Pivotal Utility Holdings, which primarily consisted of Florida City Gas, to NextEra Energy for a total cash purchase price of $587
million, which includes the final working capital adjustment. This disposition resulted in a net gain of $16 million, which includes
$103 million of income tax expense. The income tax expense included tax on goodwill not deductible for tax purposes and for
which a deferred tax liability had not been recorded previously. Southern Company Gas and NextEra Energy entered into a
transition services agreement whereby Southern Company Gas will provide certain administrative and operational services through
no later than July 29, 2020.
Assets Held for Sale
As discussed previously, Southern Company and Southern Power each have assets and liabilities held for sale on their balance
sheets at December 31, 2018. Assets and liabilities held for sale have been classified separately on each company's balance sheet at
the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell at the time the criteria for held-for-sale classification were met. For assets
and liabilities held for sale recorded at fair value on a nonrecurring basis, the fair value of assets held for sale is based primarily on
unobservable inputs (Level 3), which includes the agreed upon sales prices in executed sales agreements.
Upon classification as held for sale in May 2018 for the Florida Plants and November 2018 for Plant Mankato, Southern Power
ceased recognizing depreciation on the property, plant, and equipment to be sold. The Florida Plants sale was completed on
December 4, 2018. Since the depreciation of the assets sold in the Gulf Power transaction continued to be reflected in customer
rates through the closing date and was reflected in the carryover basis of the assets when sold, Southern Company continued to
record depreciation on those assets through the date the transaction closed. Likewise, since the depreciation of the assets sold in the
Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and Florida City Gas transactions continued to be reflected in customer rates and was reflected in
the carryover basis of the assets when sold, Southern Company Gas continued to record depreciation on those assets through the
respective date that each transaction closed.
The following table provides Southern Company's and Southern Power's major classes of assets and liabilities classified as held for
sale at December 31, 2018:
 Southern
CompanySouthern
Power
 (in millions)
Assets Held for Sale:   
Current assets $ 393$ 8
Total property, plant, and equipment 4,623 576
Other non-current assets 727 —
Total Assets Held for Sale $ 5,743$ 584
Liabilities Held for Sale:   
Current liabilities $ 425$ 15
Long-term debt 1,286 —
Accumulated deferred income taxes 618 —
Other non-current liabilities 932 —
Total Liabilities Held for Sale $ 3,261$ 15
Southern Company, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas each concluded that the asset sales, both individually and
combined, did not represent a strategic shift in operations that has, or is expected to have, a major effect on its operations and
financial results; therefore, none of the assets related to the sales have been classified as discontinued operations for any of the
periods presented.
II-424
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Gulf Power and the Florida Plants represent individually significant components of Southern Company and Southern Power,
respectively; therefore, pre-tax income for these components for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 are presented
below:
 2018 2017 2016
 (in millions)
Earnings (loss) before income taxes:   
Gulf Power $ 140$ 229$ 231
Southern Power's Florida Plants(*)$ 49$ 37$ 37
(*)Earnings before income taxes for the Florida Plants in 2018 represents the period from January 1, 2018 to December 4, 2018 (the divestiture date).
16. SEGMENT AND RELATED INFORMATION
Southern Company
The primary businesses of the Southern Company system are electricity sales by the traditional electric operating companies and
Southern Power and the distribution of natural gas by Southern Company Gas. The traditional electric operating companies –
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power (through December 31, 2018), and Mississippi Power – are vertically integrated
utilities providing electric service in four Southeastern states. On January 1, 2019, Southern Company completed its sale of Gulf
Power to NextEra Energy. Southern Power develops, constructs, acquires, owns, and manages power generation assets, including
renewable energy projects, and sells electricity at market-based rates in the wholesale market. Southern Company Gas distributes
natural gas through its natural gas distribution utilities and is involved in several other complementary businesses including gas
pipeline investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services. In July 2018, Southern Company Gas completed sales of
three of its natural gas distribution utilities. See Note 15 for additional information regarding disposition activities.
Southern Company's reportable business segments are the sale of electricity by the traditional electric operating companies, the sale
of electricity in the competitive wholesale market by Southern Power, and the sale of natural gas and other complementary products
and services by Southern Company Gas. Revenues from sales by Southern Power to the traditional electric operating companies
were $435 million, $392 million, and $419 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. Revenues from sales of natural gas from
Southern Company Gas to the traditional electric operating companies and Southern Power were $32 million and $119 million,
respectively, in 2018, $23 million and $119 million, respectively, in 2017, and $11 million and $17 million, respectively, in 2016.
The "All Other" column includes the Southern Company parent entity, which does not allocate operating expenses to business
segments. Also, this category includes segments below the quantitative threshold for separate disclosure. These segments include
providing energy technologies and services to electric utilities and large industrial, commercial, institutional, and municipal
customers, as well as investments in telecommunications and leveraged lease projects. All other inter-segment revenues are not
material.
II-425
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Financial data for business segments and products and services for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 was as
follows:
 Electric Utilities    
 Traditional
Electric
Operating
CompaniesSouthern
Power Eliminations TotalSouthern
Company
GasAll
Other Eliminations Consolidated
 (in millions)
2018       
Operating r evenues $ 16,843 $2,205 $ (477)$18,571 $ 3,909 $1,213 $ (198)$ 23,495
Depr eciation and amortization 2,072 493 — 2,565 500 66 — 3,131
Inter est income 23 8 — 31 4 8 (5) 38
Earnings fr om equity method
investments (1) — — (1) 148 2 (1) 148
Inter est expense 852 183 — 1,035 228 580 (1) 1,842
Income taxes (benefit) 371 (164) — 207 464 (222) — 449
Segment net income (loss)(a)(b)(c)(d)2,117 187 — 2,304 372 (453) 3 2,226
Goodwill — 2 2 5,015 298 — 5,315
Total assets 79,382 14,883 (306)93,959 21,448 3,285 (1,778 ) 116,914
Gross pr operty additions 6,077 315 — 6,392 1,399 414 — 8,205
2017       
Operating revenues $ 16,884 $2,075 $ (419)$18,540 $ 3,920 $741 $ (170)$ 23,031
Depreciation and amortization 1,954 503 — 2,457 501 52 — 3,010
Interest income 14 7 — 21 3 11 (9) 26
Earnings from equity method
investments 1 — — 1 106 (1) — 106
Interest expense 820 191 — 1,011 200 490 (7) 1,694
Income taxes (benefit) 1,021 (939) — 82 367 (307) — 142
Segment net income (loss)(a)(b)(e)(f)(193) 1,071 — 878 243 (279) — 842
Goodwill — 2 — 2 5,967 299 — 6,268
Total assets 72,204 15,206 (325)87,085 22,987 2,552 (1,619 ) 111,005
Gross property additions 3,836 268 — 4,104 1,525 355 — 5,984
2016       
Operating revenues $ 16,803 $1,577 $ (439)$17,941 $ 1,652 $463 $ (160)$ 19,896
Depreciation and amortization 1,881 352 — 2,233 238 31 — 2,502
Interest income 6 7 — 13 2 20 (15) 20
Earnings from equity method
investments 2 — — 2 60 (3) — 59
Interest expense 814 117 — 931 81 317 (12) 1,317
Income taxes (benefit) 1,286 (195) — 1,091 76 (216) — 951
Segment net income (loss)(a)(b)2,233 338 — 2,571 114 (230) (7) 2,448
Goodwill — 2 — 2 5,967 282 — 6,251
Total assets 72,141 15,169 (316)86,994 21,853 2,474 (1,624 ) 109,697
Gross property additions 4,852 2,114 — 6,966 618 41 (1) 7,624
(a)Attributable to Southern Company.
(b)Segment net income (loss) for the traditional electric operating companies includes pre-tax charges for estimated losses on plants under construction of $1.1
billion ($722 million after tax) in 2018, $3.4 billion ($2.4 billion after tax) in 2017, and $428 million ($264 million after tax) in 2016. See Note 2 under
"Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" and "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility – Schedule and Cost Estimate" for additional information.
(c)Segment net income (loss) for Southern Power includes pre-tax impairment charges of $156 million ($117 million after tax) in 2018. See Note 15 under
"Southern Power – Development Projects" and " – Sales of Natural Gas Plants" for additional information.
(d)Segment net income (loss) for Southern Company Gas includes a net gain on dispositions of $291 million ($51 million loss after tax) in 2018 related to the
Southern Company Gas Dispositions and a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million in 2018 related to the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See Note 15 under
"Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
(e)Segment net income (loss) for the traditional electric operating companies includes a pre-tax charge for the write-down of Gulf Power's ownership of Plant
Scherer Unit 3 of $33 million ($20 million after tax) in 2017. See Note 2 under "Southern Company – Gulf Power" for additional information.
(f)Segment net income (loss) includes income tax expense of $367 million for the traditional electric operating companies, income tax benefit of $743 million for
Southern Power, and income tax expense of $93 million for Southern Company Gas in 2017 related to the Tax Reform Legislation.
II-426
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Products and Services
Electric Utilities' Revenues
Year Retail  Wholesale  Other Total
 (in millions)
2018 $ 15,222 $ 2,516 $ 833 $ 18,571
2017 15,330 2,426 784 18,540
2016 15,234 1,926 781 17,941
Southern Company Gas' Revenues
YearGas
Distribution
OperationsGas
Marketing
Services All Other Total
 (in millions)
2018 $ 3,155 $ 568 $ 186 $ 3,909
2017 3,024 860 36 3,920
2016 1,266 354 32 1,652
Southern Company Gas
Southern Company Gas manages its business through four reportable segments - gas distribution operations, gas pipeline
investments, wholesale gas services, and gas marketing services. The non-reportable segments are combined and presented as all
other. During 2018, Southern Company Gas changed its reportable segments to further align the way its new Chief Operating
Decision Maker reviews operating results and has reclassified prior years' data to conform to the new reportable segment
presentation. This change resulted in a new reportable segment, gas pipeline investments, which was formerly included in gas
midstream operations.
Gas distribution operations is the largest component of Southern Company Gas' business and includes natural gas local distribution
utilities that construct, manage, and maintain intrastate natural gas pipelines and gas distribution facilities in four states. In July
2018, Southern Company Gas sold three of its natural gas distribution utilities, Elizabethtown Gas, Elkton Gas, and Florida City
Gas. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
Gas pipeline investments consists of joint ventures in natural gas pipeline investments including a 50% interest in SNG, two
significant pipeline construction projects, and a 50% joint ownership interest in the Dalton Pipeline. These natural gas pipelines
enable the provision of diverse sources of natural gas supplies to the customers of Southern Company Gas. See Notes 5 and 7 for
additional information.
Wholesale gas services provides natural gas asset management and/or related logistics services for each of Southern Company Gas'
utilities except Nicor Gas as well as for non-affiliated companies. Additionally, wholesale gas services engages in natural gas
storage and gas pipeline arbitrage and related activities.
Gas marketing services provides natural gas marketing to end-use customers primarily in Georgia and Illinois through SouthStar.
On June 4, 2018, Southern Company Gas sold Pivotal Home Solutions, which provided home equipment protection products and
services. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas – Sale of Pivotal Home Solutions" for additional information.
The all other column includes segments below the quantitative threshold for separate disclosure, including the storage and fuels
operations, which was formerly included in gas midstream operations, and the other subsidiaries that fall below the quantitative
threshold for separate disclosure.
After the Merger, Southern Company Gas changed the segment performance measure to net income, which is utilized by its parent
company. In order to properly assess net income by segment, Southern Company Gas executed various intercompany note
agreements to revise interest charges to its segments. Since such agreements did not exist in the predecessor period, Southern
Company Gas is unable to provide the comparable net income for that period.
II-427
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Financial data for business segments for the successor years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, the successor period of July 1,
2016 through December 31, 2016, and the predecessor period of January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016 were as follows:
 Gas
Distribution
Operations(a)(b)Gas Pipeline
InvestmentsWholesale
Gas
Services(c)Gas
Marketing
Services(b)(d) Total All Other Eliminations Consolidated
 (in millions)
Successor  – Year ended December  31, 2018     
Operating r evenues $ 3,186 $ 32 $ 144 $ 568  $3,930 $ 55 $ (76) $ 3,909
Depr eciation and
amortization 409 5 2 37 453 47 — 500
Operating income (loss) 904 20 70 19 1,013 (98) — 915
Earnings fr om equity
method investments — 145 — — 145 3 — 148
Inter est expense (178) (34) (9) (6) (227) (1) — (228)
Income taxes (benefit) 409 28 4 54 495 (31) — 464
Segment net income
(loss) 334 103 38 (40) 435 (63) — 372
Gross pr operty
additions 1,429 32 — 6 1,467 54 — 1,521
Successor  – Total assets
at December  31, 2018 17,266 1,763 1,302 1,587  21,918 11,112 (11,582 ) 21,448
Successor – Year ended December 31, 2017     
Operating revenues $ 3,207 $ 17 $ 6 $ 860  $4,090 $ 64 $ (234) $ 3,920
Depreciation and
amortization 391 2 2 62 457 44 — 501
Operating income (loss) 645 10 (51) 113 717 (57) — 660
Earnings from equity
method
investments — 103 — — 103 3 — 106
Interest expense (153) (26) (7) (5) (191) (9) — (200)
Income taxes(e)178 109 — 24 311 56 — 367
Segment net income (loss)
(e) 353 (22) (57) 84 358 (115) — 243
Gross property additions 1,330 117 1 9 1,457 51 — 1,508
Successor – Total assets
at December 31, 2017 19,358 1,699 1,096 2,147  24,300 12,726 (14,039 ) 22,987
Successor – July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016     
Operating revenues $ 1,342 $ 3 $ 24 $ 354  $1,723 $ 31 $ (102) $ 1,652
Depreciation and
 amortization 185 — 1 35 221 17 — 238
Operating income (loss) 225 1 (2) 27 251 (52) — 199
Earnings from equity
method
investments — 58 — — 58 2 — 60
Interest expense (105) (10) (3) (1) (119) 38 — (81)
Income taxes (benefit) 51 21 (3) 7 76 — — 76
Segment net income (loss) 77 29 — 19 125 (11) — 114
Gross property additions 561 51 1 5 618 14 — 632
Successor – Total assets
at December 31, 2016 19,453 1,659 1,127 2,084  24,323 11,697 (14,167 ) 21,853
II-428
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
 Gas
Distribution
Operations(a)(b)Gas Pipeline
Investments Wholesale
Gas
Services(c)Gas
Marketing
Services(b)(d) Total All
Other Eliminations Consolidated
 (in millions)
Predecessor – January 1, 2016 through June 30, 2016   
Operating revenues $ 1,575 $ 3 $ (32)$ 435 $1,981  $26 $ (102) $ 1,905
Depreciation and
 amortization 178 — 1 11 190  16 — 206
Operating income (loss) 353 3 (69) 109 396  (73) — 323
EBIT 353 3 (68) 109 397  (69) — 328
Gross property additions 484 40 1 4 529  19 — 548
(a)Operating revenues for the three gas distribution operations dispositions were $244 million, $399 million, and $168 million for the successor years ended
December 31, 2018 and 2017 and the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, respectively, and $215 million for the predecessor
period ended June 30, 2016. See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
(b)Segment net income for gas distribution operations includes a gain on dispositions of $324 million ($16 million after tax) for the year ended December 31,
2018. Segment net income for gas marketing services includes a loss on disposition of $(33) million ($(67) million loss after tax) and a goodwill impairment
charge of $42 million for the year ended December 31, 2018 recorded in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions. See Note 15 under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information.
(c)The revenues for wholesale gas services are netted with costs associated with its energy and risk management activities. A reconciliation of operating revenues
and intercompany revenues is shown in the following table.
 Third Party
Gross
RevenuesIntercompany
Revenues  Total Gross
RevenuesLess Gross
Gas Costs Operating
Revenues
 (in millions)
Successor – Year Ended
December 31, 2018 $ 6,955$ 451 $ 7,406$ 7,262 $ 144
Successor – Year Ended
December 31, 2017 6,152 481 6,633 6,627 6
Successor – July 1, 2016 through
December 31, 2016 5,807 333 6,140 6,116 24
Predecessor – January 1, 2016 through
June 30, 2016 2,500 143 2,643 2,675 (32)
(d)Operating revenues for the gas marketing services disposition were $55 million, $129 million, and $56 million for the successor years ended December 31, 2018
and 2017 and the successor period of July 1, 2016 through December 31, 2016, respectively, and $64 million for the predecessor period ended June 30, 2016
See Note 15 under "Southern Company Gas" for additional information.
(e)Includes the impact of the Tax Reform Legislation and new income tax apportionment factors in several states resulting from Southern Company Gas' inclusion
in the consolidated Southern Company state tax filings.
II-429
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
17. QUARTERLY FINANCIAL INFORMATION (UNAUDITED)
The tables below provide summarized quarterly financial information for each registrant for 2018 and 2017. Each registrant's
business is influenced by seasonal weather conditions.
Quarter EndedSouthern
Company(a)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
Power(b)Mississippi
Power(c)Southern
Power(d)Southern
Company
Gas(e)
 (in millions)
March 2018      
Operating Revenues $ 6,372$ 1,473$ 1,961$ 302$ 509$ 1,639
Operating Income (Loss) 1,376 372 513 7 60 388
Net Income (Loss) 936 225 352 (7) 115 279
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 938 225 352 (7) 121 279
      
June 2018      
Operating Revenues $ 5,627$ 1,503$ 2,048$ 297$ 555$ 730
Operating Income (Loss) 63 380 (472) 54 16 49
Net Income (Loss) (127) 259 (396) 46 45 (31)
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant (154) 259 (396) 46 22 (31)
      
September 2018      
Operating Revenues $ 6,159$ 1,740$ 2,593$ 358$ 635$ 492
Operating Income (Loss) 2,174 561 991 80 136 374
Net Income (Loss) 1,222 373 664 47 146 46
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 1,164 373 664 47 92 46
      
December 2018      
Operating Revenues $ 5,337$ 1,316$ 1,818$ 308$ 506$ 1,048
Operating Income (Loss) 578 164 257 52 30 104
Net Income (Loss) 269 73 173 149 (60) 78
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 278 73 173 149 (48) 78
(a)See notes (b), (c), (d), and (e) below.
(b)Georgia Power recorded an estimated probable loss of $1.1 billion in the second quarter 2018 to reflect its revised estimate to complete construction and start-up
of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4. See Note 2 under "Georgia Power – Nuclear Construction" for additional information.
(c)As a result of the abandonment and related closure activities for the mine and gasifier-related assets at the Kemper County energy facility, Mississippi Power
recorded total pre-tax charges to income of $44 million ($33 million after tax) in the first quarter 2018, immaterial amounts in the second and third quarters
2018, and a pre-tax credit to income of $9 million in the fourth quarter 2018. In addition, Mississippi Power recorded a credit to earnings of $95 million in the
fourth quarter 2018 primarily resulting from the reduction of a valuation allowance for a state income tax NOL carryforward associated with the Kemper County
energy facility. See Note 2 under "Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" and Note 10 for additional information.
(d)Southern Power recorded pre-tax impairment charges of $119 million ($89 million after tax) in the second quarter 2018 in contemplation of the sale of the
Florida Plants and $36 million ($27 million after tax) in the third quarter 2018 related to wind turbine equipment. See Note 15 under "Southern Power – Sales of
Natural Gas Plants" and " – Development Projects" for additional information. As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, Southern Power recorded income tax
expense of $75 million in the fourth quarter 2018. See Note 10 for additional information.
(e)Southern Company Gas recorded a goodwill impairment charge of $42 million in the first quarter 2018 in contemplation of the sale of Pivotal Home Solutions.
Southern Company Gas also recorded gains (losses) on dispositions in the second, third, and fourth quarters 2018 of $(36) million pre-tax and $(76) million
after tax, $353 million pre-tax and $40 million after tax, and $(27) million pre-tax and $(15) million after tax, respectively. See Note 15 under "Southern
Company Gas" for additional information.
II-430
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Quarter EndedSouthern
     Company(a)(b)(c)Alabama
PowerGeorgia
PowerMississippi
Power(a)(b)Southern
Power(b)Southern
Company
Gas(b)
 (in millions)
March 2017     
Operating Revenues $ 5,771$ 1,382$ 1,832$ 272$ 450$ 1,560
Operating Income (Loss) 1,252 361 483 (64) 65 389
Net Income (Loss) 665 174 260 (20) 66 239
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 658 174 260 (20) 70 239
     
June 2017     
Operating Revenues $ 5,430$ 1,484$ 2,048$ 303$ 529$ 716
Operating Income (Loss) (1,649) 440 621 (2,956) 112 95
Net Income (Loss) (1,348) 230 347 (2,054) 104 49
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant (1,381) 230 347 (2,054) 82 49
     
September 2017     
Operating Revenues $ 6,201$ 1,740$ 2,546$ 341$ 618$ 565
Operating Income (Loss) 1,991 601 1,017 49 159 67
Net Income (Loss) 1,109 325 580 40 154 15
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 1,069 325 580 40 124 15
     
December 2017     
Operating Revenues $ 5,629$ 1,433$ 1,884$ 271$ 478$ 1,079
Operating Income (Loss) 739 255 452 (180) 32 109
Net Income (Loss) 500 119 227 (556) 793 (60)
Net Income (Loss)
Attributable to Registrant 496 119 227 (556) 795 (60)
(a)As a result of revisions to the cost estimate for the Kemper IGCC and the project's June 2017 suspension, Mississippi Power recorded total pre-tax charges to
income related to the Kemper IGCC of $108 million ($67 million after tax) in the first quarter 2017, $3.0 billion ($2.1 billion after tax) in the second quarter
2017, $34 million ($21 million after tax) in the third quarter 2017, and $208 million ($185 million after tax) in the fourth quarter 2017. See Note 2 under
"Mississippi Power – Kemper County Energy Facility" for additional information.
(b)As a result of the Tax Reform Legislation, the Southern Company system recorded a total income tax benefit of $264 million in the fourth quarter 2017,
comprised primarily of income tax expense of $372 million recorded at Mississippi Power, income tax benefit of $743 million recorded at Southern Power, and
income tax expense of $93 million recorded at Southern Company Gas. See Note 10 for additional information.
(c)Gulf Power recorded a pre-tax charge of $33 million ($20 million after tax) for the write-down of its ownership in Plant Scherer Unit 3 in the first quarter 2017.
See Note 2 under "Southern Company – Gulf Power" for additional information.
II-431
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
COMBINED NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (continued)
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
Southern Company
The table below provides quarterly per share financial information for Southern Company common stock for 2018 and 2017.
 Per Common Share
 Basic
EarningsDiluted
Earnings  Quarter Ended Dividends
   
March 2018 $ 0.93$ 0.92 $ 0.5800
June 2018 (0.15) (0.15) 0.6000
September 2018 1.14 1.13 0.6000
December 2018 0.27 0.27 0.6000
   
March 2017 $ 0.66$ 0.66 $ 0.5600
June 2017 (1.38) (1.37) 0.5800
September 2017 1.07 1.06 0.5800
December 2017 0.49 0.49 0.5800
II-432
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 9.CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
Item 9A.CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures.
As of the end of the period covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K, Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power,
Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas conducted separate evaluations under the supervision and with the
participation of each company's management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the
effectiveness of the design and operation of the disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended). Based upon these evaluations, the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief
Financial Officer, in each case, concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures are effective.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting.
(a) Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting.
 Page
Southern Company II-434
Alabama Power II-435
Georgia Power II-436
Mississippi Power II-437
Southern Power II-438
Southern Company Gas II-439
(b) Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm.
The report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Southern Company's independent registered public accounting firm, regarding Southern
Company's Internal Control over Financial Reporting is included in Item 8 herein of this Form 10-K. This report is not applicable to
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas as these companies are not
accelerated filers or large accelerated filers.
(c) Changes in internal control over financial reporting.
There have been no changes in Southern Company's, Alabama Power's, Georgia Power's, Mississippi Power's, Southern Power's, or
Southern Company Gas' internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) during the fourth quarter 2018 that have materially affected or are reasonably
likely to materially affect Southern Company's, Alabama Power's, Georgia Power's, Mississippi Power's, Southern Power's, or
Southern Company Gas' internal control over financial reporting.
II-433
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The management of Southern Company is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Southern Company's internal control over
financial reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that
Southern Company's internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2018.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, as auditors of Southern Company's financial statements, has issued an attestation report on the
effectiveness of Southern Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, which is included herein.
/s/ Thomas A. Fanning
Thomas A. Fanning
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Andrew W. Evans
Andrew W. Evans
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
February 19, 2019
II-434
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Alabama Power Company 2018 Annual Report
The management of Alabama Power is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Alabama Power's internal control over financial
reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that Alabama Power's
internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2018.
/s/ Mark A. Crosswhite
Mark A. Crosswhite
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Philip C. Raymond
Philip C. Raymond
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2019
II-435
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Georgia Power Company 2018 Annual Report
The management of Georgia Power is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Georgia Power's internal control over financial
reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that Georgia Power's
internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2018.
/s/ W. Paul Bowers
W. Paul Bowers
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Xia Liu
Xia Liu
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2019
II-436
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Mississippi Power Company 2018 Annual Report
The management of Mississippi Power is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Mississippi Power's internal control over
financial reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that
Mississippi Power's internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2018.
/s/ Anthony L. Wilson
Anthony L. Wilson
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Moses H. Feagin
Moses H. Feagin
Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2019
II-437
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The management of Southern Power is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over
financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control system
can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Southern Power's internal control over financial
reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that Southern Power's
internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2018.
/s/ Mark S. Lantrip
Mark S. Lantrip
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ William C. Grantham
William C. Grantham
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2019
II-438
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies 2018 Annual Report
The management of Southern Company Gas is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control
over financial reporting as required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). A control
system can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the control system are met.
Under management's supervision, an evaluation of the design and effectiveness of Southern Company Gas' internal control over
financial reporting was conducted based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this evaluation, management concluded that
Southern Company Gas' internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2018.
/s/ Kimberly S. Greene
Kimberly S. Greene
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
/s/ Daniel S. Tucker
Daniel S. Tucker
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
February 19, 2019
II-439
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
Item 9B.OTHER INFORMATION
Georgia Power is disclosing the information below in this Item 9B in lieu of filing a Current Report on Form 8-K.
Amendments to the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
As previously reported, on September 26, 2018, Georgia Power entered into a binding term sheet with the other Vogtle Owners and
MEAG's wholly-owned subsidiaries MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC (MEAG SPVJ), MEAG Power SPVM, LLC (MEAG SPVM), and
MEAG Power SPVP, LLC (MEAG SPVP) to take certain actions which partially mitigate potential financial exposure for the other
Vogtle Owners (Vogtle Owner Term Sheet).
On February 18, 2019, Georgia Power, the other Vogtle Owners, MEAG SPVJ, MEAG SPVM, and MEAG SPVP entered into
certain amendments to the joint ownership agreements for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 (Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements) to
implement the provisions of the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet (Global Amendments).
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the Vogtle Joint Ownership Agreements
were modified as follows: (i) each Vogtle Owner must pay its proportionate share of qualifying construction costs for Plant Vogtle
Units 3 and 4 based on its ownership percentage up to the estimated cost at completion (EAC) for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 which
formed the basis of Georgia Power's forecast of $8.4 billion in the nineteenth VCM plus $800 million; (ii) Georgia Power will be
responsible for 55.7% of actual qualifying construction costs between $800 million and $1.6 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth
VCM (resulting in $80 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners responsible
for 44.3% of such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests; and (iii) Georgia Power will be responsible
for 65.7% of qualifying construction costs between $1.6 billion and $2.1 billion over the EAC in the nineteenth VCM (resulting in
a further $100 million of potential additional costs to Georgia Power), with the remaining Vogtle Owners responsible for 34.3% of
such costs pro rata in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
If the EAC is revised and exceeds the EAC in the nineteenth VCM by more than $2.1 billion, each of the other Vogtle Owners will
have a one-time option at the time the project budget forecast is so revised to tender a portion of its ownership interest to Georgia
Power in exchange for Georgia Power's agreement to pay 100% of such Vogtle Owner's remaining share of total construction costs
in excess of the EAC in the nineteenth VCM plus $2.1 billion. In this event, Georgia Power will have the option of cancelling the
project in lieu of purchasing a portion of the ownership interest of any other Vogtle Owner. If Georgia Power accepts the offer to
purchase a portion of another Vogtle Owner's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, the ownership interest(s) to be
conveyed from the tendering Vogtle Owner(s) to Georgia Power will be calculated based on the proportion of the cumulative
amount of construction costs paid by each such tendering Vogtle Owner(s) and by Georgia Power as of the COD of Plant Vogtle
Unit 4. For purposes of this calculation, payments made by Georgia Power on behalf of another Vogtle Owner in accordance with
the second and third items described in the paragraph above will be treated as payments made by the applicable Vogtle Owner.
In the event the actual costs of construction at completion of a Unit are less than the EAC reflected in the nineteenth VCM report
and such Unit is placed in service in accordance with the schedule projected in the nineteenth VCM report (i.e., Plant Vogtle Unit 3
is placed in service by November 2021 or Plant Vogtle Unit 4 is placed in service by November 2022), Georgia Power will be
entitled to 60.7% of the cost savings with respect to the relevant Unit and the remaining Vogtle Owners will be entitled to 39.3% of
such savings on a pro rata basis in accordance with their respective ownership interests.
For purposes of the foregoing provisions, qualifying construction costs will not include costs (i) resulting from force majeure
events, including governmental actions or inactions (or significant delays associated with issuance of such actions) that affect the
licensing, completion, start-up, operations, or financing of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, administrative proceedings or litigation
regarding ITAAC or other regulatory challenges to commencement of operation of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, and changes in laws
or regulations governing Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4, (ii) legal fees and legal expenses incurred due to litigation with contractors or
subcontractors that are not subsidiaries or affiliates of Southern Company, and (iii) additional costs caused by requests from the
Vogtle Owners other than Georgia Power, except for the exercise of a right to vote granted under the Vogtle Joint Ownership
Agreements, that increase costs by $100,000 or more.
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, the provisions of the Vogtle Joint
Ownership Agreements requiring that Vogtle Owners holding 90% of the ownership interests in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 vote to
continue construction following certain adverse events (Project Adverse Events) were also modified. In particular, an increase in
the construction cost estimate for Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 no longer constitutes a Project Adverse Event and thus would no
longer require a vote. In addition, the Project Adverse Event relating to disallowances of cost recovery by Georgia Power now
excludes any additional amounts paid by Georgia Power on behalf of the other Vogtle Owners pursuant to the provisions of the
Global Amendments described above and the first 6% of costs during any six-month VCM reporting period that are disallowed by
the Georgia PSC for recovery, or for which Georgia Power elects not to seek cost recovery, through retail rates. Further, the Global
Amendments provide that Georgia Power may cancel the project at any time in its sole discretion.
II-440
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
The Global Amendments provide that if the holders of at least 90% of the ownership interests fail to vote in favor of continuing the
project following any future Project Adverse Event, work on Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 will continue for a period of 30 days if the
holders of more than 50% of the ownership interests vote in favor of continuing construction (Majority Voting Owners). In such a
case, the Vogtle Owners (i) have agreed to negotiate in good faith towards the resumption of the project, (ii) if no agreement is
reached during such 30-day period, the project will be cancelled, and (iii) in the event of such a cancellation, the Majority Voting
Owners will be obligated to reimburse any other Vogtle Owner for the incremental costs it incurred during such 30-day negotiation
period.
Purchase of PTCs During Commercial Operation
Pursuant to the Global Amendments, and consistent with the Vogtle Owner Term Sheet, Georgia Power has agreed to purchase
additional PTCs from OPC, Dalton, MEAG SPVM, MEAG SPVP, and MEAG SPVJ (to the extent any MEAG SPVJ PTC rights
remain after any purchases required under Georgia Power's agreement with MEAG and MEAG SPVJ to provide funding with
respect to MEAG SPVJ's ownership interest in Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 under certain circumstances) at varying purchase prices
dependent upon the actual cost to complete construction of Plant Vogtle Units 3 and 4 as compared to the EAC reflected in the
nineteenth VCM report. The purchases are at the option of the applicable Vogtle Owner. The purchases will occur during the month
after such PTCs are earned and will be at the following purchase prices: (i) 88% of face value if the actual cost remains at or below
the EAC projected in the nineteenth VCM report; (ii) 91% of face value if the actual cost increases by no more than $299 million
over the EAC projected in the nineteenth VCM report; (iii) 95% of face value if the actual cost increases at least $300 million but
less than $600 million over the EAC in the nineteenth VCM report; and (iv) 98% of face value if the actual cost increases by $600
million or more over the EAC in the nineteenth VCM report.
II-441
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
PART III
Items 10 (other than the information under "Code of Ethics" below), 11, 12, 13, and 14 for Southern Company are incorporated by
reference to Southern Company's Definitive Proxy Statement relating to the 2019 Annual Meeting of Stockholders. Specifically,
reference is made to "Corporate Governance at Southern Company" and "Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting
Compliance" for Item 10, "Compensation Discussion and Analysis," "Executive Compensation Tables," and "Director
Compensation" for Item 11, "Stock Ownership Information," "Executive Compensation Tables," and "Equity Compensation Plan
Information" for Item 12, "Southern Company Board" for Item 13, and "Principal Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
Fees" for Item 14.
Items 10 (other than the information under "Code of Ethics" below), 11, 12, 13, and 14 for Alabama Power are incorporated by
reference to the Definitive Information Statement of Alabama Power relating to its 2019 Annual Meeting of Shareholders.
Specifically, reference is made to "Nominees for Election as Directors," "Corporate Governance," and "Section 16(a) Beneficial
Ownership Reporting Compliance" for Item 10, "Executive Compensation," "Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider
Participation," "Director Compensation," "Director Deferred Compensation Plan," and "Director Compensation Table" for Item 11,
"Stock Ownership Table" and "Executive Compensation" for Item 12, "Certain Relationships and Related Transactions" and
"Director Independence" for Item 13, and "Principal Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm Fees" for Item 14.
Items 10, 11, 12, and 13 for each of Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas are omitted
pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(c) of Form 10-K. Item 14 for each of Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and
Southern Company Gas is contained herein.
ITEM 10.DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Code of Ethics
The registrants collectively have adopted a code of business conduct and ethics (Code of Ethics) that applies to each director,
officer, and employee of the registrants and their subsidiaries. The Code of Ethics can be found on Southern Company's website
located at www.southerncompany.com. The Code of Ethics is also available free of charge in print to any shareholder by requesting
a copy from Myra C. Bierria, Corporate Secretary, Southern Company, 30 Ivan Allen Jr. Boulevard NW, Atlanta, Georgia 30308.
Any amendment to or waiver from the Code of Ethics that applies to executive officers and directors will be posted on the website.
III-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
The following represents fees billed to Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and Southern Company Gas in 2018
and 2017 by Deloitte & Touche LLP, each company's principal public accountant:
 2018 2017
 (in thousands)
Georgia Power   
Audit Fees (1)$ 3,605$ 3,247
Audit-Related Fees (2)31 96
Tax Fees — —
All Other Fees (3) 8 1
Total $ 3,644$ 3,344
Mississippi Power   
Audit Fees (1)$ 1,371$ 1,537
Audit-Related Fees (2)79 6
Tax Fees — —
All Other Fees (3) — 8
Total $ 1,450$ 1,551
Southern Power   
Audit Fees (1)$ 1,795$ 1,778
Audit-Related Fees(4)1,017 439
Tax Fees — —
All Other Fees (3) 13 8
Total $ 2,825$ 2,225
Southern Company Gas   
Audit Fees (1)(5)$ 3,622$ 4,449
Audit-Related Fees (6)520 579
Tax Fees — —
All Other Fees (3)(7) 7 8
Total $ 4,149$ 5,036
(1)Includes services performed in connection with financing transactions.
(2)Represents non-statutory audit services in 2018 and 2017.
(3)Represents registration fees for attendance at Deloitte & Touche LLP-sponsored education seminars.
(4)Represents fees in connection with audits of Southern Power partnerships.
(5)Includes fees in connection with statutory audits of several Southern Company Gas subsidiaries.
(6)Represents fees for non-statutory audit services in 2018 and a review report on internal controls in 2018 and 2017.
(7)Includes subscription fees for Deloitte & Touche LLP's technical accounting research tool in 2017.
The Southern Company Audit Committee (on behalf of Southern Company and its subsidiaries) adopted a Policy of Engagement
of the Independent Auditor for Audit and Non-Audit Services that includes pre-approval requirements for the audit and non-audit
services provided by Deloitte & Touche LLP. All of the services provided by Deloitte & Touche LLP in fiscal years 2018 and 2017
and related fees were approved in advance by the Southern Company Audit Committee.
III-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
PART IV
Item 15.EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)The following documents are filed as a part of this report on Form 10-K:
(1)Financial Statements and Financial Statement Schedules:
Management's Reports on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting for Southern Company and Subsidiary
Companies, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power and Subsidiary Companies,
and Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies are listed under Item 9A herein.
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on the financial statements for Southern Company
and Subsidiary Companies, Alabama Power Company, Georgia Power Company, Mississippi Power Company,
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies, and Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies
are listed under Item 8 herein.
The financial statements filed as a part of this report for Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies,
Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power and Subsidiary Companies, and Southern
Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies are listed under Item 8 herein.
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on the financial statement schedules for Southern
Company and Subsidiary Companies, Alabama Power Company, Georgia Power Company, Mississippi Power
Company, Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies, and Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary
Companies are listed in the Index to the Financial Statement Schedules at page S-1.
The financial statement schedules for Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies, Alabama Power, Georgia
Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power and Subsidiary Companies, and Southern Company Gas and
Subsidiary Companies are listed in the Index to the Financial Statement Schedules at page S-1.
The financial statements of Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C. as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 and for
the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 and the four months ended December 31, 2016 are provided by
Southern Company Gas as separate financial statements of subsidiaries not consolidated pursuant to Rule 3-09
of Regulation S-X, and are incorporated by reference herein from Exhibit 99(g) hereto.
(2)Exhibits:
Exhibits for Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power, and
Southern Company Gas are listed in the Exhibit Index at page E-1.
Item 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
IV-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
INDEX TO FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
 Page
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on the Financial Statement Schedules S-2
Schedule II
Valuation and Qualifying Accounts and Reserves 2018, 2017, and 2016
The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies S-8
Alabama Power Company S-9
Georgia Power Company S-10
Mississippi Power Company S-11
Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies S-12
Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies S-13
Schedules I through V not listed above are omitted as not applicable or not required. Columns omitted from schedules filed have
been omitted because the information is not applicable or not required.
S-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of The Southern Company and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the consolidated financial statements of The Southern Company and subsidiary companies (Southern Company)
as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, and Southern
Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, and have issued our report thereon dated
February 19, 2019; such report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also included the financial statement schedule
of Southern Company (Page S-8) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement schedule is the responsibility of Southern
Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits. In our opinion, such financial statement
schedule, when considered in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents fairly, in all material respects, the
information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
S-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Alabama Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the financial statements of Alabama Power Company (Alabama Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The
Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018,
and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2019; such report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also
included the financial statement schedule of Alabama Power (Page S-9) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement
schedule is the responsibility of Alabama Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits. In
our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents
fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Birmingham, Alabama
February 19, 2019
S-3
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Georgia Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the financial statements of Georgia Power Company (Georgia Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The
Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018,
and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2019; such report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also
included the financial statement schedule of Georgia Power (Page S-10) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement
schedule is the responsibility of Georgia Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits. In
our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents
fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
S-4
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Mississippi Power Company
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the financial statements of Mississippi Power Company (Mississippi Power) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The
Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018,
and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2019; such report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Our audits also
included the financial statement schedule of Mississippi Power (Page S-11) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement
schedule is the responsibility of Mississippi Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits.
In our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents
fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
S-5
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Southern Power Company and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the consolidated financial statements of Southern Power Company and subsidiary companies (Southern Power) (a
wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2018, and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2019; such report is included elsewhere in
this Form 10-K. Our audits also included the financial statement schedule of Southern Power (Page S-12) listed in the Index at Item
15. This financial statement schedule is the responsibility of Southern Power's management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion based on our audits. In our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered in relation to the financial
statements taken as a whole, presents fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
S-6
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholder and the Board of Directors of Southern Company Gas and Subsidiary Companies
Opinion on the Financial Statement Schedule
We have audited the consolidated financial statements of Southern Company Gas and subsidiary companies (Southern Company
Gas) (a wholly-owned subsidiary of The Southern Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the six-month periods ended
June 30, 2016 (Predecessor) and December 31, 2016 (Successor), and have issued our report thereon dated February 19, 2019; such
report is included elsewhere in this Form 10-K. As indicated in that report, we did not audit the financial statements of Southern
Natural Gas Company, L.L.C. (SNG), Southern Company Gas' investment in which is accounted for by the use of the equity
method. Southern Company Gas' financial statements include its equity investment in SNG of $1,261 million and $1,262 million as
of December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, respectively, and its earnings from its equity method investment in SNG of $131
million, $88 million, and $56 million for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 and the six months ended December 31,
2016, respectively. Those statements were audited by other auditors whose report (which expresses an unqualified opinion on
SNG's financial statements and contains an emphasis of matter paragraph concerning the extent of its operations and relationships
with affiliated entities) have been furnished to us, and our opinion, insofar as it relates to the amounts included for SNG, is based
solely on the report of the other auditors. Our audits also included the financial statement schedule of Southern Company Gas (Page
S-13) listed in the Index at Item 15. This financial statement schedule is the responsibility of Southern Company Gas' management.
Our responsibility is to express an opinion based on our audits. In our opinion, such financial statement schedule, when considered
in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole, presents fairly, in all material respects, the information set forth therein.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
February 19, 2019
S-7
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
THE SOUTHERN COMPANY AND SUBSIDIARY COMPANIES
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018, 2017, AND 2016
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
  Additions    
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of PeriodCharged to
Income Charged to
Other
Accounts Acquisitions Deductions Reclassified to
Held for Sale(c) Balance at
End of
Period
Provision for
uncollectible accounts(a)       
2018 $ 44$ 69 $ (1) $ — $ 61 $ 1 $ 50
2017 43 56 — — 55 — 44
2016 13 40 (1) 41 50 — 43
Tax valuation allowance
(net state)(b)       
2018 $ 148$ (38) $ — $ — $ 10 $ — $ 100
2017 22 126 — — — — 148
2016 2 — — 20 — — 22
(a)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
(b)In 2017, Mississippi Power established a valuation allowance for the State of Mississippi net operating loss carryforward
expected to expire prior to being fully utilized. This valuation allowance was reduced in 2018 as a result of higher projected
state taxable income. In 2018, Georgia Power established a valuation allowance for certain Georgia state tax credits expected to
expire prior to being fully utilized, as a result of lower projected state taxable income. See Note 10 to the financial statements in
Item 8 herein for additional information.
(c)Represents provision for uncollectible accounts at Gulf Power presented on Southern Company's balance sheet at December 31,
2018 as assets held for sale, current. See Note 15 to the financial statements under "Southern Company's Sale of Gulf Power"
and "Assets Held for Sale" in Item 8 herein for additional information.
S-8
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
ALABAMA POWER COMPANY
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018, 2017, AND 2016
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
 Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of PeriodCharged to
Income  Charged to
Other
Accounts Deductions(*) Balance at
End of
Period
Provision for uncollectible accounts     
2018 $ 9 $ 13 $ — $ 12 $ 10
2017 10 10 — 11 9
2016 10 11 — 11 10
(*)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
S-9
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
GEORGIA POWER COMPANY
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018, 2017, AND 2016
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
  Additions  
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of Period Charged to
Income  Charged to
Other
Accounts Deductions Balance at
End of
Period
Provision for uncollectible accounts(a)   
2018 $ 3 $ 11 $ — $ 12 $ 2
2017 3 11 — 11 3
2016 2 15 — 14 3
Tax valuation allowance (net state)(b)   
2018 $ — $ 39 $ — $ 6 $ 33
2017 — — — — —
2016 — — — — —
(a)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
(b)In 2018, Georgia Power established a valuation allowance for certain Georgia state tax credits expected to expire prior to being
fully utilized, as a result of lower projected state taxable income. See Note 10 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for
additional information.
S-10
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MISSISSIPPI POWER COMPANY
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018, 2017, AND 2016
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
   Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of Period Charged to
IncomeCharged to
Other
Accounts Deductions Balance at
End of
Period
Provision for uncollectible accounts(a)    
2018 $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ 1 $ 1
2017 — 2 — 1 1
2016 — 1 — 1 —
Tax valuation allowance (net state)(b)    
2018 $ 124 $ (92) $ — $ — $ 32
2017 — 124 — — 124
2016 — — — — —
(a)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
(b)In 2017, Mississippi Power established a valuation allowance for the State of Mississippi net operating loss carryforward
expected to expire prior to being fully utilized. This valuation allowance was reduced in 2018 as a result of higher projected
state taxable income. See Note 10 to the financial statements in Item 8 herein for additional information.
S-11
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SOUTHERN POWER COMPANY AND SUBSIDIARY COMPANIES
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018, 2017, AND 2016
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
  Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of Period Charged to
IncomeCharged to
Other
Accounts DeductionsBalance at
End of
Period
Tax valuation allowance (net state)     
2018 $ 10 $ 12 $ — $ — $ 22
2017 — 10 — — 10
2016 — — — — —
S-12
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SOUTHERN COMPANY GAS AND SUBSIDIARY COMPANIES
SCHEDULE II — VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
FOR THE SUCCESSOR PERIODS OF JULY 1, 2016 THROUGH DECEMBER 31, 2016
AND THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018 AND 2017
AND THE PREDECESSOR PERIOD OF JANUARY 1, 2016 THROUGH JUNE 30, 2016
(Stated in Millions of Dollars)
  Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of PeriodCharged to
Income  Charged to
Other
Accounts DeductionsBalance at
End of
Period
Successor – December 31, 2018     
Provision for uncollectible accounts(*)$ 28 $ 33 $ (1) $ 30 $ 30
Income tax valuation allowance (net state) 11 1 — — 12
Successor – December 31, 2017     
Provision for uncollectible accounts(*)$ 27 $ 28 $ — $ 27 $ 28
Income tax valuation allowance (net state) 19 — — 8 11
Successor – December 31, 2016     
Provision for uncollectible accounts(*)$ 38 $ 9 $ (1) $ 19 $ 27
Income tax valuation allowance (net state) 19 — — — 19
Predecessor – June 30, 2016     
Provision for uncollectible accounts(*)$ 29 $ 16 $ 2 $ 9 $ 38
Income tax valuation allowance (net state) 19 — — — 19
(*)Deductions represent write-offs of accounts considered to be uncollectible, less recoveries of amounts previously written off.
S-13
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
EXHIBIT INDEX
The exhibits below with an asterisk (*) preceding the exhibit number are filed herewith. The remaining exhibits have previously
been filed with the SEC and are incorporated herein by reference. The exhibits marked with a pound sign (#) are management
contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements required to be identified as such by Item 15 of Form 10-K.
(2) Plan of acquisition, reorganization, arrangement, liquidation or succession
 Southern Company
  (a) 1 — Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Southern Company, AMS Corp., and
Southern Company Gas, dated August 23, 2015. (Designated in Form 8-K dated August 23,
2015, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 2.1.)
  (a) 2 — Stock Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 20, 2018, by and among Southern Company,
700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy. (Designated in Form 8-K dated May 23, 2018,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 2(a)1.)
 * (a) 3 — Amendment No. 1 to Stock Purchase Agreement, dated as of January 1, 2019, by and
among Southern Company, 700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy.**
  (a) 4 — Stock Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 20, 2018, by and among Southern Company
Gas, NUI Corporation, 700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy. (Designated in Form 8-K
dated May 23, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 2(a)2.)
  (a) 5 — Equity Interest Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 20, 2018, by and among Southern
Power Company, 700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy. (Designated in Form 8-K dated
May 23, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 2(a)3.)
 Southern Power
  (e) 1 — Equity Interest Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 20, 2018, by and among Southern
Power Company, 700 Universe, LLC, and NextEra Energy. See Exhibit 2(a)5 herein.
 Southern Company Gas
  (f) 1 — Agreement and Plan of Merger by and among Southern Company, AMS Corp., and
Southern Company Gas, dated August 23, 2015. See Exhibit 2(a)1 herein.
  (f) 2 — Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated as of July 10, 2016, among Kinder Morgan SNG
Operator LLC, Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C., and Southern Company.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated August 31, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 2.1a.)
  (f) 3 — Assignment, Assumption and Novation of Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated as of
August 31, 2016, between Southern Company and Evergreen Enterprise Holdings LLC.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated August 31, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 2.1b.)
   
(3) Articles of Incorporation and By-Laws
 Southern Company
 * (a) 1 — Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Southern Company, dated February 12, 2019.
  (a) 2 — By-laws of Southern Company as amended effective May 25, 2016, and as presently in
effect. (Designated in Form 8-K dated May 25, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 3.2.)
 Alabama Power
  (b) 1 — Charter of Alabama Power and amendments thereto through September 7, 2017.
(Designated in Registration Nos. 2-59634 as Exhibit 2(b), 2-60209 as Exhibit 2(c), 2-60484
as Exhibit 2(b), 2-70838 as Exhibit 4(a)-2, 2-85987 as Exhibit 4(a)-2, 33-25539 as Exhibit
4(a)-2, 33-43917 as Exhibit 4(a)-2, in Form 8-K dated February 5, 1992, File No. 1-3164,
as Exhibit 4(b)-3, in Form 8-K dated July 8, 1992, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4(b)-3, in
Form 8-K dated October 27, 1993, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibits 4(a) and 4(b), in Form 8-K
dated November 16, 1993, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4(a), in Certificate of Notification,
File No. 70-8191, as Exhibit A, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1997, File
No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 3(b)2, in Form 8-K dated August 10, 1998, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.4, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2000, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 3(b)2, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 3(b)2, in Form 8-K dated February 5, 2003, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.4, in
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, File No 1-3164, as Exhibit 3(b)1, in
Form 8-K dated February 5, 2004, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2006, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 3(b)(1), in Form 8-K dated
December 5, 2006, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated September 12, 2007,
File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.5, in Form 8-K dated October 17, 2007, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.5, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2008, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 3(b)1, and in Form 8-K dated September 5, 2017, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.1.)
E-1
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 (b)
 2
 — Amended and Restated By-laws of Alabama Power effective February 10, 2014, and as
presently in effect. (Designated in Form 8-K dated February 10, 2014, File No 1-3164, as
Exhibit 3.1.)
 Georgia Power
 (c)
 1
 — Charter of Georgia Power and amendments thereto through October 9, 2007. (Designated
in Registration Nos. 2-63392 as Exhibit 2(a)-2, 2-78913 as Exhibits 4(a)-(2) and 4(a)-(3),
2-93039 as Exhibit 4(a)-(2), 2-96810 as Exhibit 4(a)-2, 33-141 as Exhibit 4(a)-(2), 33-1359
as Exhibit 4(a)(2), 33-5405 as Exhibit 4(b)(2), 33-14367 as Exhibits 4(b)-(2) and 4(b)-(3),
33-22504 as Exhibits 4(b)-(2), 4(b)-(3) and 4(b)-(4), in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1991, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibits 4(a)(2) and 4(a)(3), in Registration
No. 33-48895 as Exhibits 4(b)-(2) and 4(b)-(3), in Form 8-K dated December 10, 1992,
File No. 1-6468 as Exhibit 4(b), in Form 8-K dated June 17, 1993, File No. 1-6468, as
Exhibit 4(b), in Form 8-K dated October 20, 1993, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4(b),
in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1997, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 3(c)2, in
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2000, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 3(c)2, in
Form 8-K dated June 27, 2006, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 3.1, and in Form 8-K dated
October 3, 2007, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.5.)
 (c)
 2
 — By-laws of Georgia Power as amended effective November 9, 2016, and as presently in
effect. (Designated in Form 8-K dated November 9, 2016, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 3.1.)
 Mississippi Power
 (d)
 1
 — Articles of Incorporation of Mississippi Power, articles of merger of Mississippi Power
Company (a Maine corporation) into Mississippi Power and articles of amendment to the
articles of incorporation of Mississippi Power through April 2, 2004. (Designated in
Registration No. 2-71540 as Exhibit 4(a)-1, in Form U5S for 1987, File No. 30-222-2, as
Exhibit B-10, in Registration No. 33-49320 as Exhibit 4(b)-(1), in Form 8-K dated
August 5, 1992, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibits 4(b)-2 and 4(b)-3, in Form 8-K dated
August 4, 1993, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4(b)-3, in Form 8-K dated August 18, 1993,
File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4(b)-3, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
1997, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 3(e)2, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2000, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 3(e)2, and in Form 8-K dated March 3, 2004, File
No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4.6.)
 (d)
 2
 — By-laws of Mississippi Power as amended effective July 1, 2017, and as presently in effect.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, File No. 001-11229, as
Exhibit 3(e).)
 Southern Power
 (e)
 1
 — Certificate of Incorporation of Southern Power Company dated January 8, 2001.
(Designated in Registration No. 333-98553 as Exhibit 3.1.)
 (e)
 2
 — By-laws of Southern Power Company effective January 8, 2001. (Designated in
Registration No. 333-98553 as Exhibit 3.2.)
 Southern Company Gas
 (f)
 1
 — Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of Southern Company Gas dated July 11,
2016. (Designated in Form 8-K dated July 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 3.1.)
 (f)
 2
 — By-laws of Southern Company Gas effective July 11, 2016. (Designated in Form 8-K dated
July 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 3.2.)
    
E-2
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
(4) Instruments Describing Rights of Security Holders, Including Indentures
 With respect to each of Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power
Company, and Southern Company Gas, such registrant has excluded certain instruments with respect to long-term
debt that does not exceed 10% of the total assets of such registrant and its subsidiaries. Each such registrant agrees,
upon request of the SEC, to furnish copies of any or all such instruments to the SEC.
 Southern Company
  (a)
 1
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 2007, between Southern Company and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and certain indentures supplemental thereto
through August 17, 2018. (Designated in Form 8-K dated January 11, 2007, File No. 1-
3526, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated August 21, 2013, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2,
in Form 8-K dated August 19, 2014, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated
June 9, 2015, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-
3526, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(c), in Form 8-K
dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(d), in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016,
File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(e), in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 4.2(f), in Form 8-K dated May 19, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.2(g), in
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4(a)2, and in
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4(a)1.)
  (a)
 2
 — Subordinated Note Indenture dated as of October 1, 2015, between The Southern Company
and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and indentures supplemental
thereto through November 22, 2017. (Designated in Form 8-K dated October 1, 2015, File
No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.3, in Form 8-K dated October 1, 2015, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
4.4, in Form 8-K dated September 12, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form 8-K
dated December 5, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2017, File No. 1-3526 as Exhibit 4(a)1, and in Form 8-K dated November
17, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 4.4.)
 Alabama Power
  (b)
 1
 — Subordinated Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 1997, between Alabama Power and
Regions Bank, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures supplemental thereto through
October 2, 2002. (Designated in Form 8-K dated January 9, 1997, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibits 4.1, and in Form 8-K dated September 26, 2002, File No. 3164, as Exhibit 4.9-B.)
  (b)
 2
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of December 1, 1997, between Alabama Power and Regions
Bank, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures supplemental thereto through June 28,
2018. (Designated in Form 8-K dated December 4, 1997, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.1,
in Form 8-K dated December 6, 2002, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated
February 11, 2003, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated March 12, 2003,
File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 8, 2008, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated February 26, 2009, File No. 1-3164 as Exhibit 4.2, in Form
8-K dated September 27, 2010, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated
March 3, 2011, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 18, 2011, File
No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated May 18, 2011, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated January 10, 2012, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in
Form 8-K dated November 27, 2012, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated
December 3, 2013, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated August 20, 2014,
File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated March 5, 2015, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated April 9, 2015, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6(b), in Form 8-
K dated January 8, 2016, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated February 27,
2017, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit 4.6, in Form 8-K dated November 2, 2017, File No. 1-
3164, as Exhibit 4.6, and in Form 8-K dated June 21, 2018, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit
4.6.)
  (b)
 3
 — Amended and Restated Trust Agreement of Alabama Power Capital Trust V dated as of
October 1, 2002. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September 26, 2002, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 4.12-B.)
  (b)
 4
 — Guarantee Agreement relating to Alabama Power Capital Trust V dated as of October 1,
2002. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September 26, 2002, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit
4.16-B.)
E-3
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 Georgia Power
 (c)
 1
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 1998, between Georgia Power and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures
supplemental thereto through August 8, 2017. (Designated in Form 8-K dated January 21,
1998, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibits 4.1, in Form 8-K dated April 10, 2003, File No. 1-6468,
as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated March 6, 2007, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form
8-K dated February 4, 2009, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated
December 8, 2009, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 24, 2010, File
No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated August 26, 2010, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit
4.2, in Form 8-K dated February 29, 2012, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K
dated May 8, 2012, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated March 12, 2013,
File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated March 2, 2016, File No. 1-6468, as
Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated March 2, 2016, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(b), in
Form 8-K dated February 28, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(a), in Form 8-K dated
February 28, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2(b), and in Form 8-K dated August 3,
2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2.)
 (c)
 2
 — Subordinated Note Indenture, dated as of September 1, 2017, between Georgia Power and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and First Supplemental Indenture
thereto dated as of September 21, 2017. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September 18,
2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.3, and in Form 8-K dated September 18, 2017, File No.
1-6468, as Exhibit 4.4.)
 (c)
 3
 — Loan Guarantee Agreement between Georgia Power and the DOE dated as of February 20,
2014, Amendment No. 1 thereto dated as of June 4, 2015, Amendment No. 2 thereto dated
as of March 9, 2016, Amendment No. 3 thereto dated as of July 27, 2017, and Amendment
No. 4 thereto dated as of December 8, 2017. (Designated in Form 8-K dated February 20,
2014, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2015,
File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(c)1, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016,
File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4(c)3, in Form 8-K dated July 27, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as
Exhibit 4.1, and in Form 8-K dated December 8, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.1.)
 (c)
 4
 — Note Purchase Agreement among Georgia Power, the DOE, and the Federal Financing
Bank dated as of February 20, 2014. (Designated in Form 8-K dated February 20, 2014,
File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.2.)
 (c)
 5
 — Future Advance Promissory Note dated February 20, 2014 made by Georgia Power to the
FFB. (Designated in Form 8-K dated February 20, 2014, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.3.)
 (c)
 6
 — Deed to Secure Debt, Security Agreement and Fixture Filing between Georgia Power and
PNC Bank, National Association, doing business as Midland Loan Services Inc., a division
of PNC Bank, National Association dated as of February 20, 2014. (Designated in Form 8-
K dated February 20, 2014, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.4.)
 (c)
 7
 — Owners Consent to Assignment and Direct Agreement and Amendment to Plant Alvin W.
Vogtle Additional Units Ownership Participation Agreement by and among Georgia Power,
OPC, MEAG Power, and Dalton dated as of February 20, 2014. (Designated in Form 8-K
dated February 20, 2014, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 4.5.)
 Mississippi Power
 (d)
 1
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of May 1, 1998, between Mississippi Power and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures
supplemental thereto through March 27, 2018. (Designated in Form 8-K dated May 14,
1998, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated October 11, 2011, File
No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated March 5, 2012, File No. 001-11229,
as Exhibit 4.2(b), in Form 8-K dated March 22, 2018, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit
4.2(a) and in Form 8-K dated March 22, 2018, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 4.2(b).)
E-4
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 Southern Power
 (e)
 1
 — Senior Note Indenture dated as of June 1, 2002, between Southern Power Company and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Successor Trustee, and certain indentures
supplemental thereto through November 20, 2017. (Designated in Registration No. 333-
98553 as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated September 14, 2011, File No. 333-98553, as
Exhibit 4.4, in Form 8-K dated July 10, 2013, File No. 333-98553, as Exhibit 4.4, in Form
8-K dated May 14, 2015, File No. 333-98553, as Exhibit 4.4(b), in Form 8-K dated
November 12, 2015, File No. 333-98553, as Exhibit 4.4(a), in Form 8-K dated June 13,
2016, File No. 001-37803, as Exhibit 4.4(a), in Form 8-K dated June 13, 2016, File No.
001-37803, as Exhibit 4.4(b), in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2016, File
No. 001-37803, as Exhibit 4(f)1, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2016,
File No. 001-37803, as Exhibit 4(f)2, in Form 8-K dated November 10, 2016, File No. 001-
37803, as Exhibit 4.4(a), in Form 8-K dated November 10, 2016, File No. 001-37803, as
Exhibit 4.4(b), in Form 8-K dated November 10, 2016, File No. 001-37803, as Exhibit
4.4(c), and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No 001-37803, as
Exhibit 4(f)2.)
 Southern Company Gas
 (f)
 1
 — Indenture dated February 20, 2001 between AGL Capital Corporation, AGL Resources Inc.,
and The Bank of New York, as Trustee. (Designated in Form S-3, File No. 333-69500, as
Exhibit 4.2.)
 (f)
 2
 — Southern Company Gas Capital Corporation's 6.00% Senior Notes due 2034, 5.25% Senior
Notes due 2019, Form of 3.50% Senior Notes due 2021, 5.875% Senior Notes due 2041,
Form of Series B Senior Notes due 2018, 4.40% Senior Notes due 2043, 3.875% Senior
Notes due 2025, 3.250% Senior Notes due 2026, Form of 2.450% Senior Note due October
1, 2023, Form of 3.950% Senior Note due October 1, 2046, and Form of Series 2017A
4.400% Senior Note due May 30, 2047. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September 22,
2004, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated August 5, 2009, File No. 1-
14174, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated September 15, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as
Exhibit 4.1, in Form 8-K dated March 16, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1, in Form
8-K dated August 31, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 13,
2013, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated November 13, 2015, File No. 1-
14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 13, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.2,
in Form 8-K dated September 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1(a), in Form 8-K
dated September 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1(b), and in Form 8-K dated May
5, 2017, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.1, respectively.)
 (f)
 3
 — Southern Company Gas' Guarantee related to the 6.00% Senior Notes due 2034, Guarantee
related to the 5.25% Senior Notes due 2019, Guarantee related to the 5.875% Senior Notes
due 2041, Form of Guarantee related to the 3.50% Senior Notes due 2021, Guarantee
related to the 4.40% Senior Notes due 2043, Guarantee related to the 3.875% Senior Notes
due 2025, Guarantee related to the 3.250% Senior Notes due 2026, Form of Guarantee
related to the 2.450% Senior Notes due October 1, 2023, Form of Guarantee related to the
3.950% Senior Notes due October 1, 2046, and Form of Guarantee related to the Series
2017A 4.400% Senior Notes due May 30, 2047. (Designated in Form 8-K dated September
22, 2004, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3, in Form 8-K dated March 16, 2011, File No. 1-
14174, as Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated September 15, 2011, File No. 1-14174, as
Exhibit 4.2, in Form 8-K dated May 13, 2013, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3, in Form 8-
K dated November 13, 2015, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3, in Form 8-K dated May 13,
2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3, in Form 8-K dated September 8, 2016, File No. 1-
14174, as Exhibit 4.3(a), in Form 8-K dated September 8, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as
Exhibit 4.3(b), and in Form 8-K dated May 5, 2017, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4.3,
respectively.)
 (f)
 4
 — Indenture dated December 1, 1989 of Atlanta Gas Light Company and First Supplemental
Indenture thereto dated March 16, 1992. (Designated in Form S-3, File No. 33-32274, as
Exhibit 4(a) and in Form S-3, File No. 33-46419, as Exhibit 4(a).)
E-5
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
  (f) 5 —Indenture of Commonwealth Edison Company to Continental Illinois National Bank and
Trust Company of Chicago, Trustee, dated as of January 1, 1954, Indenture of Adoption of
Northern Illinois Gas Company to Continental Illinois National Bank and Trust Company
of Chicago, Trustee, dated February 9, 1954, and certain indentures supplemental thereto.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1995, File No. 1-7296, as
Exhibit 4.01, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1995, File No. 1-7296, as
Exhibit 4.02, in Registration No. 2-56578 as Exhibits 2.21 and 2.25, in Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 1996, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.01, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 1997, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.19, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2003, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.09, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2003, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.10, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2003, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.11, in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2006, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.11, in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2008, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.01, in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 31, 2009, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4.01, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2012, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 4, in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2016, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4(g)6, in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2017, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4(g)6, and in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2018, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 4(g)1.)
    
(10)Material Contracts
 Southern Company
 # (a) 1 — Southern Company 2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan effective May 25, 2011.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated May 25, 2011, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10.1.)
 # (a) 2 — Form of Stock Option Award Agreement for Executive Officers of Southern Company
under the Southern Company Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2011, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)3.)
 # (a) 3 — Deferred Compensation Plan for Outside Directors of The Southern Company, Amended
and Restated effective January 1, 2008 and First Amendment thereto effective April 1,
2015. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, File No. 1-3526,
as Exhibit 10(a)3 and in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2015, File No. 1-3526,
as Exhibit 10(a)2.)
 # (a) 4 — Southern Company Deferred Compensation Plan, Amended and Restated as of January 1,
2018. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No. 1-3536,
as Exhibit 10(a)4.)
 # (a) 5 — The Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, Amended and Restated
effective June 30, 2016, Amendment No. 1 thereto effective January 1, 2017, Amendment
No. 2 thereto effective January 1, 2018, and Amendment No. 3 thereto effective April 1,
2018. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)1, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-3536, as
Exhibit 10(a)18, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)16, and in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-3526,
as Exhibit 10(a)1.)
 # (a) 6 — The Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan, Amended and Restated effective as of
June 30, 2016, Amendment No. 1 thereto effective January 1, 2017, Amendment No. 2
thereto effective January 1, 2018, and Amendment No. 3 thereto effective April 1, 2018.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
10(a)2, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-3536, as Exhibit
10(a)19, in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
10(a)17, and in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)2.)
 # (a) 7 — The Southern Company Change in Control Benefits Protection Plan (an amendment and
restatement of The Southern Company Change in Control Benefit Plan Determination
Policy), effective December 31, 2008 and Amendment No. 1 thereto effective March 1,
2018. (Designated in Form 8-K dated December 31, 2008, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
10.1 and in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
10(a)3.)
E-6
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 # (a) 8 —
 Deferred Compensation Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its
Subsidiaries, Amended and Restated effective January 1, 2001, between Wells Fargo Bank,
N.A., as successor to Wachovia Bank, N.A., Southern Company, SCS, Alabama Power,
Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Linc, Southern Company Energy Solutions,
LLC, and Southern Nuclear and First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2000, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)103 and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-
3526, as Exhibit 10(a)16.)
 # (a) 9 —
 Deferred Stock Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its Subsidiaries,
Amended and Restated effective January 1, 2000, between Reliance Trust Company,
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power and First
Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2000, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)104 and in Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)18.)
 # (a) 10 —
 Deferred Cash Compensation Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its
Subsidiaries, Amended and Restated effective September 1, 2001, between Wells Fargo
Bank, N.A., as successor to Wachovia Bank, N.A., Southern Company, Alabama Power,
Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power and First Amendment thereto effective January 1,
2009. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001, File No. 1-3526,
as Exhibit 10(a)92 and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-
3526, as Exhibit 10(a)20.)
 # (a) 11 —
 Southern Company Senior Executive Change in Control Severance Plan, Amended and
Restated effective December 31, 2008, First Amendment thereto effective October 19,
2009, and Second Amendment thereto effective February 22, 2011. (Designated in Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)23, in Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)22, and in
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)16.)
 # (a) 12 —
 Southern Company Executive Change in Control Severance Plan, Amended and Restated
effective December 31, 2008 and First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2010.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)24 and in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, File No. 1-3526,
as Exhibit 10(a)24.)
 # (a) 13 —
 Form of Terms for Performance Share Awards granted under the Southern Company 2011
Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)1).
 # (a) 14 —
 Outside Directors Stock Plan for The Southern Company and its Subsidiaries effective June
1, 2015. (Designated in Definitive Proxy Statement filed April 10, 2015, File No. 1-3526,
as Appendix A.)
 # (a) 15 —
 Deferred Compensation Agreement between Southern Company, SCS, Alabama Power,
and Mark A. Crosswhite, effective July 30, 2008. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)17.)
 (a) 16 —
 The Southern Company Employee Savings Plan, Amended and Restated effective January
1, 2018. (Designated in Post-Effective Amendment No. 1 to Form S-8, File No. 333-
212783 as Exhibit 4.3.)
 # (a) 17 —
 Form of Terms for Restricted Stock Unit with Performance Measure Awards granted under
the Southern Company 2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)2.)
 # (a) 18 —
 Letter Agreement among Southern Company Gas, Southern Company, and Andrew W.
Evans and Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement, dated September 29, 2016.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as
Exhibit 10(a)3.)
 # (a) 19 —
 Form of Time-Vesting Restricted Stock Unit Awards granted under the Southern Company
2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2017, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 10(a)4.)
 # (a) 20 —
 Consulting Agreement between SCS and Arthur P. Beattie effective August 1, 2018.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2018, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit
10(a)1.)
 #   *(a) 21 —
 First Amendment to the Southern Company Deferred Compensation Plan, dated December
7, 2018.
 #   *(a) 22 —
 Second Amendment to the Southern Company Deferred Compensation Plan, dated January
29, 2019.
E-7
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 #   *(a) 23 —
 Fourth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan,
dated December 7, 2018.
 #   *(a) 24 —
 Fifth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan,
dated January 29, 2019.
 #   *(a) 25—
 Fourth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan, dated December
14, 2018.
 #   *(a) 26—
 Fifth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan, dated January 29,
2019.
 #   *(a) 27—
 Second Amendment to the Deferred Stock Trust Agreement For Directors of Southern
Company and Its Subsidiaries, dated December 29, 2018.
 #   *(a) 28—
 Second Amendment to the Deferred Cash Compensation Trust Agreement For Directors of
Southern Company and Its Subsidiaries, dated December 21, 2018.
 Alabama Power
 (b) 1 —
 Intercompany Interchange Contract as revised effective May 1, 2007, among Alabama
Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company, and
SCS. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2007, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 10(b)5.)
 *(b) 2 —
 Appendix A to the Southern Company System Intercompany Interchange Contract, dated as
of January 1, 2019.
 # (b) 3 —
 Southern Company 2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan effective May 25, 2011.
See Exhibit 10(a)1 herein.
 # (b) 4 —
 Form of Stock Option Award Agreement for Executive Officers of Southern Company
under the Southern Company Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)2
herein.
 # (b) 5 —
 Southern Company Deferred Compensation Plan, Amended and Restated as of January 1,
2018. See Exhibit 10(a)4 herein.
 # (b) 6 —
 The Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, Amended and Restated
effective June 30, 2016 and Amendment No. 1 thereto effective January 1, 2017. See
Exhibit 10(a)5 herein.
 # (b) 7 —
 The Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan, Amended and Restated effective as of
June 30, 2016 and Amendment No. 1 thereto effective January 1, 2017. See Exhibit 10(a)6
herein.
 # (b) 8 —
 Southern Company Executive Change in Control Severance Plan, Amended and Restated
effective December 31, 2008 and First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2010. See
Exhibit 10(a)12 herein.
 # (b) 9 —
 Deferred Compensation Plan for Outside Directors of Alabama Power Company, Amended
and Restated effective January 1, 2008 and First Amendment thereto effective June 1, 2015.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2008, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit
10(b)1 and in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2015, File No. 1-3164, as Exhibit
10(b)1.)
 # (b) 10 —
 The Southern Company Change in Control Benefits Protection Plan (an amendment and
restatement of The Southern Company Change in Control Benefit Plan Determination
Policy), effective December 31, 2008. See Exhibit 10(a)7 herein.
 # (b) 11 —
 Deferred Compensation Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its
Subsidiaries, Amended and Restated effective January 1, 2001, between Wells Fargo Bank,
N.A., as successor to Wachovia Bank, N.A., Southern Company, SCS, Alabama Power,
Georgia Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Linc, Southern Company Energy Solutions,
LLC, and Southern Nuclear and First Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009. See
Exhibit 10(a)8 herein.
 # (b) 12 —
 Deferred Stock Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its Subsidiaries,
Amended and Restated effective January 1, 2000, between Reliance Trust Company,
Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power and First
Amendment thereto effective January 1, 2009. See Exhibit 10(a)9 herein.
 # (b) 13 — Deferred Cash Compensation Trust Agreement for Directors of Southern Company and its
Subsidiaries, Amended and Restated effective September 1, 2001, between Wells Fargo
Bank, N.A., as successor to Wachovia Bank, N.A., Southern Company, Alabama Power,
Georgia Power, and Mississippi Power and First Amendment thereto effective January 1,
2009. See Exhibit 10(a)10 herein.
E-8
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 # (b)
 14
 — Southern Company Senior Executive Change in Control Severance Plan, Amended and
Restated effective December 31, 2008, First Amendment thereto effective October 19,
2009, and Second Amendment thereto effective February 22, 2011. See Exhibit 10(a)11
herein.
 # (b)
 15
 — Form of Terms for Performance Share Awards granted under the Southern Company 2011
Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)13 herein.
 # (b)
 16
 — Deferred Compensation Agreement between Southern Company, Alabama Power, Georgia
Power, Mississippi Power, and SCS and Philip C. Raymond dated September 15, 2010.
(Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010, File No. 1-3164, as
Exhibit 10(b)2.)
 # (b)
 17
 — Deferred Compensation Agreement between Southern Company, SCS, Alabama Power,
and Mark A. Crosswhite, effective July 30, 2008. See Exhibit 10(a)15 herein.
 # (b)
 18
 — Outside Directors Stock Plan for The Southern Company and its Subsidiaries effective June
1, 2015. See Exhibit 10(a)14 herein.
 # (b)
 19
 — Form of Terms for Restricted Stock Unit with Performance Measure Awards granted under
the Southern Company 2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)17
herein.
 # (b)
 20
 — Form of Time-Vesting Restricted Stock Unit Awards granted under the Southern Company
2011 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. See Exhibit 10(a)19 herein.
 # (b)
 21
 — First Amendment to the Southern Company Deferred Compensation Plan, dated December
7, 2018. See Exhibit 10(a)21 herein.
 # (b)
 22
 — Second Amendment to the Southern Company Deferred Compensation Plan, dated January
29, 2019.  See Exhibit 10(a)22 herein.
 # (b)
 23
 — Fourth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan,
dated December 7, 2018. See Exhibit 10(a)23 herein.
 # (b)
 24
 — Fifth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan,
dated January 29, 2019.  (See Exhibit 10(a)24 herein.
 # (b)
 25
 — Fourth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan, dated December
14, 2018. See Exhibit 10(a)25 herein.
 # (b)
 26
 — Fifth Amendment to the Southern Company Supplemental Benefit Plan, dated January 29,
2019.  See Exhibit 10(a)26 herein.
 # (b)
 27
 — Second Amendment to the Deferred Stock Trust Agreement For Directors of Southern
Company and Its Subsidiaries, dated December 29, 2018. See Exhibit 10(a)27 herein.
 # (b)
 28
 — Second Amendment to the Deferred Cash Compensation Trust Agreement For Directors of
Southern Company and Its Subsidiaries, dated December 21, 2018. See Exhibit 10(a)28
herein.
 Georgia Power
 (c)
 1
 — Intercompany Interchange Contract as revised effective May 1, 2007, among Alabama
Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company, and
SCS. See Exhibit 10(b)1 herein.
 (c)
 2
 — Appendix A to the Southern Company System Intercompany Interchange Contract, dated as
of January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(b)2 herein.
 (c)
 3
 — Revised and Restated Integrated Transmission System Agreement dated as of
November 12, 1990, between Georgia Power and OPC. (Designated in Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 1990, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(g).)
 (c)
 4
 — Revised and Restated Integrated Transmission System Agreement between Georgia Power
and Dalton dated as of December 7, 1990. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1990, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(gg).)
 (c)
 5
 — Revised and Restated Integrated Transmission System Agreement between Georgia Power
and MEAG dated as of December 7, 1990. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1990, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(hh).)
E-9
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 (c)
 6
 — Interim Assessment Agreement dated as of March 29, 2017, by and among Georgia Power,
for itself and as agent for OPC, MEAG, and Dalton, and Westinghouse, WECTEC Staffing
Services LLC, and WECTEC Global Project Services, Inc., Amendment 1 thereto dated as
of April 28, 2017, Amendment 2 thereto dated as of May 12, 2017, Amendment 3 thereto
dated as of June 3, 2017, Amendment 4 thereto dated as of June 5, 2017, Amendment 5
thereto dated as of March 29, 2017, Amendment 6 thereto dated as of June 22, 2017,
Amendment 7 thereto dated as of June 28, 2017 and Amendment 8 thereto dated as of July
20, 2017. (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, File No. 1-
6468, as Exhibit 10(c)3, in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017, File No. 1-
6468, as Exhibit 10(c)4, in Form 8-K dated May 12, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit
10.1, in Form 8-K dated June 3, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1, in Form 8-K dated
June 5, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1, in Form 8-K dated June 16, 2017, File No.
1-6468, as Exhibit 10.2, in Form 8-K dated June 22, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1,
in Form 8-K dated June 28, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1, and in Form 8-K dated
July 20, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1.)
 (c)
 7
 — Settlement Agreement dated as of June 9, 2017, by and among Georgia Power, OPC,
MEAG, Dalton, and Toshiba and Amendment No. 1 thereto dated as of December 8, 2017.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated June 16, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1 and in
Form 8-K dated December 8, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10.1.)
 (c)
 8
 — Amended and Restated Services Agreement dated as of June 20, 2017, by and among
Georgia Power, for itself and as agent for OPC, MEAG, MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC, MEAG
Power SPVM, LLC, MEAG Power SPVP, LLC, and Dalton, and Westinghouse and
WECTEC Global Project Services, Inc. (Georgia Power requested confidential treatment
for certain portions of this document pursuant to an application for confidential treatment
sent to the SEC. Georgia Power omitted such portions from the filing and filed them
separately with the SEC.) (Designated in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2017,
File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(c)9.)
 (c)
 9
 — Construction Completion Agreement dated as of October 23, 2017, between Georgia
Power, for itself and as agent for OPC, MEAG, MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC, MEAG Power
SPVM, LLC, MEAG Power SPVP, LLC, and Dalton, and Bechtel. (Georgia Power has
requested confidential treatment for certain portions of this document pursuant to an
application for confidential treatment sent to the SEC. Georgia Power omitted such
portions from the filing and filed them separately with the SEC.) (Designated in Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No. 1-6468, as Exhibit 10(c)8.)
 *(c)
 10
 — Amendment No. 1 to Construction Completion Agreement dated as of October 12, 2018,
between Georgia Power, for itself and as agent for OPC, MEAG, MEAG Power SPVJ,
LLC, MEAG Power SPVM, LLC, MEAG Power SPVP, LLC, and Dalton, and
Bechtel. (Georgia Power has requested confidential treatment for certain portions of this
document pursuant to an application for confidential treatment sent to the SEC. Georgia
Power omitted such portions from the filing and filed them separately with the SEC.)
 (c)
 11
 — Plant Alvin W. Vogtle Additional Units Ownership Participation Agreement dated as of
April 21, 2006, among Georgia Power, OPC, MEAG, and The City of Dalton, Georgia,
Amendment 1 thereto dated as of April 8, 2008, Amendment 2 thereto dated as of February
20, 2014, Agreement Regarding Additional Participating Party Rights and Amendment 3
thereto dated as of November 2, 2017, and First Amendment to Agreement Regarding
Additional Participating Party Rights and Amendment No. 3 to Plant Alvin W. Vogtle
Additional Units Ownership Participation Agreement, dated as of August 31, 2018.
(Designated in Form 8-K dated April 21, 2006, File No. 33-7591, as Exhibit 10.4.4, in
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013, File No. 000-53908, as Exhibit
10.3.2(a), in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013, File No. 000-53908, as
Exhibit 10.3.2(b), in Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2017, File No. 000-
53908, as Exhibit 10.1, and in Form 8-K dated August 31, 2018, File No. 1-6468, as
Exhibit 10.1.)
 * (c)
 12
 — Global Amendments to Vogtle Additional Units Agreements, dated as of February 18, 2019,
among Georgia Power, OPC, MEAG, MEAG Power SPVJ, LLC, MEAG Power SPVM,
LLC, MEAG Power SPVP, LLC, and Dalton.
 Mississippi Power
 (d)
 1
 — Intercompany Interchange Contract as revised effective May 1, 2007, among Alabama
Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company, and
SCS. See Exhibit 10(b)1 herein.
 (d)
 2
 — Appendix A to the Southern Company System Intercompany Interchange Contract, dated as
of January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(b)2 herein.
E-10
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
  (d) 3 — Transmission Facilities Agreement dated February 25, 1982, Amendment No. 1 dated
May 12, 1982 and Amendment No. 2 dated December 6, 1983, between Entergy
Corporation (formerly Gulf States) and Mississippi Power. (Designated in Form 10-K for
the year ended December 31, 1981, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 10(f), in Form 10-K for
the year ended December 31, 1982, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 10(f)(2), and in Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 1983, File No. 001-11229, as Exhibit 10(f)(3).)
  (d) 4 — Cooperative Agreement between the DOE and SCS dated as of December 12, 2008.
(Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, File No. 001-11229, as
Exhibit 10(e)22.) (Mississippi Power requested confidential treatment for certain portions
of this document pursuant to an application for confidential treatment sent to the SEC.
Mississippi Power omitted such portions from this filing and filed them separately with the
SEC.)
 Southern Power
  (e) 1 —Intercompany Interchange Contract as revised effective May 1, 2007, among Alabama
Power, Georgia Power, Gulf Power, Mississippi Power, Southern Power Company, and
SCS. See Exhibit 10(b)1 herein.
  (e) 2 — Appendix A to the Southern Company System Intercompany Interchange Contract, dated as
of January 1, 2019. See Exhibit 10(b)2 herein.
 Southern Company Gas
  (f) 1 — Final Allocation Agreement dated January 3, 2008. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2007, File No. 1-7296, as Exhibit 10.15.)
  (f) 2 — Asset Purchase Agreement, dated as of October 15, 2017, by and between Pivotal Utility
Holdings, Inc., as Seller, and South Jersey Industries, Inc., as Buyer. (Designated in Form
8-K dated October 15, 2017, File No. 1-14174, as Exhibit 10.1.)
    
(14)Code of Ethics
 Southern Company
  (a) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. (Designated in Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2016, File No. 1-3526, as Exhibit 14(a).)
 Alabama Power
  (b) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
 Georgia Power
  (c) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
 Mississippi Power
  (d) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
 Southern Power
  (e) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
 Southern Company Gas
  (f) — The Southern Company Code of Ethics. See Exhibit 14(a) herein.
    
(21)Subsidiaries of Registrants
 Southern Company
 *(a) — Subsidiaries of Registrant.
 Alabama Power
  (b) — Subsidiaries of Registrant. See Exhibit 21(a) herein.
 Georgia Power
  Omitted pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(b) of Form 10-K.
 Mississippi Power
  Omitted pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(b) of Form 10-K.
 Southern Power
  Omitted pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(b) of Form 10-K.
 Southern Company Gas
  Omitted pursuant to General Instruction I(2)(b) of Form 10-K
E-11
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
    
(23)Consents of Experts and Counsel
 Southern Company
 *(a) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Alabama Power
 *(b) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Georgia Power
 *(c) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Mississippi Power
 *(d) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Southern Power
 *(e) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f) 1— Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP.
 *(f) 2— Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP.
 *(f) 3— Consent of BDO USA, LLP.
    
(24)Powers of Attorney and Resolutions
 Southern Company
 *(a) 1— Power of Attorney and resolution.
 *(a) 2— Power of Attorney of Janaki Akella and Anthony F. Earley, Jr.
 Alabama Power
 *(b) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
 Georgia Power
 *(c) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
 Mississippi Power
 *(d) — Power of Attorney and resolution.
 Southern Power
 *(e) 1— Power of Attorney and resolution.
 *(e) 2— Power of Attorney for Stan W. Connally.
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f) 1— Power of Attorney and resolution.
 *(f) 2— Power of Attorney of Daniel S. Tucker.
    
(31)Section 302 Certifications
 Southern Company
 *(a)
 1 — Certificate of Southern Company's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(a)
 2 — Certificate of Southern Company's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Alabama Power
 *(b)
 1 — Certificate of Alabama Power's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(b)
 2 — Certificate of Alabama Power's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Georgia Power
 *(c)
 1 — Certificate of Georgia Power's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(c)
 2 — Certificate of Georgia Power's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
E-12
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
 Mississippi Power
 *(d) 1 —
 Certificate of Mississippi Power's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(d) 2 —
 Certificate of Mississippi Power's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Southern Power
 *(e) 1 —
 Certificate of Southern Power Company's Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(e) 2 —
 Certificate of Southern Power Company's Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f) 1 —
 Certificate of Southern Company Gas' Chief Executive Officer required by Section 302 of
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 *(f) 2 —
 Certificate of Southern Company Gas' Chief Financial Officer required by Section 302 of
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
      
(32)Section 906 Certifications
 Southern Company
 *(a)
 —
 Certificate of Southern Company's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Alabama Power
 *(b)
 —
 Certificate of Alabama Power's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Georgia Power
 *(c)
 —
 Certificate of Georgia Power's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Mississippi Power
 *(d)
 —
 Certificate of Mississippi Power's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Southern Power
 *(e)
 —
 Certificate of Southern Power Company's Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f)
 —
 Certificate of Southern Company Gas' Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
required by Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
      
(99)Additional Exhibits
 Southern Company Gas
 *(f)
 —
 The financial statements of Southern Natural Gas Company, L.L.C., pursuant to Rule 3-09
of Regulation S-X.
      
(101)XBRL-Related Documents
 *INS  — XBRL Instance Document
 *SCH — XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
 *CAL — XBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document
 *DEF — XBRL Definition Linkbase Document
 *LAB — XBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document
 *PRE — XBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document
** Schedules and exhibits have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K. A copy of any omitted schedule or
exhibit will be furnished supplementally to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request; provided, however, that each
registrant may request confidential treatment pursuant to Rule 24b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, for any
schedules or exhibits so furnished.
E-13
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
THE SOUTHERN COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
THE SOUTHERN COMPANY
By:Thomas A. Fanning
 Chairman, President, and
 Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2019
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Thomas A. Fanning
Chairman, President, and
Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)  
Andrew W. Evans
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)  
Ann P. Daiss
Comptroller and Chief Accounting Officer
(Principal Accounting Officer)  
Directors:
Janaki Akella
Juanita Powell Baranco
Jon A. Boscia
Henry A. Clark III
Anthony F. Earley, Jr.
David J. Grain
Veronica M. Hagen
Donald M. JamesJohn D. Johns
Dale E. Klein
Ernest J. Moniz
William G. Smith, Jr.
Steven R. Specker
Larry D. Thompson
E. Jenner Wood III
By: /s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2019
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
ALABAMA POWER COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
ALABAMA POWER COMPANY
By:Mark A. Crosswhite
 Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2019
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Mark A. Crosswhite
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)   
Philip C. Raymond
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and
Treasurer
(Principal Financial Officer)   
Anita Allcorn-Walker
Vice President and Comptroller
(Principal Accounting Officer)   
Directors:   
Whit Armstrong
Angus R. Cooper, III
O. B. Grayson Hall, Jr.
Anthony A. Joseph
James K. LowderRobert D. Powers
Catherine J. Randall
C. Dowd Ritter
R. Mitchell Shackleford, III
Phillip M. Webb
  
By: /s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2019
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
GEORGIA POWER COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
GEORGIA POWER COMPANY
By:W. Paul Bowers
 Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2019
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
W. Paul Bowers
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)  
Xia Liu
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer,
and Treasurer
(Principal Financial Officer)  
David P. Poroch
Comptroller and Vice President
(Principal Accounting Officer)  
Directors:  
Mark L. Burns
Shantella E. Cooper
Lawrence L. Gellerstedt III
Douglas J. Hertz
Kessel D. Stelling, Jr.Jimmy C. Tallent
Charles K. Tarbutton
Beverly Daniel Tatum
Clyde C. Tuggle
 
By: /s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2019
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
MISSISSIPPI POWER COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
MISSISSIPPI POWER COMPANY
By:Anthony L. Wilson
 Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2019
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Anthony L. Wilson
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)
Moses H. Feagin
Vice President, Treasurer, and
Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)
Cynthia F. Shaw
Comptroller
(Principal Accounting Officer)
Directors:
Carl J. Chaney
L. Royce Cumbest
Thomas M. Duff
Mark E. KeenumChristine L. Pickering
M.L. Waters
Camille S. Young
By: /s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2019
Supplemental Information to be Furnished with Reports Filed Pursuant to Section 15(d) of the Act by Registrants Which
Have Not Registered Securities Pursuant to Section 12 of the Act:
Mississippi Power is not required to send an annual report or proxy statement to its sole shareholder and parent company, The
Southern Company, and will not prepare such a report after filing this Annual Report on Form 10-K for fiscal year 2018.
Accordingly, Mississippi Power will not file an annual report with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SOUTHERN POWER COMPANY
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
SOUTHERN POWER COMPANY
By: Mark S. Lantrip
 Chairman, President and Chief
Executive Officer
By: /s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2019
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Mark S. Lantrip
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)
William C. Grantham
Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and
Treasurer
(Principal Financial Officer)
Elliott L. Spencer
Comptroller and Corporate Secretary
(Principal Accounting Officer)
Directors:
Stan W. Connally
Andrew W. Evans
Thomas A. FanningKimberly S. Greene
James Y. Kerr, II
Christopher C. Womack
By: /s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2019
    Table of Contents                                Index to
Financial Statements
SOUTHERN COMPANY GAS
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized. The signature of the undersigned company shall be
deemed to relate only to matters having reference to such company and any subsidiaries thereof.
SOUTHERN COMPANY GAS
By:Kimberly S. Greene
 Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
By:/s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date:February 19, 2019
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. The signature of each of the undersigned shall be deemed to
relate only to matters having reference to the above-named company and any subsidiaries thereof.
 
Kimberly S. Greene
Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)
Daniel S. Tucker
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer
(Principal Financial Officer)
Grace A. Kolvereid
Senior Vice President and Comptroller
(Principal Accounting Officer)
Directors:
Sandra N. Bane
Thomas D. Bell, Jr.
Charles R. CrispBrenda J. Gaines
John E. Rau
James A. Rubright
By: /s/Melissa K. Caen
 (Melissa K. Caen, Attorney-in-fact)
Date: February 19, 2019
Supplemental Information to be Furnished with Reports Filed Pursuant to Section 15(d) of the Act by Registrants Which
Have Not Registered Securities Pursuant to Section 12 of the Act:
Southern Company Gas is not required to send an annual report or proxy statement to its sole shareholder and parent company, The
Southern Company, and will not prepare such a report after filing this Annual Report on Form 10-K for fiscal year 2018.
Accordingly, Southern Company Gas will not file an annual report with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
